[{"name": "Sabia-Fieber", "sub_name": "Brasilianisches h\u00e4morrhagisches Fieber", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Brazilian hemorrhagic fever, caused by the Sabia virus (a newly discovered arenavirus), is a viral hemorrhagic fever, believed to originate from Sao Paulo, Brazil, with only 3 reported cases (2 of which were due to laboratory accidents) to date, characterized by fever, nausea vomiting myalgia tremors, and hemorragic manifestations such as conjunctival petechia and haematemesis, leading potentially to shock, coma and death.", "synonyms": "Sabia hemorrhagic fever, ", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A96.8", "umls": "C0343633"}, {"name": "Saccharase-Isomaltase-Mangel, kongenitaler", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in europ\u00e4ischen Bev\u00f6lkerungen wird auf 1:5.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, h\u00f6her ist sie in den Urbev\u00f6lkerungen Alaskas, Gr\u00f6nlands und Kanadas.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, congenital carbohydrate intolerance disorder characterized by lack of endogenous sucrase activity, marked reduction in isomaltase activity, and moderate decrease in maltase activity, and clinically manifesting with diarrhea, abdominal pain and bloating, failure to thrive.", "synonyms": "CSID, Congenital sucrose intolerance, Disaccharide intolerance, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E74.3", "omim": "222900", "umls": "C1283620", "mesh": "C538139", "gard": "6183\u00a0 7710", "meddra": "10066387", "epidemiology": "The prevalence for the classical type in the European population is estimated at 1/5,000 but it is higher among the indigenous populations of Alaska, Greenland and Canada. Many cases are probably undiagnosed, especially in patients with milder phenotypes.", "clinical_description": "Onset is usually after weaning from breast milk or lactose-only formula to foods containing sucrose and/or starch. Clinical manifestations include osmotic diarrhea, abdominal bloating and discomfort, flatulence and vomiting. This may result in failure to thrive, dehydration and malnutrition. Mildly affected individuals may present with irritable bowel syndrome and loose/frequent stools. Symptom severity depends on residual sucrase and isomaltase activity, as well as the amount of sugar and starch consumed, and thus onset may be later in life. CSID may coexist with other disaccharidase deficiencies (e.g. lactase, maltase-glucoamylase and/or peptidase deficiencies).", "etiology": "CSID is caused by mutations in genes encoding the brush-border membrane complex, sucrase-isomaltase (SI), which is required for the breakdown of sucrose and starch into monosaccharides. These can then readily be absorbed in the gut facilitated by specific monosaccharide transporters. Amylase (salivary and pancreatic) facilitates the limited digestion of nutritional starch leading to oligomers but debranching has to be catalyzed by isomaltase. The SI deficiency results in an accumulation of disaccharides and glucose-oligomers in the lumen of the gut, causing the abdominal symptoms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis may be suspected after presentation with osmotic diarrhea, bloating, abdominal pain and failure to thrive. Duodenal or jejunal mucosal biopsy and assay of disaccharidases is the 'gold standard' diagnostic technique. Samples must be immediately frozen and transported frozen to the analytical lab as preanalytical errors result in false positive findings. Presumed diagnosis can be made by a flat sucrose tolerance test and development of gastrointestinal symptoms, or via the 13C-sucrose breath hydrogen test, which is neither specific nor sensitive. Genetic testing is both an alternative and a supplement to enzymatic studies.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes the numerous causes of chronic diarrhea (allergic gastroenteropathy, celiac disease, Crohn's disease, irritable bowel syndrome, infection, severe gastro-enteritis, cystic fibrosis, diverticulitis, lactose intolerance, glucose-galactose intolerance, and fructose intolerance) as well as secondary causes of sucrase-isomaltase deficiency (medication, environmental).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible when there is an index case. Due to relatively good treatment options and outcome, prenatal diagnosis is rarely indicated.", "genetic_counseling": "CSID is transmitted as an autosomal-recessive or autosomal-dominant trait. Offspring of affected individuals are obligate carriers. Heterozygous carriers may also experience symptoms like irritable bowel syndrome.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment used to be based on a strict sucrose- and starch-restricted diet. However, this is challenging and mostly still associated with CSID- symptoms. Regular consultation with a dietician is strongly recommended. Adjuvant enzyme replacement therapy (ERT) with sacrosidase is recommended to aid in sucrose digestion. The amount of enzyme given has to be titrated based on the residual sucrose activity and the amount of sucrose in the diet. However, sacrosidase ERT does not correct starch maldigestion, patients under sacrosidase treatment are often not symptom-free and still have to stick to starch restriction. Other tailor-made enzyme preparations distributed by specialized pharmacists contain a combination of sacrosidase, amylase and amyloglucosidases, and facilites the complete digestion of starch to monomers. Vitamin supplementation is typically required in infants and children.", "prognosis": "Dietary restriction typically reduces symptoms, but is not sufficient in most patients. Treatment with sacrosidase is effective but not able to mediate starch digestion, and starch-restriction is still necessary. Improved enzyme replacement therapy limits the need for starch restriction in many patients and, frequently, a normal unrestricted diet is possible."}, {"name": "Saccharopin-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Saccharopinurie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Hyperlysin\u00e4mie Typ II, Saccharopin-Dehydrogenase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E72.3", "OMIM": "268700", "UMLS": "C0268556\u00a0 C2936921", "MeSH": "C537218", "GARD": "314", "summary": "Die Saccharopinurie ist eine St\u00f6rung des Lysin-Stoffwechsels mit erh\u00f6hten Lysin-Blutspiegeln und vermehrter Urinausscheidung von Lysin. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die wenigen bisher mit Saccharopinurie beschriebenen Patienten wurden haupts\u00e4chlich wegen neurologischer St\u00f6rungen (z.B. spastische Diplegie) erfasst. Die Beziehung zwischen der Stoffwechselanomalie und den neurologischen St\u00f6rungen ist daher unklar. Die Saccharopinurie wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache ist ein Mangel des bi-funktionalen Enzyms Alpha-Aminoadipat-Semialdehyd-Synthase, kodiert vom AASS-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 7q31.3. Das Enzym hat die Funktion einer Lysin-Ketoglutarat-Reduktase (LKR) und einer Saccharopin-Dehydrogenase (SDH) und katalysiert die ersten beiden Schritte im Lysinabbau.Der Mangel der LKR-Aktivit\u00e4t ist bei der Saccharopinurie nur partiell. Eine spezifische Behandlung gibt es nicht, aber eine lysinarme Di\u00e4t ist in einigen F\u00e4llen evtl. hilfreich. "}, {"name": "Saccharopinurie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Hyperlysin\u00e4mie Typ II, Saccharopin-Dehydrogenase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E72.3", "OMIM": "268700", "UMLS": "C0268556\u00a0 C2936921", "MeSH": "C537218", "GARD": "314", "summary": "Die Saccharopinurie ist eine St\u00f6rung des Lysin-Stoffwechsels mit erh\u00f6hten Lysin-Blutspiegeln und vermehrter Urinausscheidung von Lysin. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die wenigen bisher mit Saccharopinurie beschriebenen Patienten wurden haupts\u00e4chlich wegen neurologischer St\u00f6rungen (z.B. spastische Diplegie) erfasst. Die Beziehung zwischen der Stoffwechselanomalie und den neurologischen St\u00f6rungen ist daher unklar. Die Saccharopinurie wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache ist ein Mangel des bi-funktionalen Enzyms Alpha-Aminoadipat-Semialdehyd-Synthase, kodiert vom AASS-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 7q31.3. Das Enzym hat die Funktion einer Lysin-Ketoglutarat-Reduktase (LKR) und einer Saccharopin-Dehydrogenase (SDH) und katalysiert die ersten beiden Schritte im Lysinabbau.Der Mangel der LKR-Aktivit\u00e4t ist bei der Saccharopinurie nur partiell. Eine spezifische Behandlung gibt es nicht, aber eine lysinarme Di\u00e4t ist in einigen F\u00e4llen evtl. hilfreich. "}, {"name": "Saccharoseintoleranz, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Saccharase-Isomaltase-Mangel, kongenitaler", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in europ\u00e4ischen Bev\u00f6lkerungen wird auf 1:5.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, h\u00f6her ist sie in den Urbev\u00f6lkerungen Alaskas, Gr\u00f6nlands und Kanadas.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, congenital carbohydrate intolerance disorder characterized by lack of endogenous sucrase activity, marked reduction in isomaltase activity, and moderate decrease in maltase activity, and clinically manifesting with diarrhea, abdominal pain and bloating, failure to thrive.", "synonyms": "CSID, Congenital sucrose intolerance, Disaccharide intolerance, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E74.3", "omim": "222900", "umls": "C1283620", "mesh": "C538139", "gard": "6183\u00a0 7710", "meddra": "10066387", "epidemiology": "The prevalence for the classical type in the European population is estimated at 1/5,000 but it is higher among the indigenous populations of Alaska, Greenland and Canada. Many cases are probably undiagnosed, especially in patients with milder phenotypes.", "clinical_description": "Onset is usually after weaning from breast milk or lactose-only formula to foods containing sucrose and/or starch. Clinical manifestations include osmotic diarrhea, abdominal bloating and discomfort, flatulence and vomiting. This may result in failure to thrive, dehydration and malnutrition. Mildly affected individuals may present with irritable bowel syndrome and loose/frequent stools. Symptom severity depends on residual sucrase and isomaltase activity, as well as the amount of sugar and starch consumed, and thus onset may be later in life. CSID may coexist with other disaccharidase deficiencies (e.g. lactase, maltase-glucoamylase and/or peptidase deficiencies).", "etiology": "CSID is caused by mutations in genes encoding the brush-border membrane complex, sucrase-isomaltase (SI), which is required for the breakdown of sucrose and starch into monosaccharides. These can then readily be absorbed in the gut facilitated by specific monosaccharide transporters. Amylase (salivary and pancreatic) facilitates the limited digestion of nutritional starch leading to oligomers but debranching has to be catalyzed by isomaltase. The SI deficiency results in an accumulation of disaccharides and glucose-oligomers in the lumen of the gut, causing the abdominal symptoms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis may be suspected after presentation with osmotic diarrhea, bloating, abdominal pain and failure to thrive. Duodenal or jejunal mucosal biopsy and assay of disaccharidases is the 'gold standard' diagnostic technique. Samples must be immediately frozen and transported frozen to the analytical lab as preanalytical errors result in false positive findings. Presumed diagnosis can be made by a flat sucrose tolerance test and development of gastrointestinal symptoms, or via the 13C-sucrose breath hydrogen test, which is neither specific nor sensitive. Genetic testing is both an alternative and a supplement to enzymatic studies.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes the numerous causes of chronic diarrhea (allergic gastroenteropathy, celiac disease, Crohn's disease, irritable bowel syndrome, infection, severe gastro-enteritis, cystic fibrosis, diverticulitis, lactose intolerance, glucose-galactose intolerance, and fructose intolerance) as well as secondary causes of sucrase-isomaltase deficiency (medication, environmental).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible when there is an index case. Due to relatively good treatment options and outcome, prenatal diagnosis is rarely indicated.", "genetic_counseling": "CSID is transmitted as an autosomal-recessive or autosomal-dominant trait. Offspring of affected individuals are obligate carriers. Heterozygous carriers may also experience symptoms like irritable bowel syndrome.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment used to be based on a strict sucrose- and starch-restricted diet. However, this is challenging and mostly still associated with CSID- symptoms. Regular consultation with a dietician is strongly recommended. Adjuvant enzyme replacement therapy (ERT) with sacrosidase is recommended to aid in sucrose digestion. The amount of enzyme given has to be titrated based on the residual sucrose activity and the amount of sucrose in the diet. However, sacrosidase ERT does not correct starch maldigestion, patients under sacrosidase treatment are often not symptom-free and still have to stick to starch restriction. Other tailor-made enzyme preparations distributed by specialized pharmacists contain a combination of sacrosidase, amylase and amyloglucosidases, and facilites the complete digestion of starch to monomers. Vitamin supplementation is typically required in infants and children.", "prognosis": "Dietary restriction typically reduces symptoms, but is not sufficient in most patients. Treatment with sacrosidase is effective but not able to mediate starch digestion, and starch-restriction is still necessary. Improved enzyme replacement therapy limits the need for starch restriction in many patients and, frequently, a normal unrestricted diet is possible."}, {"name": "Sack-Barabas-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, vaskul\u00e4rer Typ", "german_description": "Das Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom Typ IV, auch als vaskul\u00e4rer Typ des Ehlers-Danlos-Syndroms (EDS) bekannt, ist eine erbliche Erkrankung des Bindegewebes. Merkmale des EDS IV sind faziale Symptome (Akrogerie, bei den meisten Patienten), durchscheinende Haut am Stamm und den unteren R\u00fcckenpartien (mit auff\u00e4llig sichtbaren Gef\u00e4\u00dfen der Unterhaut), leichte Entstehung blauer Flecken und schwere Komplikationen an Arterien, Verdauungstrakt und Uterus, die selten, wenn \u00fcberhaupt, bei anderen Formen des EDS gesehen werden. Die Pr\u00e4valenz aller EDS-Formen zusammen wird auf 1:10.000 bis 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Das EDS Typ IV macht etwa 5-10% der F\u00e4lle aus. Die Gef\u00e4\u00dfkomplikationen k\u00f6nnen in allen anatomischen Regionen auftreten, bevorzugt in Arterien mit gro\u00dfem und mittlerem Durchmesser. Typisch sind Dissektionen der Vertebralarterien und Karotiden in ihren intra- und extrakranialen Anteilen (kavern\u00f6se Karotisfisteln). Es besteht ein hohes Risiko f\u00fcr Perforationen des Kolons. Risiken in der Schwangerschaft sind Uterus- und Gef\u00e4\u00dfrupturen. Das EDS Typ IV wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im COL3A1-Gen (Chromosomen-region 2q31), das f\u00fcr die Alpha1-Kette-Kette des Typ III-Kollagens kodiert. Die Diagnose beruht auf den klinischen Symptomen, nicht-invasiven bildgebenden Verfahren und dem Nachweis einer pathogenen Mutation im COL3A1-Gen. Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen im Kindesalter sind Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen und das Silverman-Syndrom, bei Erwachsenen sind die anderen Typen des EDS, das Marfan-Syndrom und das Loeys-Dietz-Syndrom (s. diese Termini) auzuschlie\u00dfen. Wenn in einer Familie die urs\u00e4chliche Mutation bekannt ist, kann ggf. eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Chorionzottenbiopsie und Amniozentese bedeuten f\u00fcr Schwangere mit EDS IV aber ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko. Eine spezifische Therapie gibt es nicht. Die medizinische Betreuung besteht deshalb in symptomatischer Behandlung und prophylaktischen Ma\u00dfnahmen. Komplikationen von seiten der Arterien, des Verdauungstraktes und des Uterus sind medizinische Notf\u00e4lle und erfordern schnellste Krankenhauseinweisung und intensiv-medizinische Versorgung. Invasive Bildgebungsverfahren sind kontraindiziert. Bei Gef\u00e4\u00dfkomplikationen wird f\u00fcr das EDS IV ein konservatives Vorgehen empfohlen, potentiell t\u00f6dliche Komplikationen erfordern aber ein chirurgisches Eingreifen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic connective tissue disorder typically characterized by the association of unexpected organ fragility (arterial/bowel/gravid uterine rupture) with inconstant physical features as thin, translucent skin, easy bruising and acrogeric traits.", "synonyms": "Arterial-ecchymotic EDS, EDS IV, Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type 4, Sack-Barabas syndrome, Vascular EDS, vEDS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q79.6", "omim": "130050", "umls": "C0268338", "gard": "2082", "epidemiology": "The true prevalence of vascular Ehlers-Danlos syndrome (vEDS) is unknown, due to underdiagnosis of both symptomatic and milder forms of the disease. Prevalence estimates range between 1/50 000 and 1/200 000.", "clinical_description": "Typical physical signs associated with vEDS are predominantly cutaneous, as easy bruising unrelated to trauma, thin translucent skin predominantly on the upper torso and abdomen, with abnormally visible veins. Wound healing may be delayed and may result in widened, papyraceous scars, particularly over prominent bony pressure points (knee). Extremities, particularly hands may appear prematurely aged (acrogeria). Characteristic facial features are prominent eyes, thin lips, sunken cheeks and a pinched nose. Hair loss, particularly notable in women may also be present. Clinical complications of vEDS typically start to occur in the late teenage years, more rarely during childhood, and may repeat at unpredictable time intervals through the entire adult life. Most common complications are arterial accidents involving medium size arteries, including dissections, aneurysms, arterial rupture and arteriovenous fistulas. Spontaneous carotid-cavernous fistula is almost pathognomic of vEDS. Digestive complications are dominated by spontaneous perforations of the sigmoid colon. Solid organ rupture as liver or spleen, may also occur. Other complications are gravid uterine rupture or arterial rupture in the peripartum period. Spontaneous, often recurrent hemo/pneumothoraces are not uncommon. Varicose veins are also commonly present in vEDS patients at a young age.", "etiology": "The disorder is caused by mutations in the COL3A1 gene (2q32.2), which encodes for the pro-alpha1-chains of type III procollagen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on the base of physical signs and clinical complications in probands, and requires the identification of a pathogenic variant within the COL3A1 gene by molecular genetic testing (single gene testing or multigene panel including COL3A1).", "differential_diagnosis": "Main differential diagnosis are other forms of Ehlers-Danlos syndromes, notably classical EDS (including COL1A1 variants leading to substitutions of arginine to cysteine residues in the triple helical domain), kyphoscoliotic EDS and periodontal EDS. Other rare connective tissue disorders are: Loeys-Dietz syndromes, polycystic kidney disease, and Marfan syndrome. In children with marked bruising, coagulation disorders and child abuse are sometimes considered.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Preimplantation and prenatal genetic diagnosis can be considered in families where the mutation is known.", "genetic_counseling": "Half of vEDS patients have inherited the pathogenic variant from an affected parent. The other half of patients have a de novo pathogenic variant, except for rare cases of parental COL3A1 somatic mosaicism. The pattern of inheritance is typically autosomal dominant, and thus there is a 50% risk of transmitting the disease to offspring. Rare cases of biallelic mutations have been reported. Therefore, genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Patient management requires a multidisciplinary care team, ideally in dedicated centers for vEDS patients. These centers coordinate follow-up of clinically silent patients and implement prophylactic measures. Acute onset, unexplained pain require emergency imaging by appropriate means to exclude arterial rupture. Acute arterial complications commonly require hospitalization with a conservative approach in most cases. Life-saving procedures (arterial rupture, bowel perforation, etc.) may require interventional radiology, vascular or bowel surgery. Medical management includes optimal blood pressure control to minimize arterial stress. Betablockers may be of interest in reducing arterial complications, but only one has been investigated in that indication (celiprolol). Angiotensin receptor blockers might also be beneficial and are currently being investigated.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable and depends in part on the type of pathogenic COL3A1 variant. There is also an important intra- and interfamilial heterogeneity in the age of onset of complications and life expectancy for the same variant. Overall, patients with vEDS are exposed to recurrent organ complications, estimated at a rate of 1.6 events/5 years, 1.3 events/5 years for arterial complications. Overall life-expectancy is reduced to a median 51 years of age, but with an important range in age of survival for individual patients."}, {"name": "sACL", "sub_name": "Lymphom, anaplastisch gro\u00dfzelliges", "german_description": "Die gro\u00dfzelligen anaplastischen Lymphome wurden bisher meist als Maligne Histiozytose bezeichnet. Sie machen etwa 10% der Lymphome im Kindesalter aus und manifestieren sich mit Befall der peripheren, mediastinalen oder abdominalen Lymphknoten, h\u00e4ufigen allgemeinen (Fieber), kutanen und visceralen Symptomen. Die Diagnose basiert auf der Morphologie und dem Nachweis von CD30 (Ki-1 oder BERH2)- und EMA-Antigenen in den malignen Zellen. In mehr als 80% der F\u00e4lle ist eine Translokation t(2;5)(p23;q35) nachweisbar, z.B. mit der PCR (Polymerase-Kettenreaktion). Die meisten Tumoren enthalten lymphoide T-Zellen oder Null-Zellen. Die klassische Behandlung besteht in einer intensiven kombinierten Chemotherapie, die in 80% zur Heilung f\u00fchrt. Die Betreuung erfordert ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team von erfahrenen p\u00e4diatrischen Onkologen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare and aggressive peripheral T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma, belonging to the group of CD30-positive lymphoproliferative disorders, which affects lymph nodes and extranodal sites. It is comprised of two sub-types, based on the expression of a protein called anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK): ALK positive and ALK negative ALCL.", "synonyms": "ALCL, CD30 positive anaplastic large cell lymphoma, Ki-1 positive anaplastic large cell lymphoma, Primary systemic ALCL, sACL, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "C84.6\u00a0 C84.7", "umls": "C0206180", "mesh": "D017728", "gard": "3112", "epidemiology": "ALCL accounts for approximately 3% of adult non-Hodgkin lymphomas and 10% to 20% of childhood lymphomas. Its prevalence is unknown. The ALK positive subtype usually affects children and young adults. The ALK negative subtype is more commonly found in older patients over the age of 40.", "clinical_description": "ALCL is characterized by peripheral, mediastinal, or abdominal lymph node involvement. It manifests with the development of painless and enlarged lymph nodes, especially in the neck or armpit (axillary lymph nodes). General symptoms include loss of appetite and fatigue as well as fever, weight loss, and night sweats (B symptoms). Mediastinal involvement manifests as cough, dypsnea and/or edema. ALCL can also extend to extranodal sites such as the bones, bone marrow, subcutaneous tissue, lungs, spleen and liver.", "etiology": "Etiology is unknown. In the ALK positive sub-type, the anaplastic lymphoma receptor tyrosine kinase ALK gene (2p23) is overexpressed due to a t(2;5)(p23;q35) translocation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on physical examination, medical history and is confirmed by histopathological and immunohistochemical evaluation of a lymph node biopsy. The biopsy shows a cohesive growth pattern, usually with lymph node-sinus involvement, with anaplastic cytology (atypical large cells with abundant cytoplasm, prominent nucleoli, and horseshoe-like or reniform nuclei), constant membrane expression of the CD30 antigen, EMA (epithelial membrane antigen) expression in the majority of cases, and CD3, CD5 or CD2 expression (mostly in ALK negative cases). ALK protein is detected by immunohistochemistry in the ALK positive sub-type. Additional tests include blood and bone marrow analysis, as well as imagery (X rays, computed tomography, PET scans and MRI) for bone disease.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Hodgkin lymphoma and peripheral T cell lymphomas (see these terms), which may express CD30.", "management_and_treatment": "Anthracycline-based chemotherapy, such as CHOP (cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin, vincristine and prednisone) or CHOP-like regimens, constitutes the first-line of treatment. It may only be combined with radiotherapy in stage I/II disease. Pediatric patients have distinct protocols similar to protocols used for B-cell lymphomas, with other drugs such methotrexate, etoposide, and cytarabine being used. High-dose chemotherapy followed by autologous stem cell transplantation can also be performed, usually in cases of relapse or as first line treatment in cases with an adverse prognosis. Antibody-drug conjugate therapy (brentuximab velotin) may be given when at least one chemotherapy regimen is unsuccesful.", "prognosis": "With treatment, ALK-positive patients (5-year survival of 70-80%) have a better prognosis than ALK-negative patients (5-year survival of 33-49%). Relapse confers a poorer prognosis."}, {"name": "SACRAL-Syndrom", "sub_name": "LUMBAR-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Akronym PELVIS steht f\u00fcr perineale H\u00e4mangiome, Fehlbildung der externen Genitalien, Lipo-Myelomeningozele, vesiko-renale Fehlbildungen, Anus imperforatus und Haut ('skin')-Anh\u00e4ngsel. Das Syndrom wurde bisher bei 11 Patienten beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A disorder defining by the association of Perineal hemangioma, External genitalia malformations, Lipomyelomeningocele, Vesicorenal abnormalities, Imperforate anus, and Skin tag. Eleven cases have been reported.", "synonyms": "Lower body hemangioma-urogenital anomalies-myelopathy-bony deformities-anorectal and arterial malformations-renal anomalies syndrome, PELVIS syndrome, Perineal hemangioma-external genitalia malformations-lipomyelomeningocele-vesicorenal abnormalities-imperforate anus-skin tag syndrome, SACRAL syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8"}, {"name": "SADDAN-Dysplasie", "sub_name": "Schwere Achondroplasie-Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung-Acanthosis nigricans-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch schwere Achondroplasie, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und Acanthosis nigricans. Es wurde bei 4 nicht miteinander verwandten Personen beschrieben. Als weitere, nicht obligate Symptome wurden Strukturanomalien des Zentralnervensystems, Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und Verbiegungen von Schl\u00fcsselbein, Femur, Tibia und Fibula beschrieben. Ursache ist die Mutation Lys650Met in der Kinase-Dom\u00e4ne des Fibroblasten-Wachstumfaktor-Rezeptors 3, der durch das FGFR3-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 4p16.3 kodiert wird. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe achondroplasia-developmental delay-acanthosis nigricans syndrome is characterised by the association of severe achondroplasia with developmental delay and acanthosis nigricans. It has been described in four unrelated individuals. Structural central nervous system anomalies, seizures and hearing loss were also reported, together with bowing of the clavicle, femur, tibia and fibula in some cases. The syndrome is caused by a Lys650Met substitution in the kinase domain of fibroblast growth factor receptor 3 (encoded by the FGFR3 gene; 4p16.3).", "synonyms": "SADDAN, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q77.4", "omim": "616482", "umls": "C2674173", "gard": "9443"}, {"name": "S-Adenosylhomocystein-Hydrolase-Defizienz", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch verz\u00f6gerte psychomotorische Entwicklung, schwere, seit Geburt bestehende Myopathie (Hypotonie, fehlende Sehnenreflexe, verz\u00f6gerte Myelinisierung), Hypermethionin\u00e4mie und erh\u00f6hte Serumspiegel der Kreatinkinase. Es wurde bei 3 nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beschrieben und wird wahrscheinlich autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen wurden im AHCY-Gen (20cen-q13.1) gefunden. Es kodiert f\u00fcr die S-Adenosylhomocystein-Hydrolase (SAHH), ein Enzym, das am Stoffwechsel des Methionins beteiligt ist. Durch Reduktion des Methionins in der Nahrung und zus\u00e4tzliche Gaben von Kreatin werden die Myelinisierung und die psychomotorische Entwicklung evtl. g\u00fcnstig beeinflusst. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, multisystemic inherited metabolic diseases characterized clinically, by a variable spectrum of severity, primarily comprised of psychomotor delay, myopathy and liver dysfunction. Most patients present in infancy, but the onset can be already in utero or in adult age. Hypermethioninemia is frequent, but often absent in infancy. Creatine kinase is elevated in most patients.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Antenatal, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E72.1", "omim": "613752", "umls": "C3151058", "epidemiology": "Approximately 15 cases of S-adenosylhomocysteine hydrolase (SAHH) deficiency have been described to date.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset is typically in infancy, but may occur in utero or in adult age. In infancy, the clinical picture is typically comprised of developmental delay and hypotonia due to myopathy with markedly increased creatine kinase (CK) plasma levels, and more variably with cerebral hypomyelination, coagulation abnormalities and hepatopathy. Microcephaly, strabismus and behavioral changes are frequent. Severe cases may present in utero with fetal hydrops, congenital brain anomalies (pontine and cerebellar hypoplasia, hypoplastic corpus callosum), synthetic liver failure, respiratory insufficiency due to severe muscle weakness and death in early infancy. Specific biochemical findings include markedly increased plasma S-adenosylhomocysteine (AdoHyc) and S-adenosylmethionine (AdoMet) in combination with normal or near normal total homocysteine (tHcy) and hypermethioninemia which is not always present, particularly not in early infancy. Whilst the disease is typically severe with poor developmental outcomes, the phenotype can vary from mild to asymptomatic (one report). The milder phenotype includes later disease onset and milder weakness and developmental delay. Hepatocellular carcinoma was reported in one patient and was possibly present in another.", "etiology": "The disease is due to mutations in the gene encoding S-adenosylhomocysteine hydrolase, AHCY (20q11.22), an enzyme involved in methionine metabolism.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis should be suspected in patients with any combination of the clinical symptoms and in all patients with unexplained hypermethioninemia. Marked elevations of AdoMet and AdoHcy, in combination with normal or near normal tHcy are characteristic for the disease, thus plasma AdoMet and AdoHcy should be measured where there is clinical suspicion for the disease. Since these biochemical assays are poorly available, gene analysis could be a better choice. The latter , as well as enzyme assay of AdoHcy hydrolase, serves also for confirmation of the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Based on the multiorgan clinical presentation, SAHH deficiency has a very wide differential diagnosis, with chronic myopathies, muscular dystrophies, floppy infant syndrome and group of isolated persistent hypermethioninemias being the most important.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible if a genetic mutation has been previously identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. Where both parents are unaffected carriers of the disease, the risk of transmission to offspring is 25%. There is variable disease severity between different families. Intrafamilial variability is also possible.", "management_and_treatment": "Whilst there is little evidence to support specific treatment strategies, the current consensus is on a methionine-restricted diet (with methionine-free amino acid mixture supplementation), which can decrease and sometimes even normalize plasma AdoMet and AdoHcy. Subsequent close clinical and biochemical monitoring seem mandatory. Phosphatidylcholine, creatine and cysteine supplementation may be beneficial. Liver transplantation has resulted in clinical and biochemical improvement in a single case.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the severity of the disease and ranges from death during the neonatal period to survival into adulthood and possibly normal life span. Functional outcomes in surviving patients are frequently severe, with the most common impact on neurodevelopment and mobility. Long term follow-up is missing in most patients and accurate and precise prognosis is not possible. Whilst dietary management is promising in some cases, it is not effective in all (improving metabolic parameters but not functional outcomes). Evidence on liver graft is limited."}, {"name": "Saethre-Chotzen-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt liegt zwischen 1/25,000 und 1/50,000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A syndrome characterized by unilateral or bilateral coronal synostosis, facial asymmetry, ptosis, strabismus and small ears with prominent superior and/or inferior crus, among other less common manifestations.", "synonyms": "ACS3, Acrocephalosyndactyly type 3, SCS, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "101400\u00a0 180750", "umls": "C0175699", "gard": "7598", "epidemiology": "Saethre-Chotzen syndrome (SCS) prevalence ranges from 1/25,000 to 1/50,000 livebirths.", "clinical_description": "SCS has a variable spectrum of manifestations. Classic SCS presents at birth with synostosis of coronal (less commonly in conjunction with sagittal, metopic or lambdoid) sutures resulting in abnormal skull shape, facial asymmetry, low frontal hairline, ptosis, strabismus, tear duct stenosis and small ears with prominent crus. Brachydactyly, broad toes, partial cutaneous syndactyly of digits 2 and 3 of the hand, duplicated distal phalanx of the hallux are also often present. Intelligence is normal in most, but mild to severe developmental delay has been reported, primarily in cases with a large genomic deletion. Some may experience conductive and/or sensorineural hearing loss. Less common manifestations include short stature, hypertelorism, cleft palate, bifid uvula, maxillary hypoplasia, lacrimal duct stenosis, parietal foramina, vertebral anomalies, radioulnar synostosis, obstructive sleep apnea and congenital heart malformations. Mild phenotypes include patients with ptosis or blepharophimosis with or without craniosynostosis. Elevated intracranial pressure (ICP) associated with severe cases of synostosis may lead to headaches, visual loss, seizures and death if untreated.", "etiology": "SCS is due to point mutations or deletions involving (or removing completely) the TWIST1 gene (7p21), which encodes a basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) transcription factor responsible for cell lineage determination and differentiation. Loss of function mutations in this gene lead to the induction of premature cranial suture fusion. Gene deletions cause more severe phenotypes, usually associated with significant neurocognitive delays.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based mainly on the presence of characteristic clinical findings. CT of the head and radiographs are useful in characterizing abnormalities of the skull, spine and limbs. Molecular genetic testing can identify a TWIST1 mutation or deletion, confirming diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Although several features (such as 2-3 syndactyly of the hand) are unique to SCS, differential diagnoses include other syndromic forms of craniosynostosis such as Muenke, Baller-Gerold, Pfeiffer, and Crouzon syndromes as well as isolated unilateral coronal synostosis. Robinow-Sorauf syndrome is now considered within the spectrum of SCS, typically with milder features. Mutations in FGFR3, FGFR2, TCF12, RECQL4, and EFNB1 have been reported to cause synostosis conditions that phenotypically overlap with SCS. This is not surprising, as there is evidence that FGFR and TWIST1 may be integrated into overlapping pathways, including in osteoblast differentiation. In addition, TWIST1 mutations have been noted in some cases of isolated single-suture craniosynostosis, including sagittal and unicoronal cases.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing for a TWIST1 mutation is rare, but it can be performed in families with a known mutation or when an ultrasound shows craniosynostosis of unknown etiology.", "genetic_counseling": "SCS is inherited as an autosomal dominant trait. Genetic counseling is valuable. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment of SCS requires management by a multidisciplinary craniofacial team with follow-up until young adulthood. In general, patients must undergo cranioplasty in the first year of life to increase the intracranial volume and restore a more normal head shape. Recurrent increased ICP may necessitate further surgical expansion procedures. In childhood, orthodontic care and/or midfacial surgery may be necessary for treatment of airway obstruction and malocclusion. In those with cleft palate, surgical closure can be performed in the context of other malformations, with evaluation for velopharyngeal insufficiency and speech therapy offered as necessary. Routine evaluations of facial growth, hearing loss and psychomotor development are needed, as well as regular ophthalmologic examinations to monitor strabismus, amblyopia or chronic papilledema (that indicates increased ICP). Early intervention programs should be offered to children with developmental delay. Augmentation of hearing and supportive interventions related to deafness should be pursued when indicated.", "prognosis": "In most cases, when treated and monitored from an early age, the prognosis is excellent. Developmental prognosis is worse for patients with a TWIST1 deletion, compared to those with point mutations."}, {"name": "Sagittalnahtsynostose mit kongenitaler Herzerkrankung, geistiger Retardierung und mandibul\u00e4rer Ankylose", "sub_name": "Kardiokraniales Syndrom Typ Pfeiffer", "german_description": "Das Kardio-kraniale Syndrom Typ Pfeiffer ist ganz au\u00dferordentlich selten und wurde weltweit bisher bei weniger als 10 Patienten beschrieben. Symptome sind: Angeborener Herzfehler, Sagittalnahtsynostose und schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung (Minderwuchs, geistige Behinderung). M\u00f6gliche weitere Symptome sind: Fehlbildungen der Genitalien und Nieren, sowie verschiedene kranio-faziale Dysmorphien (Hypertelorismus, tiefsitzende Ohren, dysplastische Ohren, Mikrogenie, Unterkiefer-Ankylose, Lid-Anomalien), Syndaktylie und Gelenkver\u00e4nderungen. Die Ursache ist unbekannt. Die Beobachtung von betroffenen Geschwistern beiderlei Geschlechts unterst\u00fctzt die Annahme, dass das Syndrom autosomal-rezessiv vererbt wird. Als m\u00f6gliche Ursache wurden aber auch autosomal-dominante Vererbung und submikroskopische Deletionen vorgeschlagen. Die Behandlung richtet sich nach den haupts\u00e4chlichen Symptomen und schlie\u00dft eine chirurgische Dekompression des Sch\u00e4dels ein. Weitere unterst\u00fctzende Ma\u00dfnahmen sind angezeigt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, multiple congenital anomalies syndrome with intellectual disability commonly characterized by facial dysmorphism (e.g. sagittal craniosynostosis, hypertelorism, strabismus, low-set dysplastic ears, retrognathia or micrognathia, mandibular ankyloses, cleft palate, aplasia uvulae), congenital heart defects (e.g. atrioventricular septal defect, anomalous venous return), genital anomalies (e.g. cryptorchidism, microphallus), as well as growth delay and intellectual disability. In some cases, tracheobronchial anomalies, large joint contractures, syndactyly, rib anomalies and hypoplastic kidneys are reported. Rarely, no cardiac anomaly may be reported.", "synonyms": "Craniosynostosis-congenital heart disease-intellectual disability syndrome, Pfeiffer-Singer-Zschiesche syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "218450", "gard": "8586"}, {"name": "Sagittalnaht-Synostose, nicht-syndromale", "sub_name": "Skaphozephalie, isolierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Dolichozephalie, isolierte, Sagittalnaht-Synostose, nicht-syndromale, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q75.0", "OMIM": "123100\u00a0 600775\u00a0 615529", "UMLS": "C0265534", "summary": "Die isolierte Skaphozephalie ist eine Form von nicht-syndromaler Kraniosynostose mit pr\u00e4maturer Fusion der Sagittalnaht. Sie macht etwa die H\u00e4lfte aller F\u00e4lle von nicht-syndromaler Kraniosynostose aus. Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen betr\u00e4gt 1:5.000. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als das weibliche (m:w = 3,5:1), und die H\u00e4ufigkeit unter Zwillingen ist unerwartet hoch. Der vorzeitige Verschluss der Sagittalnaht f\u00fchrt zu einer signifikanten kompensatorischen anterior-posteriorer Verl\u00e4ngerung des Sch\u00e4dels. Entsprechend ist auch die Sagittalnaht l\u00e4nger als normal. Abh\u00e4ngig vom Ausma\u00df der pr\u00e4maturen Fusion haben die Betroffenen eine Balkonstirn und eine Ausw\u00f6lbung des Hinterkopfes. Der Hirndruck ist selten gesteigert, und die Intelligenz ist in der Regel normal. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, 6% aller F\u00e4lle sind famili\u00e4r mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung. Die Ursache der isolierten Skaphozephalie ist noch nicht bekannt. Bei einem einzelnen Fall wurde eine Mutation im TWIST1-Gen (7p21) beschrieben. Die Konkordanzrate bei eineiigen Zwillingen betr\u00e4gt 30%, ein Hinweis, dass genetische und nicht-genetische Faktoren an der Verursachung der Skaphozephalie beteiligt sind. Die Diagnose st\u00fctzt sich auf klinische und sonografische Befunde, auf R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen und 3D-CT- und/oder MRT-Untersuchungen des Sch\u00e4dels. Die Synostose der Pfeilnaht tritt nicht nur isoliert auf, sondern kann auch Teil eines Syndroms sein (z.B. Famili\u00e4re Skaphozephalie mit radioulnarer Synostose, Sagittalnahtsynostose mit Dandy-Walker-Malformation und Hydrozephalus; s. diese Termini). M\u00f6glich ist eine chirurgische Rekonstruktion der Form des Sch\u00e4deldaches. Das Ergebnis der Operation ist in der Regel g\u00fcnstig, mit normaler Intelligenz und normaler psychomotorischer Entwicklung. "}, {"name": "Sagliker-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare bone disease characterized by secondary hyperparathyroidism in patients with chronic renal failure, caused by improper treatment in the early stages of the disease with retention of phosphorus, vitamin D deficiency, and disturbed calcium-phosphorus metabolism, which result in increased parathyroid hormone levels. Patients present with short stature, severe changes of the skull and jaws as well as other skeletal deformities, dental anomalies, ''brown tumors'' in the mouth, hearing loss, and neuropsychiatric disorders.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages"}, {"name": "Sakrale Agenesie-abnormale Verkn\u00f6cherung der Wirbelk\u00f6rper-persistierender notochordaler Kanal-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sacral agenesis-abnormal ossification of the vertebral bodies-persistent notochordal canal syndrome is a rare, genetic, neural tube defect malformation syndrome characterized by sacral agenesis and abnormal vertebral body ossification with normal vertebral arches associated with notochord canal persistence on ultrasonography. Additional findings include bilateral clubfoot, oligohydramnios, single umbilical artery and, in some, increased nuchal translucency.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "omim": "615709"}, {"name": "Sakrokokzygeales Teratom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "C41.4", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Teratom, extragonadales"}, {"name": "Salcedo-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Nagel-Patella-Syndrom-\u00e4hnliche Nierenerkrankung", "german_description": "Bei diesem Syndrom handelt es sich um eine schwere Nephropathie mit gest\u00f6rter Nierenfunktion, Proteinurie, \u00d6demen und mikroskopischer H\u00e4maturie. Es wurde bei drei Br\u00fcdern beschrieben, von denen zwei im terminalen Nierenversagen verstarben. Die Nierenhistologie gleicht der des Nagel-Patella-Syndroms, dessen Symptome an Knochen und N\u00e4geln aber fehlen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic glomerular disease characterized by variably severe nephropathy with microscopic hematuria and proteinuria, in the absence of nail and bone abnormalities. Characteristic ultrastructural findings are irregular thickening and moth-eaten appearance of the glomerular basement membrane with focal deposition of type III collagen fibrils.", "synonyms": "Salcedo syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "N07.8", "omim": "256020", "umls": "C0403548", "gard": "321"}, {"name": "Saldino-Mainzer-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "OMIM": "266920\u00a0 615630", "UMLS": "C1849437", "MeSH": "C535463", "GARD": "8600", "summary": "Das Saldino-Mainzer-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von Nephropathie, Pigmentdystrophie der Retina, zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie und Skelettdysplasie. Etwa 10 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben. Ein weiteres Symptom ist leichter bis moderater Kleinwuchs. Radiologische Zeichen sind verk\u00fcrzte Phalangen mit Zapfenepiphysen und manchmal auch Anomalien der Femurepiphyse und -metaphyse. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. "}, {"name": "Salih-Ataxie", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Epilepsie-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom durch RUBCN-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An extremely rare, autosomal recessive, hereditary cerebellar ataxia disorder characterized by early onset of progressive, mild to moderate gait and limb ataxia, moderate to severe dysarthria, and nystagmus or saccadic pursuit, frequently associated with epilepsy, moderate intellectual disability, delayed speech acquisition, and hyporeflexia in the upper extremities. Hyperreflexia in the lower extremities may also be associated.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 15, SCAR15, Salih ataxia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "615705"}, {"name": "Salla disease, intermedi\u00e4re schwere", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "GARD": "10871", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Sialins\u00e4ure-Speicherkrankheit"}, {"name": "Salla-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "OMIM": "604369", "UMLS": "C1096903", "GARD": "4754", "MedDRA": "10067531", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Sialins\u00e4ure-Speicherkrankheit"}, {"name": "Salmonellen-Krankheit, invasive nicht-typhoidale", "sub_name": "Salmonellose, invasive, nicht-typhoide", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die invasive nicht-typhoide Salmonellose ist eine seltene, bakterielle Infektionskrankheit, die durch eine extraintestinale Infektion mit nicht-typhoiden Serotypen von  Salmonella enterica  bei Patienten mit zugrunde liegender HIV-Infektion, Malaria oder Malignit\u00e4t verursacht wird. Sie hat eine hohe Sterblichkeitsrate und die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise mit Fieber, Bl\u00e4sse und respiratorischen Zeichen (Husten, Tachypnoe, Pneumonie). Gastrointestinale Manifestationen (Durchfall, Erbrechen, abdominale Schmerzen) sind nicht h\u00e4ufig. Gelegentlich k\u00f6nnen Organabszesse, septischer Schock und Meningitis beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "Salmonellen-Krankheit, invasive nicht-typhoidale, iNTS-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A02.0\u00a0 A02.1\u00a0 A02.2\u00a0 A02.8\u00a0 A02.9"}, {"name": "Salmonellose, invasive, nicht-typhoide", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die invasive nicht-typhoide Salmonellose ist eine seltene, bakterielle Infektionskrankheit, die durch eine extraintestinale Infektion mit nicht-typhoiden Serotypen von  Salmonella enterica  bei Patienten mit zugrunde liegender HIV-Infektion, Malaria oder Malignit\u00e4t verursacht wird. Sie hat eine hohe Sterblichkeitsrate und die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise mit Fieber, Bl\u00e4sse und respiratorischen Zeichen (Husten, Tachypnoe, Pneumonie). Gastrointestinale Manifestationen (Durchfall, Erbrechen, abdominale Schmerzen) sind nicht h\u00e4ufig. Gelegentlich k\u00f6nnen Organabszesse, septischer Schock und Meningitis beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "Salmonellen-Krankheit, invasive nicht-typhoidale, iNTS-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A02.0\u00a0 A02.1\u00a0 A02.2\u00a0 A02.8\u00a0 A02.9"}, {"name": "Salti-Salem-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hypogonadotroper Hypogonadismus - frontoparietale Alopezie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Salti-Salem-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E23.0", "GARD": "324", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von hypogonadotropem Hypogonadismus und fronto-parietaler Alopezie. Es wurde bei 6 Mitgliedern (2 w.,4 m.) einer konsanguinen libanesischen Familie beschrieben. Neben der fronto-parietalen Alopezie war das \u00fcbrige Kopfhaar sp\u00e4rlich, und Achsel- und Schamhaare fehlten. Im Gegensatz zum Syndrom des hypergonadotropen Hypogonadismus mit partieller Alopezie (sh. dort) wurden bei den weiblichen Mitgliedern dieser libanesischen Familie Stranggonaden oder fehlende Ovarien, hypoplastischer Uterus und Mikrozephalie nicht beschrieben. Trotz Konsanguinit\u00e4t in der Familie wurde autosomal-dominante Vererbung mit unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz als wahrscheinlichster Erbgang beschrieben. "}, {"name": "Salzverlust-Tubulopathie, Typ Henle-Schleife", "sub_name": "Bartter-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Jahresinzidenz wird auf 1 :830.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bartter syndrome is a group of rare renal tubular disease characterized by impaired salt reabsorption in the thick ascending limb of Henle's loop and clinically by the association of hypokalemic alkalosis, hypercalciuria/nephrocalcinosis, increased levels of plasma renin and aldosterone, low blood pressure and vascular resistance to angiotensin II.", "synonyms": "Renal tubular normotensive hypokalemic alkalosis with hypercalciuria, Salt-losing tubular disorder, Henle's loop type, Salt-wasting tubulopathy, Henle's loop type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "E26.8", "omim": "241200\u00a0 300971\u00a0 601198\u00a0 601678\u00a0 602522\u00a0 607364\u00a0 613090", "umls": "C0004775", "mesh": "D001477", "gard": "5893", "meddra": "10050839", "epidemiology": "Annual incidence is estimated at 1/1000,000 in Europe.", "clinical_description": "Five distinct genotypes have been described, with four distinct clinical variants: an antenatal/infantile Bartter syndrome (most patients with genotypes I and II; see this term), characterized by polyhydramnios, premature delivery, polyuria, dehydration, hypercalciuria and nephrocalcinosis; an infantile Bartter syndrome with deafness (genotype IV, see this term), with congenital sensorineural deafness; classic Bartter syndrome (mostly patients with genotype III, but also some patients with genotype I and II; see this term), manifesting as polyuria-polydipsia in infancy-childhood through adulthood, dehydration and a variable delay in the height-weight growth curve; and autosomal dominant hypocalcemia with Bartter syndrome (patients with genotype V, see this term), associating chronic hypocalcemia and tubular salt wasting, hypokalemia and alkalosis.", "etiology": "Bartter syndrome results from a defect in sodium, potassium and chloride reabsorption at the level of Henle's loop. They are caused by homozygous or compound heterozygous mutations in four genes encoding proteins involved in tubular fluid reabsorption in the thick ascending part of Henle's loop: SLC12A1 gene (15q15-21), encoding the sodium-potassium-chloride cotransporter NKCC2 in type I Bartter syndrome; KCNJ1 gene (11q24) encoding the potassium channel ROMK in type II; CLCNKB gene (1p36), encoding a basolateral chloride channel, in type III; and BSND gene (1p32.3), encoding barttin, the beta-subunit for the basolateral chloride channels, CLCNKA and CLCNKB in type IV. A final variant (type V) is associated with heterozygous activating mutations of the CASR gene (3q21.1), encoding the calcium sensing receptor.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture, as well as in plasma and urine electrolytes (sodium, potassium, chloride, bicarbonate, magnesium, calcium), renin and aldosterone levels. Calcium levels in the urine may be normal to markedly increased. Hypocalcemia is observed in Bartter syndrome type V. Genetic testing provides the definite diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes pseudo-Bartter syndrome (diuretic abuse, surreptitious vomiting), Gitelman syndrome, cystic fibrosis and celiac disease (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Diagnostic testing of amniocytes might be indicated for mothers of affected children, or potential heterozygous carriers (close relatives of affected individuals).", "genetic_counseling": "Four of the genetic variants (types I,II,III,IV) of Bartter syndrome are transmitted following an autosomal recessive pattern whereas variant (type V) is transmitted as an autosomal dominant trait.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment includes oral potassium supplements, non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (e.g. indomethacin) and possibly potassium-sparing diuretics. In stressful situations (intecurrent diseases, surgical procedures, trauma) blood electrolyte levels may change rapidly, requiring prompt and vigorous intravenous treatment.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy may be reduced in severe cases but renal failure is rare. Quality of life may be poor, growth rate reduced, and hospitalization rate high."}, {"name": "Samariter-Myopathie, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Myopathie, benigne, Typ Samariter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign Samaritan congenital myopathy is a rare, genetic, skeletal muscle disease characterized by severe neonatal hypotonia with respiratory insufficiency, delay in motor milestones, and dysmorphic features including bitemporal narrowing, epicanthal folds and hypertelorism. Affected individuals show gradual improvement in hypotonia and muscle weakness within the first two years of life resulting in minimal clinical manifestations in adulthood.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G71.2"}, {"name": "Sambesisches h\u00e4morrhagisches Fieber", "sub_name": "Lujo h\u00e4morrhagisches Fieber", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Lujo hemorrhagic fever, caused by the Lujo virus (a newly discovered Old World arenavirus) is a zoonotic disease from Zambia, Africa, whose reservoir is unknown and is characterized by fever and hemorrhagic manifestations with an extremely high fatality rate of 80% (in the 5 reported cases to date) and a moderate to high level of nosocomial transmission.", "synonyms": "Zambian hemorrhagic fever, ", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A96.8"}, {"name": "SAMD9L-associated auto-inflammatory syndrome", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Sammelgangkarzinom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Ductus-Bellini-Karzinom ist ein seltener, aggressiver Subtyp des Nierenzellkarzinoms, der vom Epithel der distalen Sammelg\u00e4nge ausgeht und sich in der Regel mit H\u00e4maturie, Flankenschmerzen, tastbarer abdomineller Masse oder unspezifischen Symptomen wie M\u00fcdigkeit, Gewichtsverlust oder Fieber manifestiert. Die Patienten sind oft lange Zeit asymptomatisch, daher ist die Erkrankung zum Zeitpunkt der Diagnose oft lokal fortgeschritten oder metastasiert. In F\u00e4llen mit metastatischer Ausbreitung k\u00f6nnen Knochenschmerzen, Husten, Dyspnoe, Lungenentz\u00fcndung oder neurologische Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen auftreten.", "synonyms": "DBK, Ductus-Bellini-Karzinom, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C64", "UMLS": "C1266044", "MeSH": "D002292", "GARD": "9573"}, {"name": "SAMS 1-31", "sub_name": "Spinales arterioven\u00f6ses metameres Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Angiomatose, kutaneomeningospinale, Cobb-Syndrom, SAMS 1-31, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "Q27.3", "UMLS": "C0346068", "GARD": "11892", "MedDRA": "10068841", "summary": "Das Cobb-Syndrom ist definiert als die Assoziation von ven\u00f6sen oder arterio-ven\u00f6sen Gef\u00e4\u00dfl\u00e4sionen der Haut und arterio-ven\u00f6sen L\u00e4sionen der Muskeln, Knochen und Medulla, alle diese im gleichen Metamer oder spinalen Segment. Diese segmentale Verteilung kann sich auf eines oder auch mehrere der 31 beim Menschen vorhandenen Metamere erstrecken. Nur 16% der medull\u00e4ren L\u00e4sionen sind vielfach und haben eine klare metamere Verteilung. Bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich h\u00e4ufig betroffen. Weniger als 15% der arterio-ven\u00f6sen Fehlbildungen des R\u00fcckenmarks treten im Rahmen eines Cobb-Syndroms auf. Die neurologischen Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei akuten h\u00e4morrhagischen Ereignissen oder bei chronischer ven\u00f6ser Stauung des R\u00fcckenmarks. Das Ausma\u00df der begleitenden Ausf\u00e4lle h\u00e4ngt vom Ort der Gef\u00e4\u00dffehlbildung (zervikal, thorakal, lumbal, sakral) ab. Am h\u00e4ufigsten sind die unteren Extremit\u00e4ten betroffen, mit beidseitigen unsymmetrischen motorischen und sensorischen Ausf\u00e4llen, zusammen mit Sphinkter-St\u00f6rungen. Die morphologischen Ver\u00e4nderungen erscheinen evtl. unvollst\u00e4ndig, wenn einige Lokalilasionen im gleichen Metamer nicht betroffen sind. Die h\u00e4ufigsten kutanen Manifestationen des Syndroms sind flache Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien (Portwein-N\u00e4vi), m\u00f6glich sind aber auch Angiokeratome, Angiolipome und Lymphangiome. Bei den medull\u00e4ren L\u00e4sionen handelt es sich um arterio-ven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen. Die Gef\u00e4\u00dfl\u00e4sionen in Muskel und Knochen verursachen nicht- mechanisch verursachte \u00f6rtlich begrenzte Schmerzen, sind oft aber auch symptomlos. Das Syndrom ist in den Familien Betroffener nicht geh\u00e4uft, Chromosomenanomalien wurden nicht beschrieben. Die Anf\u00e4nge der Krankheit liegen in der fr\u00fchen Embryogenese, vor der Migration von Gef\u00e4\u00df-Vorl\u00e4uferzellen zu ihren definitiven Territorien (Haut, Knochen, periphere Nerven, R\u00fcckenmark). Wenn zwei aufeinander folgende Territorien betroffen sind, resultiert eine multimetamere Form der Krankheit. In einer k\u00fcrzlichen Analyse des Syndroms wurde die Bezeichnung Spinales Arterio-ven\u00f6ses Metameres Syndrom 1-31 (SAMS 1-31) eingef\u00fchrt, in Analogie zu den Zerebro-fazialen Arterio-ven\u00f6sen Metameren Syndromen (CAMS 1-3) und den Zerebro-fazialen Ven\u00f6sen Metameren Syndromen (CVMS1-3). Die Diagnose wird durch MRI und zus\u00e4tzliche medull\u00e4re Angiographie gestellt. Die Malformationen in Muskel und Knochen werden durch Embolisation (endovaskul\u00e4re Navigation und Verschluss der zur Malformation f\u00fchrenden Arterien mit einem biologischen Kleber) und/oder chirurgisch behandelt. Oberfl\u00e4chliche kutane L\u00e4sionen werden mit Laser behandelt. Radikul\u00e4re und medull\u00e4re Malformationen werden embolisiert. Klassische chirurgische Verfahren bleiben wenigen Lokalisationen und oberfl\u00e4chlichen L\u00e4sionen vorbehalten. Wenn das endovaskul\u00e4re Verfahren nicht gelingt, k\u00f6nnen epidurale und paraspinale Injektionen angewendet werden. Eine Strahlentherapie ist nicht indiziert. Durch fr\u00fche Diagnose wird das Ausma\u00df neurologischer. Komplikationen, besonders von L\u00e4hmungen, in Grenzen gehalten. Der Verlauf der Krankheit kann nicht vorausgesagt werden, die L\u00e4sionen bleiben evtl. lange Zeit symptomfrei."}, {"name": "SAMS-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kleinwuchs-H\u00f6rkanalatresie-Mandibul\u00e4re Hypoplasie-Skelettanomalien-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Kleinwuchs-H\u00f6rkanalatresie-Mandibul\u00e4re Hypoplasie-Skelettanomalien-Syndrom ist ein seltenes, genetisches Dysmorphie-Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch Kleinwuchs, eine Schalleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit aufgrund bilateraler Geh\u00f6rgangatresie, Unterkieferhypoplasie und multiplen Skelettanomalien, einschlie\u00dflich bilateraler Humerushypoplasie, skapulohumerale Synostose, verz\u00f6gerter Schambeinverkn\u00f6cherung, zentraler Versetzung der H\u00fcften und proximaler Femurdefekte, sowie bilateraler Talipes equinovarus, proximal implantierter Daumen und lumbaler Hyperlordose. Die damit verbundene kraniofaziale Dysmorphie umfasst Mikro/Skaphozephalie, Malarhypoplasie, hochgew\u00f6lbten Gaumen und einfache, dysplastische Pinnae mit pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4ren Ohrgr\u00fcbchen.", "synonyms": "SAMS-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "602471", "UMLS": "C1865361"}, {"name": "SAM-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Schwere Dermatitis-multiple Allergien-metabolischer Verlust-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe dermatitis-multiple allergies-metabolic wasting syndrome is a rare, genetic, epidermal disorder characterized by congenital erythroderma with severe psoriasiform dermatitis, ichthyosis, severe palmoplantar keratoderma, yellow keratosis on the hands and feet, elevated immunoglobulin E, multiple food allergies, and metabolic wasting. Other variable features may include hypotrichosis, nail dystrophy, recurrent infections, mild global developmental delay, eosinophillia, nystagmus, growth impairment and cardiac defects.", "synonyms": "Congenital erythroderma-hypotrichosis-recurrent infections-multiple food allergies syndrome, SAM syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "615508"}, {"name": "SANDD-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Sinusknoten-Dysfunktion und Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sinoatrial node dysfunction and deafness is a rare genetic disease characterized by congenital severe to profound deafness with no evidence of vestibular dysfunction, associated with sinoatrial node dysfunction with pronounced bradycardia and increased variability of heart rate at rest and episodic syncopes that may be triggered by enhanced physical activity and stress.", "synonyms": "Sinoatrial node dysfunction and hearing loss, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "H91.8", "omim": "614896"}, {"name": "Sandhoff-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "GM2-Gangliosidose, 0-Variante, Hexosaminidase-A/B-Mangel\u00a0, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "E75.0", "OMIM": "268800", "UMLS": "C0036161", "MeSH": "D012497", "GARD": "2521\u00a0 7604", "summary": "Die Sandhoff-Krankheit ist eine lysosomale Speicherkrankheit aus der Familie der GM2-Gangliosidosen. Charakteristisch ist eine zentralnerv\u00f6se Neurodegeneration. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:130.000. Klinisch gleicht die Krankheit der Tay-Sachs-Krankheit, mit Schreckhaftigkeit, fr\u00fcher Erblindung, progredientem motorischem und geistigem Verfall, Makrozephalie und kirschrotem Makulafleck. M\u00f6gliche weitere Symptome sind Puppengesicht, Hepatosplenomegalie und rezidivierende Atemwegsinfekte. Im Urin sind die Oligosaccharide stark vermehrt. In den ersten 3-6 Lebensmonaten entwickeln sich die Kinder normal. Danach beginnen die Symptome, und die Krankheit schreitet schnell fort. Bei sp\u00e4ter beginnenden oder adulten F\u00e4llen k\u00f6nnen die Symptome in einer spino-zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie oder einer Dystonie bestehen, wobei die intellektuellen F\u00e4higkeiten entweder beeintr\u00e4chtigt sind oder auch nicht. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache ist der gleichzeitige Mangel der Hexosaminidasen A und B, die beide die gleiche ver\u00e4nderte Beta-Untereinheit haben. (Dagegen besteht bei der Tay-Sachs-Krankheit nur ein Mangel der Hexosaminidase A, da hier die Alpha-Untereinheit ver\u00e4ndert ist). Der Enzymdefekt f\u00fchrt zu abnormer Speicherung des GM2-Gangliosids in Neuronen und peripheren Geweben. Das urs\u00e4chlich beteiligte HEXB-Gen liegt in der Chromosomenregion 5q13. Es gibt f\u00fcr diese Krankheit keine spezifische Therapie. Die Prognose ist schlecht, die Kinder sterben in der Regel mit etwa 4 Jahren. "}, {"name": "Sandhoff-Krankheit, adulte Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "GM2-Gangliosidose, adulte, 0-Variante, Hexosaminidasen A- und B-Mangel, adulte Formen, ", "ICD-10": "E75.0", "OMIM": "268800", "UMLS": "C0751489\u00a0 C1849320", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Sandhoff-Krankheit"}, {"name": "Sandhoff-Krankheit, infantile Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "GM2-Gangliosidose, infantile, 0-Variante, Hexosaminidasen A- und B-Mangel, infantile Formen, ", "ICD-10": "E75.0", "OMIM": "268800", "UMLS": "C0751490\u00a0 C1849322", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Sandhoff-Krankheit"}, {"name": "Sandhoff-Krankheit, juvenile Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "GM2-Gangliosidose, juvenile, 0-Variante, Hexosaminidasen A- und B-Mangel, juvenile Formen, ", "ICD-10": "E75.0", "OMIM": "268800", "UMLS": "C0751491\u00a0 C1849321", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Sandhoff-Krankheit"}, {"name": "Sandifer-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G24.8", "UMLS": "C0338465", "MeSH": "C537234", "GARD": "9684", "MedDRA": "10066142", "summary": "Das Sandifer-Syndrom ist eine paroxysmale dystone Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, bei der gleichzeitig ein gastro-\u00f6sophagealer Reflux und manchmal auch eine Hiatushernie besteht. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit beginnt meist im S\u00e4uglingsalter oder in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit. Die dystonen Bewegungen sind gekennzeichnet durch abnorme Stellung des Kopfes und des Halses (Torticollis) und durch starke Kr\u00fcmmung des R\u00fcckens. Die Episoden dauern 1 bis 3 Minuten und k\u00f6nnen am Tag bis zu 10 Mal auftreten, obwohl sie meist im Zusammenhang mit der Nahrungsaufnahme stehen. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber Erbrechen, zu geringe Nahrungsaufnahme, An\u00e4mie, epigastrische Beschwerden, H\u00e4matemesis und abnorme Augenbewegungen. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Reflux-\u00d6sophagitis. Die dystonen Bewegungen gehen eindeutig mit gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux einher, aber die pathophysiologischen Mechanismen sind unklar. Mehrere Studien ergaben Hinweise, dass es sich bei der dystonen Haltung um einen pathologischen Reflex handelt, der durch die reflux- und \u00f6sophagitisbedingten Schmerzen ausgel\u00f6st wird. Trotz widerspr\u00fcchlicher Befunde nehmen einige Autoren an, dass mit der dystonen Haltung die Schmerzen im Abdomen abnehmen. Das Sandifer-Syndrom wird bei gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux mit der charakteristischen Bewegungsst\u00f6rung diagnostiziert. Der neurologische Befund ist in der Regel unauff\u00e4llig. Da klare Gr\u00fcnde f\u00fcr den Reflux fehlen, wird das Syndrom nicht selten falsch als Infantile Spasmen, Epilepsie oder Paroxysmale Dystonie diagnostiziert. Eine fr\u00fche Diagnose des Syndroms ist entscheidend, da durch die erfolgreiche Behandlung des Refluxes (medikament\u00f6s, chirurgisch) die Bewegungsst\u00f6rung verschwindet. Die Prognose der Patienten ist gut. "}, {"name": "Sandrow-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Laurin-Sandrow-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Laurin-Sandrow-Syndrom (LSS) ist gekennzeichnet durch vollst\u00e4ndige Polysyndaktylie der H\u00e4nde, durch Spiegelf\u00fc\u00dfe und Nasenanomalien (hypoplastische Nasenfl\u00fcgel, kurze Columella), oft in Verbindung mit gedoppelter Ulna und/oder Fibula und manchmal mit Tibiaagenesie. Bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Einige Patienten mit den gleichen klinischen Symptomen, aber ohne Nasenanomalien, geh\u00f6ren evtl. zur gleichen Entit\u00e4t. Die \u00c4tiologie des LSS ist nicht bekannt. Verschiedene Erbg\u00e4nge wurden vorgeschlagen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Laurin-Sandrow syndrome (LSS) is characterised by complete polysyndactyly of the hands, mirror feet and nose anomalies (hypoplasia of the nasal alae and short columella), often associated with ulnar and/or fibular duplication (and sometimes tibial agenesis). It has been described in less than 20 cases. Some cases with the same clinical signs but without nasal defects have also been reported, and may represent the same entity. The etiology of LSS is unknown. Different modes of inheritance have been suggested.", "synonyms": "Mirror hands and feets-nasal defects syndrome, Sandrow syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "135750", "umls": "C1851100", "mesh": "C535689", "gard": "155"}, {"name": "Sanfilippo-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MPS III, MPS3, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ III, Sanfilippo-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E76.2", "OMIM": "252900\u00a0 252920\u00a0 252930\u00a0 252940", "UMLS": "C0026706\u00a0 C0086648", "MeSH": "D009084", "GARD": "3807", "MedDRA": "10056890", "summary": "Die Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3 (MPS III) ist eine lysosomale Speicherkrankheit aus der Gruppe der Mukopolysaccharidosen und gekennzeichnet durch schweren und schnellen Verlust geistiger F\u00e4higkeiten. Die Krankheit wird wegen der allgemein nur leichten Dysmorphien nicht immer diagnostiziert. In den Niederlanden und in Australien ist sie mit einer Pr\u00e4valenz von 1:53.000 bzw. 1:67.000 die h\u00e4ufigste MPS. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der verschiedenen Subtypen ist von Land zu Land verschieden. Der Subtyp A ist h\u00e4ufiger in England, den Niederlanden und Australien, der Subtyp B ist h\u00e4ufiger in Griechenland und Portugal, w\u00e4hrend die Subtypen IIIC und IIID sehr viel seltener sind. Mit 2 bis 6 Jahren treten die ersten Symptome in Form von Verhaltensst\u00f6rungen (Hyperkinesie, Aggressivit\u00e4t), Verlust geistiger F\u00e4higkeiten, Schlafst\u00f6rungen und sehr leichten Dysmorphien auf. Die neurologische Beteiligung wird im Alter von etwa 10 Jahren deutlicher, mit Verlust der motorischen F\u00e4higkeiten und mit gest\u00f6rter Kommunikation. Nach dem 10. Lebensjahr treten oft auch zerebrale Kr\u00e4mpfe auf. Auch einige wenige F\u00e4lle mit abgeschw\u00e4chter Symptomatik wurden beschrieben. Der Mangel von vier verschiedenen Enzymen aus dem Abbauweg des Heparan-Sulfats (HS) definiert die vier Untergruppen der MPS III: Heparan-Sulfamidase die MPS IIIA, Alpha-N-Acetylglucosaminidase die MPS IIIB, Alpha-Glucosaminid:N-Acetyltransferase die MPS IIIC und N-Acetylglucosamin-6-sulfat-Sulfatase die MPS IIID. Alle vier Gene, die f\u00fcr diese Enzyme kodieren, wurden kartiert und kloniert (MPS IIIA nach 17q25.3, MPS IIIB nach 17q21, MPS IIIC in die perizentromerische Region des Chromosoms 8 und MPS IIID nach 12q14) und viele Mutationen wurden in ihnen gefunden. Alle Untergruppen werden autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Nachweis vermehrter Spiegel von HS im Urin. Der Nachweis des Mangels einer der vier Enzyme in kultivierten Leukozyten oder Fibroblasten erlaubt die Zuordnung zu einem der vier Subtypen der MPS III. F\u00fcr einesichere Diagnose der Subtypen IIIA und IIID, d.h., f\u00fcr den Ausschluss eines Multiplen Sulfatase-Mangels (Austin-Krankheit, s. dort), mu\u00df unbedingt noch eine andere Sulfatase bestimmt werden. Wenn in einer Familie beim Index-Patienten die Mutationen gefunden wurden, k\u00f6nnen heterozygote Familienmitglieder durch molekulare Analyse sicher identifiziert werden. Da eine wirksame Behandlung nicht existiert, gibt es f\u00fcr die Eltern, die das Risiko haben, ein betroffenes Kind zu bekommen, nur die M\u00f6glichkeit der vorgeburtlichen Diagnostik (Mutationsanalyse oder Bestimmung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t in Trophoblastzellen oder Amniozyten). Die Knochenmark-Transplantation ist kontraindiziert, da sie den geistigen Abbau nicht verhindern kann, auch dann nicht, wenn sie vor dem Einsetzen der Symptome durchgef\u00fchrt wird. In Tiermodellen f\u00fcr die Subtypen IIIA und IIIB wird gegenw\u00e4rtig die Gentherapie erprobt. Der neurologische Abbau geht mit einer Vielzahl von Komplikationen einher, und eine angemessene symptomatische Behandlung erfordert deshalb ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Vorgehen. Die Prognose ist schlecht, die meisten Patienten mit Typ IIIA sterben am Ende des 2. Lebensjahrzehnts. L\u00e4ngere \u00dcberlebenszeiten von 30-40 Jahren wurden f\u00fcr die Untertypen B und D mitgeteilt."}, {"name": "Sanfilippo-Krankheit Typ A", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Heparan-Sulfamidase-Mangel, MPS3A, MPSIIIA, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3A, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ IIIA, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "E76.2", "OMIM": "252900", "UMLS": "C0086647", "GARD": "7071", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3"}, {"name": "Sanfilippo-Krankheit Typ B", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MPS3B, MPSIIIB, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3B, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ IIIB, N-Acetyl-Alpha-Glucosaminidase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E76.2", "OMIM": "252920", "UMLS": "C0086648", "GARD": "7072", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3"}, {"name": "Sanfilippo-Krankheit Typ C", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "HGSNAT-Mangel, Heparan-Alpha-Glucosaminid N-Acetyltransferase-Mangel, MPS3C, MPSIIIC, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3C, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ IIIC, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E76.2", "OMIM": "252930", "UMLS": "C0086649", "GARD": "7073", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3"}, {"name": "Sanfilippo-Krankheit Typ D", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "GNS-Mangel, Glucosamin N-Acetyl-6-Sulfatase-Mangel, MPS3D, MPSIIID, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3D, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ IIID, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "E76.2", "OMIM": "252940", "UMLS": "C0086650", "GARD": "7074", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 3"}, {"name": "Sanjad-Sakati-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Sanjad-Sakati-Syndrom (SSS) ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitalen Hypoparathyreoidismus, Kleinwuchs, geistige Retardierung, zerebrale Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Mikrozephalie, Dysmorphien (Anomalien der Fazies, der Augen und der Z\u00e4hne) und kurze H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Das Syndrom steht mit seinen Symptomen der autosomal-rezessiven Form des Kenny-Caffey-Syndroms (KCS, s. dort) sehr nahe. Anders als beim KCS fehlen beim SSS jedoch Osteosklerose und rezidivierende bakterielle Infekte. Durch Kopplungsanalyse wurde gezeigt, da\u00df SSS- und KCS-Locus den gleichen anzestralen Haplotyp in der Chromosomenregion 1q42-q43 aufweisen liegen, sodass eine gemeinsame Gr\u00fcndermutation anzunehmen ist. Tats\u00e4chlich sind sowohl das SSS als auch das ebenfalls autosomal-rezessiv vererbte KCS durch Mutationen (Deletionen und Kettenabbruch-Mutationen) im TBCE-Gen f\u00fcr das Tubulin-spezifische Chaperon E bedingt. Dieses Protein ist am Aufbau der Tubulin-Strukturen beteiligt. Durch den Defekt k\u00f6nnen Proteintransport, Signaltransduktion und/oder Zellmotilit\u00e4t beeintr\u00e4chtigt werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sanjad-Sakati syndrome (SSS), also known as hypoparathyroidism - intellectual disability-dysmorphism, is a rare multiple congenital anomaly syndrome, mainly occurring in the Middle East and the Arabian Gulf countries, characterized by intrauterine growth restriction at birth, microcephaly, congenital hypoparathyroidism (that can cause hypocalcemic tetany or seizures in infancy), severe growth retardation, typical facial features (long narrow face, deep-set eyes, beaked nose, floppy and large ears, long philtrum, thin lips and micrognathia), and mild to moderate intellectual deficiency. Ocular findings (i.e. nanophthalmos, retinal vascular tortuosity and corneal opacification/clouding) and superior mesenteric artery syndrome have also been reported. Although SSS shares the same locus with the autosomal recessive form of Kenny-Caffey syndrome (see this term), the latter differs from SSS by its normal intelligence and skeletal features.", "synonyms": "HRD syndrome, Hypoparathyroidism-intellectual disability-dysmorphism syndrome, Hypoparathyroidism-short stature-intellectual disability-seizures syndrome, Richardson-Kirk syndrome, SSS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.1", "omim": "241410", "umls": "C1855840", "gard": "411"}, {"name": "San Luis Valley-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Rekombinantes 8-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Rekombinante 8 (rec(8))-Syndrom, auch San-Luis-Valley-Syndrom genannt, ist eine komplexe Chromosomenst\u00f6rung, die durch eine elterliche perizentrische Inversion des Chromosoms 8 verursacht wird und die durch gr\u00f6\u00dfere angeborene Herzfehler, urogenitale Fehlbildungen, m\u00e4\u00dfige bis schwere geistige Behinderung und milde kraniofaziale Dysmorphien gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Duplikation 8q/Deletion 8p, Rec(8)-Syndrom, Rec8-Syndrom, Rekombinantes Chromosom 8-Syndrom, San Luis Valley-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q99.8", "OMIM": "179613", "UMLS": "C0795822", "GARD": "9698", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt, jedoch ist das Syndrom selten. Das Rec(8)-Syndrom tritt typischerweise bei Hispanoamerikanern im S\u00fcdwesten der Vereinigten Staaten auf und es wird angenommen, dass es auf einen einzigen Gr\u00fcnder zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren ist, der im 17. oder 18. Jahrhundert aus Spanien nach Colorado oder New Mexiko emigrierte.", "clinical_description": "Charakteristische Symptome des Rec(8)-Syndroms sind: (i) gr\u00f6\u00dfere angeborene Herzfehler mit komplexen konotrunkalen Anomalien, oft begleitet von nicht-konotrunkalen Anomalien (Pulmonalstenose, Ventrikelseptumdefekt (VSD), persistierender Ductus arteriosus, persistierende linksseitige Vena cava superior (PLSVC)); (ii) urogenitale Fehlbildungen (Kryptorchismus, hypoplastisches Skrotum bei m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten); (iii) m\u00e4\u00dfige geistige Behinderung und (iv) milde kraniofaziale Dysmorphien (abnorme Haarwirbel, tiefer Nackenhaaransatz, breites Gesicht, Hypertelorismus, infraorbitale Falten, nach vorn gerichtete Nasenl\u00f6cher, d\u00fcnne Oberlippe, zeltf\u00f6rmiger Mund, Gingivahyperplasie, abnorme Zahnentwicklung, Mikrogenie, malformierte tiefsitzende Ohren). Weitere Befunde sind: Verz\u00f6gerte Entwicklung, Spastik mit orthop\u00e4dischen Komplikationen (Skoliose), Krampfanf\u00e4lle, rezidivierende Otitis media, H\u00f6rverlust. Personen mit dem rec(8)-Syndrom besitzen trotz ihrer geistigen Behinderung in der Regel solide soziale und nonverbale Kommunikationsf\u00e4higkeiten und ein gutm\u00fctiges Naturell.", "etiology": "Das Rec(8)-Syndrom ist durch eine komplexe Chromosomenst\u00f6rung verursacht, die formal als rec(8)dup(8q)inv(8)(p23.1q22.1) bezeichnet wird. Ausgangspunkt ist eine parentale perizentrische Inversion des Chromosoms 8 [inv(8)(p23.1q22.1)]. Die Bruchstellen sind unterschiedlich, nur f\u00fcr die Population der Hispanics werden identische Bruchstellen angenommen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den klinischen Symptomen, die zur Chromosomenanalyse mit klassischer oder molekularer Karyotypisierung f\u00fchrt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Chromosom 8-Anomalien, Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom, Williams-Syndrom und Noonan-Syndrom (siehe jeweils dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose ist nach Amniozentese oder Chorionzottenbiopsie durch zytogenetische Analyse m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Eine genetische Beratung wird empfohlen. Zur Bestimmung des Wiederholungsrisikos ist eine Karyotypisierung der Eltern erforderlich. Durch Segregationsanalyse wurde die Wahrscheinlichkeit, dass ein Tr\u00e4ger-Elternteil ein weiteres Kind mit dem rec(8)-Syndrom haben wird, auf 6,2% bestimmt. Unter den Patienten-Eltern sind M\u00fctter h\u00e4ufiger Tr\u00e4ger der Inversion (ca. 60%) als V\u00e4ter (ca. 40%).", "management_and_treatment": "Das Krankheitsmanagement umfasst chirurgische Eingriffe im Fall von Herzfehlern und multidisziplin\u00e4re Versorgung, einschlie\u00dflich Screening des H\u00f6rverm\u00f6gens, Untersuchung des Reflux und Verstopfungen und eine umfassende Untersuchung des Entwicklungsstandes mit regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Nachuntersuchungen. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfiges Screening der neurologischen Entwicklung und Teilnahme an individuell angepassten Therapieprogrammen werden empfohlen. Orthop\u00e4dische Operationen liefern suboptimale Ergebnisse, da die geistige Behinderung eine Rehabilitation beeintr\u00e4chtigt.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich und wird durch den Schweregrad des angeborenen Herzfehlers bestimmt. In der Vergangenheit war die Lebenserwartung \u00fcber die fr\u00fche Kindheit hinaus sehr gering, jedoch kann, mit verbesserter Versorgungsqualit\u00e4t und fr\u00fcher Intervention, die Mehrzahl der Patienten bis in das Erwachsenenalter \u00fcberleben.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt, jedoch ist das Syndrom selten. Das Rec(8)-Syndrom tritt typischerweise bei Hispanoamerikanern im S\u00fcdwesten der Vereinigten Staaten auf und es wird angenommen, dass es auf einen einzigen Gr\u00fcnder zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren ist, der im 17. oder 18. Jahrhundert aus Spanien nach Colorado oder New Mexiko emigrierte."}, {"name": "Santavuori-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Muskel-Augen-Gehirn-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene kongenitale Muskeldystrophie aus der Gruppe der Dystroglykanopathien, die durch eine fr\u00fch einsetzende Muskeldystrophie, schwere Muskelhypotonie, schwere geistige Behinderung und typische Gehirn- und Augenfehlbildungen gekennzeichnet ist, einschlie\u00dflich Pachygyrie, Polymikrogyrie, Agyrie, strukturelle Anomalien des Hirnstamms und des Kleinhirns, schwere Myopie, Glaukom, Hypoplasie des Sehnervs und der Netzhaut. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen sich mit Krampfanf\u00e4llen, Makro- oder Mikrozephalie, Mikrophthalmie und kongenitalen Kontrakturen pr\u00e4sentieren. Je nach Schweregrad wird eine eingeschr\u00e4nkte motorische Funktion beobachtet. Es wurden auch weniger schwere F\u00e4lle berichtet.", "synonyms": "Kongenitale Muskeldystrophie Typ Santavuori, MEB-Syndrom, Muscle-Eye-Brain-Syndrom, Santavuori-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G71.0", "OMIM": "236670\u00a0 253280\u00a0 253800\u00a0 613150\u00a0 613153\u00a0 613154\u00a0 615181\u00a0 615350", "UMLS": "C0457133", "GARD": "156"}, {"name": "Santavuori-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Ceroid-Lipofuszinose, neuronale, infantile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Infantile Neuronale Ceroidlipofuscinose (INCL) ist eine Form der Neuronalen Ceroidlipofuscinose (NCL; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Beginn in der zweiten H\u00e4lfte des ersten Lebensjahres mit schnellem mentalem und motorischem Abbau bis hin zum Verlust aller psychomotorischen F\u00e4higkeiten.", "synonyms": "Hagberg-Santavuori-Krankheit, INCL, NCL, infantile, Santavuori-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E75.4", "OMIM": "256730", "UMLS": "C0268281\u00a0 C2931673", "MeSH": "C537948", "epidemiology": "Die Infantile NCL tritt weltweit auf, ist aber am h\u00e4ufigsten in Finnland mit einer Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 1:190.000 in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung und 1:20.000 unter lebend Geborenen. In Schweden und Norwegen hat die Krankheit dagegen nur eine Pr\u00e4valenz von unter 1:1.000.000.", "clinical_description": "Nach einer anf\u00e4nglichen Periode mit normaler Entwicklung wird die Krankheit nach dem 6. Lebensmonat manifest. Zu dieser Zeit erreicht die geistige Entwicklung ein Plateau und wird zusammen mit motorischen Funktionsst\u00f6rungen r\u00fcckl\u00e4ufig. Der mentale Abbau ist begleitet von Krampfanf\u00e4llen, spastischer Parese  und Visusverlust. Die Hirnatrophie resultiert in verlangsamten Sch\u00e4delwachstum und Mikrozephalie. M\u00f6gliche weitere Symptome sind Muskelsteife und Irritabilit\u00e4t. Die psychomotorischen F\u00e4higkeiten gehen sehr schnell verloren, die Entwicklung sistiert, und innerhalb einiger Monate entsteht ein vegetativer Status.", "etiology": "Die INCL wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im PPT1/CLN1-Gen (1p32), das f\u00fcr die lysosomale Palmitoyl-Protein-Thioesterase 1 kodiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinisch-neurologischen und -ophthalmologischen Befunde, die Entwicklungsdiagnostik und die Aktivit\u00e4tsbestimmung der Palmitoyl-Protein-Thioesterase 1 in Leukozyten, trockenen Blutproben oder kultivierten Hautfibroblasten. Durch molekulare Analyse wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt. Ein histopathologischer Befund ist der Nachweis autofluoreszierender, granul\u00e4rer, osmophiler Ablagerungen in den Lysosomen (GRODs) mit charakterischer Akkumulation der Saponine A und D.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnostisch muss an andere progrediente neurologische Krankheiten mit fr\u00fchem Beginn gedacht werden, z.B. Infantile Krabbe-Krankheit, Fr\u00fchstadium des Rett-Syndroms und Gangliosidosen (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose ist durch enzymatische Messungen und, wenn die urs\u00e4chlichen Mutationen in der Familie bekannt sind, durch molekulare Analyse m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Krankheit kann nicht geheilt werden. Die Betreuung besteht in palliativer Pflege, der Anwendung von Antikonvulsiva und der Behandlung schwerer Spastik mit Muskelrelaxantien. F\u00fcr die Behandlung schmerzhafter spastischer Krisen, die im sp\u00e4teren Krankheitsverlauf auftreten, k\u00f6nnen orale Opiate und Fentanyl-Pflaster hilfreich sein. In der Zukunft k\u00f6nnte die Stammzelltherapie eine m\u00f6gliche Alternative zur Behandlung der INCL werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist schwer, aber die Lebenserwartung wird auch durch die unterst\u00fctzenden Ma\u00dfnahmen, z.B. Ern\u00e4hrung durch ein Gastrostoma, bestimmt.", "summary": "Die Infantile NCL tritt weltweit auf, ist aber am h\u00e4ufigsten in Finnland mit einer Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 1:190.000 in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung und 1:20.000 unter lebend Geborenen. In Schweden und Norwegen hat die Krankheit dagegen nur eine Pr\u00e4valenz von unter 1:1.000.000."}, {"name": "Santos-Mateus-Leal-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hirschsprung-Krankheit - Polydaktylie - Innenohrtaubheit", "german_description": "Die Assoziation von Hirschsprung-Krankheit, Polydaktylie und Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit ist extrem selten und wurde bei einem Geschwisterpaar mit konsanguinen Eltern beschrieben. Die Neugeborenen hatten eine einseitige Nierenagenesie und Hypertelorismus. Todesursache im Kindesalter war die Aganglionose. Autosomal-rezessive Vererbung ist anzunehmen. - Hirschsprung-Krankheit mit Gliedma\u00dfenanomalien, vor allem Polydaktylie, ist mehrfach beschrieben worden. Diese Patienten hatten h\u00e4ufig auch Herzscheidewand-Defekte. - Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und Hirschsprung-Krankheit sind h\u00e4ufig miteinander assoziiert, entweder isoliert oder als Teil gut bekannter Syndrome, wie dem Waardenburg-Syndrom. Es ist bei allen diesen Assoziationen schwer zu sagen, ob es sich um spezifische Assoziationen oder um variable Expression ungen\u00fcgend definierter Syndrome mit Symptomen in verschiedenen Organen (Herz, Hand, Niere, Colon, Innenohr) und autosomal-rezessiver Vererbung handelt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hirschsprung disease-deafness-polydactyly syndrome is an extremely rare malformative association, described in only two siblings to date, characterized by Hirschsprung disease (defined by the presence of an aganglionic segment of variable extent in the terminal part of the colon that leads to symptoms of intestinal obstruction, including constipation and abdominal distension), polydactyly of hands and/or feet, unilateral renal agenesis, hypertelorism and congenital deafness. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1988.", "synonyms": "Hirschsprung disease-hearing loss-polydactyly syndrome, Santos-Mateus-Leal syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q43.1", "omim": "235740", "umls": "C2931452", "gard": "157"}, {"name": "SAO", "sub_name": "Ovalozytose, s\u00fcdostasiatische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die S\u00fcdostasiatische Ovalozytose (SAO) ist eine seltene St\u00f6rung der Erythrozytenmembran, die durch ovale rote Blutk\u00f6rperchen gekennzeichnet ist. Die meisten Patienten sind symptomlos oder zeigen gelegentlich milde Symptome wie z. B. Bl\u00e4sse, Gelbsucht, An\u00e4mie and Gallensteine.", "synonyms": "Melanesische Ovalozytose, SAO, Stomatozytische heredit\u00e4re Elliptozytose, S\u00fcdasiatische Elliptozytose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D58.1", "OMIM": "166900", "epidemiology": "Die SAO ist verbreitet in S\u00fcdostasien und L\u00e4ndern des westlichen Pazifikraums (z. B. Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesien, Philippinen und Papua-Neuguinea). Die SAO ist sehr h\u00e4ufig in Gebieten, in denen Malaria endemisch ist (Pr\u00e4valenz 1:20-1:4), aber in Europa sehr selten.", "clinical_description": "Eine SAO kann mit jedem Alter auftreten. Neugeborene mit SAO k\u00f6nnen symptomatisch sein mit H\u00e4molyse bei Geburt, die zu An\u00e4mie, Bl\u00e4sse oder Gelbsucht f\u00fchrt. An\u00e4mie und Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie bei Neugeborenen tritt oft gemeinsam mit milder Splenomegalie and Gallensteinen auf. Eine H\u00e4molyse tritt f\u00fcr gew\u00f6hnlich in den ersten drei Lebensjahren auf. Erwachsene sind asymptomatisch oder haben nur eine minimale h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie. Eine erh\u00f6hte Malariaresistenz wird ebenfalls beobachtet.", "etiology": "Die SAO wird durch eine 27 bp-Deletion im SLC4A1-Gen verursacht, das auf Chromosom 17q2.31 lokalisiert ist (SLC4A1del27- Mutation). Dieses Gen kodiert f\u00fcr ein Bande 3-Anionen-Transportprotein, den Bicarbonat-Chlorid-Austauscher in den Membranen roter Blutk\u00f6rperchen. Mutationen in diesem Protein verursachen Membransteifigkeit. In fast allen F\u00e4llen kann die Deletion heterozygot nachgewiesen werden, wobei Homozygotie als lethal f\u00fcr den sich entwickelnden Embryo angesehen wird. Unl\u00e4ngst wurde in einem SAO-Fall eine homozygote Mutation nachgewiesen, die zu einer extrem schweren dyserythropoietischen An\u00e4mie mit distaler tubul\u00e4rer Azidose der Nieren (s. diese Termini) f\u00fchrt. Diese w\u00e4re t\u00f6dlich gewesen, wenn der Fet nicht in-utero Bluttransfusionen bekommen h\u00e4tte. Das gleichzeitige Vorkommen der SLC4A1del27-Mutation mit anderen Mutationen im SLC4A1-Gen kann eine distale tubul\u00e4re Azidose der Niere verursachen, die in einigen F\u00e4llen mit einer SAO assoziiert ist.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Nachweis von Makro-Ovalozyten im peripheren Blutausstrich, wobei einige der Zellen Stomatozyten \u00e4hneln mit mehreren charakteristischen schlitz- oder mundf\u00f6rmigen Aufhellungen ohne H\u00e4molyse. Zus\u00e4tzlich kann eine genetische Diagnostik zum Nachweis der SLC4A1-Genmutation herangezogen werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen beinhalten alle Formen der heredit\u00e4ren Elliptozytose und Sph\u00e4rozytose sowie der dehydrierten heredit\u00e4ren Stomatozytose (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, wird aber aufgrund der milden Symptomatik der Erkrankung nicht angeboten.", "genetic_counseling": "Die SAO folgt einem autosomal-dominantem Erbgang. Eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die meisten SAO-F\u00e4lle sind asymptomatisch, und eine Behandlung ist nicht erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Eine SAO ist nicht lebensbedrohlich.", "summary": "Die SAO ist verbreitet in S\u00fcdostasien und L\u00e4ndern des westlichen Pazifikraums (z. B. Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesien, Philippinen und Papua-Neuguinea). Die SAO ist sehr h\u00e4ufig in Gebieten, in denen Malaria endemisch ist (Pr\u00e4valenz 1:20-1:4), aber in Europa sehr selten."}, {"name": "SAOA", "sub_name": "Sporadische Ataxie unbekannter \u00c4tiologie im Erwachsenenalter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die sporadische Ataxie unbekannter \u00c4tiologie im Erwachsenenalter beschreibt eine Gruppe nicht-erblicher degenerativer Ataxien, die durch ein langsam progredientes Kleinhirnsyndrom (mit Ataxie des Standes und des Ganges, Dysmetrie der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen und Intentionstremor, ataktischer Sprache und okulomotorischen Anomalien) gekennzeichnet ist, das im Erwachsenenalter (um das 50. Lebensjahr herum) auftritt und keine bekannte Ursache hat. Extrazerebell\u00e4re Symptome (z. B. verminderter Vibrationssinn und fehlende oder verminderte Kn\u00f6chelreflexe), Polyneuropathie und leichte autonome Dysfunktion k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls vorhanden sein. Selten wurde auch eine leichte kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung berichtet.", "synonyms": "Idiopathische sp\u00e4t-einsetzende zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, SAOA, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "G31.8"}, {"name": "SAP-Defizienz", "sub_name": "X-chromosomales lymphoproliferatives Syndrom durch SH2D1A-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltener, genetisch bedingter, prim\u00e4rer Immundefekt, der durch eine gest\u00f6rte Immunantwort auf eine Infektion mit dem Epstein-Barr-Virus (EBV) gekennzeichnet ist. Urs\u00e4chlich sind hemizygote Mutationen im X-chromosomalen SH2D1A-Gen, die zu einer Lymphoproliferation der B-Zellen f\u00fchren und variable Ph\u00e4notypen verursachen. Das Syndrom kann sich mit einer EBV-bedingten schweren oder fulminanten Mononukleose, h\u00e4mophagozytischer Lymphohistiozytose (mit fulminanter Hepatitis, Lebernekrose, Knochenmarkshypoplasie und neurologischer Beteiligung), Hypogammaglobulin\u00e4mie und B-Zell-Lymphom manifestieren. Weitere variable Merkmale sind Vaskulitis, lymphomatoide Granulomatose, aplastische An\u00e4mie und chronische Gastritis. Gelegentlich kann ein T-Zell-Lymphom beobachtet werden. Zu den Laborbefunden geh\u00f6ren normale oder erh\u00f6hte aktivierte T-Zellen und reduzierte Anzahl an B-Ged\u00e4chtniszellen.", "synonyms": "SAP-Defizienz, SAP-Mangel, SH2D1A/SLAM-assoziierter Proteinmangel, X-chromosomales lymphoproliferatives Syndrom Typ 1, XLP1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D82.3", "OMIM": "308240"}, {"name": "SAPHO-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, pyogene autoinflammatorische Erkrankung, die durch die Assoziation von neutrophiler kutaner Beteiligung und chronischer nicht-bakterieller Osteomyelitis gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Synovitis - Akne - Pustulosis - Hyperostose - Osteitis, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "M86.3", "UMLS": "C0263859", "GARD": "7606", "MedDRA": "10051316", "epidemiology": "Obwohl seine H\u00e4ufigkeit und Pr\u00e4valenz wahrscheinlich untersch\u00e4tzt wird, gilt das SAPHO-Syndrom (Abk\u00fcrzung f\u00fcr Synovitis, Akne, Pustulosis, Hyperostosis und Osteitis) als eine seltene Erkrankung.", "clinical_description": "Das Eintrittsalter reicht von der Adoleszenz bis zum sp\u00e4ten Erwachsenenalter, mit einem mittleren Alter zwischen 30 und 40 Jahren. Das SAPHO-Syndrom umfasst ein breites Spektrum von Anomalien, die durch variable Kombinationen von osteoartikul\u00e4ren und kutanen Manifestationen unterschiedlicher Schweregrade gekennzeichnet sind. Der Beginn von Knochen- und Gelenkschmerzen, Steifigkeit und Schwellungen ist meist heimt\u00fcckisch. Bei Erwachsenen kommt es vor allem in der vorderen Brustwand, aber auch in der Wirbels\u00e4ule, seltener im Unterkiefer und in den Beckenknochen vor; bei Kindern zeigt sie eine vergleichbare Verteilung wie die chronische nicht-bakterielle Osteomyelitis (CNO/CRMO) (z.B. lange Knochen, Schl\u00fcsselbein, Wirbels\u00e4ule). Wenn eine Synovialitis auftritt, manifestiert sie sich meist im Kreuzbeingelenk, in den H\u00fcften oder Knien oder in den Sternoklavikulargelenken. Je nach Schwere der Symptome kann ein eingeschr\u00e4nkter Bewegungsumfang beobachtet werden. Die dermatologische Beteiligung umfasst schwere Akne, palmoplant\u00e4re Pustulose und pustul\u00e4re Psoriasis. Hautmanifestationen beginnen oft 1-2 Jahre vor kn\u00f6chernen Ver\u00e4nderungen, k\u00f6nnen aber gleichzeitig oder mehr als 20 Jahre sp\u00e4ter auftreten. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch unter Bauchschmerzen, Durchfall, Analfissuren oder Abszessen leiden, was auf einen m\u00f6glichen Zusammenhang mit einer entz\u00fcndlichen Darmerkrankung (IBD) hindeutet. Die meisten Autoren betrachten CNO/CRMO als die p\u00e4diatrische Form des SAPHO-Syndroms. Tats\u00e4chlich spricht das h\u00e4ufige Auftreten von dermatologischen St\u00f6rungen oder IBD f\u00fcr die Einbeziehung dieser beiden Einheiten in das gleiche Spektrum.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie ist unbekannt. Das SAPHO-Syndrom scheint einen multifaktoriellen Ursprung mit genetischen, \u00f6kologischen, immunologischen und infekti\u00f6sen Komponenten zu haben. Langsam wachsende Bakterien, wie z.B. Propionibacterium acnes, k\u00f6nnten als Ausl\u00f6ser fungieren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die bei der klinischen Untersuchung vermutete Diagnose muss mit bildgebenden Verfahren (R\u00f6ntgen, CT, MRT) best\u00e4tigt werden, die eine Kombination von Osteolyse und Osteosklerose mit sekund\u00e4rer Hyperostose, Knochenmark\u00f6dem, endostealer periostealer Entz\u00fcndung, perifokaler Myositis und angrenzender Arthritis zeigen. Die Knochenbiopsie offenbart oft ein Infiltrat von Neutrophilen im Fr\u00fchstadium, das nach und nach durch mononukle\u00e4re Zellen ersetzt und in sp\u00e4teren Stadien mit Sklerose assoziiert wird. Eine bakteriologische Studie ist manchmal positiv f\u00fcr Propionibacterium acnes. Die Kultur der Synovialfl\u00fcssigkeit ist in der Regel negativ.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst infekti\u00f6se Osteomyelitis oder Arthritis, Langerhans-Zell-Histiozytose und Knochentumore wie Ewing-Sarkom, Osteoblastom und osteoidales Osteom. Hypophosphatasie kann den Knochenph\u00e4notyp des SAPHO-Syndroms nachahmen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch. Es wurden einige famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle gemeldet.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist haupts\u00e4chlich symptomatisch und basiert auf nicht-steroidalen entz\u00fcndungshemmenden Medikamenten, die manchmal durch Kortikosteroide (z.B. Prednison) ersetzt werden. In resistenten F\u00e4llen k\u00f6nnen auch krankheitsmodifizierende Antirheumatika (z.B. Methotrexat) eingesetzt werden. Intraven\u00f6se Biphosphonate (Pamidronat, Zoledronat) k\u00f6nnen Knochenschmerzen lindern. In j\u00fcngster Zeit zeigten TNF-Hemmer ermutigende Ergebnisse bei der Kontrolle sowohl der osteoartikul\u00e4ren als auch der kutanen Manifestationen. Die osteoartikul\u00e4ren Merkmale k\u00f6nnen auch mit Sulfasalazin behandelt werden. Akne kann mit systemischen Antibiotika wie Doxycyclin behandelt werden. Die palmoplantare Pustulose oder Psoriasis pustulosa reagiert in der Regel gut auf das Thema Kortikosteroide oder die PUVA-Therapie. Physiotherapie wird empfohlen.", "prognosis": "Die Erkrankung verl\u00e4uft in der Regel chronisch, mit abwechselnden Remissions- und R\u00fcckfallphasen, manchmal mit dem Auftreten neuer osteosklerotischer L\u00e4sionen. Es kann zu einer spontanen Aufl\u00f6sung kommen. Zu den Komplikationen geh\u00f6ren Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen der Knochen- und Gelenkfunktion, Gef\u00e4\u00dfkompression, chronisches Schmerzsyndrom und Fortschreiten zur klassischen Spondyloarthritis.", "summary": "Obwohl seine H\u00e4ufigkeit und Pr\u00e4valenz wahrscheinlich untersch\u00e4tzt wird, gilt das SAPHO-Syndrom (Abk\u00fcrzung f\u00fcr Synovitis, Akne, Pustulosis, Hyperostosis und Osteitis) als eine seltene Erkrankung."}, {"name": "SAP-Mangel", "sub_name": "X-chromosomales lymphoproliferatives Syndrom durch SH2D1A-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltener, genetisch bedingter, prim\u00e4rer Immundefekt, der durch eine gest\u00f6rte Immunantwort auf eine Infektion mit dem Epstein-Barr-Virus (EBV) gekennzeichnet ist. Urs\u00e4chlich sind hemizygote Mutationen im X-chromosomalen SH2D1A-Gen, die zu einer Lymphoproliferation der B-Zellen f\u00fchren und variable Ph\u00e4notypen verursachen. Das Syndrom kann sich mit einer EBV-bedingten schweren oder fulminanten Mononukleose, h\u00e4mophagozytischer Lymphohistiozytose (mit fulminanter Hepatitis, Lebernekrose, Knochenmarkshypoplasie und neurologischer Beteiligung), Hypogammaglobulin\u00e4mie und B-Zell-Lymphom manifestieren. Weitere variable Merkmale sind Vaskulitis, lymphomatoide Granulomatose, aplastische An\u00e4mie und chronische Gastritis. Gelegentlich kann ein T-Zell-Lymphom beobachtet werden. Zu den Laborbefunden geh\u00f6ren normale oder erh\u00f6hte aktivierte T-Zellen und reduzierte Anzahl an B-Ged\u00e4chtniszellen.", "synonyms": "SAP-Defizienz, SAP-Mangel, SH2D1A/SLAM-assoziierter Proteinmangel, X-chromosomales lymphoproliferatives Syndrom Typ 1, XLP1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D82.3", "OMIM": "308240"}, {"name": "Sarcocystosis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare parasitic disease characterized by infection with sarcocystis species with humans as definitive (intestinal sarcocystosis) or aberrant intermediate (muscular sarcocystosis with development of sarcocysts in myocytes of skeletal, cardiac, and smooth muscle) host. Enteric infection is often mild or asymptomatic but may cause symptomatic enteritis with nausea, abdominal pain, diarrhea, and vomiting. Symptoms of muscular sarcocystosis include fever, fatigue, headache, cough, myalgia, and arthralgia, among others, with the possibility of a long-lasting, waxing and waning course.", "synonyms": "Sarcosporidiosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A07.8", "umls": "C0036231", "mesh": "D012523", "meddra": "10039483"}, {"name": "Sarkoglycan, qualitative oder quantitative Defekte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sarkoglykanopathie, ", "UMLS": "C2936331", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sarkoglykanopathie", "sub_name": "Sarkoglycan, qualitative oder quantitative Defekte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sarkoglykanopathie, ", "UMLS": "C2936331", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sarkoidose", "german_description": "Die Sarkoidose ist eine multisystemische Krankheit mit unbekannter Ursache. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch Bildung von Immun-Granulomen in den betroffenen Organen. Die Sarkoidose ist weltweit verbreitet. Die Inzidenz h\u00e4ngt vom, Alter, Geschlecht, ethnischem Hintergrund und geographischer Herkunft ab und wurde bei M\u00e4nnern zu etwa 1:6.300 und bei Frauen zu 1:5.300 bestimmt. Bevorzugt betroffen sind Lunge und lymphatisches System, aber auch praktisch jedes andere Organ kann in den Krankheitsprozess einbezogen sein. Schwere Verl\u00e4ufe resultieren aus der Beteiligung des Herzens, des Nervensystems, der Augen, der Nieren und des Kehlkopfes. In den meisten F\u00e4llen wird die Sarkoidose durch anhaltenden tockenen Husten, Augen- und Hautsymptome, Schwellung der peripheren Lymphknoten, Mattigkeit, Gewichtsverlust, Fieber oder Nachtschwei\u00df und Erythema nodosum manifest. Ein abnormer Stoffwechsel des Vitamins D3 in den Granulomen und Hyperkalz\u00e4mie sind m\u00f6gliche Befunde. Die R\u00f6ntgen-Thorax-Befunde sind in 90% auff\u00e4llig und definieren mit Lymphadenopathie und/oder Lungeninfiltraten (ohne oder mit Fibrose) die Sarkoidose-Stadien I bis IV. Die \u00c4tiologie ist noch unbekannt. In der am meisten favorisierte Hypothese wird angenommen, dass verschiedene unbekannte und schwer abbaubare Antigene aus Infektionen oder Umwelt bei genetisch pr\u00e4disponierten Personen eine \u00fcberstarke Immunreaktion ausl\u00f6sen. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren charakteristische klinische und radiologische Befunde, der Nachweis nicht-verk\u00e4sender Granulome (in Biopsaten unter tracheo-bronchialer Endoskopie oder an anderen Stellen) und der Ausschluss aller anderen granulomat\u00f6sen Erkrankungen. Verlauf und Schweregrad der Sarkoidose sind sehr unterschiedlich. In den gutartigsten F\u00e4llen mit spontaner Remission innerhalb von 24-36 Monaten ist eine Behandlung nicht erforderlich, aber bis zur Heilung m\u00fcssen regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen stattfinden. In schwereren F\u00e4llen erfolgt eine medikament\u00f6se Behandlung, entweder sofort oder im Verlauf der Kontrolluntersuchungen, wenn die Entwicklung der Krankheit es erfordert. Die Behandlung st\u00fctzt sich auf systemische Anwendung von Kortikosteroiden. Diese Behandlung muss mindestens 12 Monate lang erfolgen. Einige Patienten machen wiederholte Rezidive durch und ben\u00f6tigen \u00fcber lange Zeit (mehrere Jahre) niedrig dosiert Kortikosteroide. Bei mangelhaftem Ansprechen auf Kortikosteroide, bei Unvertr\u00e4glichkeit oder zur Einsparung hoher Steroiddosen, wenn diese \u00fcber lange Zeit erforderlich sind, haben sich Immunsuppressiva und Aminochinoline als n\u00fctzlich erwiesen. In streng ausgew\u00e4hlten F\u00e4llen, die auf Standardtherapie nicht ansprechen, k\u00f6nnen evtl. spezifische Anti-TNF-alpha-Agentien wertvolle Besserung bringen. Einige Patienten profitieren von topischen Kortikosteroiden. Die Mortalit\u00e4t der Sarkoidose wird auf 0,5-5% gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multisystemic, autoinflammatory disorder of unknown etiology characterized by the formation of immune, non-caseating granulomas in any organ(s), leading to variable clinical symptoms and severity. Clinical presentation is typically with persistent dry cough, eye or skin manifestations, peripheral lymph nodes, fatigue, weight loss, fever or night sweats, and L\u00f6fgren syndrome.", "synonyms": "Besnier-Boeck-Schaumann disease, Boeck sarcoid, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Elderly, Adult", "icd_10": "D86.0\u00a0 D86.1\u00a0 D86.2\u00a0 D86.3\u00a0 D86.8\u00a0 D86.9", "omim": "181000\u00a0 612387\u00a0 612388", "umls": "C0036202", "mesh": "D012507", "meddra": "10039486", "epidemiology": "Sarcoidosis is a ubiquitous disease with incidence varying according to age, sex, race and geographic origin. The highest rates are reported in Northern Europe and in African-American individuals, the lowest rates in Asia. In Europe, incidence ranges between 1/625 to 500,000 inhabitants. There is a slight predominance in females.", "clinical_description": "Presentation, severity and evolution of sarcoidosis is highly variable. Diagnosis typically occurs in the fourth and fifth decade of life with a second peak of incidence occurring in women older than 50 years of age, but presentation may occur anywhere between childhood and elderly age. The disease is classed as either acute, resolving within 2 years, or chronic, persisting for 3-5 years or longer. The lung and the lymphatic system are predominantly affected, but virtually every organ may be involved. Other severe manifestations result from cardiac, neurological, ocular, kidney or laryngeal localizations. In most cases, sarcoidosis is revealed by persistent dry cough, eye or skin manifestations, peripheral lymph nodes, fatigue, weight loss, fever or night sweats, and L\u00f6fgren syndrome (an acute form characterized by fever, bilateral ankle arthritis and/or erythema nodosum and bilateral hilar lymphadenopathy). Abnormal metabolism of vitamin D3 within granulomatous lesions and hypercalcemia are possible. Chest radiography is abnormal in about 90% of cases and shows lymphadenopathy and/or pulmonary infiltrates (without or with fibrosis), defining sarcoidosis stages from I to IV. African-Americans present a more severe disease, and in Scandinavian countries, about one third of cases have L\u00f6fgren syndrome.", "etiology": "The etiology remains unknown. The prevailing hypothesis is that various, unidentified antigens of either infectious or environmental origin could trigger an exaggerated immune reaction in genetically susceptible hosts.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis relies on compatible clinical and radiographic manifestations, biopsy showing non-caseating granulomas and exclusion of all other causes of granulomatous disease. Some situations do not require biopsy such as Lofgren's syndrome or the presence of typical asymptomatic bilateral mediastino-hilar adenopathies. Biopsies from easily accessible areas (skin, peripheral lymphadenopathies, conjunctival nodules) should be considered. However, bronchoscopy with bronchial and transbronchial biopsies has a good diagnostic performance. Endobronchial ultrasonography-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) provide a high yield in case of mediastino-hilar lymphadenopathies.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes infections, chronic beryllium disease, common variable immunodeficiency, hypersensitivity pneumonitis, granulomatous polyangiitis, Crohn disease, sarcoid-like reactions (cancer or lymphomas), as well as drug-induced granulomatosis.", "genetic_counseling": "Sarcoidosis results from a complex interaction of multiple genes and thus does not require genetic counseling.", "management_and_treatment": "Depending on the evolution and severity of sarcoidosis, patients may not require systemic therapy. Therapy is considered where there is a possibility of severe complications (i.e. functional organ failure) or to reduce persistent symptoms of discomfort that impact on quality of life. Discomfort may be due to fibrosis, para-sarcoidosis syndrome or comorbidities as well as active disease. Treatment is principally with systemic corticosteroids, and generally maintained for 12 months; however, the duration and minimal efficient dose should be adapted to each patient. Patients with repeated relapses may require long-term, low-dose corticosteroid therapy. Other treatments including immunosuppressive drugs (methotrexate, azathioprine, or leflunomide) and aminoquinolins may be useful in case of unsatisfactory response to corticosteroids, poor tolerance or as sparing agents. In some strictly selected cases refractory to standard therapy, specific anti-TNF-alpha agents (infliximab or adalimumab) may offer improvement. Some patients benefit from topical corticosteroids.", "prognosis": "In at least half of cases, sarcoidosis resolves spontaneously within 2 years. Remission is less likely where diseases persists for five years after presentation. Mortality is estimated at 6-8% and typically due to organ failure (typically respiratory or cardiac). The extent of pulmonary fibrosis and pulmonary hypertension are predictive of mortality."}, {"name": "Sarkom der Cervix uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Maligner mesenchymaler Tumor des Geb\u00e4rmutterhalses, Sarkom, zervikales, Zervixtumor, maligner mesemchymaler, ", "ICD-10": "C53.0\u00a0 C53.1\u00a0 C53.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sarkom der interdigitierenden dendritischen Zellen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare dendritic cell tumor characterized by a neoplasm composed of spindle to ovoid cells with phenotypic features similar to those of interdigitating dendritic cells. Solitary lymph node involvement is common, although extranodal localization (in particular skin and soft tissue) has also been reported. Patients usually present with an asymptomatic mass, sometimes with systemic symptoms such as fatigue, fever, and night sweats. Generalized lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly, or hepatomegaly may be seen in rare cases. The clinical course is generally aggressive.", "synonyms": "Interdigitating cell sarcoma, Reticulum cell sarcoma, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C96.4", "omim": "267730", "umls": "C0024302\u00a0 C1260326", "mesh": "D054739", "meddra": "10038804"}, {"name": "Sarkom des Corpus uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "C54.2", "UMLS": "C0338113", "MedDRA": "10039497", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sarkom des Thorax bei SMARCA4-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare soft tissue tumor characterized by a compressive mass located in the mediastinum and/or pleura and lung, including prominent lymph node involvement, histologically poorly differentiated and frequently showing rhabdoid features. Loss of SMARCA4 is typically accompanied by SMARCA2-deficiency. Presenting symptoms include dyspnea, cough, chest pain, or dysphagia, among others. The tumors are aggressive with limited response to chemotherapies, rapid local progression, high recurrence rate after surgical resection, and short median survival times. There is a strong association with smoking.", "synonyms": "SMARCA4-deficient thoracic sarcoma, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C49.3"}, {"name": "Sarkom, follikul\u00e4res dendritisches", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare dendritic cell neoplasm characterized by a proliferation of spindled to ovoid cells with morphological and immunophenotypic features of follicular dendritic cells. Conventional follicular dendritic cell sarcomas are negative for EBV. The tumor arises as a painless, slow-growing mass in lymph nodes (most often cervical), extranodal sites (such as tonsils, gastrointestinal tract, soft tissue, mediastinum, or lung, among others), or both. Paraneoplastic pemphigus may occur in rare cases. Predictive factors are tumor size, presence of coagulative necrosis, mitotic count, and presence of significant cytological atypia.", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "C96.4", "umls": "C1260325", "mesh": "D054740"}, {"name": "Sarkom, granulozyt\u00e4res", "sub_name": "Myelosarkom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Chlorom, Sarkom, granulozyt\u00e4res, Tumor, extramedull\u00e4rer myeloischer, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "C92.3", "UMLS": "C0152276", "MeSH": "D023981", "GARD": "12763", "summary": "Das Myeloische Sarkom ist ein solider Tumor von Knochenmarkzellen, der au\u00dferhalb des Knochenmarks entsteht. Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. (Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz aller akuten myeloischen Leuk\u00e4mien wird auf 3,4:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.) Die klinischen Symptome h\u00e4ngen vom Ort des Tumors ab. H\u00e4ufige Lokalisationen sind subperiostale Knochenstrukturen an Sch\u00e4del, Nasennebenh\u00f6hlen, Sternum, Rippen, Wirbel und Becken, sowie Lymphknoten und Haut. Selten tritt der Tumor auf in Pankreas, Herz, Hirn, Mund, Brust, Magendarmtrakt, Gallenwegen, Prostata, Harnblase und weiblichem Genitaltrakt. "}, {"name": "Sarkom, histiozyt\u00e4res", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare histiocytic tumor characterized by a malignant proliferation of cells showing morphological and immunophenotypic features of mature tissue histiocytes. Most cases occur in extranodal sites, most commonly the intestinal tract, skin, and soft tissue. Patients may present with a solitary mass, lymphadenopathy, a skin rash or numerous tumors on the trunk and extremities, lytic bone lesions, hepatosplenomegaly with pancytopenia, intestinal obstruction, and/or systemic symptoms. The neoplasm is aggressive with typically poor therapy response.", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C96.8", "umls": "C0334663", "mesh": "D054747"}, {"name": "Sarkom, neurogenes", "sub_name": "Schwannom, malignes", "german_description": "Das maligne Schwannom hat seinen Ursprung in den Markscheiden des peripheren Nervensystems. Andere Bezeichnungen sind 'neurogenes Sarkom', 'Neurofibrosarkom' oder 'maligner peripherer Markscheidentumor (MPNST)'. Letztere Bezeichnung ist jetzt allgemein akzeptiert, da sie auf den Ursprung des Tumors Bezug nimmt. Diese Tumoren machen 5% der b\u00f6sartigen Weichteiltumoren aus und treten meist bei Erwachsenen auf. Die Neurofibromatose Typ 1 (NF1) ist das gr\u00f6\u00dfte Risiko, diesen Tumor zu entwickeln: 50% der MPNST treten bei Patienten mit NF1 auf, und 5% der Patienten mit NF1 entwickeln einen MPNST. Patienten mit gro\u00dfen Deletionen im NF1-Gen scheinen ein noch h\u00f6heres Tumorrisiko zu haben. Eine seltene Variante des MPNST ist der bei NF1-Patienten sehr h\u00e4ufige maligne Triton-Tumor mit Rhabdomysarkomzellen und mesenchymaler Differenzierung. Der MPNST kann sich auf jedem Nerv des K\u00f6rpers entwickeln. Die hervorstechenden Symptome sind Schmerzen und eine schnell wachsende Tumormasse. In der Regel sind diese Tumoren sehr aggressiv und haben eine schlechte Prognose. Falls die Tumoren vollst\u00e4ndig exzidiert werden k\u00f6nnen, ist die Prognose besser. Wenn immer m\u00f6glich sollte deshalb eine chirurgische Intervention versucht werden. In einigen F\u00e4llen erweisen sich Chemotherapie und Strahlentherapie als wirksam. Die Patienten sollen von einem multidisziplin\u00e4ren Team, dem auch Chirurgen, Onkologen und Strahlentherapeuten angeh\u00f6ren, betreut werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor (MPNST) is a rare and often aggressive soft tissue sarcoma occurring in a wide range of anatomical sites.", "synonyms": "MPNST, Malignant neurilemmoma, Malignant neurofibroma, Malignant schwannoma, Neurofibrosarcoma, Neurogenic sarcoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C47.9", "umls": "C0206729\u00a0 C0751690", "gard": "10872\u00a0 8211", "meddra": "10029236", "epidemiology": "Exact prevalence and incidence are unknown. Incidence of MPNST in the general population has been reported to be 1/100,000. MPNSTs account for about 5 to 10% of all soft tissue sarcomas. The sex ratio is about equal. Incidence among neurofibromatosis type 1 patients (NF1; see this term) is reported to be approximately 5 to 10%.", "clinical_description": "The age of occurrence is highly variable but most cases are reported in adults (typically between 20 and 50 years of age). In most cases, tumors arise in major nerve trunks such as the sciatic nerve or in the brachial plexus and sacral plexus. They are highly variable in appearance and commonly present as a rapidly enlarging palpable mass that is sometimes painful, with associated neurologic deficits such as radicular pain, paresthesia, and motor weakness. Tumors are fusiform to globular in shape, usually well circumscribed, and can be white to yellow and soft or firm. They occur most commonly in the trunk, head, neck and proximal extremities. Very rare anatomical sites include the brain, breast, posterior mediastinum, bladder, adrenal gland and skin. Tumors are often aggressive and high-grade, with the tendency to recur or to metastasize. MPNSTs can occur sporadically or in patients with NF1. They occur either de novo or from a preexisting neurofibroma or rarely from a schwannoma.", "etiology": "The etiology is unknown. Identified gene alterations include loss of the NF1 (17q11.2) and TP53 tumor suppressor gene (17p13.1). About 10% of tumors are associated with prior therapeutic or environmental radiation exposure.", "diagnostic_methods": "Histopathological examination is needed for definitive diagnosis. Biopsy usually reveals MPNST to be an infiltrative neoplasm with a varied range of cell morphologies (spindle, rounded or fusiform cells), with cellular fascicles which alternate with myxoid regions (marbled pattern). Diagnosis may be challenging because there are no specific immunohistochemical or molecular markers. Radiological imaging is used to determine the site and extension of the tumor.", "differential_diagnosis": "Other malignant neoplasms to include in the differential diagnosis include synovial sarcoma, fibrosarcoma, undifferentiated pleomorphic sarcoma, angiosarcoma (see these terms), melanoma, and myoepithelial tumors.", "management_and_treatment": "Total surgical resection is the mainstay of treatment. If removal is not possible, excision combined with high-dose radiation therapy may be used. Local Radiotherapy may be beneficial, but appears to have little effect on long-term survival. Chemotherapy is generally not effective.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is generally poor and depends on the size of the tumor and success of treatment. A less favorable prognosis is associated with large tumors, NF1-associated cases, and truncal localization. The recurrence rate is reported to be as high as 40% and approximately two thirds of cases metastasize (lungs and bone). Five-year survival rate is reported to be 26% to 60%, and 10-year survival to be around 45%."}, {"name": "Sarkom, retikul\u00e4res", "sub_name": "Sarkom der interdigitierenden dendritischen Zellen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare dendritic cell tumor characterized by a neoplasm composed of spindle to ovoid cells with phenotypic features similar to those of interdigitating dendritic cells. Solitary lymph node involvement is common, although extranodal localization (in particular skin and soft tissue) has also been reported. Patients usually present with an asymptomatic mass, sometimes with systemic symptoms such as fatigue, fever, and night sweats. Generalized lymphadenopathy, splenomegaly, or hepatomegaly may be seen in rare cases. The clinical course is generally aggressive.", "synonyms": "Interdigitating cell sarcoma, Reticulum cell sarcoma, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C96.4", "omim": "267730", "umls": "C0024302\u00a0 C1260326", "mesh": "D054739", "meddra": "10038804"}, {"name": "Sarkom, thorakales, durch SMARCA4-Mangel", "sub_name": "Sarkom des Thorax bei SMARCA4-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare soft tissue tumor characterized by a compressive mass located in the mediastinum and/or pleura and lung, including prominent lymph node involvement, histologically poorly differentiated and frequently showing rhabdoid features. Loss of SMARCA4 is typically accompanied by SMARCA2-deficiency. Presenting symptoms include dyspnea, cough, chest pain, or dysphagia, among others. The tumors are aggressive with limited response to chemotherapies, rapid local progression, high recurrence rate after surgical resection, and short median survival times. There is a strong association with smoking.", "synonyms": "SMARCA4-deficient thoracic sarcoma, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C49.3"}, {"name": "Sarkom, undifferenziertes pleomorphes", "german_description": "Das Maligne fibr\u00f6se Histiozytom geh\u00f6rt zu Gruppe der Weichteil-Sarkome und macht knapp 10% aller Weichteil-Sarkome aus. Meist treten sie an den unteren Extremit\u00e4ten auf, seltener im Abdomen oder Thorax. Die klinischen Zeichen und Symptome stehen in direktem Zusammenhang mit dem prim\u00e4ren Ort des Tumors. Die \u00c4tiologie der Krankheit ist, wie auch die der \u00fcbrigen Weichteilsarkome, ungekl\u00e4rt. In seltenen F\u00e4llen tritt das Sarkom famili\u00e4r auf, mit Betroffenen in unterschiedlichen Generationen. Gegenw\u00e4rtig wird untersucht, ob bei diesen Familien eine genetische Pr\u00e4disposition besteht. Gegenw\u00e4rtig gibt es nur wenige Daten \u00fcber das Erkrankungsalter und \u00fcber den Verlauf der Krankheit. Die meisten Tumoren, besonders die intra-abdominalen, scheinen sich \u00fcber mehrere Jahre zu entwickeln, bevor sie entdeckt werden. Die Behandlung besteht in der kompletten chirurgischen Resektion des Tumors. Besondere Sorgfalt ist darauf zu verwenden, dass der Tumor nicht nur makroskopisch, sondern auch mikroskopisch entfernt wird, da, besonders bei intra-abdominalen Tumoren, Rezidive h\u00e4ufig sind, wenn dieses Ziel nicht erreicht wurde. Wenn immer m\u00f6glich, sollte bei der prim\u00e4ren Operation ein 1-2 cm breiter Saum mitresiziert werden. F\u00fcr hoch-gradige, gro\u00dfe (> 3 cm) und tiefliegende Tumoren ist die Operation als einziges Verfahren nur dann akzeptabel, wenn sie mit einer Amputation verbunden ist, oder wenn ein Kompartiment mit histologisch negativen Grenzen (R0) resiziert wird. Eine weite Excision allein, ohne adjuvante Therapie, ist nur bei oberfl\u00e4chlichen, kleinen (< 3 cm) und nieder-gradigen Tumoren vertretbar. Histologisch positive R\u00e4nder (R1) oder unvollst\u00e4ndige Excision (R2) sind unzureichend und sollten Anla\u00df zu einer weiteren angemessenen Behandlung sein (weitere Operation oder adjuvante Therapie, wenn ein multidisziplin\u00e4r zusammengesetztes Sarkom-Kommittee eine weitere Operation als nicht durchf\u00fchrbar beurteilt). Eine positive Auswirkung adjuvanter Strahlen- oder Chemotherapie auf die \u00dcberlebensdauer konnte nicht eindeutig gesichert werden. Einige Studien ergaben jedoch eine geringf\u00fcgige Reduktion des Risikos \u00f6rtlicher Rezidive. Dennoch sollte eine weite Exzision mit adjuvanter Strahlentherapie als Standardbehandlung angesehen werden. Der Verzicht auf eine adjuvante Strahlentherapie ist nur vertretbar bei oberfl\u00e4chlichen, kleinen (< 3 cm) und nieder-gradigen Tumoren und bei Sarkomen der Gliedma\u00dfen, wenn eine Amputation erfolgt. F\u00fcr nicht-operable Sarkome kann eine prim\u00e4re Bestrahlung erwogen werden. Als optimale technische Bedingungen gelten hierbei: (a) 50 Gray Herddosis (erh\u00f6ht um weitere 10 Gray, wenn mikroskopisch ein Resttumor (R1) besteht); (b) das Zielvolumen f\u00fcr die Bestrahlung schlie\u00dft ein: das Tumorbett, Narben und Drainagenausg\u00e4nge mit entsprechenden Sicherheitsabst\u00e4nden; (c) der Abstand zwischen Operation und Bestrahlung ist nicht gr\u00f6\u00dfer als 8 Wochen. Bei inoperablen Sarkomen ist auch die M\u00f6glichkeit einer prim\u00e4ren Chemotherapie in Betracht zu ziehen. Bei leicht operablen Sarkomen sollte eine neo-adjuvante Chemotherapie nur im Rahmen klinischer Forschungsprojekte erfolgen. In F\u00e4llen, in denen eine adjuvante Behandlung sinnvoll ist, sollte eine systemische Chemotherapie nur im Rahmen prospektiver klinischer Studien erfolgen. Adjuvante Chemotherapie kann bei Patienten durchgef\u00fchrt werden, wenn trotz umfassender Resektion histologisch positive Randzonen verbleiben. Bez\u00fcglich der weiteren \u00dcberwachung der Patien mit Weichteilsarkomen besteht kein Konsens. Die Franz\u00f6sische Sarkom-Expertengruppe empfiehlt f\u00fcr die ersten Jahre klinische Nachuntersuchungen im Abstand von 12 Wochen, und dann, bis zum 5. Jahr, alle 4 Monate. Die klinische Untersuchung, R\u00f6ntgen-Thorax oder CT sind die \u00fcblichen Methoden, um nach Metastasen zu fahnden. Bei Lokalisation tief im Stamm kann auch Ultraschall verwendet werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An aggressive sarcoma of soft tissues or bone that can arise from any part of the body, clinically presenting as swelling, mass, pain, pathological fracture and occasional systemic features and is characterized by high local recurrence and significant metastasis.", "synonyms": "UPS, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C49.9", "umls": "C0334463", "mesh": "D051677", "gard": "6963", "meddra": "10025552", "epidemiology": "UPS ranks the 4th most common soft tissue sarcoma with a slight male preponderance. The incidence has been evaluated to be close to 0.8-1 new case per 100000 per year in one European series.", "clinical_description": "The tumor arises most commonly during the sixth and seventh decades of life. The most common sites of involvement include lower extremities (mainly thigh) followed by upper arms, retroperitoneum, viscera, head and neck (in childhood). Primary osseous UPS most commonly occurs in distal femur, proximal tibia, proximal femur and humerus. Patients may present pain, swelling / mass and pathological fractures. In the skin, UPS presents as a relatively painless, rapidly enlarging nodule. Anorexia, malaise, fever and weight loss are present in retroperitoneal and inflammatory forms of UPS. Most UPS recur locally; distant metastases are common (the most frequent is lung). Regional metastases are rare.", "etiology": "UPS is thought to be derived from a primitive mesenchymal cell capable of differentiating into histiocytes, fibroblasts, myofibroblasts and osteoclasts. The etiology of the tumor remains unknown. Prior radiation therapy is a likely risk factor in some cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Any tumor mass over 5 cm is suspected to be a sarcoma. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is the imaging method of choice for limbs and shows a high signal on T2 weighted images. Histology of biopsy specimen prior to any treatment is crucial to reach diagnosis and shows pleomorphic spindle cell population with large atypical cells frequently exhibiting numerous irregular mitotic figures, associated regions of hemorrhage and necrosis, associated lymphohistiocytic infiltrate and invasion of dermis. Immunohistochemical staining is negative for S-100, HMB-45, CD34 and cytokeratin which assists in ruling out other soft tissue tumors. Most cases previously diagnosed as malignant fibrous histiocytoma have been reclassified into other histological types of sarcoma.", "differential_diagnosis": "When occurring in skin, UPS is difficult to differentiate from atypical fibroxanthoma or dermatofibrosarcoma protuberans (see this term). Histological differential diagnoses include leiomyosarcoma, rhabdomyosarcoma, lymphoma, and melanoma (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "UPS should be referred to an expert/ reference center for primary biopsy, expert pathology review, and multidisciplinary treatment. Immediate surgery of a mass without knowledge of its histological nature is strongly discouraged because it is associated with an increased risk of death due to inappropriate resection and increased risk of relapse. UPS is best treated by wide surgical excision. Sometimes amputation may be necessary to remove the whole lesion. Adjuvant radiotherapy is given for high-grade, large (>5 cm), deep-seated tumors, in limb sparing surgeries and when negative margins are not obtained. For non-operable sarcomas, primary radiation therapy could be an option, but usually doxorubicin containing regimens are preferred options in first-line setting for locally irresectable and/or metastatic lesions. Chemotherapy (CHT) with ifosfamide, trabectedin, dacarbazine, pazopanib have demonstrated efficacy in UPS and are registered and available in most European Union countries.", "prognosis": "A 5-year overall survival rate of 48% has been reported for patients with head and neck tumors versus 77% for patients with tumors arising on the trunk and extremities. The childhood variant appears have better prognosis."}, {"name": "Sarkom, zervikales", "sub_name": "Sarkom der Cervix uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Maligner mesenchymaler Tumor des Geb\u00e4rmutterhalses, Sarkom, zervikales, Zervixtumor, maligner mesemchymaler, ", "ICD-10": "C53.0\u00a0 C53.1\u00a0 C53.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sarkosin\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Die Sarkosin\u00e4mie ist eine Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung mit vermehrter Sarkosin-Konzentration im Plasma und im Urin. Ursache ist ein Aktivit\u00e4tsmangel der Sarkosin-Dehydrogenase. Im Neugeborenen-Screening wurde die Pr\u00e4valenz in verschiedenen L\u00e4ndern zu 1:28.000 bis 1:350.000 bestimmt. Wahrscheinlich ist die Sarkosin\u00e4mie eine gutartige Anomalie ohne signifikante klinische Konsequenzen. Sie wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im Gen der Sarkosin-Dehydrogenase, das in der Chromosomenregion 9q34 liegt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare inborn error of metabolism characterized by increased concentrations of sarcosine in plasma and urine due to sarcosine dehydrogenase deficiency. The condition is considered benign and not associated with any specific clinical phenotype. Mode of inheritance is autosomal recessive.", "synonyms": "Sarcosine dehydrogenase complex deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "E72.5", "omim": "268900", "umls": "C0268563", "mesh": "C537236", "gard": "158", "meddra": "10059299"}, {"name": "Sarkosin-Dehydrogenase-Komplex-Mangel", "sub_name": "Sarkosin\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Die Sarkosin\u00e4mie ist eine Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung mit vermehrter Sarkosin-Konzentration im Plasma und im Urin. Ursache ist ein Aktivit\u00e4tsmangel der Sarkosin-Dehydrogenase. Im Neugeborenen-Screening wurde die Pr\u00e4valenz in verschiedenen L\u00e4ndern zu 1:28.000 bis 1:350.000 bestimmt. Wahrscheinlich ist die Sarkosin\u00e4mie eine gutartige Anomalie ohne signifikante klinische Konsequenzen. Sie wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im Gen der Sarkosin-Dehydrogenase, das in der Chromosomenregion 9q34 liegt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare inborn error of metabolism characterized by increased concentrations of sarcosine in plasma and urine due to sarcosine dehydrogenase deficiency. The condition is considered benign and not associated with any specific clinical phenotype. Mode of inheritance is autosomal recessive.", "synonyms": "Sarcosine dehydrogenase complex deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "E72.5", "omim": "268900", "umls": "C0268563", "mesh": "C537236", "gard": "158", "meddra": "10059299"}, {"name": "Sarkosporidiose", "sub_name": "Sarcocystosis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare parasitic disease characterized by infection with sarcocystis species with humans as definitive (intestinal sarcocystosis) or aberrant intermediate (muscular sarcocystosis with development of sarcocysts in myocytes of skeletal, cardiac, and smooth muscle) host. Enteric infection is often mild or asymptomatic but may cause symptomatic enteritis with nausea, abdominal pain, diarrhea, and vomiting. Symptoms of muscular sarcocystosis include fever, fatigue, headache, cough, myalgia, and arthralgia, among others, with the possibility of a long-lasting, waxing and waning course.", "synonyms": "Sarcosporidiosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A07.8", "umls": "C0036231", "mesh": "D012523", "meddra": "10039483"}, {"name": "SARS", "sub_name": "Schweres akutes respiratorisches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Lungenerkrankung, die durch eine Infektion mit dem SARS-CoV-Coronavirus ausgel\u00f6st wird, mit einer berichteten Inkubationszeit von 2 bis 7 Tagen. Die Patienten weisen grippe\u00e4hnliche Symptome auf, darunter Fieber, Unwohlsein, Myalgie, Kopfschmerzen, Durchfall und Rigor. H\u00e4ufig wird von trockenem, unproduktivem Husten und Dyspnoe berichtet. Schwere F\u00e4lle entwickeln sich rasch, schreiten zu Atemnot und Atemversagen fort und erfordern intensive Pflege. Die Sterblichkeitsrate liegt bei 10%. Die Krankheit trat 2002 in S\u00fcdchina auf und breitete sich 2003 auf 26 L\u00e4nder aus. Die gemeldete \u00dcbertragung von Mensch zu Mensch erfolgte in Toronto (Kanada), der Sonderverwaltungsregion Hongkong in China, Chinesisch-Taipeh, Singapur und Hanoi (Vietnam).", "synonyms": "SARS, SARS-1, Schweres akutes Atemwegssyndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "U04.9", "UMLS": "C1175175", "MeSH": "D045169", "GARD": "9237", "MedDRA": "10061982"}, {"name": "SARS-1", "sub_name": "Schweres akutes respiratorisches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Lungenerkrankung, die durch eine Infektion mit dem SARS-CoV-Coronavirus ausgel\u00f6st wird, mit einer berichteten Inkubationszeit von 2 bis 7 Tagen. Die Patienten weisen grippe\u00e4hnliche Symptome auf, darunter Fieber, Unwohlsein, Myalgie, Kopfschmerzen, Durchfall und Rigor. H\u00e4ufig wird von trockenem, unproduktivem Husten und Dyspnoe berichtet. Schwere F\u00e4lle entwickeln sich rasch, schreiten zu Atemnot und Atemversagen fort und erfordern intensive Pflege. Die Sterblichkeitsrate liegt bei 10%. Die Krankheit trat 2002 in S\u00fcdchina auf und breitete sich 2003 auf 26 L\u00e4nder aus. Die gemeldete \u00dcbertragung von Mensch zu Mensch erfolgte in Toronto (Kanada), der Sonderverwaltungsregion Hongkong in China, Chinesisch-Taipeh, Singapur und Hanoi (Vietnam).", "synonyms": "SARS, SARS-1, Schweres akutes Atemwegssyndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "U04.9", "UMLS": "C1175175", "MeSH": "D045169", "GARD": "9237", "MedDRA": "10061982"}, {"name": "SAS", "sub_name": "SATB2-assoziiertes Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by moderate to severe developmental delay/intellectual disability with absent or limited speech development, various behavioral problems (including autistic features, hyperactivity, or aggressiveness), and craniofacial anomalies such as long face, high and prominent forehead, bulbous nose with low-hanging columella, thin vermillion of the upper lip, palatal (cleft palate, high-arched palate, and bifid uvula) and dental (abnormal upper incisors) abnormalities, and micrognathia. Hypotonia and feeding difficulties are frequent. Other supportive findings may include skeletal anomalies with low bone density and abnormal brain imaging.", "synonyms": "SAS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal"}, {"name": "SATB2-assoziiertes Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by moderate to severe developmental delay/intellectual disability with absent or limited speech development, various behavioral problems (including autistic features, hyperactivity, or aggressiveness), and craniofacial anomalies such as long face, high and prominent forehead, bulbous nose with low-hanging columella, thin vermillion of the upper lip, palatal (cleft palate, high-arched palate, and bifid uvula) and dental (abnormal upper incisors) abnormalities, and micrognathia. Hypotonia and feeding difficulties are frequent. Other supportive findings may include skeletal anomalies with low bone density and abnormal brain imaging.", "synonyms": "SAS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal"}, {"name": "SATB2-assoziiertes-Syndrom durch chromosomales Rearrangement", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Del(2)(q33.1), Mikrodeletionssyndrom 2q33.1, Monosomie 2q33.1, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0oder\u00a0Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q93.5", "OMIM": "612313", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter SATB2-assoziiertes Syndrom"}, {"name": "SATB2-assoziiertes Syndrom durch eine pathogene Variante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "OMIM": "612313", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter SATB2-assoziiertes Syndrom"}, {"name": "Satoyoshi-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Satoyoshi-Syndrom ist eine seltene, multisystemische Autoimmunerkrankung, die haupts\u00e4chlich durch intermittierende schmerzhafte Muskelkr\u00e4mpfe, Alopezie (in den meisten F\u00e4llen totalis oder universalis) und lang anhaltende Diarrh\u00f6e gekennzeichnet ist, die zu Unterern\u00e4hrung, Wachstumsretardierung und Amenorrhoe f\u00fchren kann. Sekund\u00e4re Knochendeformit\u00e4ten und verschiedene endokrine Anomalien k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls assoziiert sein. Antinukle\u00e4re Antik\u00f6rper werden in vielen F\u00e4llen berichtet.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M35.8", "OMIM": "600705", "UMLS": "C1833454", "MeSH": "C536616", "GARD": "160", "MedDRA": "10070579"}, {"name": "Saturnismus", "sub_name": "Bleivergiftung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Lead poisoning is defined as acute or chronic exposure to lead resulting in lead accumulation (blood lead concentration (BLC) >5 ug/dL) that can affect every organ system in the body and to which children are more susceptible. Clinical manifestations depend on the amount and duration of exposure and include abdominal pain, colic, constipation, lead line on gingival tissue, arthralgia, myalgia, peripheral neuropathy, fatigue, irritability, anemia, chronic nephropathy and hypertension. In children, even low levels of exposure (BLC <5 ug/dL) is reported to lead to irreversible effects such as loss of cognition, shortening of attention span, alteration of behavior, dyslexia, attention deficit disorder, hypertension, renal impairment, immunotoxicity and toxicity to the reproductive organs.", "synonyms": "Lead intoxication, Plumbism, Saturnism, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "T56.0", "umls": "C0023176"}, {"name": "S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der S\u00e4uglingsbotulsmus ist eine seltene Form des Botulismus, einer seltenen erworbenen St\u00f6rung der Muskelendplatte mit absteigender schlaffer Parese, verursacht durch Botulinum-Neurotoxine (BoNTs). Ursache ist die Besiedelung des Darms mit Clostridium botulinum deren Toxine in das Blut \u00fcbergehen (Toxin\u00e4mie).", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "A05.1", "UMLS": "C0238027", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit (ohne Afrika) wurden bisher mindestens 3.350 F\u00e4lle von S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus beschrieben. In den USA und in Argentinien ist es die h\u00e4ufigste Form von Botulismus. Die Krankheit bef\u00e4llt S\u00e4uglinge und Kleinkinder im Alter von 1 bis 52 Wochen.", "clinical_description": "Die Inkubationszeit von der Exposition mit Sporen bis zum Ausbruch der Krankheit liegt zwischen 3 und 30 Tagen, es wurde aber auch ein Krankheitsbeginn nach 38 Tagen beschrieben. Die Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei den anderen Formen von Botulismus (symmetrische L\u00e4hmung der Hirnnerven, gefolgt von symmetrischer absteigender schlaffer motorischer L\u00e4hmung). Daneben ist der S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus gekennzeichnet durch Muskelhypotonie, Obstipation,, Unf\u00e4higkeit zu saugen und zu schlucken, schwaches Schreien, Ptose und schlechte Kopfkontrolle. Fieber fehlt. Die Krankheit beginnt subakut bis akut und kann bis zu generalisierter Muskelhypotonie ('floppy baby') und Atemversagen fortschreiten. Auch F\u00e4lle von pl\u00f6tzlichem Kindstod (SIDS) und Erstsymptome \u00e4hnlich einem akuten Abdomen wurden im Zusammenhang mit S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus beschrieben.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit ist bedingt durch tempor\u00e4re Darmbesiedelung duch Sporen von C. botulinum der Typen A, B und E oder sehr selten duch neurotoxinbildende St\u00e4mme von C. barati Typ F und C. butyricum Typ E und in situ Toxinproduktion. Die Sporen erreichen den Darmtrakt durch Inhalation oder Aufnahme mit der Nahrung. Staub der Umgebung und Honig wurden als Sporentr\u00e4ger identifiziert. Es wird vermutet, dass eine Besiedelung des Darms mit Clostridien m\u00f6glich ist, weil eine normale kompetitive Mikroflora noch nicht vollst\u00e4ndig entwickelt ist. Nach Auskeimung der Sporen und Toxinbildung werden die BoNTs vom Blutstrom absorbiert, erreichen so alle Bereiche des K\u00f6rpers und verursachen die Symptome des Botulismus.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren das klinische Bild, das Elektromyographie (EMG)-Muster mit kurzen, kleinen, h\u00e4ufigen Potentialen motorischer Einheiten (BSAPs). Die Diagnose wird durch den Nachweis von BoNTs im Stuhl oder Serum oder, noch h\u00e4ufiger, durch die Isolierung BoNTs produzierender Clostridien aus dem Stuhl gesichert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sepsis, Dehydratation, Elektrolytst\u00f6rungen, Vergiftungen und Enzephalitis, dazu Stoffwechselkrankheiten, Myopathien, Guillain-Barr\u00e9-Syndrom (Miller-Fisher- Syndrom), Infantile spinale Muskelatrophie (SMA1), kongenitale myasthenische Syndrome und Poliomyelitis.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung besteht vor allem in unterst\u00fctzenden Ma\u00dfnahmen, z.B. f\u00fcr Atmung und Ern\u00e4hrung, unter intensivmedizinischen Bedingungen. F\u00fcr S\u00e4uglinge ist als Antitoxin-Therapie ein Botulinum-Immunglobulin (BIG-IV, Anti-A,B) menschlicher Herkunft verf\u00fcgbar. Antibiotika sind ohne Wirkung und werden auch nicht empfohlen, weil sie durch die Lyse vegetativer Zellen BoNT-produzierender Clostridien die Menge freier Toxine erh\u00f6hen. Komplikationen sind Atemstillstand mit daraus folgender hypoxischer Enzephalopathie und irreversiblem Hirnschaden, Tod, Herzstillstand, das Syndrom ungeregelter Sektetion des antidiuretischen Hormons (mit Hyponatri\u00e4mie, Hypo-Osmolalit\u00e4t des Serums und Hyper-Osmolalit\u00e4t des Urins) und akute Otitis media durch Funktionsst\u00f6rung der Eustachischen Tuben.", "prognosis": "Ohne Komplikationen und bei angemessener intensivmedizinischer Betreuung ist die Prognose gut. Die \u00dcberlebensrate ist mit oder auch ohne Antitoxin-Therapie nahezu 100%.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit (ohne Afrika) wurden bisher mindestens 3.350 F\u00e4lle von S\u00e4uglingsbotulismus beschrieben. In den USA und in Argentinien ist es die h\u00e4ufigste Form von Botulismus. Die Krankheit bef\u00e4llt S\u00e4uglinge und Kleinkinder im Alter von 1 bis 52 Wochen."}, {"name": "S\u00e4uglingsepilepsie mit wandernden Teilanf\u00e4llen", "sub_name": "Maligne migrierende Partialepilepsie des Kindes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare epileptic and developmental encephalopathy characterized by seizure onset during the first months of life, focal seizures arising independently in both hemispheres, marked drug resistance, and severe, long-term cognitive disability.", "synonyms": "Epilepsy of infancy with migrating focal seizures, MMPEI, MMPSI, MPEI, MPSI, Malignant migrating partial epilepsy of infancy, Malignant migrating partial seizures of infancy, Migrating partial epilepsy of infancy, Migrating partial seizures of infancy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G40.0", "omim": "613722\u00a0 614959\u00a0 615338\u00a0 616645", "gard": "12919", "epidemiology": "The estimated prevalence of Epilepsy of infancy with migrating focal seizures (EIMFS) is approximately 1/900,000 children. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "Seizures start during the first 6 months of life, typically in the neonatal period. Seizures are initially infrequent and consist of focal motor, tonic or clonic seizures, showing in some patients as subtle seizures reported as behavioral arrest with minor motor signs, and prominent autonomic features. Seizure frequency rapidly increases and status epilepticus is common. At onset, focal seizures arise independently in both hemispheres and can migrate from one region to another. Seizures show a marked drug resistance. Neurological status progressively deteriorates with worsening seizures and leads to progressive hypotonia, loss of visual contact, and lack or regression of psychomotor achievements. Most patients develop microcephaly by 1 year of age.", "etiology": "The genetic etiology is variable. 70% of children have an identified genetic etiology. Half of them present gain-of-function mutations affecting the KCNT1 gene, located on 9q34.4. In other cases, the genes involved may include SCN2A (2q24.3), KCNQ2 (20q13.33), PLCB1 (20p12.3), TBC1D24 (16p13.3),PIGA (Xp22.2), SCN1A (2q24.3), SLC25A22 (11p15.5), and SLC12A5 (20q13.12). The following genes have been reported in single cases: GABRA1, GABRB1, ATP1A3, CDKL5, and ITPA.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and electroencephalographic (EEG) findings. The EEG background can be normal at onset; however, diffuse slowing of the background occurs with time. At onset, seizures may be subtle and video-EEG recordings are necessary to identify the seizures and the ictal EEG pattern. This is characterized by rhythmic theta discharges that affect different cortical regions consecutively in the same single seizure event giving the eponym ''migrating'' to EIMFS. Multifocal discharges appear with time in all cases. Rarely hypsarrhythmia is reported. Brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is usually normal at onset and may show diffuse brain atrophy as the condition progresses. Delayed myelination with white matter hyperintensity on MRI and decreased N-acetyl aspartate on magnetic resonance spectroscopy are often reported early during the first months of the disease onset. Molecular genetic testing should be proposed in order to identify the causal pathogenic variant.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other epileptic and developmental encephalopathies starting during the neonatal period, in particular when multifocal seizures and EEG abnormalities are present.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal genetic diagnosis can be performed in families with a known mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "In the majority of patients, KCNT1 mutations arise de novo. In a few families with a known KCNT1 mutation, inheritance is autosomal dominant with variable penetrance and expressivity. Genetic counselling is highly recommended in all patients with known genetic etiology. According to the gene involved, the disorder may be autosomal dominant, autosomal recessive, or X-linked.", "management_and_treatment": "Seizures are often difficult to treat and may continue into adulthood despite anti-seizures medications. Currently, there is no anti-seizures medication that has been proven to be more efficient to reduce seizure frequency and duration. Overtreatment should be avoided and follow-up by a reference center recommended.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is poor with on-going drug resistant seizures, severe neurological disability, acquired microcephaly and reduced life expectancy, although a milder evolution has been reported in a few children. Some patients are also affected by severe gastrointestinal dysmotility and movement disorder."}, {"name": "Saure Phosphatase-Mangel, lysosomaler", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare lysosomal disease characterized by intermittent vomiting, hypotonia, lethargy, opisthotonos, and fatal outcome in early infancy, associated with deficient acid phosphatase in lysosomes. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1971.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E83.3", "omim": "200950", "umls": "C0268410"}, {"name": "SAVI", "sub_name": "STING-assoziierte Vaskulopathie mit Beginn in der Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die STING-assoziierte Vaskulopathie mit Beginn in der Kindheit (SAVI) ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte autoinflammatorische Erkrankung, die aufgrund einer konstitutiven STING-Aktivierung (STimulator of INterferon Genes) zu den Typ-1-Interferonopathien gez\u00e4hlt wird. Die Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch eine neonatale oder im S\u00e4uglingsalter einsetzende systemische Entz\u00fcndung und eine Vaskulopathie der kleinen Gef\u00e4\u00dfe, die zu schweren Haut-, Lungen- und Gelenkl\u00e4sionen f\u00fchrt. Die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich mit intermittierendem niedrigem Fieber, rezidivierendem Husten und Gedeihst\u00f6rung in Verbindung mit fortschreitender interstitieller Lungenerkrankung, Polyarthritis und violetten schuppenden L\u00e4sionen an Fingern, Zehen, Nase, Wangen und Ohren (die sich durch K\u00e4lteeinwirkung verschlimmern), die oft zu chronischen Akrenulzerationen, Nekrosen und Autoamputation fortschreiten.", "synonyms": "SAVI, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "M35.8", "OMIM": "615934", "GARD": "12357"}, {"name": "Say-Barber-Biesecker-Young-Simpson-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ SBBYS", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale Hypothyreose, faziale Dysmorphien (Mikrozephalie, Blepharophimose, kolbige Nase, d\u00fcnne Lippen, tiefsitzende Ohren, Mikrogenie), postaxiale Polydaktylie und schwere geistige Behinderung. Weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. M\u00e4nnliche Patienten haben einen Kryptorchismus. Einige Patienten haben Herzfehler (Ventrikelseptumdefekt), Hypotonie und Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung. Vermutet wurde autosomal-rezessive Vererbung. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by the association of a typical facial phenotype with microcephaly associated with congenital hypothyroidism, skeletal involvement (polydactyly, long thumb(s) and long first toe(s), and patellar hypoplasia/agenesis), and some degree of global developmental delay, hypotonia and intellectual disability. Facial features include an immobile mask-like face, severe blepharophimosis and ptosis, tear duct abnormalities, a broad nasal bridge, bulbous nasal tip, small mouth, thin upper lip, hypoplastic teeth and small, low set ears. Renal and genital anomalies, usually cryptorchidism, are often present in affected males. Congenital heart defects and growth delay are variably present.", "synonyms": "Hypothyroidism-dysmorphism-postaxial polydactyly-intellectual disability syndrome, SBBYS variant of Ohdo syndrome, SBBYSS, Say-Barber-Biesecker-Young-Simpson syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "603736", "umls": "C1863557", "epidemiology": "Although the prevalence of the disorder is unknown, it is thought to be less than 1/1,000,000. To date, 122 individuals with molecularly diagnosed blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome, SBBYS type (SBBYS), have been reported.", "clinical_description": "Clinical diagnosis is typically based on the striking facial gestalt associated with microcephaly. Skeletal anomalies include long thumbs and great toes, patellar hypoplasia/agenesis, polydactyly (both pre and postaxial), camptodactyly, clinodactyly, brachydactyly, syndactyly, club feet , flexion contractures of the knees and/or hips, and anomalies of the spine, and/or ribs. Individuals generally have developmental delay/intellectual disability, which can be mild. Language disorder, autism spectrum features, anxiety, aggressiveness, attention problems, agenesis or hypoplasia of the corpus callosum, optic nerve hypoplasia and other brain abnormalities have also been reported. Congenital heart malformations (50% of cases), ocular anomalies and bilateral mixed hearing loss are also often present. Renal anomalies (e.g. hydronephrosis or multiple renal cysts), anal and genital anomalies including cryptorchidism, hypospadias, clitoromegaly and/or hypoplasia of the labia minora or majora, are reported in more than 40% of cases. In a minority of cases, thyroid agenesis/hypoplasia, hypothyroidism, intestinal malrotation, dental anomalies, feeding and respiratory difficulties, gastroesophageal reflux, poor growth, short stature, cleft palate, and Pierre Robin sequence are observed. SBBYS is allelic with genitopatellar syndrome and an intermediate phenotype has been described; thus, the disorder may present as part of a spectrum.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by heterozygous variants in KAT6B (10q22) encoding a highly conserved acetyltransferase that is part of the MYST family, and regulates the expression of multiple genes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, brain imaging and molecular studies (specific gene testing if the specific clinical suspicion has been raised, otherwise broader genomic tests).", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include other genetic syndromes that associates intellectual disability with one or more of the key features of this disorder.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Polyhydramnios, increased nuchal translucency and/or cystic hygroma, renal anomalies can be observed during pregnancy but are non-specific. Genetic diagnosis can be proposed to families in which the pathogenic variant has already been identified in an affected relative.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal dominant. Most of the cases described are de novo, so the empirical risk of recurrence is low, 1-2%. Three families have been described in which the pathogenic variant has been inherited from a parent with a mild phenotype. The recurrence risk in these cases is 50%. To date, no cases of germinal mosaicism have been reported but this cannot be excluded.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a lifelong multidisciplinary approach with specific regular follow-up based on the patient's clinical manifestations (pediatric, neuropsychiatric, cardiological, ophthalmological, audiometric, orpthopedic, and genetic examinations). Occupational, physical, speech (in particular non-verbal methods of communication), feeding and educational therapies must be tailored to the patient's needs. Bowel malrotation is a potentially dangerous medical complication. Particular attention should be paid to monitoring feeding and growth, as feeding problems tend to occur early.", "prognosis": "Whilst there is limited data regarding life expectancy, adult patients are reported and there are no known reasons to suspect reduced life expectancy. Autonomy depends on the degree of involvement and the severity of the psychomotor developmental delay."}, {"name": "Say-Barber-Hobbs-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Gaumenspalte-gro\u00dfe Ohren-Kleinwuchs-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisches Syndrom, das durch Gaumenspalte, gro\u00dfe abstehende Ohren, Mikrozephalie und Kleinwuchs (pr\u00e4natales Auftreten) gekennzeichnet ist. Weitere Skelettanomalien (verz\u00f6gertes Knochenalter, distal spitz zulaufende Finger, hypoplastische distale Phalangen, proximal platzierte Daumen, Klinodaktylie des f\u00fcnften Fingers), Pierre-Robin-Sequenz, zystische Nierendysplasie, proximale renale tubul\u00e4re Azidose, Hypospadie, zerebrale Anomalien in der Bildgebung (Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung der Seitenventrikel, milde kortikale Atrophie), Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Hypotonie und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung werden ebenfalls beobachtet.", "synonyms": "Say-Barber-Hobbs-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "181180", "UMLS": "C1867023", "GARD": "162"}, {"name": "Say-Barber-Miller-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Mikrozephalie - Hypogammablobulin\u00e4mie - Immundefekt, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "251240", "UMLS": "C2931267", "MeSH": "C536618", "GARD": "239", "summary": "Das Say-Barber-Miller-Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch die Assoziation von ungew\u00f6hnlichen Merkmalen des Gesichtes, Mikrozephalie, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und schwerer postnataler Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung. Es wurde bei zwei Br\u00fcdern mit klinisch normalen Eltern beschrieben. Weitere Merkmale sind Hypogenitalismus, Beugekontrakturen, hypoplastische Kniescheiben, Skoliose, Ekzem und rezidivierende Infekte. Das charakteristische Gesicht resultiert aus flacher Stirn, schnabelf\u00f6rmiger Nase, langen, abstehenden Ohren und Mikrogenie. Als Kinder hatten die beiden Br\u00fcder niedrige Gammaglobulin-Spiegel im Serum und eine gest\u00f6rte Chemotaxis der Granulozyten. Die Hypogammaglobulin\u00e4mie besserte sich mit zunehmendem Alter, aber die abnorme Chemotaxis und die rezidivierenden Infekte blieben. "}, {"name": "Say-Meyer-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Trigonozephalie - Kleinwuchs - Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch Kleinwuchs, Trigonozephalie und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung. Es wurde bei 3 m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten beschrieben. Ein Patient hatte eine moderate Minderbegabung, die anderen beiden Patienten waren psychomotorisch retardiert. Vermutet wurde X-chromosomale Vererbung, autosomal-rezessive Vererbung kann noch nicht ausgeschlossen werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by premature closure of metopic sutures and/or other sutures, short stature, and developmental delay. Dysmorphic features include trigonocephaly, metopic ridge, narrow forehead, bitemporal narrowing, arched eyebrows, hypotelorism, deep-set eyes, epicanthal folds, strabismus, wide nasal bridge, small pointed nose, anteverted nostrils, long philtrum, low-set ears, malar flattening, narrow mouth, thin lips, high-arched palate, crowded teeth, and micrognathia. Variable additional manifestations may include conductive hearing loss, cerebral (mainly involving the white matter), skeletal (e.g. brachymesophalangy of the fifth fingers), cardiovascular and renal anomalies, inguinal hernia, hypospadias, and seizures.", "synonyms": "Say-Meyer syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "314320", "umls": "C1839125", "gard": "243"}, {"name": "SBBYSS", "sub_name": "Blepharophimose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom Typ SBBYS", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale Hypothyreose, faziale Dysmorphien (Mikrozephalie, Blepharophimose, kolbige Nase, d\u00fcnne Lippen, tiefsitzende Ohren, Mikrogenie), postaxiale Polydaktylie und schwere geistige Behinderung. Weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. M\u00e4nnliche Patienten haben einen Kryptorchismus. Einige Patienten haben Herzfehler (Ventrikelseptumdefekt), Hypotonie und Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung. Vermutet wurde autosomal-rezessive Vererbung. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by the association of a typical facial phenotype with microcephaly associated with congenital hypothyroidism, skeletal involvement (polydactyly, long thumb(s) and long first toe(s), and patellar hypoplasia/agenesis), and some degree of global developmental delay, hypotonia and intellectual disability. Facial features include an immobile mask-like face, severe blepharophimosis and ptosis, tear duct abnormalities, a broad nasal bridge, bulbous nasal tip, small mouth, thin upper lip, hypoplastic teeth and small, low set ears. Renal and genital anomalies, usually cryptorchidism, are often present in affected males. Congenital heart defects and growth delay are variably present.", "synonyms": "Hypothyroidism-dysmorphism-postaxial polydactyly-intellectual disability syndrome, SBBYS variant of Ohdo syndrome, SBBYSS, Say-Barber-Biesecker-Young-Simpson syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "603736", "umls": "C1863557", "epidemiology": "Although the prevalence of the disorder is unknown, it is thought to be less than 1/1,000,000. To date, 122 individuals with molecularly diagnosed blepharophimosis-intellectual disability syndrome, SBBYS type (SBBYS), have been reported.", "clinical_description": "Clinical diagnosis is typically based on the striking facial gestalt associated with microcephaly. Skeletal anomalies include long thumbs and great toes, patellar hypoplasia/agenesis, polydactyly (both pre and postaxial), camptodactyly, clinodactyly, brachydactyly, syndactyly, club feet , flexion contractures of the knees and/or hips, and anomalies of the spine, and/or ribs. Individuals generally have developmental delay/intellectual disability, which can be mild. Language disorder, autism spectrum features, anxiety, aggressiveness, attention problems, agenesis or hypoplasia of the corpus callosum, optic nerve hypoplasia and other brain abnormalities have also been reported. Congenital heart malformations (50% of cases), ocular anomalies and bilateral mixed hearing loss are also often present. Renal anomalies (e.g. hydronephrosis or multiple renal cysts), anal and genital anomalies including cryptorchidism, hypospadias, clitoromegaly and/or hypoplasia of the labia minora or majora, are reported in more than 40% of cases. In a minority of cases, thyroid agenesis/hypoplasia, hypothyroidism, intestinal malrotation, dental anomalies, feeding and respiratory difficulties, gastroesophageal reflux, poor growth, short stature, cleft palate, and Pierre Robin sequence are observed. SBBYS is allelic with genitopatellar syndrome and an intermediate phenotype has been described; thus, the disorder may present as part of a spectrum.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by heterozygous variants in KAT6B (10q22) encoding a highly conserved acetyltransferase that is part of the MYST family, and regulates the expression of multiple genes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, brain imaging and molecular studies (specific gene testing if the specific clinical suspicion has been raised, otherwise broader genomic tests).", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include other genetic syndromes that associates intellectual disability with one or more of the key features of this disorder.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Polyhydramnios, increased nuchal translucency and/or cystic hygroma, renal anomalies can be observed during pregnancy but are non-specific. Genetic diagnosis can be proposed to families in which the pathogenic variant has already been identified in an affected relative.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal dominant. Most of the cases described are de novo, so the empirical risk of recurrence is low, 1-2%. Three families have been described in which the pathogenic variant has been inherited from a parent with a mild phenotype. The recurrence risk in these cases is 50%. To date, no cases of germinal mosaicism have been reported but this cannot be excluded.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a lifelong multidisciplinary approach with specific regular follow-up based on the patient's clinical manifestations (pediatric, neuropsychiatric, cardiological, ophthalmological, audiometric, orpthopedic, and genetic examinations). Occupational, physical, speech (in particular non-verbal methods of communication), feeding and educational therapies must be tailored to the patient's needs. Bowel malrotation is a potentially dangerous medical complication. Particular attention should be paid to monitoring feeding and growth, as feeding problems tend to occur early.", "prognosis": "Whilst there is limited data regarding life expectancy, adult patients are reported and there are no known reasons to suspect reduced life expectancy. Autonomy depends on the degree of involvement and the severity of the psychomotor developmental delay."}, {"name": "SBCAD-Mangel", "sub_name": "2-Methylbutyryl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "german_description": "Der Mangel der 2-Methylbutyryl-CoA-Dehydrogenase (oder Kurz-/Verzweigtketten-Acyl-CoA- Dehydrogenase; SBCAD) ist gekennzeichnet durch vermehrte Ausscheidung von 2-Methyl-Butyrylglyzin im Urin und erh\u00f6hte Plasmaspiegel von 2-Methylbutyryl (C5)-Carnitin. Dieser Stoffwechseldefekt wurde bei weniger als 30 Patienten beschrieben. Die meisten stammten aus der Bev\u00f6lkerung der Hmong, einer ethnischen Gruppe mit chinesischem Ursprung. Der Ph\u00e4notyp ist nicht gut definiert. Er reicht von symptomfreien Personen bis zu Patienten mit Muskelhypotonie, Zerebralparese, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Lethargie, Hypoglyk\u00e4mie und metabolischer Azidose. Der Enzymdefekt wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Das SBCAD-Enzym katalysiert im Abbauweg des Isoleuzins die Umwandlung von 2-Methylbutyryl-CoA in Tiglyl-CoA. Die betroffenen Personen haben Mutationen im SBCAD-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 10q25-26. Die Behandlung besteht in proteinarmer Di\u00e4t und Supplementierung von Carnitin. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare organic aciduria characterized by impaired isoleucine degradation with increased plasma or whole blood C5 acylcarnitine levels (typically observed in newborn screening) and increased urinary excretion of N-methylbutyrylglycine. The condition is usually clinically asymptomatic, although patients with muscular hypotonia, developmental delay, and seizures (among others) have been reported.", "synonyms": "2-methylbutyric aciduria, Developmental delay due to 2-methylbutyryl-CoA dehydrogenase deficiency, SBCAD deficiency, Short/branched-chain acyl-coA dehydrogenase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E71.1", "omim": "610006", "umls": "C1864912", "gard": "10322"}, {"name": "SBDS-related severe neonatal spondylometaphyseal dysplasia", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SBMA", "sub_name": "Kennedy-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Kennedy-Krankheit, auch Bulbo-spinale Muskelatrophie (BSMA) genannt, ist eine seltene, X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbte Motorneuron-Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch proximalen und bulb\u00e4ren Muskelschwund.", "synonyms": "Muskelatrophie, spinobulb\u00e4re, X-chromosomale, SBMA, SMAX1, X-chromosomale BSMA, X-chromosomale bulbo-spinale Muskelatrophie, X-chromosomale spinale und bulb\u00e4re Muskelatrophie, ", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G12.2", "OMIM": "313200", "UMLS": "C0393547\u00a0 C0752353\u00a0 C1839259", "GARD": "6818", "MedDRA": "10068600", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter m\u00e4nnlichen Neugeborenen betr\u00e4gt 1:30.000. Die Inzidenz symptomatischer F\u00e4lle ist 1:526.315 M\u00e4nner pro Jahr. Die Krankheitssymptome beginnen im Alter zwischen 30 und 60 Jahren.", "clinical_description": "Anf\u00e4ngliche klinische Manifestationen sind Tremor, Muskelkr\u00e4mpfe, Muskelzucken, Mattigkeit und undeutliche Sprache. Mit fortschreitender Krankheit treten zus\u00e4tzlich Muskelschw\u00e4che und -schwund an den Gliedma\u00dfen und Schw\u00e4che der Bulb\u00e4rmuskulatur auf. Resultierende Symptome sind Dysarthrie, Dysphonie, h\u00e4ngender Unterkiefer, Zungenschwund, Probleme beim Kauen und eingeschr\u00e4nkte Mobilit\u00e4t. Intellektueller Abbau ist minimal oder fehlt ganz. Im Endstadium k\u00f6nnen einige Patienten nicht mehr schlucken oder atmen. Nicht-neurologische Symptome sind Gyn\u00e4komastie, Hypogonadismus (mit der Folge von Infertilit\u00e4t und Impotenz) und, in seltenen F\u00e4llen, Dupuytren-Kontraktur oder Leistenhernie.", "etiology": "Ursache der BSMA ist die unstabile Expansion eines CAG-Tripletrepeats (40-62 Repeats) im Exon 1 des Gens f\u00fcr den Androgenrezeptor (AR; Xq11-q12). Die Repeat-Expansion f\u00fchrt zu einer verl\u00e4ngerten Glutaminsequenz im Androgenrezeptor (AR). Die Folgen sind falsche Faltung und Proteolyse des mutierten AR und Insensitivit\u00e4t gegen\u00fcber den androgenen Hormonen. Im Zellkern aggregieren die bei der Proteolyse entstehenden Fragmente, und es wird vermutet, dass diese Aggregate die Transkription verschiedener anderer Proteine st\u00f6ren und dadurch zur Degeneration der Motorneuronen f\u00fchren. Ohne ausreichende Zahl von Motorneuronen sind Beginn und Aufrechterhaltung einer Muskelkontraktion nicht l\u00e4nger m\u00f6glich, und es kommt zur Muskelatrophie. K\u00fcrzlich wurde ein BSMA-\u00e4hnlicher Ph\u00e4notyp mit distal betonter Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie der Gliedma\u00dfen beschrieben, dessen Ursache Mutationen im Gen DCTN1 (2p13) sind, das f\u00fcr eine Untereinheit des Dynactins kodiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren medizinische Vorgeschichte, klinische Untersuchung, erh\u00f6hte Spiegel von Kreatinkinase, Testosteron, Progesteron, follikel-stimulierendem Hormon und luteinisierendem Hormon, reduzierte Nervenleitgeschwindigkeiten oder verminderte Amplituden der Nerven-Aktionspotentiale, Zeichen der akuten oder chronischen De- und Re-Innervierung im Elektromyogramm und der Nachweis einer kausalen Mutation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie (s. diese Termini), andere Motorneuron-Krankheiten, Myopathien, Neuropathien, Blei- oder Aluminiumvergiftung und zervikale Spondylose.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist bei bekannter Mutation m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Heterozygote Tr\u00e4gerinnen der Mutation sind in der Regel klinisch unauff\u00e4llig, \u00fcbertragen aber die Mutation auf 50% ihrer S\u00f6hne und T\u00f6chter. Betroffene M\u00e4nner haben nur gesunde S\u00f6hne, aber alle ihre T\u00f6chter tragen die Mutation.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur symptomatischen Behandlung von Tremor und Muskelkr\u00e4mpfen geh\u00f6ren Physiotherapie und rehabilitative Ma\u00dfnahmen. Die Gyn\u00e4komastie wird hormonell oder chirurgisch behandelt. K\u00fcrzlich hat sich die Behandlung der Patienten mit dem Anti-Testosteron Leuprorelin als hilfreich erwiesen. Im fortgeschrittenem Stadium der Krankheit k\u00f6nnen Sondenern\u00e4hrung und Atemunterst\u00fctzung erforderlich werden. Die Krankheit ist langsam progredient, nur ein Drittel der Patienten ist 20 Jahre nach der Diagnose rollstuhlpflichtig.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose der BSMA ist in der Regel hoffnungsvoll, die Lebenserwartung ist nur wenig eingeschr\u00e4nkt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter m\u00e4nnlichen Neugeborenen betr\u00e4gt 1:30.000. Die Inzidenz symptomatischer F\u00e4lle ist 1:526.315 M\u00e4nner pro Jahr. Die Krankheitssymptome beginnen im Alter zwischen 30 und 60 Jahren."}, {"name": "SC4MOL-Mangel", "sub_name": "Mikrozephalie-kongenitale Katarakt-psoriasiforme Dermatose-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare sterol biosynthesis disorder characterized by microcephaly, bilateral congenital cataract, mild developmental delay, growth delay with short stature, psoriasiform dermatitis of variable severity, and immune dysregulation. Behavioral disorder, joint contractures, and arthralgia have also been described.", "synonyms": "SMO deficiency, Sterol-C4-methyl oxidase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "616834"}, {"name": "SCA1", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 1 (SCA1) ist ein Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Dysarthrie, Schwierigkeiten beim Schreiben, Gliederataxie und meist auch Nystagmus und sakkadische Anomalien.", "synonyms": "SCA1, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "OMIM": "164400", "UMLS": "C0752120", "GARD": "4071", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1-2:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, mit signifikanten geographischen und ethnischen Unterschieden. In typischen F\u00e4llen beginnt die Krankheit im 4. Lebensjahrzehnt (Bereich 4-74 Jahre).", "clinical_description": "Die Ataxie schreitet allm\u00e4hlich fort, und zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome k\u00f6nnen auftreten, z.B. Verlust der Propriozeption, Relex-Abschw\u00e4chung, Blickl\u00e4hmung und leichte Optikusneuropathie. Als initiales Krankheitsbild vor Auftreten der Ataxie wurden auch Blepharospasmus, oro-mandibul\u00e4re Dystonie und Retrocollis beschrieben. Die Kognition ist anfangs relativ gut erhalten, jedoch k\u00f6nnen sich in sp\u00e4teren Stadien St\u00f6rungen der Handlungsfunktionen und des verbalen Ged\u00e4chtnisses entwickeln.", "etiology": "Ursache der SCA1 sind CAG-Repeat-Expansionen im ATXN1-Gen (6p23).", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig: In sp\u00e4ten Krankheitsstadien, meist 10-15 Jahre nach Beginn der Erkrankung, entwickelt sich als Folge einer Beteiligung der unteren medull\u00e4ren Kerne eine bulb\u00e4re Dysfunktion mit der Folge lebensbedrohlicher Aspirationen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1-2:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, mit signifikanten geographischen und ethnischen Unterschieden. In typischen F\u00e4llen beginnt die Krankheit im 4. Lebensjahrzehnt (Bereich 4-74 Jahre)."}, {"name": "SCA10", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 10", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 10 (SCA10) ist ein Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch langsam progredientes Kleinhirnsyndrom, Epilepsie und manchmal leichte Pyramidenzeichen, periphere Neuropathie und neuropsychologische St\u00f6rungen. Der h\u00e4ufigste Anfallstyp sind generalisierte motorische Kr\u00e4mpfe, aber auch partiell-motorische und partiell-komplexe Anf\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen auftreten.", "synonyms": "SCA10, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "603516", "UMLS": "C1963674", "GARD": "10474", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Viele Familien wurden in mexikanischen und brasilianischen Populationen gefunden. Hier ist die SCA10 die zweith\u00e4ufigste erbliche Ataxie. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 18 bis zu 45 Jahren (Mittel 32,2 Jahre).", "etiology": "Ursache der SCA10 ist eine ATTCT-Pentanukleotid-Expansion im Intron 9 des ATXN10-Gens (22q13). Der pathogenetische Mechanismus ist nicht gekl\u00e4rt, m\u00f6glich erscheint eine Beteiligung der RNA-Prozessierung.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig, besonders f\u00fcr Patienten mit therapie-refrakt\u00e4rer Epilepsie. Die Dauer der Krankheit ist nicht sicher bekannt, im Mittel betr\u00e4gt sie wahrscheinlich etwa 13 Jahre.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Viele Familien wurden in mexikanischen und brasilianischen Populationen gefunden. Hier ist die SCA10 die zweith\u00e4ufigste erbliche Ataxie. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 18 bis zu 45 Jahren (Mittel 32,2 Jahre)."}, {"name": "SCA11", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 11", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease that is characterized by the early-onset of cerebellar signs, eye movement abnormalities and pyramidal signs.", "synonyms": "SCA11, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "604432", "umls": "C1858351", "gard": "10475", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 11 (SCA11) prevalence is unknown but SCA11 is thought to account for 2% of ADCA type III cases. More than sixty clinically affected members from six families (of British, Pakistani, Danish, Chinese, German and French descent) have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "SCA11 presents between the ages of 11-70 years with a mean age of onset of 25 years. It presents with the cerebellar signs such as dysarthria and progressive ataxia, eventually leading to difficulty walking and loss of balance as well as eye movement abnormalities (jerky pursuit, horizontal and vertical nystagmus and ophthalmoplegia). Pyramidal signs such as hyperreflexia mainly in the lower limbs, with positive Babinski sign are occasionally present. Rarely, dystonia and peripheral neuropathy have been reported. The disease is slowly progressive with dysphagia occurring later in the disease course. Patients usually become wheelchair bound 16 years after the onset of disease symptoms.", "etiology": "SCA11 is due to mutations in the tau tubulin kinase 2 TTBK2 gene (15q15.2). This gene encodes TTBK2, which is found throughout the brain, and that is essential in stabilizing Purkinje cells and phosphorylating tau protein.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical findings of pure cerebellar ataxia as well as molecular findings. Head magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) usually demonstrates the presence of cerebellar atrophy and is helpful in excluding other causes of ataxia. Molecular genetic testing identifies a mutation in the TTBK2  gene, confirming a diagnosis of SCA11.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other forms of ADCA type III, in particular SCA5, SCA6, SCA26, SCA30 and SCA31.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known disease causing mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA11 is inherited autosomal dominantly and genetic counseling is possible. The disease shows full penetrance. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA11 and treatment is supportive. Language and speech therapy can help patients with dysarthria. Physiotherapy and the use of canes, walkers and wheelchairs can help patients remain mobile. Consultation with an ophthalmologist is recommended and prism glasses can help those with nystagmus. Neurological follow-up is recommended to monitor the progression of ataxia.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is fair since the disease progresses very slowly (with disease duration of up to 20 years) and usually does not decrease life expectancy. Quality of life, however, is greatly affected."}, {"name": "SCA12", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 12", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 12 (SCA12) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Intentionstremor mit relativ milder zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber begleitende pyramidale und extrapyramidale Zeichen und Demenz.", "synonyms": "SCA12, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "604326", "UMLS": "C1858501", "GARD": "10476", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.Etwa 40 Familien wurden bisher beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 8 bis zu 55 Jahren, die meisten Patienten erkranken im 4. Lebensjahrzehnt.", "etiology": "Die Ursache der SCA12 ist eine CAG-Repeat-Expansion im PPP2R2B-Gen (5q31-5q32). Als pathogenetischer Mechanismus wird wie bei der SCA8 (s. dort) eine toxische Wirkung auf RNA-Ebene angenommen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist im Prinzip gut. In vielen F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit nur langsam progredient, und im allgemeinen ist die Lebenserwartung nicht verringert.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.Etwa 40 Familien wurden bisher beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 8 bis zu 55 Jahren, die meisten Patienten erkranken im 4. Lebensjahrzehnt."}, {"name": "SCA13", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 13", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 13 (SCA13) ist ein seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Beginn im Kindesalter mit verlangsamter motorischer und kognitiver Entwicklung, gefolgt von langsam progredienter zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie.", "synonyms": "SCA13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "605259", "UMLS": "C1854488", "MeSH": "C537195", "GARD": "9611", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die SCA13 ist ein prim\u00e4r zerebell\u00e4res Syndrom, aber bei mehr als 50 Jahre alten Patienten wurden auch Dysphagie, Harndrang und Bradykinesie beschrieben.", "etiology": "Ursache der bisher mitgeteilten F\u00e4lle von SCA13 sind Missense-Mutationen im KCNC3-Gen (19q13.3-q13.4).", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist relativ g\u00fcnstig. Viele Patienten werden \u00e4lter als 70 Jahre.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "SCA14", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 14", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 14 (SCA14) ist ein seltener, milder Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch langsam progrediente Ataxie, Dysarthrie und Nystagmus.", "synonyms": "SCA14, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "605361", "UMLS": "C1854369", "MeSH": "C537196", "GARD": "9867", "epidemiology": "Die Krankheit wurde in mehr als 20 Familien aus Europa, den USA und Australien beschrieben. Die Symptome setzen meist im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter ein (Mittel= 33,9 Jahre, Bereich 10-70 Jahre).", "clinical_description": "Neben der Kleinhirnsymptomatik werden oft Hyperreflexie und verminderte Vibrationssensitivit\u00e4t beobachtet. Bei einigen Patienten bestehen kognitives Defizit, durch Rigor gepr\u00e4gter Parkinsonismus, fokale Dystonie, axialer Myoklonus, faziale Myokymie, choreatische Handbewegungen und Epilepsie.", "etiology": "Ursache der SCA14 sind Missens-Mutationen im PRKCG-Gen (19q13.4), das f\u00fcr die Proteinkinase C gamma (PKC-gamma) kodiert.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist g\u00fcnstig. Wegen ihrer Gangst\u00f6rung ben\u00f6tigen einige Patienten Hilfsmittel, z.B. Stock oder Rollstuhl, aber mehrere Patienten sind \u00e4lter als 80 Jahre geworden.", "summary": "Die Krankheit wurde in mehr als 20 Familien aus Europa, den USA und Australien beschrieben. Die Symptome setzen meist im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter ein (Mittel= 33,9 Jahre, Bereich 10-70 Jahre)."}, {"name": "SCA15/16", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 15/16", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 15/16 (SCA15/16) is a rare subtype of type I autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia (ADCA type I; see this term). It is characterized by cerebellar ataxia, tremor and cognitive impairment.", "synonyms": "SCA15/16, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "606658", "gard": "10477", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is unknown. Fewer than 80 patients affected by the disease have been identified to date.", "clinical_description": "Age of onset is from 20 to 66 years (mean age = 39.6 years).", "etiology": "Genetic testing has shown that patients originally classified under SCA15 and SCA16 have the same subtype caused by a deletion in the inositol 1,4,5-triphosphate receptor 1 ITPR1 gene (3p26.1).", "prognosis": "Prognosis is generally good and life-shortening events do not usually occur. Some patients live beyond 80 years of age."}, {"name": "SCA17", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 17", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 17 (SCA17) ist ein seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch die Verschiedenheit der klinischen Auspr\u00e4gungen mit Demenz, psychiatrischen St\u00f6rungen, Parkinsonismus, Dystonie, Chorea, spastischer Parese und Epilepsie.", "synonyms": "Chorea Huntington-\u00e4hnliche Krankheit 4, HDL4, SCA17, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "OMIM": "607136", "UMLS": "C1846707", "GARD": "10469", "epidemiology": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, als lokale Pr\u00e4valenzen wurden 0,47:1.000.000 in der japanischen Bev\u00f6lkerung und 0,16:100.000 in Nordost-England gefunden. Bisher wurden weniger als 100 Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome haben \u00dcberschneidungen mit vielen neurodegenerativen Syndromen und besonders mit der Chorea Huntington (s. dort).", "etiology": "Ursache derr SCA17 ist eine CAG-Repeat-Expansion im Gen f\u00fcr das TATA-Box-bindende Protein (TBP; 6q27).", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig. Mehr als 60% der Patienten haben eine Dysphagie, die h\u00e4ufig zur Aspiration und zum Tod f\u00fchrt. Die mittlere Krankheitsdauer betr\u00e4gt weniger als 18 Jahre, nur wenige Patienten werden \u00e4lter als 80 Jahre.", "summary": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, als lokale Pr\u00e4valenzen wurden 0,47:1.000.000 in der japanischen Bev\u00f6lkerung und 0,16:100.000 in Nordost-England gefunden. Bisher wurden weniger als 100 Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "SCA18", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 18", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 18 (SCA18) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch sensorische Neuropathie und zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie.", "synonyms": "SCA18, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "OMIM": "607458", "UMLS": "C1843884", "MeSH": "C537197", "GARD": "9976", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur 26 Patienten einer amerikanischen 5-Generationen-Familie irischer Herkunft beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 13 bis zu 27 Jahren.", "clinical_description": "Erstes Symptom ist die axonale sensorische Neuropathie, erst sp\u00e4ter folgen zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie und Funktionsst\u00f6rung der Motorneurone.", "etiology": "Das SCA18-Gen wurde in die Chromosomenregion 7q22-q23 kartiert aber noch nicht sicher identifiziert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Wichtige Differentialdiagnosen sind SCA3 und SCA4 (s. diese Termini), da auch diese Subtypen mit peripherer Neuropathie einhergehen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist unsicher. Die mittlere Krankheitsdauer bei den bisher publizierten F\u00e4llen betrug vom Beginn der Erkrankung bis zur letzten Untersuchung etwa 24 Jahre.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur 26 Patienten einer amerikanischen 5-Generationen-Familie irischer Herkunft beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 13 bis zu 27 Jahren."}, {"name": "SCA19", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 19/22", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 19 (SCA19) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch milde zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, kognitive Einschr\u00e4nkung, niedrige Scores im die Handlungsfunktion messenden Wisconsin Card Sorting Test, Myoklonus und Haltungstremor.", "synonyms": "SCA19, SCA19/22, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "607346", "UMLS": "C1846367", "MeSH": "C537198", "GARD": "12365", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur 12 F\u00e4lle in einer holl\u00e4ndischen 5-Generationen-Familie beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 10 bis zu 46 Jahren und liegt im Mittel im dritten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "etiology": "Als m\u00f6glicher Genort wurde die Region1p21-q21 vorgeschlagen, das urs\u00e4chliche Gen ist noch nicht identifiziert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Eingangssymptome der SCA22 (s. dort) \u00fcberschneiden sich signifikant mit denen der SCA19, aber mit einem engeren Altersbereich von 35 bis zu 46 Jahren.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist g\u00fcnstig. Die SCA19 hat keinen wesentlichen Einfluss auf die Lebenserwartung, einige Patienten werden \u00e4lter als 80 Jahre.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur 12 F\u00e4lle in einer holl\u00e4ndischen 5-Generationen-Familie beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 10 bis zu 46 Jahren und liegt im Mittel im dritten Lebensjahrzehnt."}, {"name": "SCA19/22", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 19/22", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 19 (SCA19) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch milde zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, kognitive Einschr\u00e4nkung, niedrige Scores im die Handlungsfunktion messenden Wisconsin Card Sorting Test, Myoklonus und Haltungstremor.", "synonyms": "SCA19, SCA19/22, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "607346", "UMLS": "C1846367", "MeSH": "C537198", "GARD": "12365", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur 12 F\u00e4lle in einer holl\u00e4ndischen 5-Generationen-Familie beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 10 bis zu 46 Jahren und liegt im Mittel im dritten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "etiology": "Als m\u00f6glicher Genort wurde die Region1p21-q21 vorgeschlagen, das urs\u00e4chliche Gen ist noch nicht identifiziert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Eingangssymptome der SCA22 (s. dort) \u00fcberschneiden sich signifikant mit denen der SCA19, aber mit einem engeren Altersbereich von 35 bis zu 46 Jahren.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist g\u00fcnstig. Die SCA19 hat keinen wesentlichen Einfluss auf die Lebenserwartung, einige Patienten werden \u00e4lter als 80 Jahre.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur 12 F\u00e4lle in einer holl\u00e4ndischen 5-Generationen-Familie beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 10 bis zu 46 Jahren und liegt im Mittel im dritten Lebensjahrzehnt."}, {"name": "SCA2", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 2 (SCA2) ist ein Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Stammataxie, Dysarthrie, verlangsamte Sakkaden und, seltener, durch Augenl\u00e4hmung und Chorea.", "synonyms": "SCA2, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "183090", "UMLS": "C0752121", "GARD": "4072", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1-2:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, mit signifikanten geographischen und ethnischen Unterschieden. Die SCA2 wird im 3. oder 4. Lebensjahrzehnt manifest (Mittel 30, Bereich 2-65 Jahre).", "clinical_description": "Es gibt kein klinisches Symptom, durch das die SCA2 verl\u00e4sslich von der SCA1 (s. dort) unterschieden werden k\u00f6nnte, jedoch sind Tremor und vegetative St\u00f6rungen bei SCA2 h\u00e4ufiger. Parkinsonismus ist ein selteneres, aber gut dokumentiertes Symptom. Die SCA2 und SCA1 verlaufen klinisch \u00e4hnlich.", "etiology": "Ursache der SCA2 sind CAG-Repeat-Expansionen im Ataxin-2-Gen (ATXN2; 12q23-q24.1). Die nomale L\u00e4nge des CAG-Repeats ist 15-24. Repeats mit einer L\u00e4nge von 35 oder mehr sind mit klinischen Symptomen der SCA2 assoziiert.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist in den meisten F\u00e4llen relativ g\u00fcnstig, Krankheitsverl\u00e4ufe von mehr als 20 Jahren wurden beschrieben. Jedoch ist in einigen F\u00e4lle, besondes bei fr\u00fchem Beginn (unter 20 Jahren) der Symptome, eine schnelle Progredienz m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1-2:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, mit signifikanten geographischen und ethnischen Unterschieden. Die SCA2 wird im 3. oder 4. Lebensjahrzehnt manifest (Mittel 30, Bereich 2-65 Jahre)."}, {"name": "SCA20", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 20", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 20 (SCA20) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch zerebell\u00e4re Dysarthrie als typischem erstem Symptom.", "synonyms": "SCA20, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "608687", "UMLS": "C1837541", "MeSH": "C537199", "GARD": "9997", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Biasher wurden in einer australischen 4-Generationen-Familie anglo-keltischen Ursprungs weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 19 bis zu 64 Jahren (Mittel 46,5 Jahre).", "clinical_description": "Die meisten Betroffenen haben zus\u00e4tzlich Gaumenzittern und eine spasmodische Dysphonie. Das Sch\u00e4del-CT zeigt Verkalkungen im Nucleus dentatus.", "etiology": "Bei Patienten mit SCA20 wurde eine 260 kb-Duplikation in der Chromosomenregion 11q12.2-11q12.3 nachgewiesen. Dieser Bereich \u00fcberlappt mit dem Genort des SCA5-Gens SPTBN2 (s. dort), jedoch sind die klinischen Symptome verschieden. Die SCA5 geh\u00f6rt zur Typ III-ADCA (s. dort) und repr\u00e4sentiert ein reines Ataxiesyndrom mit im Mittel fr\u00fcherem Erkrankungsalter, das von 14 bis zu 50 Jahren reicht.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose der SCA20 ist relativ g\u00fcnstig. Die meisten Patienten bleiben mit oder ohne Hilfen gehf\u00e4hig, und viele Patienten werden \u00fcber 60 Jahre alt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Biasher wurden in einer australischen 4-Generationen-Familie anglo-keltischen Ursprungs weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 19 bis zu 64 Jahren (Mittel 46,5 Jahre)."}, {"name": "SCA21", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 21", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 21 (SCA21) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch langsam progrediente zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie,milde kognitive Einschr\u00e4nkung, Haltungs- und Ruhetremor, Bradykinesie und Rigor.", "synonyms": "SCA21, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "607454", "UMLS": "C1843891", "MeSH": "C537200", "GARD": "9999", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden in einer franz\u00f6sischen 4-Generationen-Familie weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Das mittlere Erkrankungsalter ist mit 17,4 Jahren im Vergleich zu den meisten anderen Typ I-ADCAs relativ fr\u00fch. Individuen aus nachfolgenden Generationen erkranken eher fr\u00fcher als die Individuen der vorangegangenen Generation.", "etiology": "Der Parkinsonismus spricht nicht auf L-DOPA an, die Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt eine Atrophie von Kleinhirn und Hirnstamm. Die SCA21 wurde in die Chromosomenregion 7p21.3-p15.1 kartiert, das urs\u00e4chliche Gen wurde noch nicht identifiziert.", "prognosis": "Die bisher vorliegenden Daten erlauben keine prognostischen Aussagen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden in einer franz\u00f6sischen 4-Generationen-Familie weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Das mittlere Erkrankungsalter ist mit 17,4 Jahren im Vergleich zu den meisten anderen Typ I-ADCAs relativ fr\u00fch. Individuen aus nachfolgenden Generationen erkranken eher fr\u00fcher als die Individuen der vorangegangenen Generation."}, {"name": "SCA23", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 23", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 23 (SCA23) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Gangataxie, Dysarthrie, verlangsamte Sakkaden, okul\u00e4re Dysmetrie, Babinski-Zeichen und Hyperreflexie.", "synonyms": "SCA23, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "610245", "UMLS": "C1853250", "MeSH": "C537201", "GARD": "9950", "epidemiology": "Dieser Subtyp wurde bisher nur in 4 niederl\u00e4ndischen Familien beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 43 bis zu 56 Jahren.", "clinical_description": "Klinische Symptome, kraniale Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) und neuropathologische Befunde k\u00f6nnen von den anderen SCA-Subtypen nicht unterschieden werden.", "etiology": "M\u00f6gliche Ursache der SCA23 sind Missense-Mutationen im Prodynorphin-Gen (PDYN; 20p12.3-p13).", "prognosis": "Einige F\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen eine g\u00fcnstige Prognose haben. Die Krankheit schreitet evtl. nur langsam fort. Mehr als 20 Jahre nach Beginn der Symptome k\u00f6nnen die Patienten rollstuhlpflichtig werden.", "summary": "Dieser Subtyp wurde bisher nur in 4 niederl\u00e4ndischen Familien beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter reicht von 43 bis zu 56 Jahren."}, {"name": "SCA25", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 25", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 25 (SCA25) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie und schwere sensorische Neuropathie.", "synonyms": "SCA25, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "OMIM": "608703", "UMLS": "C1837518", "MeSH": "C537202", "GARD": "9996", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden weniger als 10 Patienten in einer franz\u00f6sischen 4-Generationsfamilie beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter liegt zwischen 1 Jahr und 39 Jahren.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild ist unterschiedlich und reicht von sensorischer Neuropathie mit wenig zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie bis zu zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie mit wenig sensorischer Neuropathie. Einige Patienten haben als initiale Symptome gastro-intestinale (GI) St\u00f6rungen, z.B. mit Erbrechen und Leibschmerzen. Diese Beschwerden k\u00f6nnen persistieren. Auch Skoliose und Harnprobleme (Nykturie, Harndrang) wurden beschrieben. Durch kraniale Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) wird eine schwere allgemeine Kleinhirnatrophie (wie bei SCA5 und SCA8; s. diese Termini) nachgewiesen.", "etiology": "Der Genort der SCA25 wurde in die Chromosomenregion 2p15-p21 kartiert. Eine m\u00f6gliche CAG-Repeat-Expansion war nicht nachweisbar.", "prognosis": "Die bisher vorliegenden Daten erlauben keine prognostischen Aussagen.", "summary": "Bisher wurden weniger als 10 Patienten in einer franz\u00f6sischen 4-Generationsfamilie beschrieben. Das Erkrankungsalter liegt zwischen 1 Jahr und 39 Jahren."}, {"name": "SCA26", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 26", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare subtype of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type III (ADCA type III) characterized by late-onset and slowly progressive cerebellar signs (gait ataxia) and eye movement abnormalities.", "synonyms": "SCA26, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "609306", "umls": "C1836395", "mesh": "C537203", "gard": "9995", "epidemiology": "To date, only 23 affected patients have been described from one American family of Norwegian descent.", "clinical_description": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 26 (SCA26) onset occurs between the ages of 26-60 with a mean age of onset of 42 years. Slowly progressive gait ataxia and dysarthria were reported in all patients. Nystagmus, impaired pursuit, and dysmetric saccades were described in majority of patitents. Left-sided pyramidal signs (hyperreflexia with positive Babinski sign) were reported in one patient. The disease duration is unknown.", "etiology": "A candidate gene for SCA26 has recently been identified as the eukaryotic translation elongation factor 2 (EEF2) gene, located on chromosome 19p13.3. Further confirmatory studies are still required in order to determine if a mutation in this gene directly causes SCA26.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical findings of pure cerebellar ataxia as well as molecular findings. Head magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) usually demonstrates the presence of atrophy of the cerebellum sparing the brainstem and is helpful in excluding other causes of ataxia. Molecular genetic testing identifies a mutation in the EEF2  gene, confirming a diagnosis of SCA26.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other forms of ADCA type III, in particular SCA5, SCA6, SCA11, SCA30 and SCA31.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known disease causing mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA26 is inherited autosomal dominantly and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA26 and treatment is supportive. Neurological follow-up is recommended to monitor the progression of ataxia.", "prognosis": "Disease progression is very slow, but precise prognosis is unknown."}, {"name": "SCA27", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 27", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 27 (SCA27) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch fr\u00fch auftretenden Tremor, Dyskinesie und langsam progrediente zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie.", "synonyms": "SCA27, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "OMIM": "609307", "UMLS": "C1836383", "MeSH": "C537204", "GARD": "9963", "etiology": "Ursache dieses Subtyps ist eine Mutation im Gen f\u00fcr den Fibroblasten-Wachstumsfaktor 14 (FGF14; 13q34).", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist relativ g\u00fcnstig. Die Patienten bleiben bis in das 7. Lebensjahrzehnt ohne Unterst\u00fctzung gehf\u00e4hig. Lebensbedrohlicher Status epilepticus, therapierefrakt\u00e4re zerebrale Kr\u00e4mpfe und schwere Dysphagie sind selten.", "summary": "Ursache dieses Subtyps ist eine Mutation im Gen f\u00fcr den Fibroblasten-Wachstumsfaktor 14 (FGF14; 13q34)."}, {"name": "SCA28", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 28", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 28 (SCA28) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch im Jugendalter beginnende, langsam progrediente zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie im Gefolge einer Degeneration von Purkinje-Zellen.", "synonyms": "SCA28, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "610246", "UMLS": "C1853249", "MeSH": "C537205", "GARD": "9951", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, die SCA28 macht etwa 1,5% aller europ\u00e4ischen F\u00e4lle von ADCA aus. In der zuerst beschriebenen Familie war das mittlere Erkrankungsalter 19,5 Jahre.", "clinical_description": "Einige Patienten sind kognitiv eingeschr\u00e4nkt. Im fortgeschrittenen Krankheitsstadium treten Augenl\u00e4hmung, verlangsamte Sakkaden, Ptose und Pyramidenzeichen auf.", "etiology": "Der Genort der SCA28 wurde in die Chromosomenregion 18p11.22-q11.2 kartiert.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist relativ g\u00fcnstig. Die Patienten bleiben bis in das 7. Lebensjahrzehnt ohne Unterst\u00fctzung gehf\u00e4hig. Lebensbedrohlicher Status epilepticus, therapierefrakt\u00e4re zerebrale Kr\u00e4mpfe und schwere Dysphagie sind selten.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, die SCA28 macht etwa 1,5% aller europ\u00e4ischen F\u00e4lle von ADCA aus. In der zuerst beschriebenen Familie war das mittlere Erkrankungsalter 19,5 Jahre."}, {"name": "SCA29", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 29", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. In der Literatur sind bisher mehr als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type I that is characterized by very slowly progressive or non-progressive ataxia, dysarthria, oculomotor abnormalities and intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "Congenital nonprogressive spinocerebellar ataxia, SCA29, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.0", "omim": "117360", "umls": "C1861732", "gard": "10480", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 29 (SCA29) prevalence is unknown. More than 50 cases have been reported in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "SCA29 presents at birth, or shortly after, with manifestations including very slowly progressive or non-progressive gait and limb ataxia causing delayed walking and frequent falling in children. Mild developmental delay, learning difficulties, and language dysfunction are frequently reported. Other manifestations include nystagmus, dysarthria, dysmetria, and dysdiadochokinesia. Affected patients occasionally present with intention tremor, dystonia, and migraine headaches. Although the disease course is not well established, it appears to range from non-progressive or very slowly progressive ataxia (that does not affect ambulation) to progressively disabling ataxia. A slight improvement in cerebellar signs has been reported in some cases over time.", "etiology": "SCA29 is due to mutations in the ITPR1 gene (3p26.1), which is also the causal gene of SCA15.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and molecular genetic testing. As the manifestations of SCA29 are not specific, diagnosis is only confirmed with the finding of a mutation in the ITPR1 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA29 is inherited autosomal dominantly, occasionally autosomal recessively, and genetic counseling is possible.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA29 and treatment is supportive. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "Disease progression is very slow, but precise prognosis is unknown."}, {"name": "SCA3", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 3 (SCA3) oder Machado-Joseph-Krankheit, ist der h\u00e4ufigste Untertyp der autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie Typ 1 (ADCA Typ 1), einer neurodegenerativen Erkrankung mit Ataxie, externer progressiver Ophthalmoplegie und anderen neurologischen Symptomen.", "synonyms": "Azoren-Krankheit des Nervensystems, Degeneration, nigro-spino-dentale, mit nukle\u00e4rer Ophthalmoplegie, MJD, Machado-Joseph-Krankheit, Machado-Krankheit, SCA3, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "OMIM": "109150", "UMLS": "C0024408", "GARD": "6801", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1-2:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, mit signifikanten geographischen und ethnischen Unterschieden. Die h\u00f6chste Pr\u00e4valenz wurde auf den Azoren gefunden (Flores Island 1:239). Eine mittlere Pr\u00e4valenzen haben Portugal, Deutschland, Niederlande, China und Japan, niedrige Pr\u00e4valenzen haben Nordamerika, Australien und Indien. Genaue Zahlen gibt es nicht, die SCA3 ist aber in den meisten genetisch charakterisierten Populationen die h\u00e4ufigste Form der ADCA1 und ist f\u00fcr bis zu 72% der Familien mit Ataxie verantwortlich. Nach einer englischen Literatur\u00fcbersicht wurden etwa 600 F\u00e4lle publiziert.", "clinical_description": "Die SCA3 wird in drei Unterformen unterteilt: (i) SCA3 Typ 1 (MJD1) mit Beginn in der Adoleszenz ist assoziiert mit Ataxie, Ophthalmoparese, Pyramidenzeichen (Spastik, Hyperreflexie), extrapyramidalen Symptomen (Dystonie) und anderen Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen; (ii) SCA3 Typ 2 (MJD2) setzt im mittleren Erwachsenenalter mit Ataxie, Spastik und Dystonie ein; (iii) SCA3 Typ 3 (MJD3) tritt nach einem Alter von 40 Jahren auf, mit Ophthalmoparese und Vorderhornzellen-Symptomen (Faszikulieren, Atrophie, Schw\u00e4che). Ein weiteres m\u00f6gliches Symptom der SCA3 ist Parkinsonismus. Ein leicht \u00fcbersehenes, aber h\u00e4ufiges Symptom ist die am ganzen K\u00f6rper gest\u00f6rte Temperaturempfindung.", "etiology": "Ursache der SCA3 ist eine CAG-Repeat-Expansion im ATXN3-Gen (14q21) mit Antezipation. Die normale Repeatl\u00e4nge ist 13-41, Repeatl\u00e4ngen \u00fcber 56 verursachen SCA3.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren das klinische Bild, die Familienanamnese und schlie\u00dflich die DNA-Analyse.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose ist umfangreich und schlie\u00dft andere SCA-Typen mit \u00e4hnlicher Symptomatik ein.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Den betroffenen Familien k\u00f6nnen Pr\u00e4nataldiagnose und pr\u00e4klinischer Test angeboten werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Die SCA3 wird autosomal-dominant mit voller Penetranz und mit Antezipation (Vorverlegung des Erkrankungsalters in aufeinander folgenden Generationen) vererbt. Den Patienten und ihren Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden. Deren Gegenstand ist auch die pr\u00e4symptomatische Testung bei erwachsenen Familienangeh\u00f6rigen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend, eine spezifische Therapie, die die Progredienz verlangsamen oder aufhalten k\u00f6nnte, ist nicht bekannt. Medikament\u00f6s behandelt werden z.B. Parkinsonismus, Restless-Legs-Syndrom, Spastik, Schlafst\u00f6rungen und Depression. Dystonie und Spastikk\u00f6nnen mit lokalen Injektionen von Botulinumtoxin kontrolliert werden. Besch\u00e4ftigungs- und Physiotherapie sind unerl\u00e4sslich. Bei Dysarthrie kann auch Sprachtherapie hilfreich sein.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig, es wurde jedoch \u00fcber Patienten berichtet, die Jahrzehnte nach Beginn der Symptome noch lebten.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1-2:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, mit signifikanten geographischen und ethnischen Unterschieden. Die h\u00f6chste Pr\u00e4valenz wurde auf den Azoren gefunden (Flores Island 1:239). Eine mittlere Pr\u00e4valenzen haben Portugal, Deutschland, Niederlande, China und Japan, niedrige Pr\u00e4valenzen haben Nordamerika, Australien und Indien. Genaue Zahlen gibt es nicht, die SCA3 ist aber in den meisten genetisch charakterisierten Populationen die h\u00e4ufigste Form der ADCA1 und ist f\u00fcr bis zu 72% der Familien mit Ataxie verantwortlich. Nach einer englischen Literatur\u00fcbersicht wurden etwa 600 F\u00e4lle publiziert."}, {"name": "SCA30", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 30", "german_description": "SCA30 wurde bisher nur bei 6 Patienten aus einer australischen Familie beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type III that is characterized by a slowly progressive and relatively pure ataxia.", "synonyms": "SCA30, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "613371", "umls": "C2936793", "mesh": "C537206", "gard": "4950", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 30 (SCA30) has only been described in 6 patients from one Australian family to date.", "clinical_description": "The age of onset ranges from 45 to 76 years with a mean age of onset of 52 years. It presents with oculomotor dysfunction, moderate dysarthria, and ataxia that progresses slowly and eventually leads to mobility impairment. Some patients have also reported mild hyperreflexia in the lower limbs. Rarer manifestations include gaze-evoked nystagmus and dystonia. Head MRI shows atrophy of cerebellum with preservation of nodulus/uvula and brainstem.", "etiology": "The causal gene has not yet been identified but it has been linked to chromosome 4q34.3-q35.1.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and family history of SCA30.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is not possible, since a causative gene has not yet been identified for SCA30.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA30 is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA30 and treatment is supportive. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Dysphagia should be monitored to decrease the risk of aspiration pneumonia. In those with vertigo, vestibular suppressants may be beneficial. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "Disease progression is very slow, but precise prognosis is unknown."}, {"name": "SCA31", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 31", "german_description": "SCA31 ist die dritth\u00e4ufigste Form der ADCA (siehe dort) in Japan, wo bisher mehr als 20 betroffene Familien berichtet wurden. Sie tritt selten in anderen asiatischen L\u00e4ndern auf und ist extrem selten in westlichen L\u00e4ndern.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type III that is characterized by the late-onset of ataxia, dysarthria and horizontal gaze nystagmus, and that is occasionally accompanied by pyramidal signs, tremor, decreased vibration sense and hearing difficulties.", "synonyms": "SCA31, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "117210", "umls": "C1861736", "gard": "9975", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 31 (SCA31) is the third most common form of ADCA in Japan, where more than 20 families have been reported to date. It is rarely found in other Asian countries and is extremely rare in Western countries.", "clinical_description": "The mean age of disease onset is 58 years but it can present between the ages of 8 to 83 years. Ataxia, dysarthria, and horizontal gaze nystagmus are the common manifestations of SCA31, and the disease duration can be more than 10 years. Less common manifestations include pyramidal signs, tremor, decreased vibration sense, hearing difficulties, and blepharospasm", "etiology": "SCA31 is due to non-coding pentanucleotide repeat expansions in the BEAN1 gene (16q21), encoding protein BEAN1.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and molecular genetic testing. As the manifestations of SCA31 are not specific, diagnosis is only confirmed with the finding of a mutation in the BEAN1 gene", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of ADCA.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA31 is inherited autosomal dominantly with incomplete penetrance and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA31 and treatment is supportive. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Dysphagia should be monitored to decrease the risk of aspiration pneumonia. In those with vertigo, vestibular suppressants may be beneficial. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "Disease progression is very slow. Life expectancy is not reduced but the quality of life can be significantly affected. According to recent reports, patients can become wheelchair bound at age of 79 years, and died at age of 89 years."}, {"name": "SCA32", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 32", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type 1 that is characterized by ataxia and cognitive impairment. Azoospermia is a typical feature in affected males.", "synonyms": "Cerebellar ataxia with azoospermia and intellectual disability, SCA32, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "613909", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 32 (SCA32) has been reported in one Chinese family to date.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs in adulthood with females more affected than males. Manifestations include ataxia, cognitive impairment and, in males, azoospermia. Cerebellar atrophy is visible with magnetic resonance imaging.", "etiology": "The causal gene of SCA32 has not yet been identified but it is located to chromosome 7q32-q33.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and family history of the disease.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of ADCA.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA32 is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA32 and treatment is supportive. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Dysphagia should be monitored to decrease the risk of aspiration pneumonia. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "Precise prognosis is unknown due to limited number of patients reported. Mean age when aid walking needed is about 34 years."}, {"name": "SCA34", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 34", "german_description": "Bis heute wurde die SCA34 bei 25 Mitgliedern einer Franz\u00f6sisch-Kanadischen Familie nachgewiesen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type I that is characterized by papulosquamous, ichthyosiform plaques on the limbs appearing shortly after birth and later manifestations including progressive ataxia, dysarthria, nystagmus and decreased reflexes.", "synonyms": "Erythrokeratodermia with ataxia, SCA34, Spinocerebellar ataxia and erythrokeratodermia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "133190", "umls": "C1851481\u00a0 C2930921", "mesh": "C535514\u00a0 C535738", "gard": "59", "epidemiology": "To date the disorder has been reported in 45 patients including 4 asymptomatic carriers, from one French-Canadian family and three Japanese families.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs from shortly after birth to adolescence with the appearance of papulosquamous, ichthyosiform plaques on the limbs, which are often only present in the winter. After the age of 25 years they tend to disappear completely. Progressive ataxia, dysarthria, decreased reflexes, and nystagmus are further clinical signs of the disease that occur after the onset of skin manifestations, generally from the third to fifth decade of life. Patients occasionally present with autonomic dysfunction and pyramidal signs. Cerebellar and pontine atrophy is visible with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in individuals who develop cerebellar ataxia.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to a mutation in the ELOVL4 gene (6q14).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on characteristic clinical findings (skin lesions occurring shortly after birth and adult-onset slowly progressive cerebellar ataxia), and on the molecular genetic testing. Mutations in the ELOVL4 gene confirms diagnosis of SCA34. Magnetic resonance imaging usually shows marked atrophy of the cerebellum and pontine which is sometimes accompanied by Hot Cross Bun sign that is common in cerebellar type of multiple system atrophy.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other forms of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia. From the view point of radiological findings, multiple system atrophy is important in differential diagnosis, especially in patients who also develop autonomic dysfunction.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known ELOVL4 mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is only supportive. Physical activity should be maintained as much as possible with the help of prosthetic devices. Motorized chairs/scooters are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices should be offered to those with severe dysarthria.", "prognosis": "Disease progression is slow; the patients require cane or walker in their late 60s, and wheelchair in their 70s."}, {"name": "SCA35", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 35", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type 1 that is characterized by the adult-onset of progressive gait and limb ataxia, dysarthria, ocular dysmetria, intention tremor of hands, hyperreflexia and spasmodic torticollis.", "synonyms": "SCA35, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "613908", "gard": "12366", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 35 (SCA35) has been reported worldwide in less than 30 cases to date.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs in adulthood with manifestations of progressive gait and limb ataxia, dysarthria, ocular dysmetria, intention tremor, pseudobulbar palsy, spasmodic torticollis, extensor plantar responses (Babinski sign), reduced proprioception, and hyperreflexia. Cognitive impairment is rare. Patients are usually wheelchair bound 10 years or more after the onset of symptoms. Head MRI shows diffuse cerebellar atrophy without involvement of the brainstem.", "etiology": "SCA35 is caused by a mutation in the TGM6 gene (20p13) encoding transglutaminase 6 (TG6), a member of the transglutaminase family of enzymes. TG6 is expressed in the kidney, skin, eyes and neurons but the exact process that leads to SCA35 is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and molecular genetic testing. As the manifestations of SCA35 are not specific, diagnosis is only confirmed with the finding of a mutation in the TGM6 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of ADCA.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA35 is inherited autosomal dominantly and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA35 and treatment is supportive. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "SCA35 is slowly progressive disease, and most of reported patients are usually wheelchair bound 10 years or more after the onset of symptoms."}, {"name": "SCA36", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 36", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type 1 that characterized by gait and limb ataxia, lower limb spasticity, dysarthria, muscle fasiculations, tongue atrophy and hyperreflexia.", "synonyms": "Asidan, SCA36, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "614153", "gard": "12367", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 36 (SCA36) prevalence is unknown. SCA36 has been described in more than 100 families in Asia (Japan and China) and Europe (France, Italy, Poland, and Spain-Galicia). In a US population, SCA36 accounts for 0.7% of disease in a large undiagnosed ataxia cohort.", "clinical_description": "SCA36 presents in adulthood with ataxic dysarthria, truncal ataxia, limb ataxia, general hyperreflexia and variably occurring lower limb spasticity. Motor neuron involvement occurs later in the disease course and manifests with fasciculations and atrophy of the skeletal muscles and tongue. Sensorineural hearing loss may also be present in some. Oromandibular dystonia is a rare manifestation. Only mild cerebellar atrophy is reported.", "etiology": "SCA36 is due to a pathogenic heterozygous GGCCTG repeat expansion in intron 1 of the NOP56 gene (20p13).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and molecular genetic testing. As the manifestations of SCA36 are not specific, diagnosis is only confirmed with the finding of a pathogenic heterozygous GGCCTG repeat expansion in intron 1 of the NOP56 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of ADCA (Autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known genetic cause.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA36 is inherited autosomal dominantly and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA36 and treatment is supportive. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression."}, {"name": "SCA37", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 37", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type 1 that is characterized by a cerebellar syndrome along with altered vertical eye movements.", "synonyms": "SCA37, Spinocerebellar ataxia with altered vertical eye movements, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "615945", "gard": "12368", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 37 (SCA37) has been reported in nine members of a Spanish kindred to date.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs in adulthood (from the ages of 38-64). Clinical manifestations of SCA37 patients are characterized by slowly progressive cerebellar ataxia (starting with falls, dysarthria and clumsiness followed by other cerebellar signs) along with altered vertical eye movements. Generalized cerebellar atrophy is visible with magnetic resonance imaging.", "etiology": "SCA37 is due to a pathogenic pentanucleotide ATTTC insertion within the 1p32 5' non-coding regulatory region of the DAB1 gene (1p32.2).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and molecular genetic testing. As the manifestations of SCA37 are not specific, diagnosis is only confirmed with the finding of a pathogenic mutation in the DAB1 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is not possible.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA37 is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA37 and treatment is supportive. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "Precise prognosis is unknown due to small number of patients reported, but disease progression is slow and the patients generally need wheelchair from 10 and 30 years after the disease onset."}, {"name": "SCA38", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 38", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 38 (SCA38) ist ein Subtyp der autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie Typ 3, die im Erwachsenenalter (Durchschnittsalter: 40 Jahre) mit Stammataxie, Gangst\u00f6rung und blickevoziertem Nystagmus auftritt. Die Erkrankung ist langsam progredient, wobei Dysarthrie und Gliedma\u00dfenataxie folgen. Weitere Manifestationen sind Diplopie und axonale Neuropathie.", "synonyms": "SCA38, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "OMIM": "615957", "GARD": "12369"}, {"name": "SCA3, Typ Joseph", "sub_name": "Machado-Joseph-Krankheit Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 1 der Machado-Joseph-Krankheit (MJD1), ein seltener, in der Regel schwerer Subtyp der Machado-Joseph-Krankheit (SCA3/MJD; s.dort), ist gekennzeichnet durch ausgepr\u00e4gte pyramidale und extrapyramidale Zeichen.", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 3, vom Joseph Typ, SCA3, Typ Joseph, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 3 vom Joseph-Typ, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "UMLS": "C0751668", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt, sie ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr 13% aller F\u00e4lle von SCA3.", "clinical_description": "In der Regel beginnt die Krankheit fr\u00fch (mittleres Erkrankungsalter: 24 Jahre). Patienten mit MJD1 kommen meist mit Kleinhirnsymptomen und externer progressiver Ophthalmoplegie, und mit unterschiedlich schweren pyramidale Symptomen (Spastik, Hyperreflexie). Daneben haben die Patienten auch extrapyramidale Symptome (Dystonie).", "etiology": "Ursache der Krankheit ist eine CAG-Repeat-Expansion im ATXN3-Gen (14q21). Patienten mit MJD1 haben eher gr\u00f6\u00dfere CAG-Repeatl\u00e4ngen als die beiden anderen MJD-Subtypen. Die MJD wird autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt, sie ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr 13% aller F\u00e4lle von SCA3."}, {"name": "SCA3, Typ Machado", "sub_name": "Machado-Joseph-Krankheit Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 3 der Machado-Joseph-Krankheit (MJD3), ein Subtyp der Machado-Joseph-Krankheit (SCA3/MJD; s.dort) mit milderem Schweregrad, ist gekennzeichnet durch sp\u00e4ten Beginn, langsamere Progredienz und periphere Amyotrophie.", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 3, vom Machado Typ, SCA3, Typ Machado, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "UMLS": "C0751670", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser MJD-Form ist nicht bekannt. Sie ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr 30% aller SCA3-F\u00e4lle. Das mittlere Erkrankungsalter ist 46 Jahre.", "clinical_description": "Symptome sind zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, externe progressive Ophthalmoplegie und periphere Amyotrophie mit oder ohne pyramidale oder extrapyramidale Zeichen.", "etiology": "Ursache der Krankheit ist eine CAG-Repeat-Expansion im ATXN3-Gen (14q21).", "management_and_treatment": "Die MJD wird autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser MJD-Form ist nicht bekannt. Sie ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr 30% aller SCA3-F\u00e4lle. Das mittlere Erkrankungsalter ist 46 Jahre."}, {"name": "SCA3, Typ Thomas", "sub_name": "Machado-Joseph-Krankheit Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 2 der Machado-Joseph-Krankheit (MJD2), ein Subtyp der Machado-Joseph-Krankheit (SCA3/MJD; s.dort) mit intermedi\u00e4rem Schweregrad, ist gekennzeichnet durch mittleres Erkrankungsalter, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, externe progressive Ophthalmoplegie und unterschiedlich schwere pyramidale und extrapyramidale Zeichen.", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ Thomas, SCA3, Typ Thomas, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "UMLS": "C0751669", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser MJD-Form ist nicht bekannt. Sie ist die h\u00e4ufigste SCA3-Form und verantwortlich f\u00fcr 57% aller SCA3-F\u00e4lle.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit beginnt im mittleren Erwachsenalter (mittleres Alter 40 Jahre). Die extrapyramidalen und peripheren Symptome sind, falls vorhanden, milde ausgepr\u00e4gt. Bei einigen Patienten schreitet die Krankheit nach 5-10 Jahren zum MJD-Typ 1 (s.dort) fort, wenn signifikante extrapyramidale Zeichen auftreten, oder zum MJD-Typ 3 (s.dort), wenn signifikante periphere Zeichen auftreten.", "etiology": "Ursache der Krankheit ist eine CAG-Repeat-Expansion im ATXN3-Gen (14q21).", "genetic_counseling": "Die MJD wird autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser MJD-Form ist nicht bekannt. Sie ist die h\u00e4ufigste SCA3-Form und verantwortlich f\u00fcr 57% aller SCA3-F\u00e4lle."}, {"name": "SCA4", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 4 (SCA4) ist ein sehr seltener, progredienter Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Ataxie mit sensorischer Neuropathie.", "synonyms": "SCA4, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "600223", "UMLS": "C0752122", "GARD": "9970", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "In typischen F\u00e4llen beginnt die Krankheit im mittleren Erwachsenenalter mit zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie, Pyramidenzeichen und peripheren Sensibilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rungen.", "etiology": "Der Genort der SCA4 wurde in je einer Familie aus den USA (Utah) und Deutschland in die Chromosomenregion 16q22 kartiert. Das Gen und die Art der Mutation sind nicht bekannt, jedoch scheinen Trinukleotid-Repeats nicht beteiligt zu sein.", "prognosis": "Die bisher mitgeteilten klinischen Daten erlauben keine Aussagen \u00fcber die Prognose.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "SCA40", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 40", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 40 (SCA40) ist ein sehr seltener Subtyp der autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie Typ 1. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch das Auftreten von Gangunsicherheit und Dysarthrie im Erwachsenenalter, mit nachfolgendem breitbeinigen Gangbild, Gangataxie, Augendysmetrie, Intentionstremor, skandierender Sprache, Hyperreflexie und Dysdiadochokinese.", "synonyms": "SCA40, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "OMIM": "616053", "GARD": "12371"}, {"name": "SCA41", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 41", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 41 is a rare autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type III disorder characterized by adult-onset progressive imbalance and loss of coordination associated with an ataxic gait. Mild atrophy of the cerebellar vermis has been reported on brain magnetic resonance imaging.", "synonyms": "SCA41, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "616410"}, {"name": "SCA42", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 42", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 42 is a rare, autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia characterized by pure and slowly progressive cerebellar signs combining gait instability, dysarthria, nystagmus, saccadic eye movements and diplopia. Less frequent clinical signs and symptoms include spasticity, hyperreflexia, decreased distal vibration sense, urinary urgency or incontinence and postural tremor.", "synonyms": "SCA42, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "616795"}, {"name": "SCA43", "sub_name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 43", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 43 is a rare autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type I disorder characterized by late adult-onset of slowly progressive cerebellar ataxia, typically presenting with balance and gait disturbances, in association with axonal peripheral neuropathy resulting in reduced/absent deep tendon reflexes and sensory impairment. Lower limb pain and amyotrophy may be present, as well as various cerebellar signs, including dysarthria, nystagmus, hypometric saccades and tremor.", "synonyms": "SCA43, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "617017"}, {"name": "SCA45", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 45", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SCA45, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SCA46", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 46", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SCA46, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SCA47", "sub_name": "PADDAS-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung-Ataxie-Kr\u00e4mpfe-Syndrom, PUM1-assoziiert, SCA47, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SCA5", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 5", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type III that is characterized by the early-onset of cerebellar signs with eye movement abnormalities and a very slow disease progression.", "synonyms": "SCA5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "600224", "umls": "C0752123", "gard": "4953", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 5 (SCA5) prevalence is unknown. Five families (American, French, German, and Japanese) with SCA5 have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "The mean age of onset is 33 years but it can range from 6 years to 68 years. SCA5 patients clinically present with cerebellar signs (ataxia, dysarthria, tremor), intention tremor, and eye movement abnormalities such as gaze-evoked nystagmus, down beat nystagmus, and impaired smooth pursuit. Occasionally defects of the visual field and horizontal gaze palsy can be also present. Non-cerebellar signs such as facial myokimia, resting tremor, writer's cramp, impaired vibration sense, dysphagia, and brisk deep tendon reflexes have been reported in some patients. SCA5 progresses very slowly with a disease duration of more than 30 years after symptom onset.", "etiology": "SCA5 is caused by mutations in the SPTBN2 gene (11q13.2) encoding beta-III spectrin, a protein essential for the correct functioning and development of Purkinje cells.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and molecular genetic testing. As the manifestations of SCA5 are not specific, diagnosis is only confirmed with the finding of a mutation in the SPTBN2 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of ADCA (Autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease is a rare autosomal dominant spinocerebellar ataxia. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA5 and treatment is supportive. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Dysphagia should be monitored to decrease the risk of aspiration pneumonia. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "Disease progression is slow, but precise prognosis is unknown."}, {"name": "SCA6", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 6", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type III that is characterized by late-onset and slowly progressive gait ataxia and other cerebellar signs such as impaired muscle coordination and nystagmus.", "synonyms": "SCA6, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "183086", "umls": "C0752124", "gard": "10351", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 6 (SCA6) estimated worldwide prevalence is less than 1/100,000. It is most commonly seen in Japan, Korea, the Netherlands and Germany.", "clinical_description": "The mean age of onset is 45 years but can range from the ages of 16 to 72 years. It usually presents with the cerebellar signs of ataxia, dysarthria and dysphagia. Some patients also have episodic vertigo and diplopia. Eye movement abnormalities such as gaze evoked and downbeat nystagmus, impaired smooth pursuit and abnormal vestibulo-ocular reflex are commonly seen in SCA6 patients. Less common presentations include pyramidal tract signs and peripheral neuropathy. Parkinsonism, dystonia, myoclonus, tremor and cognitive impairment have been reported in rare cases. Depression and fatigue have been associated with SCA6. Disease severity seems to increase during pregnancy. SCA6 progresses very slowly with a disease duration that can last over 25 years.", "etiology": "SCA6 is caused by small expansions of the trinucleotide (CAG) repeat in the CACNA1A gene (19p13) which encodes an alpha 1 subunit of a P/Q-type voltage-gated calcium channel, necessary for proper neural communication in the brain. The expansions in SCA6 patients are usually of 21-29 CAG repeats.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and molecular genetic testing. As the manifestations of SCA6 are not specific, diagnosis is only confirmed with the finding of a mutation in the CACNA1A gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia, familial or sporadic hemiplegic migraine and episodic ataxia type 2.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA6 is inherited autosomal dominantly and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA6 and treatment is supportive. Acetazolamide may help with episodes of ataxia but does not halt the progression of the disease. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Dysphagia should be monitored to decrease the risk of aspiration pneumonia. In those with vertigo, vestibular suppressants may be beneficial. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is not reduced but the quality of life can be significantly affected. Mean age when aid walking needed is about 53 years, and mean age when wheelchair needed is approximately 60 years."}, {"name": "SCA7", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 7", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type II that is characterized by progressive ataxia, motor system abnormalities, dysarthria, dysphagia and retinal degeneration leading to progressive blindness.", "synonyms": "Ataxia with pigmentary retinopathy, Cerebellar syndrome-pigmentary maculopathy syndrome, SCA7, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "164500", "umls": "C0752125", "gard": "4955", "epidemiology": "The disorder is estimated worldwide prevalence is less than 1/100,000 and it is thought to account for 2-4% of all forms of the disease(up to 7% in Asian populations). Higher prevalence is described in some populations such as in Scandinavia or South Africa.", "clinical_description": "Onset of Spinocerebellar ataxia type 7 (SCA7) is generally in the second to fourth decade but can range from infancy to the sixth decade of life. Manifestations that present in infancy and early childhood include muscle weakness, wasting, hypotonia, poor feeding, failure to thrive and loss of motor milestones. Changes in visual acuity and color vision (tritanopia) may be the earliest signs of the disease, especially in younger-onset patients. In those where initial symptoms occur before adolescence, the disease progresses much faster and blindness can occur within a few years. In those with adult-onset disease, manifestations include dysmetria, poor coordination and dysdiadokinesia with progression into severe dysarthria, dysphagia and loss of motor control. Visual symptoms (hemeralopia, photophobia, abnormalities in color vision and central visual acuity) may precede, accompany or follow cerebellar ataxia in those with adult-onset SCA7 but progression is slower, with blindness occurring 10 or more years after initial symptom onset. Psychosis and cognitive decline has also been reported in some cases. Patients eventually become bedridden.", "etiology": "SCA7 is due to a CAG trinucleotide repeat in the ataxin 7 (ATXN7) gene (3p21.1-p12). This mutation leads to degeneration in the cells of the retina, cerebellum and brainstem. A larger CAG-repeat expansion is associated with an earlier onset and more severe disease course.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on characteristic clinical findings (progressive incoordination and cone-rod retinal dystrophy) as well as molecular genetic testing. A CAG trinucleotide expansion (usually 36 or more CAG repeats) in the ATXN7 gene confirms diagnosis of SCA7. Magnetic resonance imaging usually shows severe atrophy of the cerebellum and the brainstem. Electroretinogram testing reveals rod and cone abnormalities and fundoscopic examination shows macular changes later in the disease course.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include lipid storage diseases (such as neuronal ceroid lipofuscinosis) and Leber hereditary optic neuropathy. Other forms of ADCA should also be considered but can be excluded based on the absence of retinal degeneration, which is unique to SCA7.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known ATXN7 mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is inherited autosomal dominantly and genetic anticipation is observed. Genetic counseling can inform parents with the disease of the 50% risk of passing it on to their children.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA7 and treatment is supportive. Activity should be maintained as much as possible with the help of canes and walkers. Motorized chairs may eventually be necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices should be offered to those with dysarthria. UV exposure should be limited and sunglasses worn in order to limit damage to the retina. Low vision aids may also be beneficial. Ophthalmological follow-up is essential to monitor visual acuity. Dysphagia must also be monitored and a feeding tube may be required in those with advanced disease, in order to lower the risk of aspiration pneumonia (most common cause of death).", "prognosis": "The prognosis depends on the age of symptom onset. An earlier onset is associated with a more severe and rapidly progressive disease. Mean age when aid walking needed is about 35 years, and mean age when wheelchair needed is approximately 37 years."}, {"name": "SCA8", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 8", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 8 (SCA8) ist ein Subtyp des Typs I der Autosomal-dominanten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie (ADCA Typ I; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, durch gest\u00f6rte kognitive Funktionen bei fast dreiviertel der Patienten und durch Pyramidenzeichen und sensorische Ausf\u00e4lle bei etwa einem Drittel der Patienten.", "synonyms": "SCA8, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.2", "OMIM": "608768", "UMLS": "C1837454", "MeSH": "C537307", "GARD": "4956", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, aber die SCA8 macht etwa 3% der F\u00e4lle von ADCA aus.", "clinical_description": "Andere Symptome sind Handlungsst\u00f6rungen und meist auch psychiatrische Anomalien.", "etiology": "Ursache der SCA8 ist eine CTG-Repeat-Expansion im dem ATXN8-Gen (13q21) gegen\u00fcberliegenden DNA-Strang. Als pathogenetischer Mechanismus wird RNA- vermittelte Neurotoxizit\u00e4t angenommen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist relativ g\u00fcnstig: Die Krankheit ist \u00fcber Jahrzehnte nur langsam progredient, die Lebenserwartung ist nicht signifikant verringert.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, aber die SCA8 macht etwa 3% der F\u00e4lle von ADCA aus."}, {"name": "SCABD", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Blindheit-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive syndromic cerebellar ataxia characterized by the association of early-onset cerebellar ataxia with hearing loss and blindness. Patients may also present demyelinating peripheral motor neuropathy. Cerebral MRI shows alterations of the cerebellar white matter without cerebellar atrophy.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 3, Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia-blindness-hearing loss syndrome, SCABD, SCAR3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "271250", "umls": "C1849094", "gard": "9971"}, {"name": "SCADD", "sub_name": "Kurzketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Kurzketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase (SCAD)-Mangel ist eine sehr seltene St\u00f6rung der mitochondrialen Fetts\u00e4ureoxidation. Die klinische Auspr\u00e4gung reicht von symptomfreien Individuen (die Mehrzahl) bis zu Patienten mit Gedeihst\u00f6rung Muskelhypotonie, Kr\u00e4mpfen, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und progressiver Myopathie.", "synonyms": "ACADS-Mangel, SCAD-Mangel, SCADD, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E71.3", "OMIM": "201470", "MeSH": "C537596", "GARD": "4822", "epidemiology": "Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 50 Patienten beschrieben. In den Niederlanden betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt mindestens 1:50.000.", "clinical_description": "Die meisten im Neugeborenenscreening entdeckten Kinder mit SCAD-Mangel waren zum Zeitpunkt der Diagnose gesund, und die meisten blieben auch symptomfrei. Symptome der klinisch betroffenen Kinder waren Kr\u00e4mpfe, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung (versp\u00e4tetes Sitzen/ Laufen/ Sprechen/ soziale Interaktion), gest\u00f6rtes Wachstum mit schlechter Nahrungsaufnahme, in der Regel auch Muskelschw\u00e4che und -hypotonie.", "etiology": "Ursache des symptomatischen SCAD-Mangels sind Mutationen im ACADS (acyl-CoA dehydrogenase, C-2 to C-3 short chain)-Gen (12q24.31) und weitere, bisher nicht identifizierte ausl\u00f6sende Faktoren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Der SCAD-Mangel wird diagnostiziert durch den Nachweis (i) vermehrter Konzentrationen von Butyrylcarnitin (C4) im Plasma und/oder vermehrter Konzentrationen von Ethylmalons\u00e4ute (EMA) im Urin unter stressfreien Bedingungen (an mindestens 2 verschiedenen Zeitpunkten) und (ii) biallelischer ACADS-Mutationen oder der Suszeptibilit\u00e4ts-Haplotypen 511T-625G und 511C-625A. Durch das Neugeborenenscreening in \u00d6sterreich, Ungarn und Island werden vor allem symptomatische Patienten entdeckt. Symptomfreie Verwandte erf\u00fcllen die o.g. Kriterien des SCAD-Mangels.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind der Multiple Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase (MAD)-Mangel, die Ethylmalon-Enzephalopathie und eine akute Vergiftung mit der Akipflaume (Blighia sapida) (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist nicht relevant, da symptomatische und symptomfreie Familienmitglieder den gleichen SCAD-Genotyp haben.", "genetic_counseling": "Der SCAD-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die meisten Patienten sind symptomfrei und ben\u00f6tigen keine Behandlung. Einige symptomatische Patienten erhalten Riboflavin, folgen einer fettarmen und kohlenhydratreichen Di\u00e4t und vermeiden Fasten. Ene akute metabolische Azidose wird mit Gabe gro\u00dfer Mengen Traubenzucker (mit oder ohne Insulin) und durch iv-Infusion von Fl\u00fcssigkeit behandelt. In der antikonvulsivenr Behandlung von Kr\u00e4mpfen soll Valproat vermieden werden. Schwangere ben\u00f6tigen Kontrollen in Hinblick auf m\u00f6gliche Komplikationen (akute Fettleber und Pr\u00e4eklampsie; s. diese Termini). Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Verlaufskontrollen in einer Stoffwechselklinik betreffen den Status von Wachstum, Entwicklung und Ern\u00e4hrung.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose asymptomatischer Patienten ist g\u00fcnstig. Die Prognose von Patienten mit Symptomen ist unterschiedlich.", "summary": "Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 50 Patienten beschrieben. In den Niederlanden betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt mindestens 1:50.000."}, {"name": "SCAD-Mangel", "sub_name": "Kurzketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Kurzketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase (SCAD)-Mangel ist eine sehr seltene St\u00f6rung der mitochondrialen Fetts\u00e4ureoxidation. Die klinische Auspr\u00e4gung reicht von symptomfreien Individuen (die Mehrzahl) bis zu Patienten mit Gedeihst\u00f6rung Muskelhypotonie, Kr\u00e4mpfen, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und progressiver Myopathie.", "synonyms": "ACADS-Mangel, SCAD-Mangel, SCADD, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E71.3", "OMIM": "201470", "MeSH": "C537596", "GARD": "4822", "epidemiology": "Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 50 Patienten beschrieben. In den Niederlanden betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt mindestens 1:50.000.", "clinical_description": "Die meisten im Neugeborenenscreening entdeckten Kinder mit SCAD-Mangel waren zum Zeitpunkt der Diagnose gesund, und die meisten blieben auch symptomfrei. Symptome der klinisch betroffenen Kinder waren Kr\u00e4mpfe, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung (versp\u00e4tetes Sitzen/ Laufen/ Sprechen/ soziale Interaktion), gest\u00f6rtes Wachstum mit schlechter Nahrungsaufnahme, in der Regel auch Muskelschw\u00e4che und -hypotonie.", "etiology": "Ursache des symptomatischen SCAD-Mangels sind Mutationen im ACADS (acyl-CoA dehydrogenase, C-2 to C-3 short chain)-Gen (12q24.31) und weitere, bisher nicht identifizierte ausl\u00f6sende Faktoren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Der SCAD-Mangel wird diagnostiziert durch den Nachweis (i) vermehrter Konzentrationen von Butyrylcarnitin (C4) im Plasma und/oder vermehrter Konzentrationen von Ethylmalons\u00e4ute (EMA) im Urin unter stressfreien Bedingungen (an mindestens 2 verschiedenen Zeitpunkten) und (ii) biallelischer ACADS-Mutationen oder der Suszeptibilit\u00e4ts-Haplotypen 511T-625G und 511C-625A. Durch das Neugeborenenscreening in \u00d6sterreich, Ungarn und Island werden vor allem symptomatische Patienten entdeckt. Symptomfreie Verwandte erf\u00fcllen die o.g. Kriterien des SCAD-Mangels.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind der Multiple Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase (MAD)-Mangel, die Ethylmalon-Enzephalopathie und eine akute Vergiftung mit der Akipflaume (Blighia sapida) (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist nicht relevant, da symptomatische und symptomfreie Familienmitglieder den gleichen SCAD-Genotyp haben.", "genetic_counseling": "Der SCAD-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die meisten Patienten sind symptomfrei und ben\u00f6tigen keine Behandlung. Einige symptomatische Patienten erhalten Riboflavin, folgen einer fettarmen und kohlenhydratreichen Di\u00e4t und vermeiden Fasten. Ene akute metabolische Azidose wird mit Gabe gro\u00dfer Mengen Traubenzucker (mit oder ohne Insulin) und durch iv-Infusion von Fl\u00fcssigkeit behandelt. In der antikonvulsivenr Behandlung von Kr\u00e4mpfen soll Valproat vermieden werden. Schwangere ben\u00f6tigen Kontrollen in Hinblick auf m\u00f6gliche Komplikationen (akute Fettleber und Pr\u00e4eklampsie; s. diese Termini). Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Verlaufskontrollen in einer Stoffwechselklinik betreffen den Status von Wachstum, Entwicklung und Ern\u00e4hrung.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose asymptomatischer Patienten ist g\u00fcnstig. Die Prognose von Patienten mit Symptomen ist unterschiedlich.", "summary": "Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 50 Patienten beschrieben. In den Niederlanden betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt mindestens 1:50.000."}, {"name": "Scalenus-anticus-Syndrom, arterielles", "sub_name": "Thoracic-outlet-Syndrom, arterielles", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das arterielle Thoracic-outlet-Syndrom (ATOS) ist eine Form des Thoracic-outlet-Syndroms (TOS; siehe dort), dass sich mit einseitiger Isch\u00e4mie der oberen Extremit\u00e4ten manifestiert.", "synonyms": "ATOS, Arterielles TOS, Arterielles Thoracic-outlet-Kompressions-Syndrom, Halsrippensyndrom, arterielles, Hyperabduktionssyndrom, arterielles, Kostoklavikularsyndrom, arterielles, Scalenus-anticus-Syndrom, arterielles, ", "ICD-10": "G54.0", "UMLS": "C1956395", "epidemiology": "Die Inzidenz ist schwierig zu bestimmen, da es keine best\u00e4tigende Tests f\u00fcr TOS gibt. ATOS macht weniger als 1% aller F\u00e4lle von TOS aus.", "clinical_description": "ATOS tritt spontan bei Patienten aller Altersgruppen auf und manifestiert sich an der oberen Extremit\u00e4t mit Zeichen der Isch\u00e4mie (Schmerzen, Bl\u00e4sse, Gef\u00fchllosigkeit, K\u00e4lte, Claudicatio). Selten embolisieren Subclavia-Thromben retrograd und verursachen einen Schlaganfall.", "etiology": "Ursachen der ATOS-Symptome sind entweder die Kompression der Arteria subclavia (oft durch eine Halsrippe) oder Emboli. Die Kompression der A. subclavia f\u00fchrt zu pr\u00e4stenotischer Dilatation, Aneurysmabildung, turbulentem Blutfluss und Thrombus-Bildung.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose fu\u00dft auf der Anamnese mit Isch\u00e4mie, vermindertem distalen Puls oder vermindertem systolischem Blutdruck in der betroffenen Gliedma\u00dfe. Bei mehr als 90 % der Patienten findet man eine Halsrippe oder einen langen Halswirbel-Querfortsatz. Durch den Nachweis einer Stenose, eines Verschlusses oder Aneurysmas der Subclavia mit dynamischer Ultrasonographie, Magnetresonanz-Angiographie oder Arteriographie wird die Diagnose gest\u00fctzt. Hilfreich ist auch die Untersuchung mit provokativen Man\u00f6vern: Das Roos- Man\u00f6ver ist positiv, wenn der Patient nicht in der Lage ist, mehr als 3 Minuten die Arme bei gleichzeitigem \u00d6ffnen und Schlie\u00dfen der H\u00e4nde hochzuhalten; der Adson-Test ist positiv, wenn der Radialis-Puls verschwindet, w\u00e4hrend der Kopf nach tiefem Einatmen bei ausgestrecktem Hals zur Seite geneigt wird.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Ven\u00f6ses und neurogenes TOS (siehe diese Termini), periphere arterielle St\u00f6rung und andere Krankheiten mit eingeschr\u00e4nkter Arterienfunktion, z. B. Kompression durch einen Tumor. Ein ven\u00f6ses TOS kann durch ven\u00f6sen Ultraschall oder Magnetresonanz-Venographie ausgeschlossen werden. Das echte neurogene TOS wird als St\u00f6rung des Plexus brachialis am unteren Stamm manifest. Patienten mit Funktionsst\u00f6rung der peripheren Arterien haben arteriosklerotische Risikofaktoren. Andere externe Ursachen einer Kompression k\u00f6nnen durch entsprechende transversale Bildgebung ausgeschlossen werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die akute arterielle Isch\u00e4mie wird mit Thrombolyse oder Embolektomie behandelt. Bei Patienten mit Symptomen ist eine chirurgische Dekompression indiziert. Eventuell ist eine Rekonstruktion von Arterien erforderlich. Physiotherapie ist in der Regel nicht hilfreich.", "prognosis": "Durch Arterienverschluss ist der Erhalt der Gliedma\u00dfe gef\u00e4hrdet, durch angemessene Behandlung erreichen aber die meisten Patienten ihre volle Funktionsf\u00e4higkeit zur\u00fcck. Bei ATOS wird in 91% der F\u00e4lle durch die Dekompression ein vollst\u00e4ndiges Sistieren der Symptome erreicht.", "summary": "Die Inzidenz ist schwierig zu bestimmen, da es keine best\u00e4tigende Tests f\u00fcr TOS gibt. ATOS macht weniger als 1% aller F\u00e4lle von TOS aus."}, {"name": "Scalenus-anticus-Syndrom, ven\u00f6ses", "sub_name": "Thoracic-outlet-Syndrom, ven\u00f6ses", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das ven\u00f6se Thoracic-outlet-Syndrom (VTOS) ist eine Form des Thoracic-outlet-Syndroms (TOS; siehe dort), das mit einseitigen (selten beidseitigen) Schmerzen und Zyanose der Arme manifest wird.", "synonyms": "Effort-Subclaviathrombose, Halsrippensyndrom, ven\u00f6ses, Hyperabduktionssyndrom, ven\u00f6ses, Kostoklavikularsyndrom, ven\u00f6ses, Paget-Schrotter-Krankheit, Paget-von-Schroetter-Syndrom, Scalenus-anticus-Syndrom, ven\u00f6ses, VTOS, Ven\u00f6ses TOS, Ven\u00f6ses Thoracic-outlet-Kompressions-Syndrom, ", "ICD-10": "G54.0", "UMLS": "C1956396", "epidemiology": "Die Sch\u00e4tzung der Inzidenz ist wegen des Mangels eines best\u00e4tigenden Tests f\u00fcr TOS schwierig. Das VTOS macht 2-3% aller F\u00e4lle von TOS aus.", "clinical_description": "Das VTOS tritt bei jungen Erwachsenen auf, in der Regel nach exzessiver Belastung der Arme. Charakteristische, durch ven\u00f6se Obstruktion verursachte Symptome an den Armen sind Schwellung, Zyanose, Schmerzen und leichte Par\u00e4sthesien. Nacken- und Kopfschmerzen sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Der Unterarm ermattet bei Belastung innerhalb von Minuten. Oft sind \u00fcber der Schulter und am oberen Thorax subkutane Venen sichtbar.", "etiology": "Repetitive Armbewegungen und Kompression der Vena subclavia am Hals (zwischen Schl\u00fcsselbein und 1. Rippe) verursachen die Bildung von Narbengewebe, das durch Einengung der Gef\u00e4\u00dfe zur Thrombose pr\u00e4disponieren kann.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die Befunde am Arm: Schwellung, Zyanose und erweiterte oberfl\u00e4chlichen Venen. R\u00f6ntgenologisch k\u00f6nnen die Ursachen einer Kompression erkannt werden, ein verl\u00e4ngerter C7-Querfortsatz oder eine anomale 1. Rippe. Die Diagnose wird unterst\u00fctzt durch den Nachweis einer Stenose oder Okklusion der Vena subclavia mittels dynamischer Ultrasonographie oder Venographie mittels MRI oder CT. Hilfreich ist auch die Untersuchung mit provokativen Man\u00f6vern: Das Roos- Man\u00f6ver ist positiv, wenn der Patient nicht in der Lage ist, mehr als 3 Minuten die Arme bei gleichzeitigem \u00d6ffnen und Schlie\u00dfen der H\u00e4nde hochzuhalten; der Adson-Test ist positiv, wenn der Radialis-Puls verschwindet, w\u00e4hrend der Kopf nach tiefem Einatmen bei ausgestrecktem Hals zur Seite geneigt wird.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind das arterielle (ATOS) und neurogene TOS (NTOS) (siehe diese Termini), die klinisch differenziert werden. Das ATOS, das sich als durch Kompression oder Thrombose der Arteria subclavia verursachte Isch\u00e4mie manifestiert, kann durch Magnetresonanz-Angiographie ausgeschlossen werden. Das echte NTOS, das sich in der Regel als St\u00f6rung des Plexus brachialis am unteren Stamm manifestiert, wird elektrodiagnostisch oder durch MRI diagnostiziert. Auch an ven\u00f6se Obstruktion durch Tumoren und angeborene Anomalien und an tiefe Armvenenthrombose muss gedacht werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Im akuten Stadium werden die Patienten zun\u00e4chst thrombolytisch behandelt. Danach folgt die chirurgische Dekompression (Resektion der 1. Rippe, L\u00f6sung des Pectoralis minor oder Scalenektomie (Spaltung oder Resektion von Teilen des M. scalenus)), um die Zahl von Rezidiven zu verringern. Gesch\u00e4digte Venen werden angioplastisch oder mit chirurgischem Bypass repariert. Im chronischen Stadium, wenn der Arm geschwollen ist und sich schwer anf\u00fchlt, die Vena subclavia aber durchg\u00e4ngig ist, wird chirurgische Dekompression, Angioplastik oder Gef\u00e4\u00dfrekonstruktion empfohlen. Physiotherapie ist f\u00fcr die Behandlung des VTOS in der Regel nur bei weniger schweren F\u00e4llen von Nutzen.", "prognosis": "Bei erfolgreicher Thrombolyse und nachfolgender chirurgischer Dekompression sind nach 5 Jahren noch mehr als 95% der Venen offen, residuale \u00d6deme k\u00f6nnen aber die Funktion einschr\u00e4nken.", "summary": "Die Sch\u00e4tzung der Inzidenz ist wegen des Mangels eines best\u00e4tigenden Tests f\u00fcr TOS schwierig. Das VTOS macht 2-3% aller F\u00e4lle von TOS aus."}, {"name": "SCALP-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "SCALP syndrome is a rare skin disease characterized by the association of sebaceous nevus and aplasia cutis congenita (usually on the scalp and face) in conjunction with limbal dermoid of the eye, a giant congenital melanocytic nevus and variable central nervous system abnormalities, including seizures, hydrocephalus, neurocutaneous melanosis, arachnoid cysts, and diffuse unilateral hemisphere enlargement.", "synonyms": "Sebaceous nevus-CNS malformations-aplasia cutis congenital-limbal dermoid-pigmented nevus syndrome, Sebaceous nevus-central nervous system malformations-aplasia cutis congenital-limbal dermoid-pigmented nevus syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q84.8"}, {"name": "SCAN1", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re mit axonaler Neuropathie, Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit axonaler Neuropathie Typ 1 ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte neurologische Erkrankung, die durch einen sp\u00e4tkindlichen Beginn einer langsam fortschreitenden zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie gekennzeichnet ist. Zu den Erstmanifestationen geh\u00f6ren Schw\u00e4che und Atrophie der distalen Extremit\u00e4tenmuskulatur, Areflexie und Verlust von Schmerz-, Vibrations- und Ber\u00fchrungsempfindungen in den oberen und unteren Extremit\u00e4ten. Mit fortschreitender Erkrankung entwickeln sich Blicknystagmus, zerebell\u00e4re Dysarthrie, periphere Neuropathie, staksiger Gang und Pes cavus. Eine Atrophie des Kleinhirns (insbesondere des Vermis) ist bei allen betroffenen Personen vorhanden. Weitere berichtete Manifestationen sind Krampfanf\u00e4lle, leichte Hirnatrophie, leichte Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie und grenzwertige Hypoalbumin\u00e4mie.", "synonyms": "SCAN1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G60.2", "OMIM": "607250", "UMLS": "C1846574", "GARD": "10000"}, {"name": "SCAN 2", "sub_name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit axonaler Neuropathie Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia (ARCA), characterized by progressive cerebellar ataxia associated with frequent oculomotor apraxia, severe neuropathy and an elevated serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level.", "synonyms": "AOA2, Ataxia-oculomotor apraxia type 2, SCAN 2, SCAR1, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "G60.2", "omim": "606002\u00a0 615217", "gard": "12860", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of AOA2 in France is estimated to be 1/900,000.", "clinical_description": "AOA2 is mostly an adolescent onset disorder (age at onset ranges between 10 and 25 years), with a mean age of 14-15 years, that manifests as progressive cerebellar ataxia associated with peripheral neuropathy (98%), cerebellar atrophy (96%), occasional oculomotor apraxia (OMA; 51%; inability to coordinate eyes \u00b1 head movements: when the head turns toward a lateral target; the head reaches the target before the eyes), pyramidal signs (21%), head tremor (14%), dystonia (14%), strabismus (12%), chorea (10%) and saccadic pursuit without OMA (4.5%).", "etiology": "AOA2 results from mutations in SETX gene (9q34), encoding senataxin protein, a DNA/RNA helicase localized in nucleus which is implicated in DNA break repair. Some correlations between genotype and phenotype have been established for example deletions and nonsense mutations are correlated to more severe phenotypes than missense mutations. Mutations in the gene PIK3R5 (17p13.1) have also been implicated in the pathogenesis of AOA2. PIK3R5 encodes a regulatory subunit that interacts with class 1B phosphoinositide-3-kinase (key enzymes in various signal transduction pathways that regulate cell survival and growth, metabolism, immune, and cardiac functions).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical features, progressive evolution leading to important motor handicap, absence of extra-neurologic findings and family history. Laboratory findings show an elevated AFP serum level (above 7 \u00b5g/L). Electromyography findings reveal axonal sensory-motor neuropathy. Oculographic recordings can demonstrate OMA. Cerebral magnetic resonance imagery displays cerebellar atrophy. Diagnosis is confirmed by molecular analysis of the pathogenic gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Friedreich ataxia, ataxia with vitamin E deficiency, AOA1, ataxia-telangiectasia, ataxia-telangiectasia-like disorder, autosomal recessive spastic ataxia of Charlevoix-Saguenay.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Carrier testing for at-risk family members and prenatal testing are possible if the disease-causing alleles in a family are known.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission of AOA2 is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling is recommended as each sib of an affected individual has 25% risk of being affected, 50% risk of being an asymptomatic carrier, and 25% risk of being neither affected nor a carrier.", "management_and_treatment": "No specific treatment exists for AOA2 and management is mainly supportive. It includes physical therapy for cerebellar ataxia and disabilities resulting from peripheral neuropathy; educational support for reading and writing difficulties, speech therapy for dysarthria and cognitive impairment. Routine follow-up with a neurologist or a neurogenetician is recommended.", "prognosis": "AOA2 is a progressive neurodegenerative disorder and most patients will become wheelchair bound at a mean age of 29.9 years \u00b1 3.84 after a mean disease duration of 15.3 years \u00b1 3.52."}, {"name": "SCAP", "sub_name": "Syringocystadenoma papilliferum", "german_description": "Das Syringocystadenoma papilliferum (SP) ist ein Hamartom der Haut, das sich vermutlich von den apokrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen herleitet oder seltener von den ekkrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen. Es ist eine au\u00dferordentlich seltene Neoplasie. Das SP ist entweder schon bei der Geburt vorhanden, oder es entwickelt sich im Kleinkindalter, in der Pubert\u00e4t oder sp\u00e4ter im Leben. Es wurden 3 klinische Typen beschrieben: (i) Der Plaque-Typ manifestiert sich als haarloses Areal auf der Kopfhaut, oft in Verbindung mit einem Naevus sebaceus Jadassohn, aber auch isoliert. (ii) Der lineare Typ tritt meist am Hals oder im Gesicht auf. (iii) Der solit\u00e4re nodul\u00e4re Typ tritt bevorzugt am Stamm auf. H\u00e4ufig ist das SP mit Hamartomen assoziiert, die ihren Usprung in Follikelzellen oder Talgdr\u00fcsen haben. In etwa einem Drittel der F\u00e4lle ist das SP mit einem Naevus sebaceus assoziiert. Bei bis zu 10% der F\u00e4lle tritt ein Basalzell-Karzinom auf. Sehr viel seltener sind Plattenepithelkarzinome und verruk\u00f6se und duktale Karzinome. Die klinische Verdachtsdiagnose wird histologisch best\u00e4tigt. Wenn immer m\u00f6glich ist, wegen des Risikos einer malignen Entartung, eine prophylaktische chirurgische Resektion anzuraten. Eine komplette chirurgische Exzision mit sorgf\u00e4ltiger histologischer Kontrolle ist die Therapie der Wahl. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-malignant adnexal neoplasm that originates from the apocrine or eccrine sweat glands and is characterized histologically by cystic, papillary, and ductal invaginations into the dermis lined by double-layered outer cuboidal and luminal high columnar epithelium and connected to the epidermis. Dilated capillaries and a dense infiltrate of plasma cells are characteristic. Clinically, lesions are asymptomatic with a heterogeneous, non-distinctive appearance ranging from skin-colored to pink papules or plaques, occurring most commonly in the head and neck area.", "synonyms": "Fistulous vegetative verrucous hydradenoma, Naevus syringocystadenomatosus papilliferus, Papillary syringocystadenoma, SCAP, Syringadenoma papilliferum, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Neonatal, Infancy, Adolescent", "icd_10": "D23.9", "umls": "C0406803", "gard": "5100", "meddra": "10042926", "epidemiology": "To date, approximately 730 cases have been reported in the literature. The condition has been reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Syringocystadenoma papilliferum (SCAP) may be present at birth (50% of cases) or develop around puberty (15-30% of cases). SCAP typically presents as slow developing, non-specific, smooth, skin-colored to pink papule, verruca or nodule, which may be exudative. It may also be seen as hairless plaques, smooth or raised, usually less than 4 cm in diameter, skin-colored to brown. It is rarely pigmented. In the majority of cases, it is asymptomatic, but it may grow progressively and has been occasionally associated with pruritus, pain, and/or bleeding. Three clinical types have been described: the plaque type, the linear type and the solitary nodular type. The plaque type usually presents as an alopecia plaque on the scalp which may increase in size at puberty and often transforms to nodular or verrucous lesions. The linear type consists of multiple pink to reddish, firm papules or umbilicated nodules, 1-10 mm in diameter, and is extremely rare. The solitary type includes dome-shaped, pedunculated nodules, 5-10 mm in diameter, with a predilection for the trunk, shoulder and axillae. Rarely, segmental variants are found. In 75% of cases, SCAP is located on the head or cervical region and less frequent in other regions, or on a postoperative scar. SCAP develops in existing nevus sebaceous in about one-third of cases, 10% of which are associated with he development of basal cell carcinoma and more rarely other carcinomas. SCAP can also be associated with other benign lesions. Transition to malignancy is rare but, possible. Syringocystadenocarcinoma papilliferum is the malignant counterpart to this lesion and may develop in a long-standing case of SCAP.", "etiology": "The etiology of SCAP has not been elucidated. It seems to arise from the pluripotent cells with the potential to exhibit either apocrine or eccrine lineage, although apocrine differentiation is more common. The pathogenesis of SCAP remains unclear although, both in sporadic cases and lesions arising in nevus sebaceous, the human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA and mutations in the RAS/mitogen-activated protein kinase signaling pathway have been detected. BRAF V600E mutation or activating mutations in HRAS (or in one case KRAS) have been reported in sporadic forms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation of non-distinctive lesions and confirmed on biopsy showing the characteristic histology. Immunohistochemically, the tumor cells stains positively for carcinoembryonic antigen. Dermatoscopy is not diagnostic.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis is broad, requiring histological confirmation of cases. The main diagnostic issue is the distinction of SCAP from hidradenoma papilliferum. Other conditions to be considered include basal cell carcinoma, cutaneous lymphoma, factitious dermatitis, viral warts, subcutaneous fungal infection, linear verrucous nevus, pyogenic granuloma, warty dyskeratoma, inverted follicular keratosis, as well as eccrine nevus, nevus comedonicus, cylindroma, and basaloid follicular hamartoma.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment involves complete surgical excision. However, recurrence is common. Carbon dioxide laser treatment can be useful for lesions in anatomic areas not favorable for excision and grafting. SCAP has also been successfully treated with Mohs micrograhic surgery.", "prognosis": "The condition is mostly benign but extensive lesions may have an impact on quality of life and transformation to malignancy cannot be ruled out."}, {"name": "Scapulo-peroneale Muskeldystrophie, MYH7-abh\u00e4ngige, sp\u00e4t beginnende Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "MYH7-abh\u00e4ngige sp\u00e4t beginnende SPMD, MYH7-abh\u00e4ngiges scapuloperoneales Syndrom mit sp\u00e4tem Beginn, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G71.0", "OMIM": "181430", "GARD": "10313", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SCAR1", "sub_name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit axonaler Neuropathie Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia (ARCA), characterized by progressive cerebellar ataxia associated with frequent oculomotor apraxia, severe neuropathy and an elevated serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level.", "synonyms": "AOA2, Ataxia-oculomotor apraxia type 2, SCAN 2, SCAR1, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "G60.2", "omim": "606002\u00a0 615217", "gard": "12860", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of AOA2 in France is estimated to be 1/900,000.", "clinical_description": "AOA2 is mostly an adolescent onset disorder (age at onset ranges between 10 and 25 years), with a mean age of 14-15 years, that manifests as progressive cerebellar ataxia associated with peripheral neuropathy (98%), cerebellar atrophy (96%), occasional oculomotor apraxia (OMA; 51%; inability to coordinate eyes \u00b1 head movements: when the head turns toward a lateral target; the head reaches the target before the eyes), pyramidal signs (21%), head tremor (14%), dystonia (14%), strabismus (12%), chorea (10%) and saccadic pursuit without OMA (4.5%).", "etiology": "AOA2 results from mutations in SETX gene (9q34), encoding senataxin protein, a DNA/RNA helicase localized in nucleus which is implicated in DNA break repair. Some correlations between genotype and phenotype have been established for example deletions and nonsense mutations are correlated to more severe phenotypes than missense mutations. Mutations in the gene PIK3R5 (17p13.1) have also been implicated in the pathogenesis of AOA2. PIK3R5 encodes a regulatory subunit that interacts with class 1B phosphoinositide-3-kinase (key enzymes in various signal transduction pathways that regulate cell survival and growth, metabolism, immune, and cardiac functions).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical features, progressive evolution leading to important motor handicap, absence of extra-neurologic findings and family history. Laboratory findings show an elevated AFP serum level (above 7 \u00b5g/L). Electromyography findings reveal axonal sensory-motor neuropathy. Oculographic recordings can demonstrate OMA. Cerebral magnetic resonance imagery displays cerebellar atrophy. Diagnosis is confirmed by molecular analysis of the pathogenic gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Friedreich ataxia, ataxia with vitamin E deficiency, AOA1, ataxia-telangiectasia, ataxia-telangiectasia-like disorder, autosomal recessive spastic ataxia of Charlevoix-Saguenay.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Carrier testing for at-risk family members and prenatal testing are possible if the disease-causing alleles in a family are known.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission of AOA2 is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling is recommended as each sib of an affected individual has 25% risk of being affected, 50% risk of being an asymptomatic carrier, and 25% risk of being neither affected nor a carrier.", "management_and_treatment": "No specific treatment exists for AOA2 and management is mainly supportive. It includes physical therapy for cerebellar ataxia and disabilities resulting from peripheral neuropathy; educational support for reading and writing difficulties, speech therapy for dysarthria and cognitive impairment. Routine follow-up with a neurologist or a neurogenetician is recommended.", "prognosis": "AOA2 is a progressive neurodegenerative disorder and most patients will become wheelchair bound at a mean age of 29.9 years \u00b1 3.84 after a mean disease duration of 15.3 years \u00b1 3.52."}, {"name": "SCAR10", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia disease characterized by adulthood-onset of slowly progressive spinocerebellar ataxia, manifesting with gait and appendicular ataxia, dysarthria, ocular movement anomalies (e.g. horizontal, vertical, and/or downbeat nystagmus, hypermetric saccades), increased deep tendon reflexes and progressive cognitive decline. Additional variable features may include proximal leg muscle wasting and fasciculations, pes cavus, inspiratory stridor, epilepsy, retinal degeneration and cataracts. Brain imaging reveals marked cerebellar atrophy and electromyography shows evidence of lower motor neuron involvement.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 10, SCAR10, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "613728"}, {"name": "SCAR11", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-psychomotorische Retardierung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, hereditary, cerebellar ataxia disorder characterized by late-onset spinocerebellar ataxia, manifesting with slowly progressive gait disturbances, dysarthria, limb and truncal ataxia, and smooth-pursuit eye movement disturbance, associated with a history of psychomotor delay from childhood. Mild atrophy of the cerebellar vermis and hemispheres is observed on brain imaging.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 11, SCAR11, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "614229"}, {"name": "SCAR12", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie - Epilepsie - Intelligenzminderung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia-epilepsy-intellectual disability syndrome characterized by early-childhood onset of cerebellar ataxia associated with generalized tonic-clonic epilepsy and psychomotor development delay, dysarthria, gaze-evoked nystagmus and learning disability. Other features in some patients include upper motor neuron signs with leg spasticity and extensor plantar responses, and mild cerebellar atrophy on brain MRI.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 12, SCAR12, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "614322"}, {"name": "SCAR13", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive kongenitale zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie durch MGLUR1-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessiv vererbte kongenitale Kleinhirnataxie aufgrund eines MGLUR1-Mangels ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte, langsam fortschreitende neurodegenerative Erkrankung, die durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung (beginnend im S\u00e4uglingsalter), eine leichte bis schwere Intelligenzminderung mit schlechtem oder fehlendem Sprachverm\u00f6gen, m\u00e4\u00dfige bis schwere Ataxie des Standes und des Ganges, pyramidale Zeichen (z. B. Hyperreflexie) und leichte Dysdiadochokinese, Dysmetrie, Tremor und/oder Dysarthrie gekennzeichnet ist. Okulomotorische Zeichen wie Nystagmus, Strabismus, Ptose und hypometrische Sakkaden k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls auftreten. Die Bildgebung des Gehirns zeigt eine progressive, generalisierte, m\u00e4\u00dfige bis schwere Kleinhirnatrophie, eine inferiore Vermis-Hypoplasie und/oder ein konstitutionell kleines Gehirn.", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 13, Autosomal-rezessive kongenitale zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie durch metabotropen Glutamatrezeptor 1-Mangel, SCAR13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "614831"}, {"name": "SCAR14", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Spectrin-assoziierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive Kleinhirnataxie ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte neurologische Erkrankung, die auf SPTBN2-Mutationen zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren ist. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung im S\u00e4uglingsalter, gefolgt von einer im Kindesalter auftretenden Gangataxie mit Dysmetrie der Gliedma\u00dfen und Dysdiadochokinese, leichte bis schwere Intelligenzminderung, Entwicklung einer Kleinhirnatrophie und abnorme Augenbewegungen (einschlie\u00dflich eines konvergenten Schielens, hypometrischer Sakkaden, ruckartiger Verfolgungsbewegungen und unvollst\u00e4ndigem Bewegungsumfang).", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 14, Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie - kognitive St\u00f6rung, SCAR14, SPARCA, SPARCA1, Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 1, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Beginn im Kindesalter und psychomotorischer Retardierung, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "615386"}, {"name": "SCAR15", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Epilepsie-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom durch RUBCN-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An extremely rare, autosomal recessive, hereditary cerebellar ataxia disorder characterized by early onset of progressive, mild to moderate gait and limb ataxia, moderate to severe dysarthria, and nystagmus or saccadic pursuit, frequently associated with epilepsy, moderate intellectual disability, delayed speech acquisition, and hyporeflexia in the upper extremities. Hyperreflexia in the lower extremities may also be associated.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 15, SCAR15, Salih ataxia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "615705"}, {"name": "SCAR16", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, durch STUB1-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hereditary ataxia characterized by progressive truncal and limb ataxia resulting in gait instability. Dysarthria, dysphagia, nystagmus, spasticity of the lower limbs, mild peripheral sensory neuropathy, cognitive impairment and accelerated ageing have also been associated.", "synonyms": "SCAR16, Spinocerebellar ataxia autosomal recessive type 16, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "615768"}, {"name": "SCAR17", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, durch CWF19L1-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia characterized by early onset of slowly progressive cerebellar atrophy, clinically manifesting with extremity and truncal ataxia, global developmental delay, intellectual impairment, nystagmus, dysarthria, intention tremor, and pyramidal signs, among others.", "synonyms": "SCAR17, Spinocerebellar ataxia autosomal recessive type 17, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "616127"}, {"name": "SCAR18", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie durch GRID2-Mangel, autosomal-rezessive kongenitale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessiv vererbte kongenitale Kleinhirnataxie aufgrund eines GRID2-Mangels ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte, langsam fortschreitende neurodegenerative Erkrankung, die gekennzeichnet ist durch motorische, sprachliche und kognitive Verz\u00f6gerungen, Hypotonie, trunkale und appendikul\u00e4re Ataxie und Augenbewegungsanomalien (tonischer Aufblick, Nystagmus, okulomotorische Apraxie). Ein Intentionstremor kann ebenfalls assoziiert sein. Die Bildgebung des Gehirns zeigt eine fortschreitende Atrophie des Kleinhirns, wobei die Flocculi besonders betroffen ist.", "synonyms": "Autosomal-rezessive kongenitale zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie durch ionotropen Glutamatrezeptor delta-2-Untereinheiten-Mangel, SCAR18, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "616204"}, {"name": "SCAR19", "sub_name": "Ataxie-Taubheit-Syndrom, progressives, autosomal-rezessives", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by severe progressive sensorineural hearing loss and progressive cerebellar signs including gait ataxia, action tremor, dysmetria, dysdiadochokinesis, dysarthria, and nystagmus. Absence of deep tendon reflexes has also been reported. Age of onset is between infancy and adolescence. Brain imaging may show variable cerebellar atrophy in some patients.", "synonyms": "Lichtenstein-Knorr syndrome, Progressive autosomal recessive ataxia-sensorineural hearing loss syndrome, SCAR19, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "616291"}, {"name": "SCAR2", "sub_name": "Zerebello-parenchymale Krankheit, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Krankheiten mit prim\u00e4rer Beteiligung des Kleinhirnparenchyms werden in 6 Formen aufgeteilt. Bei der Zerebello-parenchymalen Erkrankung Typ III ist die Ataxie angeboren und nicht progredient. Zerebell\u00e4re Symptome sind unkoordinierter Gang und schlechte Koordination der H\u00e4nde, der Sprache und der Augenbewegungen. Weiterhin haben die Patienten neben anderen neurologischen und nicht-neurologischen Zeichen von Geburt an eine geistige Retardierung und Muskelhypotonie. MRI und CT zeigen eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Atrophie von Kleinhirnwurm und Kleinhirnhemisph\u00e4ren. Histologisch besteht ein schwerer Mangel an K\u00f6rnerzellen und eine Heterotopie von Purkinje-Zellen. In den wenigen bisher beschriebenen Familien war die Vererbung autosomal-rezessiv. In 1 Familie war die zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Albinismus assoziiert. Der prim\u00e4re biochemische Defekt ist noch unbekannt. Bisher besteht die Behandlung in fr\u00fch beginnender Betreuung, intensiver Sprachtherapie und angemessener Stimulation und Training. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "The disorders involving primarily the cerebellar parenchyma have been classified into six forms. In cerebelloparenchymal disorder III, cerebellar ataxia is congenital (non-progressive) and characterized by cerebellar symptoms such as incoordination of gait often associated with poor coordination of hands, speech and eye movements. The other features are congenital mental retardation and hypotonia, in addition to other neurological and non-neurological features. MRI or CT scan show marked atrophy of the vermis and hemispheres. A severe loss of granule cells with heterotopic Purkinje cells is observed. The mode of inheritance in the few reported families is autosomal recessive. In one family, cerebellar ataxia was associated to albinism.: In a large inbred Lebanese family the disease locus was assigned to a 12.1-cM interval on chromosome 9q34-qter between markers D9S67 and D9S312. The primary biochemical defect remains unknown. Up to now, the only treatment has consisted in early interventional therapies including intensive speech therapy and adequate stimulation and/or training.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 2, SCAR2, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Childhood, Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.0", "omim": "213200", "umls": "C1859298", "gard": "1199"}, {"name": "SCAR20", "sub_name": "Intelligenzminderung-grobe Gesichtssz\u00fcge-Makrozephalie-zerebell\u00e4re Hypoplasie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Intellectual disability-coarse face-macrocephaly-cerebellar hypotrophy syndrome is a rare, genetic, central nervous system malformation syndrome characterized by early-onset, progressive, severe cerebellar ataxia associated with progressive, moderate to severe intellectual disability, global developmental delay, progressively coarsening facial features, relative macrocephaly and absence of seizures. Sensorineural hearing loss may be associated. Neuroimaging reveals cerebellar atrophy/hypoplasia.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 20, Intellectual disability-coarse face-macrocephaly-cerebellar hypoplasia syndrome, SCAR20, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "616354"}, {"name": "SCAR21", "sub_name": "Akutes infantiles Leberversagen-zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-periphere sensomotorische Neuropathie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive axonal hereditary motor and sensory neuropathy characterized by infantile onset of recurrent episodes of acute liver failure (resulting in chronic liver fibrosis and hepatosplenomegaly), delayed motor development, cerebellar dysfunction presenting as gait disturbances and intention tremor, neurogenic stuttering, and motor and sensory neuropathy with muscle weakness especially in the lower legs, and numbness. Mild intellectual disability was reported in some patients. MRI of the brain shows non-progressive atrophy of the cerebellar vermis and thinning of the optic nerve.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 21, SCAR21, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.0", "omim": "616719"}, {"name": "SCAR23", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Epilepsie-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom durch TUD-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hereditary ataxia characterized by an early onset symptomatic generalized epilepsy, progressive cerebellar ataxia resulting in significant difficulties to walk or wheelchair dependency, and intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "SCAR23, Spinocerebellar ataxia autosomal recessive type 23, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "616949"}, {"name": "SCAR3", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Blindheit-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive syndromic cerebellar ataxia characterized by the association of early-onset cerebellar ataxia with hearing loss and blindness. Patients may also present demyelinating peripheral motor neuropathy. Cerebral MRI shows alterations of the cerebellar white matter without cerebellar atrophy.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 3, Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia-blindness-hearing loss syndrome, SCABD, SCAR3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "271250", "umls": "C1849094", "gard": "9971"}, {"name": "SCAR4", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene heredit\u00e4re Ataxie, die durch eine progressive Kleinhirnataxie gekennzeichnet ist, die mit einer St\u00f6rung der visuellen Fixation durch sakkadische Intrusionen (\u00fcberschie\u00dfende horizontale Sakkaden mit makroakkadischen Oszillationen und erh\u00f6hter Geschwindigkeit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Sakkaden) einhergeht. Die Patienten zeigen eine progressive Gang-, Rumpf- und Extremit\u00e4tenataxie mit Pyramidenbahnzeichen (erh\u00f6hte Sehnenreflexe und Babinski-Zeichen), myoklonischen Zuckungen, Faszikulationen, zerebell\u00e4rer Dysarthrie, sensomotorischer axonaler Neuropathie mit beeintr\u00e4chtigter Gelenkstellung, gest\u00f6rter Vibrations-, Temperatur- und Schmerzempfindung, Pes cavus und sakkadischen Intrusionen mit charakteristischen \u00fcberschie\u00dfenden horizontalen Sakkaden, makroakkadischen Oszillationen und erh\u00f6hter Geschwindigkeit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Sakkaden, ohne andere Augenbewegungsst\u00f6rungen.", "synonyms": "SCAR4, SCASI, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "607317", "UMLS": "C1846492", "GARD": "4952"}, {"name": "SCAR5", "sub_name": "CAMOS-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das CAMOS-Syndrom (cerebellar ataxia, mental retardation, optic atrophy, skin abnormalities) ist gekennzeichnet durch nicht-progrediente kongenitale Ataxie, schwere geistige Behinderung, Optikusatrophie und strukturelle Anomalien der Hautgef\u00e4\u00dfe. Es wurde bei 5 Kindern aus einer gro\u00dfen konsanguinen libanesischen Familie beschrieben. Weitere Symptome waren Kleinwuchs und Mikrozephalie. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A disorder that is characterised by the association of a non-progressive congenital ataxia, severe intellectual deficit, optic atrophy and structural anomalies of the skin vessels. It has been described in five children from a large consanguineous Lebanese family. Short stature and microcephaly were also reported. Transmission is autosomal recessive.", "synonyms": "Cerebellar ataxia-intellectual disability-optic atrophy-skin abnormalities syndrome, SCAR5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "606937", "umls": "C1847114", "gard": "9977"}, {"name": "SCAR6", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, infantile, nicht-progressive", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia disease characterized by nonprogressive cerebellar ataxia, with onset in infancy, manifesting with delayed motor and speech development, gait ataxia, dysmetria, hypotonia, increased deep tendon reflexes, and dysarthria. Additional variable manifestations include moderate nystagmus on lateral gaze, mild spasticity, intention tremor, short stature and pes planus. Brain imaging reveals cerebellar vermis atrophy.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 6, SCAR6, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G11.0", "omim": "608029", "umls": "C1842676", "gard": "4954"}, {"name": "SCAR7", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Beginn in der Kindheit, langsam fortschreitend", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia disease characterized by slowly progressive spinocerebellar ataxia developing during childhood, manifesting with gait and limb ataxia, postural tremor, dysarthria, sensory alterations (e.g. decreased vibration sense), eye movement anomalies (i.e. nystagmus, saccadic pursuit, oculomotor apraxia), upper and lower limb fasciculations, and hyperreflexia with Babinski signs. Brain imaging reveals cerebellar, pontine, vermian and medullar atrophy.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spinocerebellar ataxia type 7, SCAR7, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "609270", "umls": "C1836474", "gard": "12232"}, {"name": "SCAR8", "sub_name": "Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ Beauce", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch eine langsam progrediente reine Kleinhirn-Ataxie mit Dysarthrie. Es wurde bei 53 Personen aus 26 Familien mit kanadischer Herkunft beschrieben. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Durch Positionsklonierung wurde als urs\u00e4chliches Gen  ('synaptic nuclear envelope protein 1') in der Chromosomenregion 6q25 mit 5 verschiedenen homozygoten Mutationen identifiziert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare disorder characterised by a slowly progressive pure cerebellar ataxia associated with dysarthria. It has been described in 53 individuals from 26 families of Canadian origin. The mode of transmission is autosomal recessive. Positional cloning has led to the identification of several  gene mutations.", "synonyms": "ARCA1, Autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia type 1, SCAR8, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "610743", "umls": "C1853116\u00a0 C3683483", "gard": "12234"}, {"name": "SCAR9", "sub_name": "Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, durch Ubiquinon-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "ARCA2, Ataxie durch Coenzym Q(10)-Mangel, Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, 9, SCAR9, Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, rezessive, 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "612016\u00a0 619028", "UMLS": "C2677589", "GARD": "10294", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch in der Kindheit beginnende progrediente Ataxie und Kleinhirnatrophie. Die Progredienz ist nicht bekannt. M\u00f6gliche weitere Symptome sind Belastungsintoleranz mit erh\u00f6hten Laktatspiegeln und leichtes intellektuelles Defizit. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache ist ein Ubiquinon-Mangel, bedingt durch Mutationen im CABC1-Gen (1q42), von dem bereits bekannt war, dass es in der Hefe an der Ubiquinon-Biosynthese beteiligt ist. "}, {"name": "SCARF-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das SCARF-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch das gemeinsame Auftreten von Skelettanomalien, Cutis laxa, Kraniostenose, intermedi\u00e4rem (ambiguous) Genitale, psychomotorischer Retardierung und fazialen Dysmorphien. Bisher wurde es bei 2 \u00fcber ihre M\u00fctter verwandten Cousins I\u00b0 beschrieben. Es wird deshalb X-chromosomale Vererbung vermutet. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by variable skeletal abnormalities (including craniostenosis, pectus carinatum, short sternum, joint hyperextensibility, and anbnormal vertebrae), cutis laxa with excessive skin folds around the cheek, chin and neck, ambiguous genitalia with a micropenis and perineal hypospadia, an umbilical hernia, intellectual disability, premature aged appearance, and cardiac enlargement involving either the ventricles or atria. Facial dysmorphism is variable and can include multiple hair whorls, ptsosis, high and broad nasal root, low set ears and small chin. Enamel hypocalcification, abnormal modelling of tubular bones, and reduced cutis laxa may become apparent later on.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "312830", "umls": "C1839321", "mesh": "C536625", "gard": "247"}, {"name": "SCASI", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene heredit\u00e4re Ataxie, die durch eine progressive Kleinhirnataxie gekennzeichnet ist, die mit einer St\u00f6rung der visuellen Fixation durch sakkadische Intrusionen (\u00fcberschie\u00dfende horizontale Sakkaden mit makroakkadischen Oszillationen und erh\u00f6hter Geschwindigkeit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Sakkaden) einhergeht. Die Patienten zeigen eine progressive Gang-, Rumpf- und Extremit\u00e4tenataxie mit Pyramidenbahnzeichen (erh\u00f6hte Sehnenreflexe und Babinski-Zeichen), myoklonischen Zuckungen, Faszikulationen, zerebell\u00e4rer Dysarthrie, sensomotorischer axonaler Neuropathie mit beeintr\u00e4chtigter Gelenkstellung, gest\u00f6rter Vibrations-, Temperatur- und Schmerzempfindung, Pes cavus und sakkadischen Intrusionen mit charakteristischen \u00fcberschie\u00dfenden horizontalen Sakkaden, makroakkadischen Oszillationen und erh\u00f6hter Geschwindigkeit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Sakkaden, ohne andere Augenbewegungsst\u00f6rungen.", "synonyms": "SCAR4, SCASI, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "607317", "UMLS": "C1846492", "GARD": "4952"}, {"name": "SCAX3", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re X-chromosomale, Typ 3", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist eine Form von spinozerebell\u00e4rer Degeneration mit Beginn im Kleinkindalter. Symptome sind Muskelhypotonie, Ataxie, sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Strabismus und Optikusatrophie. Die Krankheit ist progredient und f\u00fchrt im Kindesalter zum Tod. Sie wurde in 1 Familie bei mindestens 6 betroffenen Knaben aus 5 verschiedenen, durch \u00dcbertr\u00e4gerinnen verbundenen Geschwisterschaften beschrieben. Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "X-linked spinocerebellar ataxia type 3 is a form of spinocerebellar degeneration characterized by onset in infancy of hypotonia, ataxia, sensorineural deafness, developmental delay, esotropia, and optic atrophy, and by a progressive course leading to death in childhood. It has been described one family with at least six affected males from five different sibships (connected through carrier females). It is transmitted as an X-linked recessive trait.", "synonyms": "SCAX3, X-linked ataxia-deafness syndrome, X-linked ataxia-hearing loss syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "301790", "umls": "C1844936", "mesh": "C537315", "gard": "9981"}, {"name": "SCAX4", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re X-chromosomale, Typ 4", "german_description": "Der X-chromosomale Typ 4 der Spinozerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie ist gekennzeichnet durch Ataxie, Pyramidenbahnzeichen und im Erwachsenenalter einsetzende Demenz. Die Krankheit wurde in 1 gro\u00dfen Familie bei Patienten aus 3 Generationen beschrieben. Sie wird in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit mit versp\u00e4tetem Laufenlernen und Tremor manifest. Zunehmend treten Pyramidenbahnzeichen, die Erwachsenen zeigen Ged\u00e4chtnisst\u00f6rungen und werden allm\u00e4hlich dement. Die Krankheit wird X-chromosomal vererbt. Das urs\u00e4chliche Gen ist noch nicht bekannt. In der Regel versterben die Patienten im 6. Lebensjahrzehnt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinocerebellar ataxia, X-linked, type 4 is characterised by ataxia, pyramidal tract signs and adult-onset dementia. It has been described in three generations of one large family. The disease manifests during early childhood with delayed walking and tremor. The pyramidal signs appear progressively and by adulthood memory problems and dementia gradually become apparent. Transmission is X-linked but the causative gene has not yet been identified. The disease is usually fatal during the sixth decade of life.", "synonyms": "SCAX4, X-linked ataxia-dementia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "301840", "umls": "C1844933", "mesh": "C537316", "gard": "9980"}, {"name": "SCCB", "sub_name": "Blasenkarzinom, kleinzelliges", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das kleinzellige Blasenkarzinom (SCCB) ist ein sehr seltener, wenig differenzierter, neuroendokriner epithelialer Blasentumor und klinisch durch H\u00e4maturie und/oder Dysurie und einen hoch-aggressiven Verlauf gekennzeichnet.", "synonyms": "Blasenkrebs, kleinzelliger, SCCB, Undifferenziertes neuroendokrines Blasenkarzinom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C67.0\u00a0 C67.1\u00a0 C67.2\u00a0 C67.3\u00a0 C67.4\u00a0 C67.5\u00a0 C67.6\u00a0 C67.7\u00a0 C67.8\u00a0 C67.9", "GARD": "11923", "epidemiology": "Das SCCB ist mit einer Jahresinzidenz von weniger als 1-9/1.000.000 extrem selten. Seit 1980 wurden weniger als 1.500 F\u00e4lle identifiziert. Das demographische Profil des SCCB \u00e4hnelt dem des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms der Blase (TCC). Die meisten Patienten sind m\u00e4nnlich, das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis betr\u00e4gt im Mittel 5:1 (Bereich 1:1-16:1). Die publizierten F\u00e4lle kommen \u00fcberwiegend aus Populationen mit europ\u00e4ischem Hintergrund.", "clinical_description": "Die meisten Informationen \u00fcber das SCCB resultieren aus retrospektiven Untersuchungen und einigen wenigen prospektiven Studien. Das mittlere Diagnosealter ist 67 Jahre (Bereich 32-91 Jahre). Die klinischen Merkmale des SCCB \u00e4hneln denen des Blasen-TCC und folgen aus der Anwesenheit einer Tumormasse. Das Hauptsymptom ist eine massive H\u00e4maturie (63-88 % der F\u00e4lle), mit Dysurie als zweith\u00e4ufigstem Symptom. Gelegentliche Symptome sind Obstruktion der Harnwege, Leibschmerzen, Harnwegsinfektionen und Gewichtsverlust. Das SCCB tritt oft zusammen mit anderen Karzinom-Typen auf und ist h\u00e4ufig mit anderen histologischen Formeln von Blasenkrebs kombiniert: TCC, Adenokarzinom und Plattenepithelzell-Karzinom. Allgemein wird angenommen, dass das SCCB ein hohes metastatische Potential hat. Berichtet wurde \u00fcber seltene F\u00e4lle paraneoplastischer Syndrome, z. B. ektope ACTH-Sekretion und Hyperkalz\u00e4mie.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie der Krankheit ist nicht bekannt, als wahrscheinlicher Mechanismus wird die Anomalie einer multipotenten Stammzelle angenommen. In der Vorgeschichte wird in 65-79 % der F\u00e4lle Rauchen angegeben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Der Tumor ist histologisch und immunhistochemisch nicht vom kleinzelligen Lungenkrebs (SCLC; s. dort) zu unterscheiden. Die Diagnose eines SCCB basiert haupts\u00e4chlich auf den histopathologischen Befunden nach Zystoskopie und transurethraler Resektion des Blasentumors. Hilfreich f\u00fcr die Sicherung der Diagnose sind immunchemische F\u00e4rbungen. Lichtmikroskopisch zeigt der Tumor enggepackte, zytoplasmaarme Zellen mit wenigen Organellen. Der Tumor ist zusammengesetzt aus Nestern runder maligner Zellen mit pyknotischen, runden bis ovalen Kernen und gleichm\u00e4\u00dfig verteiltem ''Pfeffer-und-Salz-Chromatin''. Mehr als 95 % der F\u00e4lle von SCCB werden im Stadium TII mit Invasion des Muskels oder sp\u00e4ter diagnostiziert.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die direkte Invasion der Blase durch SCC der Prostata, metastatische SCC anderen Ursprungs (in der Regel Lunge) und prim\u00e4re Lymphome der Blase.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Einstufung des Tumors erfolgt mit dem TNM-Staging des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms. Die Art der Behandlung ist von der Behandlung des SCLC \u00fcbernommen. Jedoch werden die Tumoren vieler Patienten mit SCCB radikal resiziert, was beim SCLC selten erfolgt. Patienten mit chirurgisch resizierbarer Erkrankung sollten multimodal chemotherapeutisch, chirurgisch und/oder radiologisch behandelt werden. Die wirksamste Behandlungssequenz ist neo-adjuvante Chemotherapie mit 4 Chemotherapie-Zyklen, gefolgt von radikaler Zystektomie. Patienten mit nicht-resizierbarer Erkrankung sollten, wie bei neuroendokrinen Tumoren, palliativ chemotherapisch mit einem Platin-Medikament (Cisplatin bei kr\u00e4ftigen Patienten) behandelt werden. Bei Blasen-SCC des Stadiums TIII/IV ist eine prophylaktische kraniale Bestrahlung zu erw\u00e4gen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig, vor allem im Fall eines rein kleinzelligen Karzinoms.", "summary": "Das SCCB ist mit einer Jahresinzidenz von weniger als 1-9/1.000.000 extrem selten. Seit 1980 wurden weniger als 1.500 F\u00e4lle identifiziert. Das demographische Profil des SCCB \u00e4hnelt dem des \u00dcbergangszell-Karzinoms der Blase (TCC). Die meisten Patienten sind m\u00e4nnlich, das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis betr\u00e4gt im Mittel 5:1 (Bereich 1:1-16:1). Die publizierten F\u00e4lle kommen \u00fcberwiegend aus Populationen mit europ\u00e4ischem Hintergrund."}, {"name": "SCCD", "sub_name": "Schnyder-Hornhautdystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Hornhautdystrophie Typ Schnyder (SCD) ist eine seltene Form der Stroma-Hornhautdystrophie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Tr\u00fcbung oder Kristallablagerung im Hornhautstroma und progrediente Abnahme der Sehkraft.", "synonyms": "Kristalline stromale Dystrophie, SCCD, SCD, Schnyder\u0092sche kristalline Hornhautdystrophie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H18.5", "OMIM": "121800", "UMLS": "C0271287", "MeSH": "C535475", "GARD": "9277", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich in der Regel fr\u00fch im Leben und meist beidseitig, aber nicht immer gleichzeitig in beiden Augen. Einige Patienten klagen \u00fcber Blendung, die mit dem Alter zunimmt. Die Sehkraft nimmt allm\u00e4hlich ab. \u00dcber begleitende systemische St\u00f6rungen wird h\u00e4ufig berichtet (Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie, Arcus lipoides und Genu valgum). Im Verlauf entwickeln sich im Hornhautstroma kleine wei\u00dfe Tr\u00fcbungen mit diffuser nebelartiger Eintr\u00fcbung. Bei etwa 50 % der Patienten sind klinisch keine Kristalle erkennbar.", "etiology": "Die Ursache der SCD sind Mutationen im UBIAD1-Gen (1p36.22).", "diagnostic_methods": "In typischen F\u00e4llen entsteht eine ringf\u00f6rmige, gelblich-wei\u00dfe Tr\u00fcbung, die aus unz\u00e4hligen feinen nadelf\u00f6rmigen Kristallen in der Bowman-Schicht und im benachbarten vorderen Stroma der Hornhautmitte besteht. Das Hornhautepithel und -endothel und die Descemet-Membran sind nicht betroffen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die SCD muss von anderen Lipid-Keratopathien und besonders vom Lecithin-Cholesterol-Acyltransferase (LCAT)-Mangel (s. dort) unterschieden werden.", "genetic_counseling": "\u00dcber autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde berichtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Das ver\u00e4nderte oberfl\u00e4chliche Hornhautgewebe muss nicht exzidiert werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "SCCH, isolierte", "sub_name": "Hyperostose, isolierte sternokostoklavikul\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die isolierte sternokostoklavikul\u00e4re Hyperostose ist eine seltene rheumatologische Erkrankung, die durch eine \u00fcberwiegend bilaterale, chronische, sterile Entz\u00fcndung und fortschreitende Sklerose und Hyperostose des Sternokostoklavikulargelenks mit angrenzender Weichteilverkn\u00f6cherung gekennzeichnet ist, ohne dass andere Gelenke betroffen sind. Die Erkrankung \u00e4u\u00dfert sich durch rezidivierende Episoden von Schmerzen, \u00d6demen und/oder Erythemen in der Sternoklavikularregion. In einigen F\u00e4llen kann zus\u00e4tzlich eine palmoplantare Pustulose beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "SCCH, isolierte, ", "ICD-10": "M85.8", "UMLS": "C0020499"}, {"name": "SCD", "sub_name": "Schnyder-Hornhautdystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Hornhautdystrophie Typ Schnyder (SCD) ist eine seltene Form der Stroma-Hornhautdystrophie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Tr\u00fcbung oder Kristallablagerung im Hornhautstroma und progrediente Abnahme der Sehkraft.", "synonyms": "Kristalline stromale Dystrophie, SCCD, SCD, Schnyder\u0092sche kristalline Hornhautdystrophie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H18.5", "OMIM": "121800", "UMLS": "C0271287", "MeSH": "C535475", "GARD": "9277", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich in der Regel fr\u00fch im Leben und meist beidseitig, aber nicht immer gleichzeitig in beiden Augen. Einige Patienten klagen \u00fcber Blendung, die mit dem Alter zunimmt. Die Sehkraft nimmt allm\u00e4hlich ab. \u00dcber begleitende systemische St\u00f6rungen wird h\u00e4ufig berichtet (Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie, Arcus lipoides und Genu valgum). Im Verlauf entwickeln sich im Hornhautstroma kleine wei\u00dfe Tr\u00fcbungen mit diffuser nebelartiger Eintr\u00fcbung. Bei etwa 50 % der Patienten sind klinisch keine Kristalle erkennbar.", "etiology": "Die Ursache der SCD sind Mutationen im UBIAD1-Gen (1p36.22).", "diagnostic_methods": "In typischen F\u00e4llen entsteht eine ringf\u00f6rmige, gelblich-wei\u00dfe Tr\u00fcbung, die aus unz\u00e4hligen feinen nadelf\u00f6rmigen Kristallen in der Bowman-Schicht und im benachbarten vorderen Stroma der Hornhautmitte besteht. Das Hornhautepithel und -endothel und die Descemet-Membran sind nicht betroffen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die SCD muss von anderen Lipid-Keratopathien und besonders vom Lecithin-Cholesterol-Acyltransferase (LCAT)-Mangel (s. dort) unterschieden werden.", "genetic_counseling": "\u00dcber autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde berichtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Das ver\u00e4nderte oberfl\u00e4chliche Hornhautgewebe muss nicht exzidiert werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "SCD-EDS", "sub_name": "SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener Subtyp des spondylodysplastischen Ehlers-Danlos-Syndroms (EDS), der durch das Vorhandensein klassischer kutaner Merkmale des EDS gekennzeichnet ist (d. h. hyperextensible, weiche, samtige, d\u00fcnne, durchscheinende Haut mit atrophischer Narbenbildung) in Verbindung mit Kleinwuchs (progressiv im Kindesalter), vorstehenden Augen mit bl\u00e4ulichen Skleren, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfig runzeligen Handfl\u00e4chen, hypotrophen Thenarmuskeln, spitzen Fingern und hypermobilen distalen Gelenken mit Neigung zu Kontrakturen. Charakteristische radiologische Befunde sind Platyspondylie, Osteopenie (vorwiegend an den Wirbeln), verbreiterte Metaphysen (Ellenbogen, Handgelenk, Interphalangen), flache Epiphysen (Oberschenkelhals und kurze R\u00f6hrenknochen) und ein kleines Ileum. Urs\u00e4chlich sind Mutationen im SLC39A13-Gen.", "synonyms": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylo-cheiro dysplastische Form, SCD-EDS, SLC39A13-abh\u00e4ngiges spEDS, SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches EDS, spEDS-SLC39A13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.6", "OMIM": "612350", "UMLS": "C2676510", "GARD": "12610"}, {"name": "SCD-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Bogengangsdehiszenz-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom der Bogengangsdehiszenz (SCD-Syndrom) ist eine seltene otorhinolaryngologische Erkrankung, die gekennzeichnet ist durch eine ein- oder beidseitige Dehiszenz der kn\u00f6chernen Abdeckung des oberen (am h\u00e4ufigsten), lateralen oder hinterer Bogengangs. Die Patienten zeigen audiologische (Autophonie, Ohrdruck, Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, pulsierender Tinnitus) und/oder vestibul\u00e4re Symptome (schall- oder druckinduzierte Oszillopsie oder Schwindel, charakteristische vertikal-torsionale Augenbewegungen), je nachdem, welcher Bogengang betroffen ist. Das posteriore SCD-Syndrom ist mit einem hochsitzenden Bulbus jugularis und fibr\u00f6ser Dysplasie assoziiert, w\u00e4hrend das laterale SCD-Syndrom mit chronischer Otitis media und Cholesteatom, mit oder ohne audiologische und vestibul\u00e4re Symptome, einhergeht.", "synonyms": "SCD-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H83.8"}, {"name": "Scedosporiose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare mycosis caused by Scedosporium species, characterized by disparate disease pictures including pneumonia, skin and soft tissue infection, mycetoma, and disseminated infection. Central nervous system infection has also been reported. Infections with this ubiquitous mold can occur in a range of contexts like solid organ transplantation, chemotherapy, chronic lung disease, but also in immunocompetent hosts and near drowning.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B48.7"}, {"name": "SCFE", "sub_name": "Epiphysiolyse der H\u00fcfte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Epiphysenl\u00f6sung der H\u00fcfte ist eine seltene Osteonekrose, die durch eine einseitige oder bilaterale St\u00f6rung des Kopf-Hals-\u00dcbergangs mit unterschiedlichem Grad an posteriorer Epiphysen\u00fcbersetzung und gleichzeitiger anteriorer Metaphysenversetzung gekennzeichnet ist. Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise vor der Adoleszenz/Jugend mit Schmerzen unterschiedlicher Intensit\u00e4t an verschiedenen Stellen (H\u00fcfte, Leiste, Oberschenkel, Knie).", "synonyms": "Abl\u00f6sung der Femurkopf-Epiphyse, Epiphysiolyse des Femurkopfes, Epiphysiolyse des oberen Femur, SCFE, SUFE, Verschiebung der oberen Femurepiphyse, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "M93.9"}, {"name": "Schaaf-Yang-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Prader-Willi-Syndrom durch Punktmutation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "PWS durch Punktmutation, Schaaf-Yang-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "615547", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Schaap-Taylor-Baraitser-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Katarakt-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Hypogonadismus-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Katarakt-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Hypogonadismus-Syndrom ist ein extrem seltenes angeborenes Syndrom mit multiplen Anomalien, das bisher nur bei drei Br\u00fcdern beschrieben wurde. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von angeborenem Katarakt, sensorineuraler Taubheit, Hypogonadismus, leichtem intellektuellem Defizit, Hypertrichose und Kleinwuchs. Seit 1995 gibt es in der Literatur keine weiteren Beschreibungen.", "synonyms": "Schaap-Taylor-Baraitser-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "UMLS": "C2931269", "GARD": "248"}, {"name": "Sch\u00e4del-Gesicht-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Hand-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Sch\u00e4del-Gesicht-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Hand-Syndrom ist definiert als das Zusammentreffen von flachem Gesichtsprofil, Hypertelorismus, angeborenem Fehlen der Tr\u00e4neng\u00e4nge, hypoplastischer Nase mit schlitzartigen Nasenl\u00f6chern und Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit. Es wurde bei einer Mutter und ihrer kleinen Tochter beschrieben, sp\u00e4ter auch beim Sohn, der genau wie Schwester und Mutter betroffen war. Radiologische Befunde: kleine Maxilla, fehlende oder kleine Nasenknochen und Ulnardeviation der H\u00e4nde. Immer war die neuropsychologische Entwicklung normal. Wegen der \u00c4hnlichkeiten mit dem Waardenburg-Syndrom Typ I wurde das PAX3 -Gen in der Chromosomenregion 2q35 untersucht, und wirklich hatten die Betroffenen in diesem Gen eine Mutation. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal dominant, multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by facial dysmorphism (flat facial profile with normal calvarium, hypertelorism, small downslanting palpebral fissures, hypoplastic nose with button tip and slitlike nares, and small, pursed mouth), profound sensorineural deafness, ulnar deviations and contractures of the hand. This disorder is allelic to Waardenburg syndrome, and distinguished by the imaging findings and distinct facial features.", "synonyms": "CDHS, Craniofacial-hearing loss-hand syndrome, Sommer-Young-Wee-Frye syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "122880", "umls": "C1852510", "mesh": "C536453", "gard": "1571"}, {"name": "SCHAD-Mangel", "sub_name": "Hyperinsulinismus durch Kurzketten-3-Hydroxyacyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "german_description": "Bisher wurden weniger als 10 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare form of congenital diazoxide-sensitive diffuse hyperinsulinism due to short chain 3 hydroxylacyl-CoA dehydrogenase (SCHAD; HADH gene) deficiency and characterized by hyperinsulinemic hypoglycemia with seizures and reported to respond well to diazoxide. It presents with the classical manifestations of hyperinsulinemic hypoglycemia. Exceptional complications include sudden death, and in one case fulminant hepatic failure.", "synonyms": "Hyperinsulinemic hypoglycemia due to short chain 3-hydroxylacyl-CoA dehydrogenase deficiency, Hyperinsulinism due to SCHAD deficiency, Hyperinsulinism due to glutamodehydrogenase deficiency, SCHAD deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E71.3", "omim": "231530\u00a0 609975", "umls": "C1291230", "gard": "2819\u00a0 9870"}, {"name": "Schalenhaut-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Peeling Skin-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Peeling Skin-Syndrom (PSS) bezeichnet eine Gruppe von seltenen, autosomal-rezessiven Formen von Ichthyose (siehe dort). Klinisch ist sie gekennzeichnet durch oberfl\u00e4chliche, beschwerdefrei spontane Absch\u00e4lung der Haut, histologisch durch Abwerfen der \u00e4u\u00dferen Epidermisschichten. Das PSS betrifft entweder lokalisiert die Akren (akrales PSS) oder tritt generalisiert in 2 Formen auf: Typ A (nicht-entz\u00fcndlich) oder Typ B (entz\u00fcndlich) (siehe diese Termini). Es verbleiben einige schwierig zu klassifizierende F\u00e4lle, sodass m\u00f6glicherweise weitere Subtypen des PSS existieren.", "synonyms": "Absch\u00e4lende Haut, Famili\u00e4res fortdauerndes Peeling Skin-Syndrom, Hautabl\u00f6sung, idiopathische, Keratosis exfoliativa congenita, PSS, Peeling Skin-Krankheit, Schalenhaut-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.8", "UMLS": "C0343064\u00a0 C0406357\u00a0 C1849193", "GARD": "7347"}, {"name": "Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Fehlbildungen des \u00e4u\u00dferen Ohres", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare, syndromic genetic deafness characterized by mild to moderate conductive hearing loss, dysmorphic pinnae and lip pits or dimples. The pinnae are usually small, cup-shaped, with helix folded forward, and hearing loss is associated with malformed ossicles and displacement of the external auditory canal.", "synonyms": "Conductive hearing loss-malformed external ear syndrome, Mengel-Konigsmark syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "omim": "221300", "umls": "C1857341\u00a0 C2931454", "gard": "1460"}, {"name": "Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Ptosis-Skelettanomalien-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Jackson-Barr-Syndrom ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte ektodermale Dysplasie charakterisiert durch eine Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit aufgrund einer Atresie des \u00e4u\u00dferen Geh\u00f6rgangs sowie des Mittelohrs, welche durch chronische Infektionen verkompliziert wird. Es treten eine Ptosis und Skelettanomalien (Innenrotation der H\u00fcfte, Dislokation der Radiusk\u00f6pfchen und Klinodaktylie des f\u00fcnften Fingers) auf. Zus\u00e4tzlich assoziiert werden eine schmale, enge Nase, ein verz\u00f6gertes Haarwachstum sowie dysplastische Z\u00e4hne. Seit 1978 gab es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "synonyms": "Jackson-Barr-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Keine Daten verf\u00fcgbar", "OMIM": "221320", "UMLS": "C1857340", "MeSH": "C535993", "GARD": "305"}, {"name": "Scharlach, Staphylokokken-induziert", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare bacterial infectious disease most prominently characterized by a red, sandpaper-like rash, a strawberry-like tongue, and a flushed face with perioral pallor. Other clinical symptoms include pharyngitis, tonsillitis, fever, headaches, and swollen lymph nodes. Potential complications are sinusitis, pneumonia, rheumatic fever, glomerulonephritis, and endocarditis, among others. The disease is caused by infection with toxin producing strains of Streptococcus pyogenes and can affect people of any age, although it is most common in children.", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A38"}, {"name": "Schauder-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Angorahaar-Naevus", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare nevus disorder characterized by the presence of epidermal nevi consisting of depigmented hypertrichosis manifesting with long, soft, white hair which grows from dilated follicles and follows Blaschko's lines, typically located on the scalp, neck, face, trunk and/or limbs. Association with hyperpigmented, hyperkeratotic linear epidermal nevi, macrocephaly, body asymmetry, sacral pit and koilonychia, as well as skeletal, ocular, and neurological abnormalities, has also been reported.", "synonyms": "Schauder syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.5"}, {"name": "Schaukelfu\u00df", "sub_name": "Vertikaler Talus, kongenitaler", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Isolated congenital vertical talus (CVT) is a rare pedal deformity recognizable at birth by a dislocation of the talonavicular joint, resulting in a characteristic radiographic near-vertical orientation of the talus.", "synonyms": "Congenital convex foot, Congenital convex pes valgus, Congenital rocker-bottom foot, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q66.8", "omim": "192950", "umls": "C0240912", "gard": "5488", "meddra": "10066242", "clinical_description": "It occurs more commonly in males than females. Some patients have vertical talus in one foot and clubfoot in the other.", "etiology": "The etiology and epidemiology of this condition are largely unknown. The reported familial cases are consistent with an autosomal dominant mode of inheritance with incomplete penetrance and mutations in HOXD10 gene have been detected in two families.", "management_and_treatment": "Serial manipulation and cast immobilization followed by limited surgery provides excellent results."}, {"name": "Scheie-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Scheie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:500.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Scheie syndrome is the mildest form of mucopolysaccharidosis type 1 (MPS1; see this term), a rare lysosomal storage disease, characterized by skeletal deformities and a delay in motor development.", "synonyms": "MPS1S, MPSIS, Mucopolysaccharidosis type 1S, Mucopolysaccharidosis type IS, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Childhood, Adult", "icd_10": "E76.0", "omim": "607016", "gard": "12561", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is estimated at 1/500,000.", "clinical_description": "Symptoms commonly occur after the age of 5 years but are so mild that diagnosis is often not considered until adulthood. Patients are of almost normal height and do not show intellectual deficiency. Corneal opacification occurs progressively and diffusely, usually after the age of four years. Glaucoma is more frequent than in Hurler syndrome (see this term). Patients present with mild coarsening of the facial features, including a large mouth with thick lips. Patients may present with nasal secretion, neurosensorial hearing loss, stiff joints, mild skeletal changes and carpal tunnel syndrome. Aortic valve disease may be present. Compression of the cervical spinal cord, caused by glycosaminoglycan infiltration of the dura, may lead to spastic paresis if not corrected by neurosurgical intervention.", "etiology": "Scheie syndrome is caused by mutations in the IDUA gene (4p16.3) leading to partial deficiency in the alpha-L-iduronidase enzyme and lysosomal accumulation of dermatan sulfate and heparan sulfate.", "diagnostic_methods": "Early diagnosis is difficult because the first clinical signs are not specific, but is very important to allow early treatment. Diagnosis is based on detection of increased urinary secretion of heparan and dermatan sulfate through the 1,9-dimethylmethylene blue (DMB) test and glycosaminoglycan (GAG) electrophoresis, and demonstration of enzymatic deficiency in leukocytes or fibroblasts. Genetic testing is available.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include the more severe forms of mucopolysaccharidosis type 1, Hurler-Scheie syndrome and Hurler syndrome, and mucopolysaccharidosis type VI and mucopolysaccharidosis type II (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible by measurement of enzymatic activity in cultivated chorionic villus or amniocytes and by genetic testing if the disease-causing mutation is known.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling is recommended.", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be carried out by a multidisciplinary team and should include physiotherapy to maintain range of movement. The enzyme substitute (laronidase) obtained EU marketing authorization as an orphan drug in 2003. Given through weekly infusions it leads to improvement of lung function and joint mobility. Enzyme replacement therapy (ERT) should be started at diagnosis and may be beneficial in patients awaiting hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). Early treatment slows the progression of the disease.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy for patients with Scheie syndrome may only be slightly affected."}, {"name": "Scheie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:500.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Scheie syndrome is the mildest form of mucopolysaccharidosis type 1 (MPS1; see this term), a rare lysosomal storage disease, characterized by skeletal deformities and a delay in motor development.", "synonyms": "MPS1S, MPSIS, Mucopolysaccharidosis type 1S, Mucopolysaccharidosis type IS, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Childhood, Adult", "icd_10": "E76.0", "omim": "607016", "gard": "12561", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is estimated at 1/500,000.", "clinical_description": "Symptoms commonly occur after the age of 5 years but are so mild that diagnosis is often not considered until adulthood. Patients are of almost normal height and do not show intellectual deficiency. Corneal opacification occurs progressively and diffusely, usually after the age of four years. Glaucoma is more frequent than in Hurler syndrome (see this term). Patients present with mild coarsening of the facial features, including a large mouth with thick lips. Patients may present with nasal secretion, neurosensorial hearing loss, stiff joints, mild skeletal changes and carpal tunnel syndrome. Aortic valve disease may be present. Compression of the cervical spinal cord, caused by glycosaminoglycan infiltration of the dura, may lead to spastic paresis if not corrected by neurosurgical intervention.", "etiology": "Scheie syndrome is caused by mutations in the IDUA gene (4p16.3) leading to partial deficiency in the alpha-L-iduronidase enzyme and lysosomal accumulation of dermatan sulfate and heparan sulfate.", "diagnostic_methods": "Early diagnosis is difficult because the first clinical signs are not specific, but is very important to allow early treatment. Diagnosis is based on detection of increased urinary secretion of heparan and dermatan sulfate through the 1,9-dimethylmethylene blue (DMB) test and glycosaminoglycan (GAG) electrophoresis, and demonstration of enzymatic deficiency in leukocytes or fibroblasts. Genetic testing is available.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include the more severe forms of mucopolysaccharidosis type 1, Hurler-Scheie syndrome and Hurler syndrome, and mucopolysaccharidosis type VI and mucopolysaccharidosis type II (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible by measurement of enzymatic activity in cultivated chorionic villus or amniocytes and by genetic testing if the disease-causing mutation is known.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling is recommended.", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be carried out by a multidisciplinary team and should include physiotherapy to maintain range of movement. The enzyme substitute (laronidase) obtained EU marketing authorization as an orphan drug in 2003. Given through weekly infusions it leads to improvement of lung function and joint mobility. Enzyme replacement therapy (ERT) should be started at diagnosis and may be beneficial in patients awaiting hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). Early treatment slows the progression of the disease.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy for patients with Scheie syndrome may only be slightly affected."}, {"name": "Scheuermann-Krankheit, famili\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial Scheuermann disease is characterized by kyphotic deformity of the spine that develops in adolescence. The spinal deformity includes irregularities of the vertebral endplates, the presence of Schmorl's nodes, disk-space narrowing, and vertebral wedging and is diagnosed using lateral radiographs of the spine. The thoracic spine is most often affected, but the lumbar spine may also be involved. Analysis of the mode of inheritance in a sample of 90 pedigrees derived from the Siberian population supported an autosomal dominant mode of inheritance with complete penetrance in boys and incomplete penetrance in girls.", "synonyms": "Familial Scheuermann juvenile kyphosis, Familial spinal osteochondrosis, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent", "icd_10": "M42.0", "omim": "181440", "umls": "C0036310", "gard": "7610"}, {"name": "Schilbach-Rott-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Schilbach-Rott-Syndrom (SRS) ist eine autosomal-dominant vererbte Krankheit mit fazialen Dysmorphien (Hypertelorismus, Blepharophimise), Gaumenspalte und h\u00e4ufig bestehender Hypospadie im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht", "synonyms": "BRSS, Hypotelorismus - Gaumenspalte - Hypospadie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "164220", "UMLS": "C1834038", "GARD": "2930", "epidemiology": "Das SRS wurde bisher bei 18 Individuen beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Charakteristisch f\u00fcr das SRS ist die auff\u00e4llige Erscheinung des Gesichts mit Hypertelorismus, Blepharophimose, Gesichtsasymmetrie, mit kleinen, nach vorn gerichteten Ohren, mit langer prominenter Nase, einem kleinen Mund und einer Gaumenspalte mit assoziierten Anomalien. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind h\u00e4utige Syndaktylie der Finger und Zehen, Kleinwuchs und im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht Hypospadie. M\u00f6glich sind eine leichte intellektuelle Behinderung und Lernschwierigkeiten.", "etiology": "Die Ursache ist ungekl\u00e4rt", "genetic_counseling": "Das SRS wird autosomal-dominant mit variabler Expressivit\u00e4t vererbt.", "summary": "Das SRS wurde bisher bei 18 Individuen beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie ist ein Typ von prim\u00e4rer kongenitaler Hypothyreose mit von Geburt an bestehendem, permanenten Mangel an Schilddr\u00fcsenhormon.", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "ICD-10": "E03.1", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:4.700 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Zeichen sind oft nur subtil oder bei Geburt noch nicht vorhanden. Gr\u00fcnde hierf\u00fcr sind wahrscheinlich trans-plazentarer Transport m\u00fctterlichen Schilddr\u00fcsenhormons und die Tatsache, dass viele Kleinkinder eine gewisse Menge des Hormons selbst produzieren. Eine Struma ist niemals vorhanden. Spezifischere Symptome entwickeln sich oft erst nach mehreren Monaten. H\u00e4ufige Zeichen sind: verminderte Aktivit\u00e4t und vermehrter Schlaf, F\u00fctterprobleme und Obstipation, verl\u00e4ngerter Ikterus, myx\u00f6demat\u00f6ses Gesicht, gro\u00dfe Fontanellen, Makroglossie, aufgetriebenes Abdomen mit Nabelbruch und Muskelhypotonie. Im Alter von 4-6 Monaten fallen in der Regel verlangsamtes Gr\u00f6\u00dfenwachstum und eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung auf. Unbehandelt f\u00fchrt die CH zu schwerem intellektuellen Defizit und Kleinwuchs. Bei der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie ist die Schilddr\u00fcse an einen ektopischen Ort verlagert, bei der Athyreose fehlt Schilddr\u00fcsengewebe ganz, und bei Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie ist die Schilddr\u00fcse unterentwickelt. Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie kann auch als Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hemiagenesie auftreten, d.h., es fehlt dann eine H\u00e4lfte der Schilddr\u00fcse. Die meisten Tr\u00e4ger dieser Anomalie zeigen keine weiteren Symptome.", "etiology": "In Regionen mit ausreichender Jodversorgung ist Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie bei 85% der F\u00e4lle die Ursache der permanenten CH. Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie tritt in drei Formen auf: Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie (2/3 der F\u00e4lle), Athyreose und Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie (jeweils 1/3 der F\u00e4lle). Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie ist im weiblichen Geschlecht doppelt so h\u00e4ufig wie im m\u00e4nnlichen. Es wurde angenommen, dass die meisten F\u00e4lle von Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie sporadisch sind, neuere Daten sprechen aber f\u00fcr die M\u00f6glichkeit einer genetischen Komponente. Etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle erwiesen sich als famili\u00e4r. M\u00f6gliche Ursachen sind Mutationen in den Genen FOXE1, NKX2-1, NKX2-5 oder PAX8 (9q22, 14q13, 5q34 und 2q12-q14). Mutationen, die zur vollst\u00e4ndigen Inaktivierung des TSHR-Gens (14q31) f\u00fchren, werden mit Athyreose oder Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie manifest.", "diagnostic_methods": "In L\u00e4ndern mit Neugeborenen-Screeningprogrammen werden die Kinder durch das Screening und nachfolgende Kontrollen (erh\u00f6hte TSH-Serumspiegel oder niedriger Spiegel von T4 oder freiem T4) diagnostiziert. Die Art der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie wird durch weitere Tests (Radionuklid-Aufnahme der Schilddr\u00fcse und Bildgebung, Sonographie) aufgedeckt. Auch genetische Tests dienen diesem Zweck.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Formen der kongenitalen Hypothyreose, die mit bildgebenden Verfahren durch den Befund fehlender Unterentwicklung der Schilddr\u00fcse ausgeschlossen werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Wenn der genetische Defekt in der Familie identifiziert wurde, kann im Rahmen der genetischen Beratung eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Levothyroxin ist die Therapie der Wahl. Die empfohlene Startdosis ist 10-15 \u00b5g/kg/Tag. Unmittelbares Ziel der Behandlung ist die schnellstm\u00f6gliche Anhebung des T4-Serumspiegels auf \u00fcber 130 nmol/L (10 \u00b5g/dL). Mit der genannten Startdosis normalisiert sich der TSH-Serumspiegel in 2 bis 4 Wochen. H\u00e4ufige Laborkontrollen im S\u00e4uglingsalter sind unerl\u00e4sslich f\u00fcr ein optimales neuro-kognitives Behandlungsergebnis. TSH und T4 oder freies T4 im Serum sollen in den ersten 6 Lebensmonaten alle 1-2 Monate, im Alter zwischen 6 Monaten und 3 Jahren alle 3 Monate, sowie 4 Wochen nach \u00c4nderung der Dosis gemessen werden.", "prognosis": "Bei fr\u00fchem Behandlungsbeginn haben die Kinder eine ausgezeichnete Prognose, und ihr IQ \u00e4hnelt dem ihrer normalen Geschwister oder Klassenkameraden. Zu ung\u00fcnstigeren neuro-kognitiven Resultaten kommt es, wenn die Behandlung mehr als 30 Tage nach der Geburt beginnt, wenn die verabreichte L-Thyroxin-Dosis unter der gegenw\u00e4rtigen Empfehlung liegt oder wenn die Kinder eine schwerere Hypothyreose haben.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:4.700 gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dyshormonogenese, famili\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die famili\u00e4re Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysfunktion (sog. Dyshormonogenese) ist ein Typ der prim\u00e4ren kongenitalen Hypothyreose (s. dort), einem seit Geburt bestehendem permanentem Mangel an Schilddr\u00fcsenhormon, verursacht durch angeborene Defekte der Synthese des Schilddr\u00fcsenhormons.", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E03.0\u00a0 E03.1", "OMIM": "274400\u00a0 274500\u00a0 274700\u00a0 274800\u00a0 274900\u00a0 607200", "clinical_description": "Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dyshormonogenese ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr 10-15% der F\u00e4lle von permanenter kongenitaler Hypothyreose (s. dort). Die klinischen Symptome sind die gleichen wie bei den anderen Formen von kongenitaler Hypothyreose (s. dort). Zus\u00e4tzlich zu den Symptomen der Hypothyreose k\u00f6nnen Patienten mit Dyshormonogenese eine Struma entwickeln. Ursache der Dyshormonogenese sind erbliche Defekte in Schritten der Synthese und der Aussch\u00fcttung des Schilddr\u00fcsenhormons.", "etiology": "Die meisten dieser F\u00e4lle werden autosomal-rezessiv, aber mindestens einer wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Am h\u00e4ufigsten ist der Aktivit\u00e4tsmangel der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Peroxidase mit vollst\u00e4ndigem Defekt der Jod-Organifizierung (TIOD), dessen Ursache autosomal-dominant vererbte Mutationen in den Genen DUOX2 und DUOX2A (15q15.3, 15q15) sind. Ursache der weniger schweren, partiellen Jod-Organifizierungs-Defekte (PIOD) sind Defekte des Natrium/Jodid-Transportes, der Thyroglobulin-Wirkung oder der Jodthyrosin-Dejodinase-Aktivit\u00e4t.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die fr\u00fche Erkennung von Kindern mit kongenitaler Hypothyreose ist Bestandteil nationaler Neugeborenen-Screeningprogramme (prim\u00e4rer Test entweder Thyroxin (T4) und nachfolgend TSH oder prim\u00e4r TSH). Die Babies haben zu dieser Zeit nur selten eine Struma. Die Diagnose soll durch den Befund erh\u00f6hter TSH-Spiegel und erniedrigter T4- oder freier T4-Spiegel im Serum best\u00e4tigt werden. Die Diagnose eines TIOD besteht im Nachweis einer hohen Aufnahme radioaktiven Jods (RAI) in die Schilddr\u00fcse und dessen mehr als 90%ige Aussch\u00fcttung nach Gabe von Natrium-Perchlorat. Auch genetische Tests sind verf\u00fcgbar. Der PIOD wird diagnostiziert durch den Befund einer 50-90%igen Aussch\u00fcttung des Radiojods nach Gabe von Perchlorat. Eine Best\u00e4tigung durch genetische Tests ist m\u00f6glich.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Formen der kongenitalen Hypothyreose (s. dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "In Familien mit bekanntem genetischen Defekt kann im Rahmen einer genetischen Beratung eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Levothyroxin ist die Therapie der Wahl (Anfangsdosis 10-15 \u00b5g/kg/Tag) mit dem unmittelbaren Ziel, schnellstm\u00f6glich den T4-Serumspiegel auf \u00fcber 130 nmol/L (10 \u00b5g/dL) anzuheben. Mit dieser Anfangsdosis normalisiert sich der TSH-Serumspiegel innerhalb von 2 bis 4 Wochen. F\u00fcr ein zufriedenstellendes neuro-kognitives Behandlungsergebnis sind im S\u00e4uglingsalter h\u00e4ufige Laborkontrollen erforderlich. TSH und T4 oder freies T4 im Serum sollen in den ersten 6 Lebensmonaten alle 1-2 Monate gemessen werden, alle 3 Monate im Alter zwischen 6 Monaten und 3 Jahren und au\u00dferdem 4 Wochen nach jeder Dosis\u00e4nderung.", "prognosis": "Bei fr\u00fchem Behandlungsbeginn haben die Kinder eine ausgezeichnete Prognose, ihre Intelligenz \u00e4hnelt dann der ihrer normalen Geschwister und Mitsch\u00fcler. Weniger g\u00fcnstig ist das neuro-kognitive Behandlungsergebnis bei sp\u00e4tem Beginn der Behandlung (Alter > 30 Tage), bei geringerer als der empfohlenen L-Thyroxin-Dosis und bei Kindern mit schwererer Hypothyreose.", "summary": "Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dyshormonogenese ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr 10-15% der F\u00e4lle von permanenter kongenitaler Hypothyreose (s. dort). Die klinischen Symptome sind die gleichen wie bei den anderen Formen von kongenitaler Hypothyreose (s. dort). Zus\u00e4tzlich zu den Symptomen der Hypothyreose k\u00f6nnen Patienten mit Dyshormonogenese eine Struma entwickeln. Ursache der Dyshormonogenese sind erbliche Defekte in Schritten der Synthese und der Aussch\u00fcttung des Schilddr\u00fcsenhormons."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenektopie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schildr\u00fcsen-Ektopie ist eine Form der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie (s. dort) und ist gekennzeichnet durch ektopische Lage der Schilddr\u00fcse, die zu prim\u00e4rer kongenitaler Hypothyreose (s. dort) f\u00fchrt, einem permanenten Mangel, der von Geburt an besteht.", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E03.1", "OMIM": "218700\u00a0 225250", "UMLS": "C0266283", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:7.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie macht etwa 2/3 der F\u00e4lle von Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie aus ist im weiblichen Geschlecht doppelt so h\u00e4ufig wie im m\u00e4nnlichen.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Zeichen der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie sind oft nur subtil oder bei Geburt noch nicht vorhanden. Gr\u00fcnde hierf\u00fcr sind wahrscheinlich trans-plazentarer Transport m\u00fctterlichen Schilddr\u00fcsenhormons und die Tatsache, dass viele Kleinkinder selbst das eine gewisse Menge des Hormons produzieren. Eine Struma ist niemals vorhanden. Spezifischere Symptome entwickeln sich oft erst nach mehreren Monaten. H\u00e4ufige klinische Zeichen sind dann verminderte Aktivit\u00e4t und vermehrter Schlaf, F\u00fctterprobleme und Obstipation, verl\u00e4ngerter Ikterus, myx\u00f6demat\u00f6ses Gesicht, gro\u00dfe Fontanellen (besonders die hintere), Makroglossie, aufgetriebenes Abdomen mit Nabelbruch und Muskelhypotonie. Im Alter von 4-6 Monaten fallen in der Regel verlangsamtes Gr\u00f6\u00dfenwachstum und eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung auf. Unbehandelt f\u00fchrt die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie zu schwerem intellektuellem Defizit und Kleinwuchs. Zur ektopischen Lage der Schilddr\u00fcse kommt es, wenn ein Rest der Schilddr\u00fcse im Verlauf des Ductus thyreoglossus (dem normalen Weg der sich entwickelnden Schilddr\u00fcse vom Zungenboden zur endg\u00fcltigen Position am Hals) verbleibt. Ektopisches Schilddr\u00fcsengewebe wurde unterhalb und oberhalb des Zungenbeins und \u00fcber dem Schildknorpel gefunden.", "etiology": "Es wird allgemein angenommen, dass die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie sporadisch ist. Neuere Daten sprechen aber f\u00fcr die M\u00f6glichkeit einer genetischen Komponente. Etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle erwiesen sich als famili\u00e4r. Spezifische Mutationen wurden bei Patienten noch nicht gefunden, jedoch sind bei der Maus Mutationen im FOXE1/TTF-2<7i>-Gen mit Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose der Ektopie muss mit bildgebenden Verfahren gesichert werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:7.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Ektopie macht etwa 2/3 der F\u00e4lle von Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie aus ist im weiblichen Geschlecht doppelt so h\u00e4ufig wie im m\u00e4nnlichen."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenfehlbildung ohne Hypothyreose, kongenital", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "Q89.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenhemiagenesie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hemiagenesie ist eine Form der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch das Fehlen einer H\u00e4lfte der Schilddr\u00fcse, was meist keine Symptome verursacht, aber auch zu prim\u00e4rer kongenitaler Hypothyreose (s. dort) f\u00fchren kann, einem von Geburt an bestehendem Mangel an Schildr\u00fcsenhormon.", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E03.1", "OMIM": "218700", "epidemiology": "Es wird gesch\u00e4tzt, dass bei 1:500 bis 1:2.000 Individuen eine Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hemiagenesie besteht.", "clinical_description": "Bei symptomatischen F\u00e4llen geh\u00f6ren zu den klinischen Zeichen verminderte Aktivit\u00e4t und vermehrter Schlaf, F\u00fctterprobleme und Obstipation, verl\u00e4ngerter Ikterus, myx\u00f6demat\u00f6ses Gesicht, gro\u00dfe Fontanellen (besonders die hintere), Makroglossie, aufgetriebenes Abdomen mit Nabelbruch und Muskelhypotonie. Verlangsamte Gr\u00f6\u00dfenzunahme und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung sind m\u00f6gliche weitere Symptome.", "etiology": "Einige publizierte famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle weisen auf die Beteiligung genetischer Faktoren, bisher wurden beim Menschen aber keine identifiziert. Dagegen wurden bei M\u00e4usen mit Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hemiagenesie compound-heterozygote Mutationen in den Genen FOXE1/NKX2-1<7i> und PAX8 (14q13 und 2q12-q14) gefunden.", "summary": "Es wird gesch\u00e4tzt, dass bei 1:500 bis 1:2.000 Individuen eine Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hemiagenesie besteht."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenhypoplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie ist eine Form der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie (s.dort) und gekennzeichnet durch unvollst\u00e4ndige Entwicklung der Schilddr\u00fcse mit der Folge einer prim\u00e4ren kongenitalen Hypothyreose (s. dort), einem von Geburt an bestehenden permanentem Mangel an Schilddr\u00fcsenhormon.", "synonyms": "Thyreoidea-Hypoplasie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E03.1", "OMIM": "218700\u00a0 225250", "UMLS": "C0151516", "GARD": "8426", "MedDRA": "10065938", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:28.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie und Athyreose (s. dort) machen zusammen ein Drittel der F\u00e4lle von Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie aus.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Zeichen der Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie sind oft nur subtil oder bei Geburt noch nicht vorhanden. Grund hierf\u00fcr ist wahrscheinlich trans-plazentarer Transport m\u00fctterlichen Schilddr\u00fcsenhormons. Spezifischere Symptome entwickeln sich oft erst nach mehreren Monaten. H\u00e4ufige klinische Zeichen sind dann verminderte Aktivit\u00e4t und vermehrter Schlaf, F\u00fctterprobleme und Obstipation, verl\u00e4ngerter Ikterus, myx\u00f6demat\u00f6ses Gesicht, gro\u00dfe Fontanellen (besonders die hintere), Makroglossie, aufgetriebenes Abdomen mit Nabelbruch und Muskelhypotonie. Eine Struma ist niemals vorhanden. Im Alter von 4-6 Monaten fallen in der Regel verlangsamtes Gr\u00f6\u00dfenwachstum und eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung auf. Unbehandelt f\u00fchrt die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasiezu schwerem intellektuellen Defizit und Kleinwuchs.", "etiology": "Die Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie wird allgemein f\u00fcr sporadisch gehalten, neuere Daten sprechen aber f\u00fcr die M\u00f6glichkeit einer genetischen Komponente. Etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle erwiesen sich als famili\u00e4r. M\u00f6gliche Ursachen sind Mutationen in den Genen FOXE1, NKX2-1, NKX2-5 oder PAX8 (9q22, 14q13, 5q34 und 2q12-q14). Mutationen, die zur vollst\u00e4ndigen Inaktivierung des TSHR-Gens (14q31) f\u00fchren, k\u00f6nnen mit Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie manifest werden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Sicherung der Diagnose sind bildgebende Verfahren erforderlich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:28.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Schilddr\u00fcsen-Hypoplasie und Athyreose (s. dort) machen zusammen ein Drittel der F\u00e4lle von Schilddr\u00fcsen-Dysgenesie aus."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "UMLS": "C0549473", "MedDRA": "10007476", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, anaplastisches", "german_description": "Das Anaplastische Schilddr\u00fcsen-Karzinom (ATC) ist ein aggressiver b\u00f6sartiger Tumor der Schilddr\u00fcse, und macht weniger weniger als 2% aller Karzinome der Schilddr\u00fcse aus, wobei deren j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz in den verschiedenen Registern zwischen 1,2 und 3,8/100.000 schwankt. Klinisch imponiert bei den meisten Patienten eine fixierte Masse mit einem Durchmesser von +/-5 cm, weitere multiple Kn\u00f6tchen in beiden Schilddr\u00fcsenlappen und vergr\u00f6\u00dferte Lymphknoten. H\u00e4ufig wird ein Durchbrechen in benachbarte Organe (Trachea, \u00d6sophagus, Blutgef\u00e4\u00dfe und Muskeln) gesehen. In 20-50% treten Fernmetastasen auf, besonders in der Lunge, aber auch in Knochen, Leber und Gehirn. Mehr als 1/3 der ATC-Patienten hatten schon lange vorher eine Struma. H\u00e4ufige Kompressions-Symptome sind eine rauhe Stimme, Dyspnoe, Husten und Dysphagie. 1/3 der Patienten hat Nackenschmerzen. Die Diagnose sollte durch eine chirurgische Probebiopsie gesichert werden. Es ist evtl. die langdauernde Stimulation eines Schilddr\u00fcsenknotens durch TSH, die zu seiner anaplastischen Entwicklung f\u00fchrt. Dies k\u00f6nnte die gr\u00f6\u00dfere ATC-H\u00e4ufigkeit in endemischen Struma-Gebieten erkl\u00e4ren. Im Gegensatz zum differenzierten Schilddr\u00fcsen-Karzinom werden im ATC h\u00e4ufig Mutationen im p53-Protein gefunden, als m\u00f6glicher Ausdruck seiner Beteiligung bei der Progression von einem differenzierten zum undifferenzierten Karzinom. Das ATC schreitet rapide fort, die Therapie mu\u00df deshalb so schnell wie m\u00f6glich beginnen. Nur eine kombinierte multimodale Therapie (Chemo- und Radiotherapie, Chirurgie) kann das \u00f6rtliche Wachstum wirkungsvoll kontrollieren und den Erstickungstod des Patienten verhindern. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A disorder that represents the ultimate dedifferentiation step of thyroid tumorigenesis and is one of the most severe cancers in humans.", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C73", "umls": "C0238461", "mesh": "C536910", "gard": "664", "meddra": "10002240", "epidemiology": "It accounts for less than 2% of thyroid cancers and affects older patients in their sixth to eighth decade.", "clinical_description": "Usual clinical presentation is a rapidly growing thyroid mass invading surrounding structures with compressive symptoms. Cervical lymph nodes enlargement and distant metastases occur frequently.", "diagnostic_methods": "Though cytological results obtained by fine needle aspiration may be suggestive of diagnosis, tissue biopsy for immunohistochemichal study can be necessary to exclude lymphoma and to validate aggressive therapies.", "management_and_treatment": "Patients developing anaplastic thyroid cancer must be referred urgently in cancer centers to plan multimodality therapeutic approach depending on their performance status. The treatment regimen combines surgery when feasible, hyperfractionated and accelerated external beam radiotherapy and doxorubicin based chemotherapy. Such treatment can provide control of locoregional disease but does not impact on overall survival in patients with distant metastases. Therapeutic research is investigating redifferenciation strategies and targeted therapies to inhibit EGF receptors and neoplastic angiogenesis. Primary prevention of this lethal disease may consist of adequate treatment of differentiated thyroid cancers and goiters in the elderly.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is dismal with a mean survival of four to nine months after diagnosis. Long survivors are patients with emerging disease presenting a resectable tumor and receiving adjuvant radiotherapy and/or chemotherapy."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, differenziertes", "german_description": "Das papill\u00e4re Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom (PTC) geh\u00f6rt zu den gut differenzierten Schilddr\u00fcsen-Karzinomen. Es ist der h\u00e4ufigste Schilddr\u00fcsenkrebs und der am h\u00e4ufigsten heilbare. Die Jahres-Inzidenz schwankt in verschiedenen Regionen der Erde zwischen 0,5 bis 10/100.000 Einwohner. Klinisch manifestiert sich das PTC als asymptomatischer, meist einzelner Schilddr\u00fcsenknoten. Er hat eine feste Konsistenz, ist beim Schlucken frei beweglich und kann von einem gutartigen Knoten klinisch nicht unterschieden werden. An ein Karzinom mu\u00df gedacht werden, wenn ein Knoten bei Kindern oder Jugendlichen oder bei \u00fcber 60-J\u00e4hrigen gefunden wird und wenn \u00fcber eine allm\u00e4hliche Gr\u00f6\u00dfenzunahme des Knotens berichtet wird. Heiserkeit, Schluckst\u00f6rungen, Husten und Atemnot sind Hinweise auf ein fortgeschrittenes Krankheitsstadium. Histologisch ist das PTC ein Tumor ohne Kapsel, mit papill\u00e4ren und follikul\u00e4ren Strukturen. Charakteristisch sind die abnormen Zellkerne: Kern\u00fcberlagerungen, gro\u00dfe Zellkerne, milchglasartiges Aussehen, longitudinale Kerngruben und Invaginationen des Zytoplasmas in die Kerne. Der Tumor breitet sich \u00fcber die Lymphgef\u00e4\u00dfe in der Schilddr\u00fcse aus, und streut in die regionalen Lymphknoten, seltener in die Lungen. Bei Patienten ohne Strahlenbelastung wurde eine Beteiligung mehrerer Onkogene nachgewiesen. Hierzu geh\u00f6ren Rearrangements im RET-Gen und Mutationen im RAS- und im B-RAF-Gen. Der Tumor wird chirurgisch, mit 131J, mit Bestrahlung und durch Medikation von Thyroxin behandelt. Nachkontrollen sind notwendig. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, slow-growing, epithelial thyroid carcinoma typically presenting as an asymptomatic thyroid mass and is classed as either papillary thyroid cancer (PTC), follicular thyroid cancer (FTC) or Hurthle cell thyroid cancer (HCTC).", "synonyms": "Papillary or follicular thyroid carcinoma, Well-differentiated thyroid carcinoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "C73", "omim": "188550\u00a0 607464", "umls": "C0238463", "gard": "12027", "epidemiology": "The annual incidence of differentiated thyroid cancer (DTC) is about 1/10,000, and the incidence appears to be increasing. The female to male ratio is about 3:1.", "clinical_description": "PTC, FTC, and HCTC have similar presentations, and constitute about 75, 20, and 5 percent of cases, respectively. About 10 percent of PTC are classified as tall cell variant, the most aggressive from of PTC. HCTC is generally considered slightly more aggressive than PTC and FTC. The age at diagnosis is usually over 30 years. Presentation is typically with an asymptomatic thyroid nodule. Rare but worrisome presentations include hoarseness due to vocal cord paralysis and obstruction of the airway or esophagus, and may suggest an aggressive variant of DTC or anaplastic thyroid carcinoma. DTC grows slowly, and distant metastases are rare at the time of presentation. The most common metastatic site is the cervical lymph nodes. Distant metastasis to lungs or bones is rare (about 5%). Pediatric cases are rare. They are more frequently present with lymph node involvement. Despite this apparently more aggressive presentation, the prognosis is excellent. Pathologically, PTC are usually composed of a mixture of papillae and follicles, frequently with relatively large nuclei containing folds and a clear center. About 50% contain calcium deposits. Different histological PTC subtypes have been described. FTC are characterized by microfollicles and presence of capsular and vascular invasion. HCTC, pathologically similar to FTC, are distinguished by mitochondria-rich, eosinophilic cytoplasm. Noninvasive follicular thyroid neoplasm with papillary-like nuclear features (NIFTP) is a recently described variant; it is currently unclear if it is a pre-malignant lesion or a DTC variant.", "etiology": "DTC arise from the epithelial cells of the thyroid gland. Most DTCs are sporadic and without known cause. Ionizing radiation predisposes to PTC. Iodine deficiency is associated with an increased risk of FTC. The sporadic molecular pathogenesis of these three malignancies is partially understood. In PTC, the V600E BRAF mutation (7q34) as well as fusion genes involving RET (10q11.2) and NTRK1 (1q23.1) are common. Activating RAS mutations occur in both PTC and FTC as well as in benign thyroid lesions. The PAX8/PPAR gamma fusion gene (2q13) is more frequently observed in FTC. About 5% of PTCs have a familial predisposition although the associated germline alterations are unknown. HCC has a unique and complex genetic profile that includes somatic mutations (including DAXX, TERT, TP53, NRAS, NF1, CDKN1A, ARHGAP35 and complex I mtDNA) and widespread chromosomal loss.", "diagnostic_methods": "DTC usually presents on physical examination or ultrasound as an asymptomatic nodule within the thyroid gland. Serum concentrations of thyroid hormone are usually normal. Thyroid fine needle aspiration biopsy cytology is frequently used to distinguish between the benign and malignant nodules. Additional diagnostic techniques include ultrasound characteristics and genetic analyses of the fine needle biopsy material. Diagnosis is confirmed on pathology review following surgical resection.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis of thyroid nodules includes benign thyroid nodules (nodular goiter, thyroid cyst, follicular adenoma), other thyroid malignancies, as well as Hashimoto's thyroiditis and thyroid lymphoma.", "management_and_treatment": "The treatment of DTC is prioritized. First, complete surgical resection is essential for cure. Second, thyroid hormone administration to suppress TSH to appropriate concentrations helps prevent recurrence. Third, since most DTCs maintain the ability to take up iodine, 131-iodine therapy is useful in eradicating residual microscopic disease. For those few patients refractory to conventional therapy, external radiation and multikinase inhibitors are effective. Long-term follow-up is essential due to the cumulative risk of recurrence (about 20% at 20 years).", "prognosis": "Prognosis is generally good in most patients, but about 5% of cases are fatal. Good prognosis is associated with age below 55 years and tumors below 4 cm. Poor prognosis is associated with distant metastatic disease, progression to anaplastic thyroid cancer (occasional), and tumors with a TERT promoter mutation plus either an activating V600E BRAF mutation or activating RAS mutation."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, gut differenziertes", "sub_name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, differenziertes", "german_description": "Das papill\u00e4re Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom (PTC) geh\u00f6rt zu den gut differenzierten Schilddr\u00fcsen-Karzinomen. Es ist der h\u00e4ufigste Schilddr\u00fcsenkrebs und der am h\u00e4ufigsten heilbare. Die Jahres-Inzidenz schwankt in verschiedenen Regionen der Erde zwischen 0,5 bis 10/100.000 Einwohner. Klinisch manifestiert sich das PTC als asymptomatischer, meist einzelner Schilddr\u00fcsenknoten. Er hat eine feste Konsistenz, ist beim Schlucken frei beweglich und kann von einem gutartigen Knoten klinisch nicht unterschieden werden. An ein Karzinom mu\u00df gedacht werden, wenn ein Knoten bei Kindern oder Jugendlichen oder bei \u00fcber 60-J\u00e4hrigen gefunden wird und wenn \u00fcber eine allm\u00e4hliche Gr\u00f6\u00dfenzunahme des Knotens berichtet wird. Heiserkeit, Schluckst\u00f6rungen, Husten und Atemnot sind Hinweise auf ein fortgeschrittenes Krankheitsstadium. Histologisch ist das PTC ein Tumor ohne Kapsel, mit papill\u00e4ren und follikul\u00e4ren Strukturen. Charakteristisch sind die abnormen Zellkerne: Kern\u00fcberlagerungen, gro\u00dfe Zellkerne, milchglasartiges Aussehen, longitudinale Kerngruben und Invaginationen des Zytoplasmas in die Kerne. Der Tumor breitet sich \u00fcber die Lymphgef\u00e4\u00dfe in der Schilddr\u00fcse aus, und streut in die regionalen Lymphknoten, seltener in die Lungen. Bei Patienten ohne Strahlenbelastung wurde eine Beteiligung mehrerer Onkogene nachgewiesen. Hierzu geh\u00f6ren Rearrangements im RET-Gen und Mutationen im RAS- und im B-RAF-Gen. Der Tumor wird chirurgisch, mit 131J, mit Bestrahlung und durch Medikation von Thyroxin behandelt. Nachkontrollen sind notwendig. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, slow-growing, epithelial thyroid carcinoma typically presenting as an asymptomatic thyroid mass and is classed as either papillary thyroid cancer (PTC), follicular thyroid cancer (FTC) or Hurthle cell thyroid cancer (HCTC).", "synonyms": "Papillary or follicular thyroid carcinoma, Well-differentiated thyroid carcinoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "C73", "omim": "188550\u00a0 607464", "umls": "C0238463", "gard": "12027", "epidemiology": "The annual incidence of differentiated thyroid cancer (DTC) is about 1/10,000, and the incidence appears to be increasing. The female to male ratio is about 3:1.", "clinical_description": "PTC, FTC, and HCTC have similar presentations, and constitute about 75, 20, and 5 percent of cases, respectively. About 10 percent of PTC are classified as tall cell variant, the most aggressive from of PTC. HCTC is generally considered slightly more aggressive than PTC and FTC. The age at diagnosis is usually over 30 years. Presentation is typically with an asymptomatic thyroid nodule. Rare but worrisome presentations include hoarseness due to vocal cord paralysis and obstruction of the airway or esophagus, and may suggest an aggressive variant of DTC or anaplastic thyroid carcinoma. DTC grows slowly, and distant metastases are rare at the time of presentation. The most common metastatic site is the cervical lymph nodes. Distant metastasis to lungs or bones is rare (about 5%). Pediatric cases are rare. They are more frequently present with lymph node involvement. Despite this apparently more aggressive presentation, the prognosis is excellent. Pathologically, PTC are usually composed of a mixture of papillae and follicles, frequently with relatively large nuclei containing folds and a clear center. About 50% contain calcium deposits. Different histological PTC subtypes have been described. FTC are characterized by microfollicles and presence of capsular and vascular invasion. HCTC, pathologically similar to FTC, are distinguished by mitochondria-rich, eosinophilic cytoplasm. Noninvasive follicular thyroid neoplasm with papillary-like nuclear features (NIFTP) is a recently described variant; it is currently unclear if it is a pre-malignant lesion or a DTC variant.", "etiology": "DTC arise from the epithelial cells of the thyroid gland. Most DTCs are sporadic and without known cause. Ionizing radiation predisposes to PTC. Iodine deficiency is associated with an increased risk of FTC. The sporadic molecular pathogenesis of these three malignancies is partially understood. In PTC, the V600E BRAF mutation (7q34) as well as fusion genes involving RET (10q11.2) and NTRK1 (1q23.1) are common. Activating RAS mutations occur in both PTC and FTC as well as in benign thyroid lesions. The PAX8/PPAR gamma fusion gene (2q13) is more frequently observed in FTC. About 5% of PTCs have a familial predisposition although the associated germline alterations are unknown. HCC has a unique and complex genetic profile that includes somatic mutations (including DAXX, TERT, TP53, NRAS, NF1, CDKN1A, ARHGAP35 and complex I mtDNA) and widespread chromosomal loss.", "diagnostic_methods": "DTC usually presents on physical examination or ultrasound as an asymptomatic nodule within the thyroid gland. Serum concentrations of thyroid hormone are usually normal. Thyroid fine needle aspiration biopsy cytology is frequently used to distinguish between the benign and malignant nodules. Additional diagnostic techniques include ultrasound characteristics and genetic analyses of the fine needle biopsy material. Diagnosis is confirmed on pathology review following surgical resection.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis of thyroid nodules includes benign thyroid nodules (nodular goiter, thyroid cyst, follicular adenoma), other thyroid malignancies, as well as Hashimoto's thyroiditis and thyroid lymphoma.", "management_and_treatment": "The treatment of DTC is prioritized. First, complete surgical resection is essential for cure. Second, thyroid hormone administration to suppress TSH to appropriate concentrations helps prevent recurrence. Third, since most DTCs maintain the ability to take up iodine, 131-iodine therapy is useful in eradicating residual microscopic disease. For those few patients refractory to conventional therapy, external radiation and multikinase inhibitors are effective. Long-term follow-up is essential due to the cumulative risk of recurrence (about 20% at 20 years).", "prognosis": "Prognosis is generally good in most patients, but about 5% of cases are fatal. Good prognosis is associated with age below 55 years and tumors below 4 cm. Poor prognosis is associated with distant metastatic disease, progression to anaplastic thyroid cancer (occasional), and tumors with a TERT promoter mutation plus either an activating V600E BRAF mutation or activating RAS mutation."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, medull\u00e4res", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C73", "UMLS": "C0238462", "MeSH": "C536914", "GARD": "7004", "MedDRA": "10027101", "summary": "Das Medull\u00e4re Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom (MTC) entsteht aus C-Zellen der Schilddr\u00fcse. Dieser Zelltyp sezerniert Calcitonin (CT). Das MTC macht 5-10% aller Karzinome der Schilddr\u00fcse aus und hat unter den nodul\u00e4ren Krankheiten der Schilddr\u00fcse eine Inzidenz von 1-2%. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wurde zu 1:14.300 bestimmt. Die Diagnose wird meist beim Befund eines solit\u00e4ren Knotens, oft mit knotenf\u00f6rmigen Metastasen, gestellt. Sie wird durch hohe Ruhespiegel von CT, dem Labormarker der Krankheit, best\u00e4tigt. Das MTC tritt in der Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle sporadisch auf. Aber in 30% der F\u00e4lle handelt es sich um famili\u00e4re Formen im Zusammenhang mit dem Syndrom der Multiplen endokrinen Neoplasie. Diese Krankheit wird autosomal-dominant vererbt und hat als Ursache Keimbahnmutationen im RET-Protoonkogen (10q11.2), das f\u00fcr eine Rezeptor-Tyrosinkinase kodiert. Labor- (CT) und DNA-Marker (RET) sind die Grundlage einer optimalen Diagnose und Therapie des MCT: Die routinem\u00e4\u00dfige Bestimmung des CT bei nodul\u00e4rer Schilddr\u00fcsenerkrankung erlaubt als Screeningverfahren eine fr\u00fche Diagnose des MTC und die ad\u00e4quate vollst\u00e4ndige Tumorresektion. Die molekulare Diagnostik f\u00fchrt zur Erkennung des famili\u00e4ren MTC und zur Identifizierung von Risikopersonen, bei denen dann eine prophylaktische Resektion der Schilddr\u00fcse durchgef\u00fchrt werden kann. Das MTC wird durch totale Thyroidektomie, verbunden mit zentraler und latero-zervikaler Lymphknoten-Dissektion, behandelt. Bei \u00f6rtlich vorangeschrittenem oder metastasiertem MTC ist umfassende Halschirurgie erforderlich, erg\u00e4nzt durch andere, systemische Verfahren. Da sich Chemotherapie als nicht sehr wirksam erwies, werden ggw. Radioimmunotherapie und Behandlung mit Tyrosinkinase-Inhibitoren erprobt. Die Prognose h\u00e4ngt vor allem vom Stadium der Erkrankung ab und vom Ausma\u00df des initialen chirurgischen Eigriffes. Etwa 80% der Patienten \u00fcberleben 10 Jahre, wenn sie nicht chirurgisch geheilt werden konnten. Wenn sich die CT-Spiegel postoperativnormalisieren, \u00fcberleben diesen Zeitraum 95% der Patienten."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, medull\u00e4res, famili\u00e4res", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "C73", "OMIM": "155240", "UMLS": "C1833921", "MeSH": "C536911", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, nicht-medull\u00e4res, famili\u00e4re Form", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic form of thyroid cancer characterized by occurrence of thyroid carcinoma (TC) as the primary feature in a familial setting.", "icd_10": "C73"}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, papill\u00e4res oder follikul\u00e4res", "sub_name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, differenziertes", "german_description": "Das papill\u00e4re Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom (PTC) geh\u00f6rt zu den gut differenzierten Schilddr\u00fcsen-Karzinomen. Es ist der h\u00e4ufigste Schilddr\u00fcsenkrebs und der am h\u00e4ufigsten heilbare. Die Jahres-Inzidenz schwankt in verschiedenen Regionen der Erde zwischen 0,5 bis 10/100.000 Einwohner. Klinisch manifestiert sich das PTC als asymptomatischer, meist einzelner Schilddr\u00fcsenknoten. Er hat eine feste Konsistenz, ist beim Schlucken frei beweglich und kann von einem gutartigen Knoten klinisch nicht unterschieden werden. An ein Karzinom mu\u00df gedacht werden, wenn ein Knoten bei Kindern oder Jugendlichen oder bei \u00fcber 60-J\u00e4hrigen gefunden wird und wenn \u00fcber eine allm\u00e4hliche Gr\u00f6\u00dfenzunahme des Knotens berichtet wird. Heiserkeit, Schluckst\u00f6rungen, Husten und Atemnot sind Hinweise auf ein fortgeschrittenes Krankheitsstadium. Histologisch ist das PTC ein Tumor ohne Kapsel, mit papill\u00e4ren und follikul\u00e4ren Strukturen. Charakteristisch sind die abnormen Zellkerne: Kern\u00fcberlagerungen, gro\u00dfe Zellkerne, milchglasartiges Aussehen, longitudinale Kerngruben und Invaginationen des Zytoplasmas in die Kerne. Der Tumor breitet sich \u00fcber die Lymphgef\u00e4\u00dfe in der Schilddr\u00fcse aus, und streut in die regionalen Lymphknoten, seltener in die Lungen. Bei Patienten ohne Strahlenbelastung wurde eine Beteiligung mehrerer Onkogene nachgewiesen. Hierzu geh\u00f6ren Rearrangements im RET-Gen und Mutationen im RAS- und im B-RAF-Gen. Der Tumor wird chirurgisch, mit 131J, mit Bestrahlung und durch Medikation von Thyroxin behandelt. Nachkontrollen sind notwendig. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, slow-growing, epithelial thyroid carcinoma typically presenting as an asymptomatic thyroid mass and is classed as either papillary thyroid cancer (PTC), follicular thyroid cancer (FTC) or Hurthle cell thyroid cancer (HCTC).", "synonyms": "Papillary or follicular thyroid carcinoma, Well-differentiated thyroid carcinoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "C73", "omim": "188550\u00a0 607464", "umls": "C0238463", "gard": "12027", "epidemiology": "The annual incidence of differentiated thyroid cancer (DTC) is about 1/10,000, and the incidence appears to be increasing. The female to male ratio is about 3:1.", "clinical_description": "PTC, FTC, and HCTC have similar presentations, and constitute about 75, 20, and 5 percent of cases, respectively. About 10 percent of PTC are classified as tall cell variant, the most aggressive from of PTC. HCTC is generally considered slightly more aggressive than PTC and FTC. The age at diagnosis is usually over 30 years. Presentation is typically with an asymptomatic thyroid nodule. Rare but worrisome presentations include hoarseness due to vocal cord paralysis and obstruction of the airway or esophagus, and may suggest an aggressive variant of DTC or anaplastic thyroid carcinoma. DTC grows slowly, and distant metastases are rare at the time of presentation. The most common metastatic site is the cervical lymph nodes. Distant metastasis to lungs or bones is rare (about 5%). Pediatric cases are rare. They are more frequently present with lymph node involvement. Despite this apparently more aggressive presentation, the prognosis is excellent. Pathologically, PTC are usually composed of a mixture of papillae and follicles, frequently with relatively large nuclei containing folds and a clear center. About 50% contain calcium deposits. Different histological PTC subtypes have been described. FTC are characterized by microfollicles and presence of capsular and vascular invasion. HCTC, pathologically similar to FTC, are distinguished by mitochondria-rich, eosinophilic cytoplasm. Noninvasive follicular thyroid neoplasm with papillary-like nuclear features (NIFTP) is a recently described variant; it is currently unclear if it is a pre-malignant lesion or a DTC variant.", "etiology": "DTC arise from the epithelial cells of the thyroid gland. Most DTCs are sporadic and without known cause. Ionizing radiation predisposes to PTC. Iodine deficiency is associated with an increased risk of FTC. The sporadic molecular pathogenesis of these three malignancies is partially understood. In PTC, the V600E BRAF mutation (7q34) as well as fusion genes involving RET (10q11.2) and NTRK1 (1q23.1) are common. Activating RAS mutations occur in both PTC and FTC as well as in benign thyroid lesions. The PAX8/PPAR gamma fusion gene (2q13) is more frequently observed in FTC. About 5% of PTCs have a familial predisposition although the associated germline alterations are unknown. HCC has a unique and complex genetic profile that includes somatic mutations (including DAXX, TERT, TP53, NRAS, NF1, CDKN1A, ARHGAP35 and complex I mtDNA) and widespread chromosomal loss.", "diagnostic_methods": "DTC usually presents on physical examination or ultrasound as an asymptomatic nodule within the thyroid gland. Serum concentrations of thyroid hormone are usually normal. Thyroid fine needle aspiration biopsy cytology is frequently used to distinguish between the benign and malignant nodules. Additional diagnostic techniques include ultrasound characteristics and genetic analyses of the fine needle biopsy material. Diagnosis is confirmed on pathology review following surgical resection.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis of thyroid nodules includes benign thyroid nodules (nodular goiter, thyroid cyst, follicular adenoma), other thyroid malignancies, as well as Hashimoto's thyroiditis and thyroid lymphoma.", "management_and_treatment": "The treatment of DTC is prioritized. First, complete surgical resection is essential for cure. Second, thyroid hormone administration to suppress TSH to appropriate concentrations helps prevent recurrence. Third, since most DTCs maintain the ability to take up iodine, 131-iodine therapy is useful in eradicating residual microscopic disease. For those few patients refractory to conventional therapy, external radiation and multikinase inhibitors are effective. Long-term follow-up is essential due to the cumulative risk of recurrence (about 20% at 20 years).", "prognosis": "Prognosis is generally good in most patients, but about 5% of cases are fatal. Good prognosis is associated with age below 55 years and tumors below 4 cm. Poor prognosis is associated with distant metastatic disease, progression to anaplastic thyroid cancer (occasional), and tumors with a TERT promoter mutation plus either an activating V600E BRAF mutation or activating RAS mutation."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, papill\u00e4res oder follikul\u00e4res, famili\u00e4re Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial papillary or follicular thyroid carcinoma is a rare, hereditary nonmedullary thyroid carcinoma characterized by the presence of differentiated thyroid cancer of follicular cell origin in two or more first-degree relatives, in the absence of other familial tumor syndromes or radiation exposure. Frequent capsular invasion is observed. Biopsy reveals multicentric tumors with multiple adenomatous nodules with or without oxyphilia and follicular or papillary carcinoma histology.", "synonyms": "FNMTC, Familial pure nonmedullary thyroid carcinoma, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C73", "omim": "188470\u00a0 188550\u00a0 603386\u00a0 603744\u00a0 606240\u00a0 616534\u00a0 616535", "gard": "8488"}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, reines nicht-medull\u00e4res, famili\u00e4re Form", "sub_name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkarzinom, papill\u00e4res oder follikul\u00e4res, famili\u00e4re Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial papillary or follicular thyroid carcinoma is a rare, hereditary nonmedullary thyroid carcinoma characterized by the presence of differentiated thyroid cancer of follicular cell origin in two or more first-degree relatives, in the absence of other familial tumor syndromes or radiation exposure. Frequent capsular invasion is observed. Biopsy reveals multicentric tumors with multiple adenomatous nodules with or without oxyphilia and follicular or papillary carcinoma histology.", "synonyms": "FNMTC, Familial pure nonmedullary thyroid carcinoma, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C73", "omim": "188470\u00a0 188550\u00a0 603386\u00a0 603744\u00a0 606240\u00a0 616534\u00a0 616535", "gard": "8488"}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkrankheit, genetisch bedingte, seltene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkrankheit, IgG4-assoziierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A fibroinflammatory disorder of the thyroid gland, occuring more frequently in females, characterized a large, hard thyroid mass, and presenting with pressure symptoms (breathing difficul\u00bcties and dysphagia) or voice hoarseness and aphonia (impingement of recurrent laryngeal nerve). It can often be associated with extracervical fibroinflammatory disorders such as retroperitoneal fibrosis, primary scleroisng cholangitis and autoimmune diseases such as Hashimoto struma, Addison disease, and Biermer disease.", "synonyms": "Riedel disease, Riedel thyroiditis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "E06.5", "umls": "C0154162", "meddra": "10039142"}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenkrankheit, seltene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0040128", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsenlymphom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary organ-specific lymphoma characterized by primary origin in the thyroid gland, sometimes involving cervical lymph nodes, and infrequently more distant sites. Diffuse large B-cell lymphoma is most common, followed by MALT lymphoma, and follicular lymphoma. More rare types include T-cell lymphomas, Burkitt lymphoma, or classic Hodgkin lymphoma. The condition is usually associated with Hashimoto thyroiditis. Patients typically present with a mass in the thyroid, with or without cervical lymphadenopathy. Hoarseness and dyspnea may occur, while constitutional symptoms are rare. Prognosis is favorable for patients with localized tumors.", "icd_10": "C85.7"}, {"name": "Schilddr\u00fcsentumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "UMLS": "C0040136", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schilder-Krankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Schilder's disease is a progressive demyelinating disorder of the central nervous system.", "synonyms": "Myelinoclastic diffuse sclerosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G37.0", "omim": "272100", "umls": "C0007795", "epidemiology": "Less than 20 sporadic cases (predominantly males) have been reported so far.", "clinical_description": "The onset is usually in childhood (age 5-14 years). The disease often occurs shortly after an infectious illness and may manifest with headache, malaise and fever. Variable neurological abnormalities progressively develop and include personality changes, poor attention, dementia, aphasia, headache, vomiting, tremor, seizures, balance instability, incontinence, muscle weakness. Deafness, paralysis of eye movements, nystagmus, optic neuritis and optic atrophy are common. Malnutrition and cachexia are reported in the later chronic stages of illness. Schilder's disease is considered as a variant or borderline form of multiple sclerosis.", "etiology": "Pathologically, it is characterized by bilateral widespread demyelination of the brain hemispheres with varying degrees of axonal injury. Etiology remains unclear.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on sequential neuroimaging (consistent with subacute or chronic myelinoclastic diffuse sclerosis) and electroencephalographic studies.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes a wide range of neurodegenerative disorders such as multiple sclerosis, acute disseminated encephalomyelitis, subacute sclerosing panencephalitis, progressive rubella panencephalitis, brucellosis, metachromatic leukoencephalopathy, Churg-Strauss disease, Wegener granulomatosis (see these terms). Schilder's disease often mimics intracranial neoplasm or abscess.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is mainly symptomatic and supportive (physiotherapy, occupational therapy, nutritional support in the later stages). Corticosteroids have been shown effective in some patients. Additional treatments include beta-interferon and/or immunosuppressive drugs.", "prognosis": "Prognosis of Schilder's disease is variable. The clinical course is usually progressive, but significant improvement and remissions have also been described. Survival has been reported to be less than ten years after the onset. Patients with a good response to corticosteroids and those with smaller lesions may have a better prognosis."}, {"name": "Schimke-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Knochendysplasie, immuno-oss\u00e4re, Typ Schimke", "german_description": "Die Schimkesche Immuno-oss\u00e4re Dysplasie (SIOD) ist eine Multisystemerkrankung mit spondylo-epiphys\u00e4rer Dysplasie, disproportioniertem Kleinwuchs, fazialen Dysmorphien, T-Zell-Immundefizienz, Glomerulonephritis und nephrotischem Syndrom. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich h\u00e4ufig betroffen, ethnische und geographische H\u00e4ufigkeitsunterschiede sind nicht bekannt. Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen betr\u00e4gt in Nordamerika 1: 1-3 Millionen. Die haupts\u00e4chlichen klinischen Symptome sind spondylo-epiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit Kleinwuchs, defekte zellul\u00e4re Immunit\u00e4t mit verst\u00e4rkter Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr lebensbedrohliche Infektionen und ein progredientes, steroid-resistentes nephrotisches Syndrom, das bei fast zwei Drittel der Patienten bis zur terminalen Niereninsuffizienz fortschreitet. Bluthochdruck und Proteinurie sind h\u00e4ufige Symptome der SIOD. Bei fast allen Patienten besteht ein T-Zell-Mangel mit normalem CD4/CD8-Verh\u00e4ltnis. H\u00e4ufig sind auch hyperpigmentierte Hautflecken, d\u00fcnnes Haar und faziale Dysmorphien (dreieckiges Gesicht; tiefer, breiter und flacher Nasenr\u00fccken). Folgen einer Atherosklerose sind neurologische Symptome (zerebrale Durchblutungsst\u00f6rungen mit migr\u00e4ne-\u00e4hnlichen Kopfschmerzen, zerebrale Isch\u00e4mie und kognitive St\u00f6rungen) und kardiale Funktionsst\u00f6rungen. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Hypothyreose, Enteropathie, und normo- oder mikrozyt\u00e4re An\u00e4mie. Die SIOD wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im SMARCAL1-Gen (2q35), das f\u00fcr HARP (auch SWI/SNF-related matrix-associated actin-dependent regulator of chromatin subfamily A-like protein 1 genannt), ein chromatin-remodellierendes Protein, kodiert. Die Diagnose basiert auf sorgf\u00e4ltiger klinischer und biochemischer Analyse und dem radiologischen Nachweis von Osteopenie, ovoiden und abgeflachten Wirbelk\u00f6rpern und Femurkopf- und Pfannendach-Hypoplasie. Durch molekulare Analyse kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden. Wichtigste Differentialdiagnose ist die Knorpel-Haar-Hypoplasie (s. dort). Da die Krankheit mehrere Systeme betrifft, muss die Therapie durch ein Team von Spezialisten erfolgen. Bei terminaler Niereninsuffizienz ist eine Nierentransplantation die Therapie der Wahl. Wegen der bei SIOD bestehenden Immunst\u00f6rung ist aber die immunsuppressive Therapie nach Nierentransplantation mit einem erh\u00f6hten Risiko f\u00fcr Absto\u00dfung und opportunistische Infektionen verbunden. Schlaganfall, Infektionen, Knochenmarkinsuffizienz und Nierenversagen begrenzen f\u00fcr die meisten Patienten die Lebenserwartung auf die Kindheit oder das fr\u00fche Erwachsenenalter. Patienten mit leichteren, sp\u00e4t-manifesten Formen und erfolgreicher Behandlung der renalen St\u00f6rung k\u00f6nnen das Erwachsenenalter erreichen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare a multisystem disorder characterized by spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia and disproportionate short stature, facial dysmorphism, T-cell immunodeficiency, and progressive, proteinuric steroid-resistant nephropathy.", "synonyms": "Schimke syndrome, Spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia-nephrotic syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "242900", "umls": "C0877024", "mesh": "C536629", "gard": "4984", "meddra": "10048699", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is unknown. Data from large pediatric registries suggest that it accounts for ~1% of steroid resistant nephrotic syndrome.", "clinical_description": "The main clinical features are spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia, growth retardation both pre- and post-natal, defective cellular immunity and episodic lymphopenia with increased susceptibility to life-threatening infections, and a progressive steroid-resistant nephrotic syndrome that leads to end-stage renal failure. Almost all patients have T-cell deficiency with a normal CD4/CD8 ratio. Hyperpigmented macules, thin hair and dysmorphic facial features (a triangular-shaped face, microdontia, broad depressed nasal bridge, narrow nasal ridge and a broad nasal tip) are common. Neurologic manifestations include atherosclerosis and cerebrovascular disease, which manifest as migraine-like headaches, cerebral ischemia, cardiac dysfunction and cognitive deficiency. Additional features may include hypothyroidism, enteropathy, normocytic or microcytic anemia and thrombocytopenia.", "etiology": "The disorder is caused by biallelic pathogenic variants in the SMARCAL1 gene (2q35) which encodes the chromatin remodeling protein, SWI/SNF-related matrix-associated actin-dependent regulator of chromatin subfamily A-like protein 1.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on careful clinical, biochemical and radiologic evaluation typically demonstrating osteopenia, ovoid and flattened vertebral bodies, and hypoplastic femoral heads and acetabular roofs. Some patients with progressive proteinuria might be diagnosed incidentally through multigenic mutational screening (next generation sequencing/whole exome sequencing).", "differential_diagnosis": "Cartilage-hair hypoplasia is the main differential diagnosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variants) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Therapy is largely limited to the prophylaxis and management of the various disease manifestations, such as dialysis and renal transplantation, supplementation of hematopoietic growth factors for neutropenia, orthopedic surgery as required, preventive antiviral therapies and vaccinations, anticoagulation, immunosuppressive therapy for those with autoimmune manifestations, and thyroid hormone supplementation.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is limited to childhood or early adolescence in most patients, due to stroke, infections, bone marrow failure, and renal failure. Survival into adulthood has been reported for patients with milder late-onset forms of the disease and successful management of the renal manifestations."}, {"name": "Schimmelpenning-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Syndrom des linearen Naevus sebaceus", "german_description": "Die Inzidenz des epidermalen Naevus (EN) (isolierter Befund oder als Syndrom) wird auf 1-3 von 1000 Lebendgeburten gesch\u00e4tzt, wobei der Naevus sebaceus (NS) sch\u00e4tzungsweise die H\u00e4lfte der Gesamtzahl ausmacht. Das Naevus-sebaceus-Syndrom (NSS) ist selten; die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung ist nicht bekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare nevus syndrome characterized by the association of an nevus sebaceous with a broad spectrum of abnormalities that affect many organ systems, most commonly the eye, skeletal and central nervous system.", "synonyms": "Nevus sebaceus of Jadassohn, Nevus sebaceus syndrome, Organoid nevus syndrome, Schimmelpenning syndrome, Solomon syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q85.8", "omim": "163200", "umls": "C0265329\u00a0 C3854181", "gard": "10291", "epidemiology": "The incidence of epidermal nevus (EN) (isolated finding or as a syndrome) is estimated at 1-3/1,000 live births, with nevus sebaceous (NS) estimated at half of the total. Nevus sebaceous syndrome (NSS) is rare; the exact prevalence and incidence in the general population is unknown.", "clinical_description": "NSS is the association of NS with extracutaneous manifestations. NS presents typically at birth as hairless yellow-pink, salmon-colored Blaschkoid plaque(s), but nevi may not appear clinically until later in infancy or early childhood. NS are found on the head and neck in two-thirds of cases, and large extensive nevi or a centrofacial location is more associated with NSS. In puberty, NS thicken and can become verrucous in appearance. Later in life, benign neoplasms may grow within the NS; rarely do malignant neoplasms grow, and the risk specifically for basal cell carcinoma is less than 1%. Central nervous system (CNS) findings are the most common extracutaneous anomalies, notably intellectual disability (nearly 80%) and seizures (57%, generalized tonic, tonic-clonic, focal motor, infantile spasms). While structural brain anomalies may occur (hemiatrophy, vascular anomalies, hemimegalencephaly, gyral or posterior fossa abnormalities), 75% of patients with CNS findings have normal imaging. Many other organ systems may also be involved in this syndrome, most commonly ophthalmologic (strabismus, lipodermoids, retinal anomalies, coloboma, cataracts, corneal vascularization) and skeletal (frontal bossing, skeletal hypoplasia, scoliosis and kyphoscoliosis, vitamin D-resistant rickets, hypophosphatemia). Other rare findings have included endocrine, cardiovascular and urogenital systems and oral anomalies (including rare neoplasms of ameloblastoma ,odontoma, giant cell granuloma).", "etiology": "NSS is a sporadic disease. EN syndromes are the result of post-zygotic mutations. Mutations in KRAS, HRAS , and NRAS have been described in both isolated NS and NSS. Mutations in these same genes are seen in keratinocytic EN (KEN).", "diagnostic_methods": "Evaluation should include prenatal, developmental, and family histories. Cutaneous examination should evaluate all skin including areas covered by hair, mucosa, eyes (especially the conjunctiva, sclerae, and extra-ocular eye movements). Careful neurologic and ophthalmologic exams should be performed. Any child with NS on the head or neck and developmental delay should have brain imaging. Skeletal exam should evaluate for kyphoscoliosis, gait and limb length. Skin biopsies and relevant laboratory studies (serum/urine calcium and phosphate, liver and renal function tests) as appropriate. Referral to specialists guided by the above is recommended.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes cutaneous-skeletal hypophosphatemia syndrome, nevus comedonicus syndrome, Becker nevus syndrome, phakomatosis pigmentokeratotica, CHILD syndrome, the spectrum of PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndrome, SOLAMEN (segmental outgrowth-lipomatosis-arteriovenous malformation-epidermal nevus syndrome), and CLOVES syndrome.", "genetic_counseling": "NSS occurs sporadically due to a postzygotic mutation. They do not appear to be heritable, as the severity of the mutations are thought to be incompatible with life when present in the germline.", "management_and_treatment": "NSS management is individualized and multidisciplinary based on the involved organ systems and degree of impairment. NS are no longer prophylactically excised in infancy, given low risk of malignant potential. In puberty, patients may opt for removal of the thickened lesions for cosmetic reasons. Biopsy is recommended for any growths that may occur within lesions. Tissue should be sent to an experienced dermatopathologist to prevent misdiagnosis of basal cell carcinoma.", "prognosis": "The prognosis depends on the severity of the clinical manifestations and the extent of the multisystem involvement."}, {"name": "Schindler-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Alpha-N-acetylgalactosaminidase- (NAGA-)Mangel ist eine sehr seltene lysosomale Speichererkrankung. Ursache der klinisch und pathologisch heterogenen Erkrankung ist das Fehlen der NAGA-Aktivit\u00e4t.", "synonyms": "NAGA-Mangel, Schindler-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "E77.1", "OMIM": "609241\u00a0 609242", "UMLS": "C0342850\u00a0 C1836544", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des NAGA-Mangels ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 20 Patienten mit deutscher, niederl\u00e4ndischer, spanischer, japanischer, franz\u00f6sischer und marokkanischer Herkunft beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild des NAGA-Mangels ist extrem variabel und wird deshalb in 3 klinische Subtypen aufgegliedert: NAGA-Mangel Typ 1, Typ 2 und Typ 3 (siehe jeweils dort). Typ 1 (Schindler-Krankheit Typ I) ist durch neuroaxonale Dystrophie mit Beginn im S\u00e4uglingsalter gekennzeichnet, Als Typ 2 (Kanzaki-Krankheit) werden erwachsene Patienten mit Angiokeratoma corporis diffusum und minimaler Beteiligung des Nervensystems beschrieben. Typ 3(Schindler-Krankheit Typ III) ist eine klinische Zwischenform: Die Symptome reichen von geistiger Behinderung \u00fcber neurologische Fehlfunktionen und Anf\u00e4lle bis hin zu milderen neurologischen und psychiatrischen Problemen wie verz\u00f6gerte Sprachentwicklung oder milde autismus\u00e4hnliche Symptome.", "etiology": "Ursache aller F\u00e4lle von NAGA-Mangel sind Mutationen im Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase-Gen (NAGA; 22q13.2), aber nicht alle Patienten haben neurologische Symptome. Eine Reihe verschiedener NAGA-Mutationen wurde identifiziert, hinsichtlich der klinischen Heterogenit\u00e4t ergab sich jedoch keine direkte Genotyp-Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelation. Es wird deshalb vermutet, dass weitere Faktoren oder Gene zum Auftreten neurologischer Symptome beitragen, schl\u00fcssige Belege f\u00fcr diese Annahme gibt es aber nicht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die bisher bekannten F\u00e4lle wurden entweder \u00fcber den Nachweis einer verringerten NAGA-Aktivit\u00e4t (Enzymtests in Leukozyten, Blutplasma, kultivierten Lymphoblasten oder Fibroblasten) und/oder durch die Analyse des Urins (D\u00fcnnschichtchromatographie zur Erstellung von Oligosaccharid- und Glykopeptid-Profilen, mit Nachweis erh\u00f6hter Konzentrationen dieser komplexen Verbindungen) diagnostiziert. Durch Mutationsanalyse im NAGA-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnosen sind je nach Typ des NAGA-Mangels verschieden. Zu denken ist an die infantile neuroaxonale Dystrophie mit Mutationen im PLA2G6-Gen, an die Pantothenat-Kinase-assoziierte Neurodegeneration mit Mutationen im PANK2-Gen und an sonstige lysosomale Erkrankungen, darunter das Fabry-Syndrom, das durch verschiedene lysosomale Enzymdefekte oder unbekannte Faktoren verursacht wird (siehe jeweils dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose des Enzymmangels ist durch Mutationsanalyse des NAGA-Gens nach Amniozentese oder Chorionzottenbiopsie m\u00f6glich. Da aber die klinisch unterschiedlichen Formen dieser Erkrankung auf demselben Gen lokalisiert wurden, k\u00f6nnen sie nicht pr\u00e4natal bestimmt werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Der NAGA-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung dieser St\u00f6rung ist symptomatisch und unterst\u00fctzend. Sie beinhaltet die Aufrechterhaltung einer zufriedenstellenden Ern\u00e4hrung und Hydration, dem Infektionskrankheiten-Management (wenn m\u00f6glich durch antibiotische Abschirmung), die Eind\u00e4mmung von Anf\u00e4llen durch Antiepileptika, medikament\u00f6se Verringerung von Spastizit\u00e4t oder Schmerzen, geeignete Positionierung, Physiotherapie zur Vermeidung von Kontrakturen oder Pneumonien, Aspirationsprophylaxe, ggf. durch k\u00fcnstliche Ern\u00e4hrung. In neuesten Untersuchungen wurde der NAGA-Mangel als typische Proteinfaltungsst\u00f6rung erkannt. Daher versucht man in Pr\u00fcfstudien zu kl\u00e4ren, ob sie f\u00fcr begleitende pharmakologische Ans\u00e4tze oder eine Enzymersatztherapie geeignet ist. Es wird auch die Gentherapie als ein weiterer Ansatz zur Therapie von lysosomalen Speicherst\u00f6rungen gepr\u00fcft.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose variiert je nach dem Typ des NAGA-Mangels, ist bei Typ 1 am ung\u00fcnstigsten und bei den anderen Typen g\u00fcnstiger. Wegen der sehr geringen Zahl von Patienten sind evidenzbasierte Aussagen \u00fcber Mortalit\u00e4t und Lebenserwartung nicht m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des NAGA-Mangels ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 20 Patienten mit deutscher, niederl\u00e4ndischer, spanischer, japanischer, franz\u00f6sischer und marokkanischer Herkunft beschrieben."}, {"name": "Schindler-Krankheit Typ 1", "sub_name": "Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase-Mangel Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase- (NAGA-)Mangel Typ 1 ist ein sehr seltener und schwerer Typ des NAGA-Mangels (siehe dort) und gekennzeichnet durch infantile neuroaxonale Dystrophie.", "synonyms": "NAGA-Mangel Typ 1, Schindler-Krankheit Typ 1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E77.1", "OMIM": "609241", "UMLS": "C1836544", "GARD": "116", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser St\u00f6rung ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurde \u00fcber weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle von NAGA-Mangel berichtet.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit manifestiert sich im Alter von etwa 9 Monaten durch verz\u00f6gerte psychomotorische Entwicklung und sp\u00e4ter, mit etwa 2 Jahren, durch Verlust erworbener F\u00e4higkeiten. Weitere Symptome folgen im Alter zwischen 4 und 10 Jahren, darunter Muskelhypotonie, Spastizit\u00e4t, Nystagmus, Strabismus, Myoklonien, Grand-Mal-Anf\u00e4lle, kortikale Blindheit und Taubheit, Opticus- und Hirnatrophie, Verlust des Kontakts mit der Umwelt und Dezerebrierungsstarre. Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung innerer Organe oder Vergr\u00f6berung der Gesichtsz\u00fcge wurde nicht beschrieben.", "etiology": "Der NAGA-Mangel Typ 1 wird durch eine homozygote Mutation des NAGA-Gens (22q13.2) verursacht, was zu einer Glu325Lys (E325K)-Substitution und zu einer Fehlfunktion, Instabilit\u00e4t und zum schnellen Zerfall des lysosomalen NAGA-Proteins f\u00fchrt.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser St\u00f6rung ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurde \u00fcber weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle von NAGA-Mangel berichtet."}, {"name": "Schindler-Krankheit Typ 2", "sub_name": "Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase-Mangel Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase (NAGA)-Mangel Typ 2 ist ein sehr seltener milder adulter Typ des NAGA-Mangels (siehe dort) mit Angiokeratoma corporis diffusum (siehe dort) und milder sensorischer Neuropathie.", "synonyms": "Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase-Mangel, adulter, Kanzaki-Krankheit, NAGA-Mangel Typ 2, Schindler-Krankheit Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "E77.1", "OMIM": "609242", "UMLS": "C1836522", "GARD": "9161", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser St\u00f6rung ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle von NAGA-Mangel beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Diese St\u00f6rung ist klinisch heterogen. Bei einigen Patienten wird zus\u00e4tzlich zum Angiokeratom eine milde geistige Behinderung ohne neurologische Symptome beschrieben. Ein weiterer Patient hatte Lymph\u00f6deme, eine Kardiomegalie, Korneatr\u00fcbung und leicht vergr\u00f6berte Gesichtsz\u00fcge (dicke Lippen, flache Nasenwurzel, vergr\u00f6\u00dferte Nasenspitze). Weitere fakultative Merkmale sind Tinnitus, H\u00f6rverlust und Schwindelgef\u00fchl (Meniere-Krankheit) (siehe dort). Ein charakteristisches histopathologisches Merkmal ist die Vakuolisierung verschiedener Zellarten (Endothelzellen der Blut- und Lymphgef\u00e4\u00dfe, Perizyten, Fibrozyten, Fettzellen. Schwannsche Zellen, Axone, glatte Muskelzellen des M. arrector pili, Zellen der ekkrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen). Die Vakuolisierung ist am auff\u00e4lligsten in den vaskul\u00e4ren Endothelzellen und im sekretorischen Teil der Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen.", "etiology": "Als Ursache sind verschiedene homozygote Mutationen des NAGA-Gens (22q13.2) beschrieben worden. Diese Mutationen f\u00fchren zu Fehlfunktion, Instabilit\u00e4t und schnellem Abbau des lysosomalen NAGA-Proteins. Folgen der fehlenden Enzymaktivit\u00e4t gest\u00f6rter Katabolismus und Akkumulation nicht abgebaute Glykokonjugate in den terti\u00e4ren Lysosomen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser St\u00f6rung ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle von NAGA-Mangel beschrieben."}, {"name": "Schindler-Krankheit Typ 3", "sub_name": "Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase-Mangel Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase- (NAGA-)Mangel Typ 3 ist ein seltener, klinisch heterogener Typ des NAGA-Mangels (siehe dort) mit entwicklungsm\u00e4\u00dfigen, neurologischen und psychiatrischen Symptomen, die sich im mittleren Alter zeigen.", "synonyms": "NAGA-Mangel Typ 3, Schindler-Krankheit Typ 3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E77.1", "OMIM": "609241", "UMLS": "C1836545", "GARD": "3903", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser St\u00f6rung ist unbekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle eines NAGA-Mangels beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Spektrum ist sehr breit, es reicht vom Beginn im Jugendalter bis zu symptomfreien Personen zum Zeitpunkt der Diagnose ihres Enzymdefektes. Symptome von klinisch offenkundigen F\u00e4llen sind Epilepsie unterschiedlichen Schweregrades, psychomotorische Retardierung, geistige Behinderung, Autismus, Strabismus und Katarakt.", "etiology": "Ursache sind compound-heterozygote oder homozygote Mutationen des Alpha-N-Acetylgalactosaminidase-Gens (NAGA; 22q13.2), die in einigen F\u00e4llen aber auch bei gesunden Geschwistern gefunden wurden. Diese Mutationen f\u00fchren zur Fehlfunktion, Instabilit\u00e4t und zum raschen Abbau des lysosomalen NAGA-Proteins.", "genetic_counseling": "Die St\u00f6rung wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser St\u00f6rung ist unbekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle eines NAGA-Mangels beschrieben."}, {"name": "Schinzel-Giedion-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Schinzel-Giedion-Syndrom (SGS) ist eine ektodermale Dysplasie, die haupts\u00e4chlich durch eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Gesichtsdysmorphie, Hydronephrose, schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, typische Skelettfehlbildungen und genitale sowie kardiale Fehlbildungen charakterisiert ist.", "synonyms": "SGS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "269150", "UMLS": "C0265227", "GARD": "117", "MedDRA": "10063540", "epidemiology": "Die Geburtsh\u00e4ufigkeit des SGS ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit sind bisher \u00fcber 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Bei der Geburt ist das SGS sehr leicht an dem deutlichen Gesichtsdysmorphismus aus vorgew\u00f6lbter Stirn, Mittelgesichtsretraktion (in ausgepr\u00e4gten F\u00e4llen einer verbreiterten Acht \u00e4hnelnd) und einer kurzen nach oben gezogenen Nase sowie Weichteilanomalien und Hypertrichose zu erkennen. Eine Hydronephrose ist in fast allen F\u00e4llen vorhanden (91 %). Herzfehler, wie z. B. Septumdefekte, Herzklappendysplasien, hypoplastische Ventrikel und ein offener Ductus arteriosus sind verbreitet (43 %), sowie weitere Anomalien des Urogenitaltraktes (76 %), so wie Kryptorchismus, Mikropenis, Hypospadie, hypoplastischer Uterus, hypoplastische gro\u00dfe und kleine Schamlippen, tiefer Schamlippensulcus und nach vorne fehlplatzierter Anus. Neugeborene zeigen oft kurze Extremit\u00e4ten sowie die folgenden Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildungen: Pes valgus oder varus. mesomele Brachymelie mit hypoplastischen und hyperkonvexen N\u00e4geln und einer einzelnen palmaren Handlinie. Betroffene Neugeborene leiden an Hypotonie und zeigen typischerweise Atemversagen und eine schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, die von (oft hartn\u00e4ckigen) Anf\u00e4llen sowie Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Seh- und H\u00f6rverm\u00f6gens begleitet sind.", "etiology": "Das SGS wird durch de novo-Mutationen im SETBP1-Gen (18q21.1) verursacht, welche wahrscheinlich einen Funktionsgewinn oder einen dominant-negativen Effekt haben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose beruht auf klinischen Merkmalen (einschlie\u00dflich der unverwechselbaren Gesichtsdysmorphien), dem Nachweis der Hydronephrose im Ultraschall und dem radiographischen Nachweis von multiplen charakteristischen Skelettfehlbildungen (z. B. sklerotische Sch\u00e4delbasis, ausgepr\u00e4gte okzipitale Synchondrose, erh\u00f6hten Dicke der Nierenrinde und breiten Rippen). Innerhalb des ersten Lebensjahres zeigt die Sch\u00e4delradiographie eine L\u00fccke zwischen den beiden Teil des Os occipitale, und auch verdichtete Nierenpyramiden sind h\u00e4ufig. Eine molekulargenetische Analyse des SETBP1-Gens ist m\u00f6glich.", "differential_diagnosis": "Weitere Erkrankungen mit einer charakteristischen Mittelgesichtsretraktion, die als Differenzialdiagnosen in Betracht gezogen werden k\u00f6nnen, umfassen das fetale Hydantoin- bzw. Warfarin-Syndrom, das Zellweger-Syndrom, Mukopolysaccharidosen, Gangliosidosen und die rhizomele Chondrodysplasie punctata sowie der kongenitale Hypothyroidismus (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die Hydronephrose ist durch eine Ultraschalluntersuchung zwischen der 18. und 37. Schwangerschaftswoche in etwa 40 % der Krankheitsf\u00e4lle nachweisbar. Eine DNA-Untersuchung ist m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Das SGS ist eine autosomal-dominant vererbte Krankheit. So gut wie alle Krankheitsf\u00e4lle entstehen sporadisch, und die Identifizierung der Patienten sollte mit einer genetischen Beratung der Eltern einhergehen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und beinhaltet eine palliative Versorgung. Die wichtigsten Komplikationen sind Atemversagen, Nahrungsmittelunvertr\u00e4glichkeit, hartn\u00e4ckigen Anf\u00e4llen und wiederholten Infektionen wie z. B. Pneumonie.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig. Die meisten betroffenen Patienten \u00fcberleben die Kindheit aufgrund progressiver Neurodegeneration, erh\u00f6htem Tumorrisiko, rezidivierenden Infektionen und Atemversagen nicht, obwohl ein \u00dcberleben bis zum Erwachsenenalter beschrieben ist.", "summary": "Die Geburtsh\u00e4ufigkeit des SGS ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit sind bisher \u00fcber 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Schinzel-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Ulna-Mamma-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Ulna-Mamma-Syndrom ist eine extrem seltene Erbkrankheit. Die Patienten haben Anomalien des ulnaren Strahls, Hypoplasie und Dysfunktion der axill\u00e4ren apokrinen Dr\u00fcsen und der Brustdr\u00fcsen, endokrine Funktionsst\u00f6rungen (Hypogonadismus, Adipositas), Zahnanomalien und manchmal Fehlbildungen der inneren Organe. Postaxiale Gliedma\u00dfendefekte reichen von einer Hypoplasie der Kleinfinger-Endphalanx bis zu einem v\u00f6lligen Fehlen der Hand und des Unterarmes. Meist fehlen Brust, Axillarbehaarung und Perspiration nicht vollst\u00e4ndig. Im Gebi\u00df sind die Eckz\u00e4hne ektopisch, hypoplastisch oder fehlen ganz. M\u00f6gliche Fehlbildungen sind auch Stenosen von Pylorus, Anus und Subglottisbereich., Inguinalhernien und Ventrikelseptumdefekt. Das Schinzel-Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant mit intrafamili\u00e4r erheblich variabler Expressivit\u00e4t vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im TBX3-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 12q24.1. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen multidisziplin\u00e4r betreut und begleitet werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by a variable spectrum of ulnar defects, mammary and apocrine gland hypoplasia and genital anomalies. The most frequent signs include fifth finger and dental anomalies, delayed puberty and mammary hypoplasia. Short stature and obesity are common.", "synonyms": "Pallister ulnar-mammary syndrome, Schinzel syndrome, UMS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Antenatal, Adolescent", "icd_10": "Q71.8", "omim": "181450", "umls": "C1866994", "mesh": "C536937", "gard": "118", "epidemiology": "Up to date, approximately 128 cases of Ulnar-mammary syndrome (UMS) have been reported in the literature.", "clinical_description": "Upper limb defects are the most common presenting feature of UMS at birth. Whilst the upper limbs can be normal, the limb phenotype is variable and can range from hypoplasia of the distal phalanges of the fifth finger(s), camptodactyly and/or postaxial polydactyly to absent ulnar ray digits, absent or hypoplastic ulna and a reduced humerus at the severe end of the spectrum. Abnormalities may be bilateral but are frequently asymmetric; lower limb defects have not been reported. The variable mammary and apocrine features of UMS may not be apparent until puberty and include mammary gland tissue hypoplasia (leading to absence of breast development and the inability to lactate), areolar or nipple hypoplasia, inverted nipples and apocrine gland hypoplasia (that can result in diminished perspiration and body odor). Absent or reduced axillary hair has also been described. Shared facial features of UMS include a wide face tapering to a prominent chin, a broad nasal tip, a wide nasal base, and a bifid tongue tip. Genital defects can include micropenis, shawl scrotum, cryptorchidism, septate uterus, and imperforate hymen. Delayed puberty is noted, particularly in males (79%), due to hypogonadism. Obesity and short stature are also common in individuals with UMS and a pituitary endocrine deficiency (growth hormone, pituitary hypoplasia) has been suggested as a possible cause. Abnormalities of the teeth with ectopic, hypoplastic or absent canines have been noted in a number of individuals. Cardiac defects (ventricular septal defects or conduction abnormalities), renal and anal anomalies (imperforation, anteposition) have been reported in a few cases.", "etiology": "UMS is caused by loss-of-function variants in the TBX3 gene (12q24.21). A hotspot of missense variants is observed in the DNA-binding domain of the TBX3 protein. TBX3 is a member of the T-box gene family. These genes encode transcription factors that have been shown to be important in embryologic development and in the morphogenesis of multiple organ systems.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of UMS is based on clinical findings and family history. It can be confirmed by molecular genetic analyses of TBX3.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include limb-mammary syndrome (due to TP63 variants) and Poland syndrome (which is sporadic).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is based on DNA analysis of amniocentesis and chorionic villus sampling and may be useful to confirm ultrasound and echocardiography findings in families with a known Ulnar Mammary syndrome mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "UMS is an autosomal dominant condition commonly reported in families. There is an important inter- and intra-familial variability in expression; however, there is no obvious phenotypic difference between those who have missense variants and those who have frameshift or stop-gain variants. Genetic counseling is possible for affected individuals, informing them that there is a 50% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is multidisciplinary and includes geneticists, orthopedic surgeons and pediatric orthopedics, endocrinologists, cardiologists, as well as social support networks.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable. Functional impact in everyday life is based on the type and severity of upper-limb anomalies and of endocrinologic anomalies (short stature, infertility, etc.). Life expectancy is the same as in the general population."}, {"name": "Schisis-Assoziation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schisis-Assoziation beschreibt die Kombination von zwei oder mehr der folgenden Anomalien: Neuralrohrdefekte (z. B. Anenzephalie, Enzephalozele, Spina bifida cystica), Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumen-Spalte, Omphalozele und kongenitale Zwerchfellhernie (siehe diese Begriffe). Diese Anomalien sind mit einer h\u00f6heren H\u00e4ufigkeit assoziiert, als mit zuf\u00e4lligen Kombinationsraten zu erwarten w\u00e4re.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "UMLS": "C2931271", "MeSH": "C536633", "GARD": "246"}, {"name": "Schistosomiasis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Schistosomiasis is an infectious disease caused by parasitic trematodes of the genus Schistosoma that colonize human blood vessels and release eggs that can cause granulomatous reactions leading to acute (swimmer's itch or acute schistosomiasis syndrome) or chronic disease. Depending on where the eggs lodge, manifestations of chronic schistosomiasis can include diarrhea, abdominal pain, loss of appetite, anemia (intestines), hepatosplenism, periportal fibrosis with portal hypertension (liver), urogenital inflammation and scarring, hematuria and dysuria (genitourinary system). Other patients may be asymptomatic.", "synonyms": "Bilharziasis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B65.0\u00a0 B65.1\u00a0 B65.2\u00a0 B65.3\u00a0 B65.8\u00a0 B65.9", "omim": "181460", "umls": "C0036323", "mesh": "D012552", "gard": "9687", "meddra": "10039603"}, {"name": "Schizenzephalie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by the presence of linear clefts containing cerebrospinal fluid lined by abnormal grey matter that extend from the lateral ventricles to the pial surface of the cortex. Schizencephaly can involve one or both cerebral hemispheres and may lead to a variety of neurological symptoms such as epilepsy, motor deficits, and psychomotor retardation.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q04.6", "omim": "269160", "umls": "C0266484", "gard": "166", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence is estimated at 1/64,935 in the USA and 1/69,444 in the UK.", "clinical_description": "Patients have varying clinical features including epilepsy (50-60% of cases), motor impairment, microcephaly and cognitive and learning disability. The severity of the clinical manifestations depends upon the extent of clefting and on whether other cerebral malformations are present. When a cleft affects one hemisphere alone (unilateral clefts), patients can have a hemiparesis but they may have little or no intellectual disability. Patients with bilateral clefts have a more severe phenotype that may be characterized by severe developmental impairment with spastic quadriplegia and severe intellectual disability. Schizencephaly is often associated with septo-optic dysplasia", "etiology": "The disorder usually results from an acquired defect of the cerebral mantle and often becomes apparent only in the second half of pregnancy. Schizencephaly has been linked to a young maternal age and to conditions secondary to vascular disruption such as maternal drug administration (e.g. warfarin), amniocentesis, and infections (cytomegalovirus). Mutations in the COL4A1 gene encoding the major type IV alpha collagen chain of basement membranes have been found responsible of some schizencephaly cases. Other genetic factors have been suggested to play a role in its pathogenesis, such as EMX2, SHH, and SIX3 that could act as susceptibility factors.", "diagnostic_methods": "Postnatally, the diagnosis is made by computed tomography (CT) and/or magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) showing unilateral or bilateral clefting of the brain. There are different classification systems for schizencephaly but a frequently used one refers to clefts as either closed-lip (type I) when the tissue surrounding the clefts are closely opposed, and open-lip (type II) when the tissue is widely separated by cerebrospinal fluid. Cerebral malformations found in association with schizencephaly on neuroimaging studies include optic nerve hypoplasia, enlarged cerebral ventricles, absence of corpus callosum or septum pellucidum, cerebellar hypoplasia, or calcifications. Genetic testing will confirm mutations in the genes associated with susceptibility to the condition but these are rare.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes porencephaly.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can made after 20 weeks of pregnancy by ultrasound examination or on in utero MRI, which demonstrates clefting and abnormalities of the cerebral mantle. The diagnosis may be confirmed post-natally by MRI, which may give additional information about the presence of septo-optic dysplasia and other abnormalities.", "genetic_counseling": "Most cases are sporadic but some familial cases have also been observed with inheritance reported to be either autosomal recessive or autosomal dominant with variable penetrance. Genetic counseling should be proposed to at risk couples informing them that there is either 25% risk of transmitting the disease to offspring in the case of an autosomal recessive inheritance or 50% risk for an autosomal dominant inheritance.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment consists on administration of anti-epileptic drugs in order to prevent seizures. In drug resistant cases (1/3rd of cases), surgery (e.g. resection of either the schizencephalic cleft alone or the cleft and surrounding epileptogenic tissue, temporal or frontotemporal lobectomy) can be performed. A regular neurologic evaluation is necessary. Physical and occupational therapy are essential.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is variable and depends on the degree of clefting and the association with other cerebral malformations. Individuals with schizencephaly can have features of a hemiparesis only but the clinical picture can extend to profound neurological impairment with spastic quadriplegia leading to immobility and to severe learning disability and epilepsy."}, {"name": "Schizenzephalie, erworbene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "OMIM": "269160", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Schizenzephalie, famili\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "OMIM": "269160", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Schizophrenie, fr\u00fch beginnende", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, neurologic disease characterized by an early onset of positive and negative symptoms of psychosis that impact development and cognitive functioning. Clinical manifestation commonly include premorbid features of autism spectrum disorders, attention deficits, neurodevelopmental delays, and behavioral abnormalities. After the onset of psychotic symptoms, other comorbidities are also common, including obsessive-compulsive disorder, major depressive disorder, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, expressive and receptive language disorders, auditory processing deficits, and executive functioning deficits.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "F20.8"}, {"name": "Schlachthausfieber", "sub_name": "Q-Fieber", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Q-Fieber ist eine bakterielle Zoonose und wird durch Coxiella burnetii verursacht. Das klinische Spektrum ist breit und reicht von akut lebensbedrohlichen bis zu chronischen Verl\u00e4ufen.", "synonyms": "Coxiellose, Infektion durch Coxiella burnetii, Query-Fieber, Schlachthausfieber, Siebentagefieber, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A78", "UMLS": "C0034362\u00a0 C2973787", "MeSH": "D011778", "GARD": "7515", "MedDRA": "10037688\u00a0 10037731", "epidemiology": "In den letzten Jahren hat die Zahl der mitgeteilten F\u00e4lle in Europa zugenommen. Allein in den Niederlanden wurden zwischen 2007 und 2010 mehr al 4.000 F\u00e4lle aufgedeckt.", "clinical_description": "Das Q-Fieber tritt in allen Altersklassen auf, meist jedoch im Alter von 30-70 Jahren. Die Inkubationszeit betr\u00e4gt 2-3 Wochen. Etwa 60% der F\u00e4lle bleiben symptomfrei. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Symptome des akuten Q-Fiebers sind hohes Fieber, schwere Kopfschmerzen, Myalgien, Sch\u00fcttelfrost und Husten. Pneumonie und Hepatitis sind m\u00f6gliche Begleiter. Die Lungenbeteiligung ist meist moderat, Pleuraerg\u00fcsse und akutes Atemnotsyndrom k\u00f6nnen aber auftreten. Die Symptome dauern 10-90 Tage an. Selten haben die Patienten neurologische (z.B. Meningitis), kardiale (Perikarditis, Myokarditis) oder dermatologische (makulo-papul\u00f6ses Exanthem, Erythema nodosum) Symptome. Bis zu 50% der diagnostizierten Kinder leiden unter gastrointestinalen Symptomen und Hautauschl\u00e4gen. Die Infektion kann bei pr\u00e4disponierten Personen (z.B. Herzklappen- oder Gef\u00e4\u00dfst\u00f6rung) Monate oder Jahre nach der Erstinfektion in eine chronische Form \u00fcbergehen (<5% der F\u00e4lle). Chronische Manifestationen sind Endokarditis, vaskul\u00e4re Infektionen und Osteomyelitis, seltener fiebrige Hepatitis mit \u00dcbergang in Leberfibrose oder -zirrhose. Folgen einer prim\u00e4ren Infektion in der Schwangerschaft sind Spontanabort, Fr\u00fchgeburt, niedriges Geburtsgewicht, Infektion des Feten oder rezidivierende Fehlgeburten. Bei chronischem Q-Fieber ist nach der Entbindung eine Herzbeteiligung m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Coxiella burnetii ist ein intrazellul\u00e4res gramnegatives Bakterium aus der Gamma-Gruppe der Proteobacteria. Die meisten Infektionen erfolgen durch Inhalation von Aerosolen oder Staub, der mit getrockenetem Fruchtwasser oder Exkrementen infizierter Tiere kontaminiert ist. Seltenere Infektionswege sind die Aufnahme infizierter Milch, Zeckenbiss oder Kontakt mit Keimreservoiren. \u00dcbertragung zwischen Personen und von der Schwangeren zum Feten wurde beschrieben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose eines akuten Q-Fiebers wird serologisch (Immunfluoreszenztest an gepaarten, im Abstand von 3-6 Wochen gewonnenen Seren) durch vierfachen Anstieg des Phase II- Immunglobulins (Ig) G best\u00e4tigt. In den ersten 2 Wochen nach Beginn der Symptome und vor der Therapie mit Antibiotika kann die PCR-Analyse in Blut oder Serum n\u00fctzlich sein. Ein einzelner hoher Phase II-IgG-Titer im Serum w\u00e4hrend der Rekonvaleszenz kann als Hinweis auf eine wahrscheinliche Infektion gewertet werden. Ein chronisches Q-Fieber wird best\u00e4tigt durch ansteigenden Phase I-IgG-Titer (typisch \u2265 1:1024) und Nachweis eines Infektionsherdes (z.B. Endokarditis, vaskul\u00e4re Infektion, Osteomyelitis, chronische Hepatitis) best\u00e4tigt. Die Spiegel der Leberenzyme sind meist erh\u00f6ht.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind alle fieberhaften Erkrankungen mit erweiterter Symptomatik wie z.B. Brucellose (s. dort) und Influenza.", "management_and_treatment": "Prophylaktische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind Impfung (in Australien) und angemessenene Hygiene. Eine \u00dcbertragung w\u00e4hrend der Krankenpflege wird durch Einhaltung der \u00fcblichen Vorsichtsma\u00dfnahmen verhindert. Symptomatische Patienten mit akutem Q-Fieber sollen 2 Wochen mit Doxycyclin behandelt werden. Vor Beginn der Behandlung muss bei Frauen im geb\u00e4rf\u00e4higen Alter ein Schwangerschaftstest durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Kinder unter 8 Jahren mit milden Symptomen, Schwangere und Patienten mit Allergie gegen Doxycyclin k\u00f6nnen mit Trimethoprim-Sulfamethoxazol behandelt werden. Das chronische Q-Fieber wird \u00fcber den Zeitraum von 18 Monaten kombiniert mit Doxycyclin and Hydroxychloroquin behandelt.", "prognosis": "Das akute Q-Fieber ist oft eine milde, selbstlimitierte Erkrankung mit niedriger Letalit\u00e4t. Ohne Behandlung enden bei chronischem Q-Fieber Endokardititis und vaskul\u00e4re Infektion oft t\u00f6dlich. Die 10-Jahres-Mortalit\u00e4tsrate einer behandelten Endokarditis im Rahmen des chronischen Q-Fiebers betr\u00e4gt 19%.", "summary": "In den letzten Jahren hat die Zahl der mitgeteilten F\u00e4lle in Europa zugenommen. Allein in den Niederlanden wurden zwischen 2007 und 2010 mehr al 4.000 F\u00e4lle aufgedeckt."}, {"name": "Schlafkrankheit", "sub_name": "Afrikanische Trypanosomiasis", "german_description": "Die Afrikanische Trypanosomiasis ist eine ausschlie\u00dflich in Afrika vorkommende parasit\u00e4re Erkrankung. Sie wird auch Afrikanische Schlafkrankheit genannt. Ursache sind Protozoen der Gattung Trypanosoma, die durch die Tsetse-Fliege (Gattung Glossina) \u00fcbertragen werden. In West- und Zentral-Afrika wird T. gambiense, in Ost-Afrika T. rhodesiense gefunden. Nach einer Initialphase mit Fieber und Lymphadenopathie schreitet die Krankheit schnell bis zu einer letalen Meningoenzephalitis fort, besonders schnell bei Infektion mit T. rhodesiense. Pentamidin ist das klassische Mittel w\u00e4hrend der lymphatischen Phase. Wenn schon das Gehirn mitbetroffen ist, wird die Arsen-Verbindung Melarsoprol gegeben. Zunehmend mehr wird die letztere Verbindung durch Alpha-Difluormethyl-Ornithin ersetzt. Die Prophylaxe besteht in einer Bek\u00e4mpfung der Tsetse-Fliege. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Human African Trypanosomiasis (HAT), also called sleeping sickness, is a vector-borne parasitic disease caused by a protozoa of the Trypanosoma genus transmitted by the bite of a tsetse fly (genus Glossina), that is found under its chronic form (average duration of 3 years) in western and central Africa (in case of the T. brucei gambiense sub-species), and under its acute form (lasting from few weeks to 6 months) in eastern and southern Africa (in case of the T. brucei rhodesiense sub-species). HAT comprises an initial hemo-lymphatic stage characterized by fever, weakness, musculoskeletal pain, anemia, and lymphadenopathy, along with dermatologic, cardiac and endocrine complications or hepatosplenomegaly, followed by a meningo-encephalitic stage characterized by neurologic involvement (sleep disturbances, psychiatric disorders, seizures) that progresses, in the absence of treatment, towards a fatal meningoencephalitis.", "synonyms": "Sleeping sickness, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B56.0\u00a0 B56.1\u00a0 B56.9", "umls": "C0041228", "mesh": "D014353", "gard": "7826", "meddra": "10001461"}, {"name": "Schlangenbiss-Vergiftung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "T63.0", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Schleimhaut-Naevus, wei\u00dfer", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "White sponge nevus (WSN) is a rare and autosomal dominant genetic disease in which the oral mucosa is white or greyish, thickened, folded, and spongy. The onset is early in life, and both sexes are affected equally. Other common sites include the tongue, floor of the mouth, and alveolar mucosa.", "synonyms": "Hereditary mucosal leukokeratosis, White sponge nevus of Cannon, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q38.6", "omim": "193900\u00a0 615785", "umls": "C1721005", "gard": "8501"}, {"name": "Schleimhautpemphigoid", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Das mittlere Erkrankungsalter ist 60-70 Jahre, die Krankheit scheint bei Frauen h\u00e4ufiger als bei M\u00e4nnern aufzutreten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autoimmune bullous skin disease characterized clinically by blistering of the mucous membranes followed by scarring, and immunologically characterized by IgG, IgA and/or C3 deposits on the epidermal basement membrane. The disease principally involves the oral mucosa, but may also affect ocular, pharyngolaryngeal, genital, and esophageal mucous membranes.", "synonyms": "Cicatricial pemphigoid, Mucosal pemphigoid, Mucosynechial pemphigoid, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly, Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "L12.1", "omim": "164185", "umls": "C0030804", "gard": "5913", "meddra": "10057052", "epidemiology": "Annual incidence was estimated to be 1/500,000 to 1/770,000 in Germany and France. A slight female predominance is reported.", "clinical_description": "The average age of onset is 60-70 years. The disease is rare in children. Mucous membrane pemphigoid is a chronic disease with periods of more rapid evolution. The disease manifests as fragile bullous lesions that give way to superficial erosions. The principle sites affected are the oral (80-90% of cases), ocular (50-70% of cases), pharyngolaryngeal (8-20% of cases), genital (15% of cases) and esophageal mucous membranes. Some forms affect only one mucosal membrane, in particular the buccal (erosive gingivitis) or ocular mucosae. An exclusively cutaneous form has also been observed in some cases. The ocular manifestations are initially inflammatory but then lead to retractile scarring of the conjunctive membrane, associated with corneal metaplasia resulting in vision loss.", "etiology": "Whilst the etiology is unknown, several different antigens are implicated in the auto-antibody response including BPAg1, BPAg2, integrin subunits alpha-6/beta-4, laminin 5 and 6, and type VII collagen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Immunological studies reveal the presence of auto-antibodies against several antigens such as PB180, the alpha Laminin-5 subunit and the beta subunit of the integrin alpha-6 beta-4 complex. Histologically, the cutaneous or mucosal blisters are subepithelial, without evidence of acantholysis, and are indistinguishable from those of bullous pemphigoid. Diagnosis can be confirmed by direct (DIF) or indirect immunofluorescence analysis. Immunoelectron microscopy can differentiate bullous from cicatricial pemphigoid by the precise location of immune deposits along the basement membrane.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes the full range of autoimmune bullous disorders. Pemphigus vulgaris is differentiated by the DIF pattern with a labelling of the intercellular substance. Bullous pemphigoid is characterized by a predominant cutaneous involvement. Epidermolysis bullosa acquisita is a difficult to differentiate and relies on ELISA (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay) anti collagene VII, a different localization of immune deposits along the basement membrane zone as imaged by immunoelectron microscopy, or DIF on salt separated skin. Oral erosive lichen planus and recurrent aphtosis do not show any immune deposits on DIF.", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be multidisciplinary with close follow-up in specialized centers, in particular for the management of the ocular manifestations. The choice of therapeutic strategy (anti-inflammatory drugs, immunosuppressive therapy, intravenous immunoglobulins or local treatments) depends in the severity of the ocular disease.", "prognosis": "The prognosis also revolves around the ocular manifestations, which may lead to blindness due to scarring of the conjunctive membrane and corneal metaplasia."}, {"name": "Schlichting-Dystrophie", "sub_name": "Hornhautdystrophie, polymorphe posteriore", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Hintere polymorphe Hornhautdystrophie (PPCD) ist ein seltener, milder Subtyp der Hinteren Hornhautdystrophie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch kleine, als Bl\u00e4schen erscheinende Aggregate auf der Ebene der Descemet-Membran, die von einem grauen Schleier umgeben sind und in der Regel den Visus nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigen.", "synonyms": "Hornhautdystrophie, hintere polymorphe, PPCD, Schlichting-Dystrophie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "H18.5", "OMIM": "122000\u00a0 609140\u00a0 609141\u00a0 618031", "UMLS": "C0339284", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt", "clinical_description": "Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich in der Regel im fr\u00fchen Kindesalter, sind meist beidseitig, k\u00f6nnen in einigen F\u00e4llen aber auch asymmetrisch oder einseitig auftreten. Die meisten Patienten sind frei von Symptomen und ohne Hornhaut\u00f6dem, progrediente Einschr\u00e4nkung des Visus durch wolkige Tr\u00fcbung der Kornea ist selten.", "etiology": "Die PPCD ist genetisch heterogen und durch extrem variable Expressivit\u00e4t gekennzeichnet. Drei Gene wurden mit der Krankheit in Verbindung gebracht: VSX1 (20p11.21), COL8A2 (1p34.2-p32.3) und ZEB1 (10p11.22), aber Hinweise auf eine Beteiligung der Gene VSX1 und COL8A2 sind umstritten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Auf der hinteren Oberfl\u00e4che der Descemet-Membran werden multiple Schichten von Kollagen in Form fokaler fusiformer oder kn\u00f6tchenf\u00f6rmiger Ausw\u00fcchse gefunden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die PPCD muss von der Kongenitalen endothelialen Dystrophie Typ 1 (CHED1; siehe dort) differenziert werden, da einige morphologische und klinische Merkmale beiden Krankheiten gemeinsam sind.", "genetic_counseling": "\u00dcber autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde berichtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Die meisten Patienten mit PPCD ben\u00f6tigen keine Therapie, bei einigen muss jedoch eines der folgenden Verfahren angewendet werden: Penetrierende Keratoplastik oder als Verfahren zur Reparatur der Kornear\u00fcckseite: Tiefe lamell\u00e4re endotheliale Keratoplastik (DLEK), Descemet stripping-Endotheliale Keratoplastik (DSEK) oder automatisierte Descemet stripping-Endotheliale Keratoplastik (DSAEK).", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt"}, {"name": "Schluckauf, chronischer", "sub_name": "Singultus, chronischer", "german_description": "Chronischer Singultus (Schluckauf) ist eine seltene Erkrankung (etwa 1 / 100.000) mit wiederholten inspiratorischen Kr\u00e4mpfen. Eine einzelne Attacke dauert 48 Stunden oder l\u00e4nger. Bei einigen Patienten h\u00e4lt sie Tage oder sogar Wochen an, bis es wieder zu einer Remission kommt. Viele Ursachen sind bekannt, die h\u00e4ufigste ist eine \u00d6sophagitis mit gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux. Kausale Therapien wirken am besten. So wird der Singultus bei gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux mit Antazida behandelt und mit Protonenpumpen-Inhibitoren, die in den meisten F\u00e4llen sehr wirksam sind. Der Reflux mu\u00df evtl. operativ behandelt werden. Immer ist eine aufmerksame Kontrolle des \u00d6sophagus anzuraten. Wenn der Singultus andere Ursachen hat, vor allem zentralnerv\u00f6se, dann scheint Baclofen das Mittel der Wahl zu sein. Im Idealfall sollte die Behandlung durch ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team erfolgen, das Erfahrungen mit komplexen Thorax- und Nerven-Krankheiten hat. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Chronic hiccup is a rare movement disorder characterized by involuntary spasmodic contractions of the inspiratory muscles synchronized with larynx closure lasting for more than 48 hours.", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G25.3", "gard": "6657", "epidemiology": "The disorder is thought to affect approximately 1/100,000 individuals. Chronic hiccup affect males more often than females.", "clinical_description": "The involuntary spasmodic contractions of the inspiratory muscles followed by the rapid closure of the vocal cords known as hiccups usually last for no more than a few minutes or at most a few hours with spontaneous resolution, and can affect people of any age. In rare pathological cases, hiccups may last for more than two days (chronic /persistent hiccup). Recurrent episodes over long periods are also called chronic hiccup. Clinical repercussions of these episodes may include dehydration, weight loss and malnutrition due to difficulty eating, sleep disorders, depression and exhaustion.", "etiology": "The hiccup is poorly understood. According to experimental data it is probably a coordinated ventilatory movement mixing branchial ventilation, suction and deglutition components. Chronic hiccup is mainly an esophageal and gastric disorder. Other causes may include fever, brain lesions/tumors, cardiovascular disorders (stroke, myocardial infarction), renal failure, metabolic imbalance, peripheral nerve stimulation, or other injuries, drugs (chemotherapy, benzodiazepines, corticosteroids, barbiturates, morphine, and anesthetics), and alcohol. Other triggers include placement of medical instruments, certain foods and beverages, spices and tobacco. Cases also sometimes develop in a context of surgery (pleural, peritoneal or intracranial).", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical diagnosis is usually straightforward given the nature of the involuntary spasms. Imaging or laboratory tests to identify the underlying cause should focus primarily on the esophagus.", "differential_diagnosis": "Hiccups are extremely specific and can rarely be mistaken for another condition.", "management_and_treatment": "Many anecdotal treatments have been described with varying success. Management should ideally focus on identifying and treating the underlying cause, especially esophageal. No specific treatments have proven efficacy in the absence of controlled studies. Pharmacological approaches that have been attempted in cases where no gastroesophageal treatment works include baclofen, chlorpromazine, carbamazepine, haloperidol, metoclopramide, gabapentin, serotoninergic agonists, prokinetics, lidocaine, nifedipine, carvedilol and marijuana. Alternative therapy includes hypnosis and acupuncture. Phrenic nerve blockade is of little benefit since it yields only partial relief at the expense of respiratory insufficiency. Long-term treatment of the frequent esophageal cause can be very useful.", "prognosis": "Persistent hiccups can reduce quality of life. Very long intractable disease may be debilitating."}, {"name": "Schmerzhafte orbitale und systemische Neurofibrome - marfanoider Habitus", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Painful orbital and systemic neurofibromas-marfanoid habitus syndrome is a rare, benign, peripheral nerve sheath tumor disorder characterized by multiple, painful, mucin-rich plexiform neurofibromas located in the orbits, cranium, large spinal nerves and mucosa, associated with a marfanoid habitus, enlarged corneal nerves, congenital neuronal migration anomalies and facial dysmorphism which includes ptosis, proptosis, prominent nose, full lips, gingival hyperplasia, and multiple subcutaneous and submucosal nodules in the lips and sublingual zone.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent", "icd_10": "D36.1", "gard": "11006"}, {"name": "Schmerzunempfindlichkeit, Ionenkanal-abh\u00e4ngige", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Ionenkanal-assoziierte Analgesie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "G60.8", "OMIM": "243000", "UMLS": "C0002768\u00a0 C0020075", "MeSH": "D000699\u00a0 D009477", "GARD": "12267", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Schmerzunempfindlichkeit, kongenitale, mit Hyperhidrose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Analgesie mit Hyperhidrose, kongenital, Kongenitale Schmerzunempfindlichkeit mit Hyperhidrose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G60.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Schmerzunempfindlichkeit mit Anhidrose", "sub_name": "Neuropathie, autonome heredit\u00e4re sensorische, Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene heredit\u00e4re sensorische und autonome Neuropathie, die durch Anhidrose, Unempfindlichkeit gegen\u00fcber Schmerzen, Selbstmutilation und Fiebersch\u00fcbe gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "CIP-Anhidrose-Syndrom, HSAN4, Neuropathie, autonome heredit\u00e4re sensorische, Typ IV, Schmerzunempfindlichkeit mit Anhidrose, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G60.8", "OMIM": "256800", "UMLS": "C0020074", "GARD": "3006", "epidemiology": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, weltweit wurden mehrere hundert F\u00e4lle berichtet. Die meisten der beschriebenen F\u00e4lle stammen aus der israelischen Beduinenbev\u00f6lkerung und Japan, wo die Pr\u00e4valenz auf 1/600.000-950.000 gesch\u00e4tzt wird.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit tritt typischerweise in der f\u00fchen Kindheit auf, kann sich aber gelegentlich auch schon w\u00e4hrend der Neugeborenenperiode manifestieren. Konsanguinit\u00e4t wurde bei 50 % der Patienten berichtet. Die fr\u00fchesten Symptome der Erkrankung sind in der Regel Episodische Fiebersch\u00fcbe ohne offensichtliche Infektionen, extreme Hyperpyrexie und Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe (aufgrund der Unf\u00e4higkeit zur W\u00e4rmeabfuhr infolge von Anhidrose) sowie selbstverletzendes Verhalten. Das kardinale Merkmal ist das Fehlen von Schwitzen am Rumpf und an den Extremit\u00e4ten, wobei die Patienten gelegentlich etwas Feuchtigkeit an der Stirn, der Nasenspitze und dem glutealen Sulcus produzieren. Die Haut wird dick und schwielig mit Lichenifikation der Handfl\u00e4chen, Bereichen von Hypotrichose auf der Kopfhaut und dystrophischen N\u00e4geln. Tiefe Sehnenreflexe sind normalerweise vorhanden. Die Schmerzunempfindlichkeit ist ausgepr\u00e4gt, mit der Folge von Selbstmutilation, Selbstamputation und Hornhautnarben, aber einige Patienten behalten die Temperaturwahrnehmung. Vibrationsempfinden und Propriozeption sind normal oder m\u00e4\u00dfig vermindert. Knochenbr\u00fcche heilen nur langsam, und gro\u00dfe gewichttragende Gelenke sind besonders anf\u00e4llig f\u00fcr wiederholte Traumata und f\u00fchren h\u00e4ufig zur Entwicklung von Charcot-Gelenken und Osteomyelitis. Hypotonie und verz\u00f6gerte Entwicklungsmeilensteine sind in den ersten Jahren h\u00e4ufig, normalisieren sich aber manchmal mit dem Alter. Die Sprache ist normalerweise klar, aber es treten schwere Lernschwierigkeiten, Reizbarkeit, Hyperaktivit\u00e4t und kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen auf. Bei einigen wenigen Patienten wurde eine normale Intelligenz festgestellt. Eine milde posturale Hypotonie mit kompensatorischer Tachykardie kann vorhanden sein, jedoch keine episodische Hypertonie. Etwa 20 % der Patienten haben eine Skoliose.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit wird durch Mutationen im NTRK1-Gen (1q21-22) verursacht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose erfordert zwei klinische Kriterien: Anhidrose und verminderte Schmerzwahrnehmung. Ein Gentest im NTRK1-Gen kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen. Die Hautbiopsie zeigt fehlende C- und A-Delta-Fasern in der Epidermis und hypoplastische dermale Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen ohne Innervation. Die Plasmakonzentration von Noradrenalin ist extrem niedrig oder nicht nachweisbar, aber Epinephrin, Vasopressin und die Plasma-Renin-Aktivit\u00e4t sind normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst andere heredit\u00e4re sensorische und autonome Neuropathien, von denen sie sich durch fehlendes oder deutlich vermindertes Schwitzen unterscheidet.", "genetic_counseling": "Das Vererbungsmuster ist autosomal-rezessiv. Wenn beide Elternteile nicht betroffene Tr\u00e4ger sind, betr\u00e4gt das Risiko der Krankheits\u00fcbertragung auf die Nachkommen 25%. Nachkommen von betroffenen Personen sind obligate Tr\u00e4ger.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung ist unterst\u00fctzend und zielt auf eine Kontrolle der Hyperthermie, Verhinderung von Selbstmutilation und Behandlung orthop\u00e4discher Probleme, um schwere, zur Invalidit\u00e4t f\u00fchrende Deformationen zu vermeiden. Bei ihrer Auseinandersetzung mit Verhaltens- und Erziehungsproblemen ben\u00f6tigen die Familien Hilfe.", "prognosis": "Die Aussicht der Patienten auf selbst\u00e4ndige Aktivit\u00e4ten h\u00e4ngt vom Schweregrad der Erkrankung und der Beherrschung sekund\u00e4rer klinischer Probleme ab.", "summary": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, weltweit wurden mehrere hundert F\u00e4lle berichtet. Die meisten der beschriebenen F\u00e4lle stammen aus der israelischen Beduinenbev\u00f6lkerung und Japan, wo die Pr\u00e4valenz auf 1/600.000-950.000 gesch\u00e4tzt wird."}, {"name": "Schmetterlingsf\u00f6rmige Musterdystrophie", "sub_name": "Pigmentdystrophie, schmetterlingsf\u00f6rmige", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die schmetterlingsf\u00f6rmige Pigmentdystrophie ist eine figurierte Dystrophie des retinalen Pigmentepithels (s. dort), die durch eine abnorme Ansammlung von Lipofuscin in einer schmetterlingsf\u00f6rmigen Verteilung auf dem Niveau des retinalen Pigmentepithels gekennzeichnet ist. Patienten zeigen einen langsam fortschreitenden Sehverlust, der oft erst im Alter auftritt.", "synonyms": "Makuladystrophie, schmetterlingsf\u00f6rmige, Schmetterlingsf\u00f6rmige Musterdystrophie, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "OMIM": "169150\u00a0 608970\u00a0 610125"}, {"name": "Schmid-Fraccaro-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Katzenaugensyndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Katzenaugensyndrom (CES) ist eine seltene Chromosomenst\u00f6rung mit einer sehr variablen klinischen Pr\u00e4sentation. Die meisten Patienten weisen multiple Fehlbildungen auf, die die Augen (Iris-Kolobom), die Ohren (pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Gruben und/oder Anh\u00e4nge), die Analregion (Analatresie), das Herz und die Nieren betreffen. Die Intelligenz ist in der Regel leicht beeintr\u00e4chtig oder grenzwertig normal.", "synonyms": "CES, Cat-Eye-Syndrom, Iriskolobom - Analatresie, Schmid-Fraccaro-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q92.8", "OMIM": "115470", "UMLS": "C0265493", "MeSH": "C535918", "GARD": "26", "epidemiology": "CES hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz von 1/50.000 bis 1/150.000 Lebendgeburten. Es liegt keine Geschlechtspr\u00e4ferenz vor.", "clinical_description": "CES deckt ein sehr breites klinisches Spektrum in Bezug auf Merkmale und Schweregrad ab, das von einem normalen Ph\u00e4notyp bis zu einer schweren multisystemischen Erkrankung reicht. Die 3 wichtigsten sichtbaren Merkmale sind pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Anomalien, Analatresie und Iris-Kolobom, aber keines davon wird durchg\u00e4ngig gefunden. Pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Hautanh\u00e4ngsel und/oder Gr\u00fcbchen sind das konsistenteste Merkmal. Die typische Augenanomalie ist bei bis zu 50% der Patienten nicht vorhanden. Das Augenkolobom kann die Iris, die Aderhaut und/oder die Netzhaut betreffen. Weniger h\u00e4ufig werden einseitige Mikrophtalmie, Aniridie, Hornhauttr\u00fcbung, Katarakt und/oder Duane-Anomalie beobachtet. Zus\u00e4tzlich zu Ohranh\u00e4ngseln und/oder Gr\u00fcbchen k\u00f6nnen die \u00e4u\u00dferen Ohren tief angesetzt und stark reduziert sein mit m\u00f6glicher Atresie des \u00e4u\u00dferen Geh\u00f6rgangs. Charakteristische Gesichtsmerkmale sind nach unten verlaufende Lidspalten, innere Epikanthusfalten, Hypertelorismus, flacher Nasenr\u00fccken und ein kleiner Unterkiefer. Eine Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte wird manchmal beobachtet. Bei einigen Personen ist der Analkanal eng oder nicht vorhanden mit einer Rektalfistel, die in eine ungew\u00f6hnliche Stelle m\u00fcndet (die Blase, die Vagina oder den Damm). Der am h\u00e4ufigsten berichtete angeborene Herzfehler ist die kongenitale totalen Lungenvenenfehlm\u00fcndung, seltener wird die Fallot-Tetralogie (s. dort) beschrieben. Zu den kongenitalen Nierenanomalien geh\u00f6ren das Fehlen einer oder beider Nieren, Hydronephrose, \u00fcberz\u00e4hlige Nieren und/oder Nierenhypoplasie. Zu den Skelettanomalien geh\u00f6ren Wirbels\u00e4ulendefekte und Fehlbildungen der Gliedma\u00dfen. M\u00f6gliche gastrointestinale Fehlbildungen sind bili\u00e4re Atresie, intestinale Malrotation und/oder Hirschsprung-Krankheit (s. dort). Weitere variable Merkmale sind Hernien, Kryptorchismus und Hypospadie bei den M\u00e4nnern. Seltenere Fehlbildungen k\u00f6nnen fast jedes Organ betreffen. Die meisten Patienten haben eine leichte Intelligenzminderung (seltener mittelschwer bis schwer), aber einige wenige haben eine normale kognitive Entwicklung. Kleinwuchs mit Wachstumshormonmangel ist in einigen F\u00e4llen m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Die meisten Patienten haben ein kleines \u00fcberz\u00e4hliges Markerchromosomen (sSMC), das zu einer partiellen Tetrasomie von 22pter-22q11 f\u00fchrt. In einem Drittel der F\u00e4lle ist dieses zus\u00e4tzliche Chromosom in einem Mosaikzustand vorhanden. Andere zytogenetische Anomalien sind selten berichtet worden, einschlie\u00dflich einer partiellen Trisomie von Chromosom 22 und einer intrachromosomalen Triplikation der 22q11-Region.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird aufgrund der klinischen Manifestationen vermutet und basiert auf einer zytogenetischen Untersuchung, die das Vorhandensein von zus\u00e4tzlichem Material von Chromosom 22q11 zeigt. Die Fluoreszenz-in situ-Hybridisierung (FISH) mit spezifischen Sonden ist erforderlich, um ein niedriggradiges chromosomales Mosaik nachzuweisen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst andere chromosomale St\u00f6rungen mit \u00fcberlappenden Ph\u00e4notypen wie das CHARGE-Syndrom und die VACTERL/VATER-Assoziation (siehe diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist durch Karyotypisierung und FISH-Analyse von pr\u00e4natalen Proben m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Das zus\u00e4tzliche Chromosom entsteht meist de novo.", "management_and_treatment": "Ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Management ist notwendig und h\u00e4ngt von den spezifischen Symptomen ab, die sich bei den Patienten zeigen. Eine chirurgische Korrektur ist bei Analatresie und schweren kardialen Fehlbildungen erforderlich. Bakterielle Infektionen sollten rechtzeitig erkannt und mit gro\u00dfer Sorgfalt behandelt werden. Die Patienten sollten auf Seh- und H\u00f6rbehinderungen untersucht werden. Eine fr\u00fche Intervention mit p\u00e4dagogischer Unterst\u00fctzung kann von Vorteil sein.", "prognosis": "Einige Patienten sterben an schweren Fehlbildungen im fr\u00fchen S\u00e4uglingsalter. Ansonsten ist die Lebenserwartung in der Regel nicht wesentlich reduziert.", "summary": "CES hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz von 1/50.000 bis 1/150.000 Lebendgeburten. Es liegt keine Geschlechtspr\u00e4ferenz vor."}, {"name": "Schmidt-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Autoimmun-Polyendokrinopathie Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, endocrine disease characterized by autoimmune Addison disease associated with autoimmune thyroid disease or type I diabetes mellitus, or both, and without chronic candidiasis. Additional endocrine (hypogonadism, hypoparathyroidism) and non-endocrine diseases (vitiligo, autoimmune hepatitis, autoimmune gastritis, pernicious anemia, and myasthenia gravies) may be present.", "synonyms": "APS type 2, APS2, Autoimmune polyendocrine syndrome type 2, Autoimmune polyglandular syndrome type 2, Autoimmune thyroid disease and/or type 1 diabetes-Addison disease syndrome, Schmidt syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "E31.0", "omim": "269200", "umls": "C0085860", "gard": "7611"}, {"name": "Schneckenbecken-Dysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Chondrodysplasie mit schnecken\u00e4hnlichem Becken, SLC35D1-CDG, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "269250", "UMLS": "C0432194", "MeSH": "C536637", "GARD": "169", "summary": "Die Schneckenbecken-Dysplasie (oder Chondrodysplasie mit schnecken\u00e4hnlichem Becken) ist eine pr\u00e4natal lethale spondylodysplastische Dysplasie. Bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Der typische r\u00f6ntgenologische Befund ist ein schneckenf\u00f6rmiges, hypoplastisches Becken. Weitere Merkmale sind abgeflachte, hypoplastische Wirbelk\u00f6rper, kurze Rippen, kurze und verbreiterte Fibula, verk\u00fcrzte und verbreiterte lange Knochen mit hantel\u00e4hnlichem Aussehen und vorzeitig verkn\u00f6cherter Tarsus. Ursache dieses autosomal-rezessiv vererbten Syndroms sind Funktionsverlust-Mutationen des SLC35D1-Gens (1p32-p31). "}, {"name": "Schneeflocken-Vitreoretinopathie", "sub_name": "Vitreoretinale Schneeflocken-Degeneration", "german_description": "Die Schneeflocken-Vitreoretinopathie (snowflake vitreoretinal degeneration, SVD) ist gekennzeichnet durch kleine, granul\u00e4re, schneeflocken-\u00e4hnliche Ablagerungen in der Retina, fibrill\u00e4re Degeneration des Glask\u00f6rpers und Katarakt. Die Krankheit wurde in mehreren Familien beschrieben, die Pr\u00e4valenz ist aber nicht bekannt. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. Das urs\u00e4chliche Gen wurde in die Chromosomenregion 2q36 kartiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Snowflake vitreoretinal degeneration (SVD) is characterised by the presence of small granular-like deposits resembling snowflakes in the retina, fibrillary vitreous degeneration and cataract. The prevalence is unknown but the disorder has been described in several families. Transmission is autosomal dominant and the causative gene has been localised to a small region on chromosome 2q36.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "H35.5", "omim": "193230", "umls": "C1860405", "mesh": "C536677", "gard": "9706"}, {"name": "Schnitzler-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden, vor allem in Europa, etwa 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. M\u00e4nner sind etwas h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als Frauen. Das mittlere Erkrankungsalter ist 51 Jahre. Zwischen dem Auftreten der Symptome und der Diagnose liegen oft mehr als 5 Jahre.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Schnitzler syndrome is a rare, underdiagnosed disorder in adults characterized by recurrent febrile rash, bone and/or joint pain, enlarged lymph nodes, fatigue, a monoclonal IgM component, leukocytosis and systemic inflammatory response.", "synonyms": "Chronic urticaria with gammopathy, Chronic urticaria with macroglobulinemia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "L50.8", "umls": "C0524988", "mesh": "D019873", "gard": "12390", "meddra": "10062908", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is unknown and about 150 cases have been reported, primarily in Europe.", "clinical_description": "There is a slight male predominance and mean age of disease onset is 51 years. Time to diagnosis often exceeds 5 years. The first clinical sign is usually a mildly or non-pruritic skin rash. Elementary lesions are rose or red macules or slightly elevated plaques, which resolve within 24 hours. Lesions can occur on every body part, though involvement of face and extremities is rare. The frequency and duration of flares are variable. Almost all patients develop intermittent fever and body temperature can rise above 40\u00b0C. Fever is usually well tolerated and chills are rare. About 80% of patients experience bone and/or joint pain. Bone involvement is common, and 30 to 40% of patients show bone lesions on imaging studies. IgM levels can remain stable or progressively increase at a rate of about 0.5 to 1 g/L/year. Other signs include elevated erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), inflammatory anemia sometimes with thrombocytosis (up to 50 % of cases), palpable lymph nodes (45%), and hepatic or splenic enlargement (30%). The monoclonal IgM component is a defining feature of the disease. Inflammatory AA amyloidosis may be a serious complication. The disease follows a chronic course.", "etiology": "Etiology remains unclear but the syndrome is probably an acquired auto-inflammatory disorder. It shares many features with genetically determined auto-inflammatory diseases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on a combination of clinical, laboratory and radiological findings and on exclusion of another cause. Histopathological skin findings are noteworthy showing a neutrophilic infiltrate of the dermis, without vasculitis and without significant edema, characteristic of neutrophilic urticarial dermatosis. An immediate and marked response to anakinra treatment is supportive of the diagnosis. The initial work-up should include an examination of bone marrow, immunoelectrophoresis of serum and urinary proteins, and determination of immunoglobulin subtypes. The two latter examinations can then be used for follow-up on a biannual basis. Lymph nodes should be biopsied when they are enlarged.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes adult-onset Still's disease, hypocomplementic urticarial vasculitis, cryoglobulinemia, hyper IgD syndrome, and acquired C1 inhibitor deficiency (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "Some treatments provide only incomplete and/or transient improvement or control of symptoms (steroids, non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs, colchicine, dapsone, peflacine, phototherapy) while others are mostly ineffective (anti-histamines, rituximab, intravenous immunoglobulins, TNF-blocking agents, immunosuppressive drugs). In contrast, the IL-1 receptor antagonist anakinra relieves all symptoms within hours after the first injection. Injection-site reactions are frequent with anakinra and sometimes severe, and can be a real concern. The neutrophil count must be monitored.", "prognosis": "The overall prognosis depends on the development of lymphoproliferative complications such as lymphoma, IgM myeloma or Waldenstr\u00f6m's disease (see these terms). Although these complications have only been reported in about 20% of cases, their incidence may be higher since they generally develop more than 10 to 20 years after the first signs of the syndrome."}, {"name": "Schn\u00fcrring-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Schn\u00fcrring-Syndrom ist eine angeborene Fehlbildung der Gliedma\u00dfen mit einer extrem variablen klinischen Pr\u00e4sentation. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch das Vorhandensein von partiellen bis vollst\u00e4ndigen, angeborenen, faserigen, umlaufenden und ringf\u00f6rmigen Einschn\u00fcrungsb\u00e4ndern/-ringen, die jedes K\u00f6rperteil betreffen k\u00f6nnen, aber besonders h\u00e4ufig an den oberen oder unteren Extremit\u00e4ten beobachtet werden. Die Ph\u00e4notypen reichen von einer nur leichten Eindellung der Haut bis hin zur vollst\u00e4ndigen Amputation von Teilen des F\u00f6tus (z. B. Zehen, distale Gliedma\u00dfe). Die Kompression durch die Ringe kann zu \u00d6demen, Skelettanomalien (z. B. Frakturen, Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten) und in seltenen F\u00e4llen zu neuralen Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen f\u00fchren.", "synonyms": "Amnion-Schn\u00fcrfurchensyndrom, Amniotisches-Band-Syndrom, Kongenitale Schn\u00fcrringe, Streeter-Dysplasie, ", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.8", "OMIM": "217100"}, {"name": "Schnyder-Hornhautdystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Hornhautdystrophie Typ Schnyder (SCD) ist eine seltene Form der Stroma-Hornhautdystrophie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Tr\u00fcbung oder Kristallablagerung im Hornhautstroma und progrediente Abnahme der Sehkraft.", "synonyms": "Kristalline stromale Dystrophie, SCCD, SCD, Schnyder\u0092sche kristalline Hornhautdystrophie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H18.5", "OMIM": "121800", "UMLS": "C0271287", "MeSH": "C535475", "GARD": "9277", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich in der Regel fr\u00fch im Leben und meist beidseitig, aber nicht immer gleichzeitig in beiden Augen. Einige Patienten klagen \u00fcber Blendung, die mit dem Alter zunimmt. Die Sehkraft nimmt allm\u00e4hlich ab. \u00dcber begleitende systemische St\u00f6rungen wird h\u00e4ufig berichtet (Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie, Arcus lipoides und Genu valgum). Im Verlauf entwickeln sich im Hornhautstroma kleine wei\u00dfe Tr\u00fcbungen mit diffuser nebelartiger Eintr\u00fcbung. Bei etwa 50 % der Patienten sind klinisch keine Kristalle erkennbar.", "etiology": "Die Ursache der SCD sind Mutationen im UBIAD1-Gen (1p36.22).", "diagnostic_methods": "In typischen F\u00e4llen entsteht eine ringf\u00f6rmige, gelblich-wei\u00dfe Tr\u00fcbung, die aus unz\u00e4hligen feinen nadelf\u00f6rmigen Kristallen in der Bowman-Schicht und im benachbarten vorderen Stroma der Hornhautmitte besteht. Das Hornhautepithel und -endothel und die Descemet-Membran sind nicht betroffen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die SCD muss von anderen Lipid-Keratopathien und besonders vom Lecithin-Cholesterol-Acyltransferase (LCAT)-Mangel (s. dort) unterschieden werden.", "genetic_counseling": "\u00dcber autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde berichtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Das ver\u00e4nderte oberfl\u00e4chliche Hornhautgewebe muss nicht exzidiert werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Schnyder\u0092sche kristalline Hornhautdystrophie", "sub_name": "Schnyder-Hornhautdystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Hornhautdystrophie Typ Schnyder (SCD) ist eine seltene Form der Stroma-Hornhautdystrophie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Tr\u00fcbung oder Kristallablagerung im Hornhautstroma und progrediente Abnahme der Sehkraft.", "synonyms": "Kristalline stromale Dystrophie, SCCD, SCD, Schnyder\u0092sche kristalline Hornhautdystrophie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H18.5", "OMIM": "121800", "UMLS": "C0271287", "MeSH": "C535475", "GARD": "9277", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich in der Regel fr\u00fch im Leben und meist beidseitig, aber nicht immer gleichzeitig in beiden Augen. Einige Patienten klagen \u00fcber Blendung, die mit dem Alter zunimmt. Die Sehkraft nimmt allm\u00e4hlich ab. \u00dcber begleitende systemische St\u00f6rungen wird h\u00e4ufig berichtet (Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie, Arcus lipoides und Genu valgum). Im Verlauf entwickeln sich im Hornhautstroma kleine wei\u00dfe Tr\u00fcbungen mit diffuser nebelartiger Eintr\u00fcbung. Bei etwa 50 % der Patienten sind klinisch keine Kristalle erkennbar.", "etiology": "Die Ursache der SCD sind Mutationen im UBIAD1-Gen (1p36.22).", "diagnostic_methods": "In typischen F\u00e4llen entsteht eine ringf\u00f6rmige, gelblich-wei\u00dfe Tr\u00fcbung, die aus unz\u00e4hligen feinen nadelf\u00f6rmigen Kristallen in der Bowman-Schicht und im benachbarten vorderen Stroma der Hornhautmitte besteht. Das Hornhautepithel und -endothel und die Descemet-Membran sind nicht betroffen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die SCD muss von anderen Lipid-Keratopathien und besonders vom Lecithin-Cholesterol-Acyltransferase (LCAT)-Mangel (s. dort) unterschieden werden.", "genetic_counseling": "\u00dcber autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde berichtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Das ver\u00e4nderte oberfl\u00e4chliche Hornhautgewebe muss nicht exzidiert werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophie ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Schoenlein-Henoch-Purpura", "sub_name": "Immunoglobulin A-Vaskulitis", "german_description": "Die Schoenlein-Henoch-Purpura (SHP) ist eine systemische IgA-Vasculitis der kleinen Gef\u00e4\u00dfe. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch Purpura, Arthritis und abdominelle und/oder renale Beteiligung. Die SHP tritt \u00fcberwiegend bei Kindern auf, bei Erwachsenen ist sie selten: Sch\u00e4tzungen der Jahres-Inzidenz liegen f\u00fcr Kinder zwischen 1:6.660 und 1:4.880 und bei etwa 1: 1 Million f\u00fcr Erwachsene. Das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis m : w ist 1,5 : 1. Die Patienten haben eine meist symmetrische vaskul\u00e4re Purpura des Ges\u00e4\u00dfes und der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen. Bei Erwachsenen ist der Verlauf durch nekrotische oder h\u00e4morrhagische bull\u00f6se L\u00e4sionen kompliziert. Die L\u00e4sionen bilden sich allm\u00e4hlich zur\u00fcck und verschwinden nach wenigen Tagen ganz. In 80% der F\u00e4lle kommt es nicht zu Rezidiven. Die Patienten haben Gelenkschmerzen vor allem in den Knien und Sprunggelenken. Leibschmerzen sind h\u00e4ufig und k\u00f6nnen mit lebensbedrohlichen Magen-Darm-Blutungen einhergehen. Eine Nierenbeteiligung kommt h\u00e4ufiger bei Erwachsenen vor und hat dann einen schwereren Verlauf. Meist besteht eine mikroskopische H\u00e4maturie mit unterschiedlich starker Proteinurie. Nephrotisches Syndrom, Nierenversagen und Bluthochdruck sind m\u00f6gliche Komplikationen. Seltene Symptome sind: Kopfschmerzen, zerebrale Kr\u00e4mpfe, Paresen, Orchiepididymitis, Urethritis, Pankreatitis, Myositis, Episkleritis, Lungenblutungen und Myokarditis. Die SHP ist begleitet von einer Ablagerung IgA-dominierter Immunkomplexe in Arteriolen, Kapillaren und Venulen, wobei die Ursache hierf\u00fcr nicht genau bekannt ist. Als Ausl\u00f6ser der Krankheit werden Bakterien, Medikamente, Nahrungsmittel und Insektenstiche diskutiert. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen und histopathologischen Befunde: In Haut- und Nierenbiopsien sind Gewebsablagerungen von IgA nachweisbar, im Blut zirkulierende IgA-Immunkomplexe. Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Ursachen von Purpura, z.B. Thrombozytopenie, h\u00e4matologische Erkrankungen oder Infektionskrankheiten. Bei Erwachsenen muss differential-diagnostisch auch an Wegener-Granulomatose, Churg-Strauss-Syndrom, mikroskopische Polyangiitis, systemischen Lupus erythematodes und gemischte Kryoglobulin\u00e4mie gedacht werden (s. diese Termini). Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch. Die Anwendung von Steroiden und/oder Immunsuppressiva wird kontrovers diskutiert, kann aber in F\u00e4llen schwerer gastrointestinaler oder renaler Manifestationen erwogen werden. Magen-Darm- und Lungenblutungen k\u00f6nnen lebensbedrohlich sein. Die Langzeitprognose wird durch eine Nierenbeteiligung bestimmt. Langzeitstudien an erwachsenen Patienten ergaben, dass bis zu einem Drittel der Patienten ein terminales Nierenversagen erleiden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, small-vessel vasculitis characterized by skin purpura, arthritis, abdominal and/or renal involvement, IgA tissue deposits (arterioles, capillaries, and venules) and circulating IgA immune complexes.", "synonyms": "Anaphylactoid purpura, Henoch-Sch\u00f6nlein purpura, IgA vasculitis, Purpura rheumatica, Rheumatoid purpura, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "D69.0", "umls": "C0034152\u00a0 C0086922", "gard": "8204", "epidemiology": "The disease usually affects children and is rare in adults. Annual incidence in children is estimated at between 1/4,880 and 1/6,660, whereas it is estimated at around 1/1,000,000 in adults. The male-to-female ratio is 1.5:1.", "clinical_description": "Patients present with vascular purpura that is usually symmetrical and primarily localized to the buttocks and legs. In adults it is more frequently complicated by necrotic or hemorrhagic bullous lesions. The lesions progressively regress, disappear after a few days and, in 80% of cases, never reappear. Patients also present with arthralgia, predominantly involving the knees and ankles. Abdominal pain is common and may be associated with life-threatening gastrointestinal bleeding. Renal involvement is more severe and frequent in adults. It usually consists of microscopic hematuria with varying degrees of proteinuria. Nephrotic syndrome, renal failure, and hypertension may also occur. Other manifestations are rare but may include headaches, seizures, paresis, orchiepididymitis, uretritis, pancreatitis, myositis, episcleritis, pulmonary bleeding and myocarditis.", "etiology": "The disease is associated with deposition of IgA-dominant immune complexes in arterioles, capillaries, and venules, but the exact etiology remains unknown. Several different viral or bacterial organisms, drugs, foods, and insect bites have been implicated as the initiating factors of the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical and histopathological findings. Examination of skin and kidney biopsies reveals tissue deposition of IgA with circulating IgA immune complexes.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other causes of purpura such as thrombopenia, hemopathy or infectious diseases. In adults, ANCA associated vasculitis, systemic lupus erythematosus, and mixed cryoglobulinemia should also be considered in the differential diagnosis.", "management_and_treatment": "The treatment is symptomatic. The use of steroids and/or immunosuppressors is controversial but may be considered in case of severe gastrointestinal or renal manifestations. Renin-angiotensin-system blockers should be started as soon as the proteinuria/creatinine ratio is greater than 50 mg/mmol.", "prognosis": "Gastrointestinal or pulmonary bleeding can be life-threatening. The long term prognosis depends on the extent of the renal involvement. Long term follow-up studies of adult series show that end-stage renal failure may occur in up to one-third of patients."}, {"name": "Sch\u00f6pf-Schulz-Passarge-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Sch\u00f6pf-Schulz-Passarge-Syndrom (SSPS) ist eine seltene, autosomal-rezessiv vererbte ektodermale Dysplasie mit multiplen Hydrokystomen der apokrinen Dr\u00fcsen der Augenlider, mit palmoplantarer Keratodermie, Hypotrichose, Hypodontie und Nageldystrophie.", "synonyms": "Ekkrine Tumore - ektodermale Dysplasie, Palmoplantarkeratose-zystische Augenlider-Hypodontie-Hypotrichose-Syndrom, SSPS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "Q82.8", "OMIM": "224750", "UMLS": "C1857069", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden mehr als 25 F\u00e4lle mit SSPS beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das SSPS bezeichnet einen abgegrenzten Ph\u00e4notyp von ektodermaler Dysplasie mit relativ gutartigen Verlauf und deshalb sp\u00e4t (oft erst im Erwachsenenalter) gestellter Diagnose. Die Symptome beginnen im Kindesalter und fr\u00fcher Adoleszenz. Die Symptome sind jedoch relativ unspezifisch, mit unterschiedlich ausgepr\u00e4gter Hypodontie, Hypotrichose, palmoplantarer Keratodermie und Nageldystrophie. Ein weiteres, relativ h\u00e4ufiges Symptom ist die teleangieektatische Rosacea. Im sp\u00e4ten Erwachsenenalter treten apokrine Hydrokystome der Augenlider auf. Bei etwa der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle wird eine palmo-plantare Keratodermie mit histologischen Merkmalen eines ekkrinen Syringofibroadenoms gesehen, die gelegentlich ein malignes Potenzial entwickelt. Andere Tumoren der Haut-Adnexen sind: Basalzell-Karzinom, ekkrines Porom, benignes Akanthom und follikul\u00e4rer Infundibulum-Tumor. Einige Patienten haben ein vogelartiges Gesicht. Innerhalb des WNT10A-Mutationsspektrums werden die Odonto-onycho-dermale Dysplasie (siehe dort) und das SSPS als diskrete Entit\u00e4ten angesehen, wobei eine wachsende Zahl von Patienten mit unvollst\u00e4ndigen Ph\u00e4notypen (odonto-onychiale, tricho-odontale und tricho-odonto-onychiale Typen) beschrieben werden", "etiology": "Ursache des SSPS sind homozygote oder compound-heterozygote Mutationen im WNT10A-Gen (2q35). Unvollst\u00e4ndige oder \u00f6rtlich begrenzte Expression der Krankheit bei heterozygotem und mehrfachem Auftreten von Konsanguinit\u00e4t f\u00fchren gelegentlich zu pseudodominanter Vererbung.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Bisher wurden mehr als 25 F\u00e4lle mit SSPS beschrieben."}, {"name": "Schreckepilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schreckepilepsie ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch h\u00e4ufige und spontane epileptische Anf\u00e4lle (h\u00e4ufig mit symmetrischen oder asymmetrischen tonischen Merkmalen) gekennzeichnet ist, ausgel\u00f6st durch einen normalen Schreck als Reaktion auf einen pl\u00f6tzlichen und unerwarteten somatosensorischen (meist auditiven) Reiz. St\u00fcrze sind h\u00e4ufig und k\u00f6nnen traumatisch sein. In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit mit spastischer Hemi-, Di- oder Tetraplegie und Intelligenzminderung verbunden.", "synonyms": "Startle-Epilepsie, ", "ICD-10": "G40.5"}, {"name": "Schulterblatthochstand", "sub_name": "Sprengel-Deformit\u00e4t", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare thoracic malformation characterized by an underdeveloped and abnormally high scapula due to its failure to descend to the regular position during embryonic development. The defect is in most cases unilateral and may be associated with other abnormalities, such as deformities of vertebral bodies, fused or absent ribs, or genitourinary anomalies, among others.", "synonyms": "High scapula, ", "icd_10": "Q74.0", "omim": "184400", "umls": "C0152438", "mesh": "C535802", "gard": "7693", "meddra": "10010455"}, {"name": "Schulterdislokation, kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital limb malformation characterized by true congenital dislocation of the shoulder, developing in utero. It can be unilateral or bilateral and is usually associated with other abnormalities of the shoulder girdle, such as in the glenoid, the humeral head, the joint capsule, and the scapula. In addition, it may be accompanied by other malformations, like developmental hip dysplasia or cardiac malformation.", "icd_10": "Q68.8", "umls": "C0265562"}, {"name": "Schulterg\u00fcrtel-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Neuralgische Amyotrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Neuralgische Amyotrophie (NA) ist eine seltene St\u00f6rung des peripheren Nervensystems mit pl\u00f6tzlich einsetzenden extremen Schmerzen in den oberen Extremit\u00e4ten und schnell folgender multifokaler Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie. Danach setzt langsam, \u00fcber mehrere Monate oder Jahre, die Erholung ein. Die NA umfasst eine idiopathische (INA, auch als Parsonage-Turner-Syndrom bezeichnet) und eine erbliche (HNA) Form.", "synonyms": "Armplexusneuritis, Brachial-Plexus-Neuropathie, autoimmune, Brachialplexitis, akute, Neuralgische Schultermyatrophie, Schulterg\u00fcrtel-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G54.5", "OMIM": "162100", "UMLS": "C0221759\u00a0 C1510479", "GARD": "4228", "MedDRA": "10063020", "epidemiology": "Die Inzidenz der NA wird auf 1/50.000-1/30.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, jedoch sind zu geringe Erkennung und anf\u00e4ngliche Fehldiagnosen h\u00e4ufig. Es wird angenommen, dass die INA 10 Mal h\u00e4ufiger ist als die HNA.", "clinical_description": "Die NA kann in jedem Alter auftreten, jedoch wird sie an h\u00e4ufigsten in der dritten bis siebenten Lebensdekade beobachtet. M\u00e4nner sind h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als Frauen. Die Krankheit beginnt bei Patienten mit HNA in der Regel fr\u00fcher als bei Patienten mit INA, aber klinisch sind beide nahezu ununterscheidbar. Das klassische Erscheinungsbild (71% der F\u00e4lle) zeigt sich mit pl\u00f6tzlichem Auftreten von brennenden oder stechenden Schmerzen, meist in den Schultern, im Hals und/oder in den Armen, mit Verbreitung entlang des oberen Plexus brachialis. Diese Schmerzen sind in der Regel unerbittlich, sie verschlimmern sich nachts und dauern etwa 3 Wochen an. Einige Stunden bis Wochen nach dem ersten Einsetzen der Schmerzen folgen Schw\u00e4che in den periskapul\u00e4ren und periglenohumeralen Muskeln. Weitere Symptome k\u00f6nnen aufgrund der Beteiligung von Nerven au\u00dferhalb des Plexus brachialis auftreten, etwa des Plexus lumbosacralis oder der phrenischen Nerven. Patienten mit HNA und SEPT9-R88W-Punktmutation zeigen charakteristische K\u00f6rpermerkmale (z.B. Hypotelorismus, schr\u00e4ge Lidspalten, Epikanthus, ovales Gesicht, Gaumenspalte). Bei einigen Patienten zeigt sich ein rezidivierender/remittierender Verlauf mit symptomfreien Intervallen, w\u00e4hrend bei anderen eine unvollst\u00e4ndige Heilung mit einer bleibenden neurologischen Beeintr\u00e4chtigung eintritt. Rezidive k\u00f6nnen auftreten (75% bei der HNA und 25% bei der INA) und ein persistierender Schmerz im Bewegungsapparat entwickelt sich bei 2/3 der Patienten.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie ist nicht genau bekannt, aber es wird angenommen, dass genetische, autoimmune und \u00e4u\u00dfere Faktoren beteiligt sind. Der Plexus brachialis ist anf\u00e4llig f\u00fcr eine mechanische Verletzung und f\u00fcr Attacken, die durch eine immunvermittelte Reaktion in diesem Nerv verursacht werden. Eine Virusinfektion oder Immunisierung kann einer NA vorausgehen. Bakterielle und parasitische Infektionen, eine Operation, eine An\u00e4sthesie, eine rheumatische Erkrankung, Trauma, Schwangerschaft und Geburt wurden als m\u00f6gliche mitwirkende Faktoren f\u00fcr NA-Attacken genannt. Die HNA ist in 50% der F\u00e4lle mit einer Punktmutation oder Duplizierung des Suszeptibilit\u00e4tsgens SEPT9 (17q25.3) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den typischen klinischen Merkmalen und dem Ausschluss anderer St\u00f6rungen (z.B. Neuroborreliose, zervikale Radikulopathie oder Pancoast-Syndrom) durch Labortests, Elektromyographie, Aufnahmen der Halswirbels\u00e4ule und Darstellung des Plexus brachialis. Bei Verdacht auf eine HNA kann ein molekulargenetischer Test zum Nachweis einer SEPT9-Mutation eingesetzt werden, da jedoch die HNA genetisch heterogen ist, schlie\u00dft ein negativer Test die Diagnose nicht aus.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose wird nicht routinem\u00e4\u00dfig angeboten.", "genetic_counseling": "Gegenstand der genetischen Beratung ist die Analyse des Suszeptibilit\u00e4tsgens f\u00fcr HNA.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur Behandlung in der akuten Phase geh\u00f6rt das Schmerzmanagement, das sich vor allem auf eine Kombination von langwirkenden Opioiden und nicht-steroidalen Antirheumatika st\u00fctzt. Patienten mit chronischen Schmerzen k\u00f6nnen Co-Analgetika gegeben werden. Orales Prednison verringert die Dauer der Schmerzen und beschleunigt die Rekonvaleszenz bei einigen Patienten, wenn es in den ersten Wochen einer Schmerzattacke gegeben wird. Eine t\u00e4gliche Dosis von 1mg/kg \u00fcber 1 Woche, die w\u00e4hrend der zweiten Woche nach und nach verringert wird, wird empfohlen. Eine Nachuntersuchung alle 6 Monate wird empfohlen. Heute gilt eine Rehabilitationstherapie als wichtig und eine \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfige Belastung des betroffenen Bereichs sollte vermieden werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich, gilt aber als gut und die Patienten erreichen nach 1-2 Jahren wieder 70-90% ihrer vorherigen Gesundheit. Allerdings bleibt bei vielen eine Intoleranz gegen Sport\u00fcbungen und eine schwache Muskelkoordination in den betroffenen und den kompensierenden Muskeln. Die Lebensqualit\u00e4t kann bei Patienten mit nur unvollst\u00e4ndiger Erholung eingeschr\u00e4nkt sein, jedoch erh\u00f6hen eine fr\u00fche Diagnose und eine geeignete Behandlung die Chancen f\u00fcr eine vollst\u00e4ndige Wiederherstellung der Funktionsf\u00e4higkeit.", "summary": "Die Inzidenz der NA wird auf 1/50.000-1/30.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, jedoch sind zu geringe Erkennung und anf\u00e4ngliche Fehldiagnosen h\u00e4ufig. Es wird angenommen, dass die INA 10 Mal h\u00e4ufiger ist als die HNA."}, {"name": "Sch\u00fctzengrabenfieber", "sub_name": "F\u00fcnf-Tage-Fieber", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare bacterial infectious disease caused by the louse-borne bacterium Bartonella quintana and characterized by a variable clinical picture with acute or insidious onset of a (potentially relapsing) febrile illness, headache, leg pain (most typically the shinbone), endocarditis, and thrombocytopenia. There may also be only non-specific symptoms that mimic other infections. The disease nowadays most commonly affects socially disadvantaged persons in urban areas.", "synonyms": "Bartonellosis due to Bartonella quintana infection, ", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A79.0", "umls": "C0040830", "mesh": "D014205", "meddra": "10044582"}, {"name": "Schwangerschaft, Geburt und Wochenbett, seltene Krankheiten in Relation zu", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schwangerschaftscholestase, intrahepatische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Cholestase, schwangerschaftsbedingte, Schwangerschaftscholestase, intrahepatische rekurrente, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "O26.6", "OMIM": "147480\u00a0 614972", "MeSH": "C535932", "GARD": "9804", "summary": "Die Intrahepatische Schwangerschaftscholestase (ICP) ist eine St\u00f6rung des Galleflusses, gekennzeichnet durch (i) Pruritus mit Beginn im 2. oder 3. Trimenon der Schwangerschaft, (ii) erh\u00f6hte Serumwerte der Transaminasen und Gallens\u00e4uren und (iii) spontane Regression der Zeichen und Symptome innerhalb von 2-3 Wochen nach der Entbindung. In Mittel- und Westeuropa und in Nordamerika tritt die ICP in 0,4-1% der Schwangerschaften auf, in Chile und Bolivien in 5-15%, und in Skandinavien und im Baltikum in 1-2%. Zur Pathogenese der ICP tragen evtl. genetische und hormonelle Faktoren und Umwelteinfl\u00fcsse bei. Die ICP erh\u00f6ht das Risiko f\u00fcr Fr\u00fchgeburtlichkeit (19-60%), Mekoniumverf\u00e4rbung des Fruchtwassers (27%), fetale Bradykardie (14%), fetale Notsituation ('fetal distress', 22-41%) und Totgeburt (0,4-4,1%), besonders bei einer Erh\u00f6hung der N\u00fcchtern-Serumspiegel der Gallens\u00e4uren auf >40 Mikromol/L. F\u00fcr die Schwangerschaftscholestase gilt heute die Gabe der hydrophilen Gallens\u00e4ure Ursodesoxychols\u00e4ure (10-20mg pro kg und Tag) als Therapie der ersten Wahl. Es wird empfohlen, bei gesicherter Lungenreife des Kindes die Geburt in der 38. Woche einzuleiten. "}, {"name": "Schwangerschaftscholestase, intrahepatische rekurrente", "sub_name": "Schwangerschaftscholestase, intrahepatische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Cholestase, schwangerschaftsbedingte, Schwangerschaftscholestase, intrahepatische rekurrente, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "O26.6", "OMIM": "147480\u00a0 614972", "MeSH": "C535932", "GARD": "9804", "summary": "Die Intrahepatische Schwangerschaftscholestase (ICP) ist eine St\u00f6rung des Galleflusses, gekennzeichnet durch (i) Pruritus mit Beginn im 2. oder 3. Trimenon der Schwangerschaft, (ii) erh\u00f6hte Serumwerte der Transaminasen und Gallens\u00e4uren und (iii) spontane Regression der Zeichen und Symptome innerhalb von 2-3 Wochen nach der Entbindung. In Mittel- und Westeuropa und in Nordamerika tritt die ICP in 0,4-1% der Schwangerschaften auf, in Chile und Bolivien in 5-15%, und in Skandinavien und im Baltikum in 1-2%. Zur Pathogenese der ICP tragen evtl. genetische und hormonelle Faktoren und Umwelteinfl\u00fcsse bei. Die ICP erh\u00f6ht das Risiko f\u00fcr Fr\u00fchgeburtlichkeit (19-60%), Mekoniumverf\u00e4rbung des Fruchtwassers (27%), fetale Bradykardie (14%), fetale Notsituation ('fetal distress', 22-41%) und Totgeburt (0,4-4,1%), besonders bei einer Erh\u00f6hung der N\u00fcchtern-Serumspiegel der Gallens\u00e4uren auf >40 Mikromol/L. F\u00fcr die Schwangerschaftscholestase gilt heute die Gabe der hydrophilen Gallens\u00e4ure Ursodesoxychols\u00e4ure (10-20mg pro kg und Tag) als Therapie der ersten Wahl. Es wird empfohlen, bei gesicherter Lungenreife des Kindes die Geburt in der 38. Woche einzuleiten. "}, {"name": "Schwangerschafts-Chorionkarzinom", "sub_name": "Chorionkarzinom, gestationales", "german_description": "Jahresinzidenz und Pr\u00e4valenz sind nicht bekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of gestational trophoblastic neoplasia characterized histologically by trophoblast proliferation, absence of chorionic villi (except in cases of intraplacental choriocarcinoma) and tissue necrosis with bleeding. The tumor occurs secondary to pregnancy (ectopic or normal), miscarriage, voluntary termination of pregnancy (VTP) or a hydatidiform mole. Indicative signs are persistent unexplained metrorrhagia or secondary increase, stagnation, or non-normalization at 6 months of total serum chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) levels after removal of a hydatidiform mole; persistent unexplained metrorrhagia following spontaneous abortion or VTP; occasionally unexplained metrorrhagia in the weeks or months following normal childbirth or an ectopic pregnancy. Occasionally, metastases (lung, liver, brain, kidneys, vagina) are indicative signs in women of childbearing age.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C58", "umls": "C0349557"}, {"name": "Schwangerschaftsdermatose, polymorphe", "sub_name": "Pruritische urtikarielle Papeln und Plaques in der Schwangerschaft", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare skin disease characterized by urticarial papules and plaques with severe pruritus mainly on the abdomen, buttocks, and proximal thighs. The condition usually develops during the third trimester of the first pregnancy, although presentation in the postpartum period, which may also feature other types of skin lesions, has been described in some cases. The symptoms generally resolve within few weeks.", "synonyms": "PUPPP, Polymorphic eruption of pregnancy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Adolescent", "icd_10": "O26.8", "omim": "178995", "umls": "C0269680", "mesh": "C535817", "gard": "9635", "meddra": "10066100"}, {"name": "Schwangerschafts-Pemphigoid", "sub_name": "Pemphigoid gestationis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autoimmune bullous skin disease characterized by pruritus with or without polymorphic skin eruption, affecting pregnant women typically during the second and third trimester.", "synonyms": "Gestational pemphigoid, ", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "L12.8", "umls": "C0019343", "mesh": "D006559", "gard": "6497", "meddra": "10019939", "epidemiology": "The estimated incidence ranges between 1/3,000-60,000 pregnancies.", "clinical_description": "Pemphigoid gestationis (PG) typically presents during the second or third trimesters, although onset during the first trimester and postpartum is possible. Pruritus may remain the only symptom. Clinical presentation typically include urticarial papules and annular plaques, erythema multiform-like changes, eczematous lesions, or papulovesicles that in some cases may develop into large tense blisters. Lesions first erupt around the umbilicus and subsequently spread to the abdomen and the extremities. The mucous membranes and the face are typically spared. The clinical course is fairly benign and PG typically resolves with an average duration of 4-6 months. A flare may occur immediately after delivery but typically resolves within 4 weeks. There is an increased risk of small-for-gestational-age baby, premature birth, and development of mild, self-limiting skin lesions in the neonate (10-11% of cases). PG can be associated with the autoimmune Graves disease in the mother.", "etiology": "PG is caused by production of anti-BP180 IgG antibodies that result from antigen presentation by MHC class II molecules aberrantly expressed on amniochorionic stromal cells and on the trophoblast. PG is strongly associated with maternal MHC class II antigens haplotypes HLA-DR3 and HLA-DR4.", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical and histological features are not specific to PG; therefore, additional tests are required for diagnosis. Direct immunofluorescence demonstrates a linear deposition of C3 and IgG autoantibodies at the dermal-epidermal junction as in bullous pemphigoid. Indirect immunofluroescence detects serum IgG autoantibodies targeting the basement membrane of the skin in 30%-100% of cases. ELISA (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay) can reveal circulating IgG antibodies against BP180.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes atopic eruption of pregnancy, polymorphic eruption of pregnancy, and intrahepatic cholestasis of pregnancy, herpes virus infection, urticaria, drug hypersensitivity reactions, contact dermatitis and other eczemas, pityriasis rosea, pityriasis versicolor, yeast folliculitis as well as other types of folliculitis, miliaria, and scabies.", "management_and_treatment": "Most patients are controlled with potent or super-potent topical corticosteroids in combination with H1-receptor antagonists such as cetirizine. In more severe cases, oral corticosteroids are necessary. Preferred corticosteroids are prednisone and prednisolone. Minimum effective doses should be used to reduce the risk of side effects, and gradually tapered to a lower maintenance dose. If exacerbation in the peripartum period occurs, the maintenance dose can be increased. Ultraviolet light therapy is relatively contraindicated. In unresponsive cases, patients may benefit from systemic immunoadsorption, or intravenous immunoglobulin. In cases of persisting (postnatal) symptoms, systemic immunosuppressants might be beneficial.", "prognosis": "The disease is typically self-limiting; however, onset in the first or second trimester and presence of blisters is associated with adverse pregnancy outcomes. Recurrence in subsequent pregnancies is common (35-50%), and is typically more severe with earlier onset. The disease can persist and converts to bullous pemphigoid (in less than 5% of patients)."}, {"name": "Schwangerschaftstoxikose", "sub_name": "Pr\u00e4eklampsie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A hypertensive disorder of pregnancy that is characterized by new-onset hypertension with proteinuria presenting after 20 weeks of gestation, and depending on mild or severe forms may initially present with severe headache, visual disturbances, and hyperreflexia.", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "O14.0\u00a0 O14.1\u00a0 O14.2\u00a0 O14.9", "omim": "189800\u00a0 609402\u00a0 609403\u00a0 609404\u00a0 614595", "umls": "C0032914", "meddra": "10036485"}, {"name": "Schwangerschafts-Trophoblastentumor", "sub_name": "Neoplasie, gestationsbedingte trophoblastische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schwangerschafts-Trophoblastentumoren (GTT) sind maligne Formen der Schwangerschafts-Trophoblastenkrankheit. Die Tumoren folgen immer einer Schwangerschaft, am h\u00e4ufigsten einer molaren Schwangerschaft (Blasenmole; s. dort). Vier histologische Untertypen wurden beschrieben: Invasive Mole, Schwangerschafts-Chorionkarzinom, Trophoblastentumor am Plazentaansatz und epitheloider Trophoblastentumor (s. diese Termini).", "synonyms": "Schwangerschafts-Trophoblastentumor, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "UMLS": "C1135868", "MeSH": "D031901", "GARD": "6498", "MedDRA": "10061988", "epidemiology": "Die Jahres-Inzidenz ist nicht sicher bekannt, sie wird auf 1:1.000.000 Frauen pro Jahr gesch\u00e4tzt. GTTs treten nach Blasenmolen (s. dort) (bei 15% der kompletten und etwa 3% der partiellen Molen), nach spontanen Fehlgeburten (1:150) oder nach Geburt (1:40.000) auf.", "clinical_description": "Hinweise sind fehlende Normalisierung oder sekund\u00e4rer Anstieg des Gesamtspiegels des Gesamt-Serum-Choriongonatropins (hCG+hCG\u00df) nach Blasenmolen-Evakuierung (mehr als 60% der F\u00e4lle), anhaltende unerkl\u00e4rte Metrorrhagie nach spontaner Fehlgeburt oder Schwangerschaftsabbruch (VTP) (etwa 30% der F\u00e4lle) und gelegentlich ungekl\u00e4rte Metrorrhagie in den Wochen oder Monaten nach normaler Geburt oder ektopischer Schwangerschaft (etwa 10% der F\u00e4lle). In Ausnahmef\u00e4llen zeigen bei Frauen im geb\u00e4rf\u00e4higen Alter erst Metastasen die Krankheit an.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie der Schwangerschafts-Trophoblastentumoren ist nicht bekannt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Ein GTT wird durch Messung des Gesamt-Serum-hCG erkannt. Sie wird empfohlen, bei Frauen nach einer Schwangerschaft mit Blasenmole, wenn eine Metrorrhagie mehr als 6 Wochen besteht und bei allen Frauen im geb\u00e4rf\u00e4higen Altermit mit Metastasen (Lunge, Leber, Hirn, Niere, Vagina) ohne bekannten Prim\u00e4rtumor. Eine post-molare GTT wird diagnostiziert, wenn eines der folgenden vier Kriterien zutrifft: Stabiler hCG-Spiegel (Variation weniger als 10%) bei mindestens 4 w\u00f6chentlichen Bestimmungen \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von mindestens 3 Wochen (Tag 1, 7, 14, 21); Anstieg des hCG-Spiegels um mindestens 10% bei mindestens 3 w\u00f6chentlichen Bestimmungen \u00fcber einen Zeitraum von mindestens 2 Wochen (Tage 1, 7, 14); Persistenz nachweisbarer hCG-Spiegel \u00fcber mehr als 6 Monate nach Molenevakuierung; histologische Diagnose eines Chorionkarzinoms. GTTs d\u00fcrfen nicht mit Blasenmolen (s. dort) verwechselt werden und, im Fall eines Chorionkarzinoms, nicht mit einem nicht schwangerschafts-abh\u00e4ngigen Chorionkarzinom, das am h\u00e4ufigsten vom Ovar ausgeht. Direkt im Anschluss an die Diagnose folgt das Staging zum Nachweis der h\u00e4ufig vorhandenen Metastasen. Verwendete Methoden sind endovaginaler Farbdoppler-Ultraschall des Beckens, MRI von Becken und Hirn und CT von Abdomen und Thorax. Bei Nachweis von Lungenmetastasen im CT muss aus dem R\u00f6ntgenbild der Lunge der FIGO 2000-Score (International Federation of Obstetrics and Gynecology) berechnet werden. Mit diesem Score k\u00f6nnen GTTs mit niedrigem Risiko (Score 6 oder kleiner) von GTTs mit hohem Risiko (Score 7 oder h\u00f6her) unterschieden werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfordert ein multidisziplin\u00e4res \u00e4rztliches Team in einem Spezialzentrum. Tumoren mit niedrigem Risiko werden systemisch chemotherapeutisch mit einer einzigen Substanz behandelt, z.B. Methotrexat, das f\u00fcr diese Indikation zugelassen ist. Tumoren mit hohem Risiko werden in erster Wahl systemisch chemotherapeutisch mit Substanzkombinationen behandelt. Die Hysterektomie ist bei Patientinnen mit Kinderwunsch nur dann Therapie der ersten Wahl, wenn es keine andere M\u00f6glichkeit gibt. Trophoblastentumoren des Plazentaansatzes und epitheloide Trophoblastentumoren sind Sonderf\u00e4lle, bei denen der FIGO-Score nicht anwendbar ist, weil sie in der Regel chemoresistent sind. Deshalb ist in diesen F\u00e4llen die totale Hysterektomie die Therapie der ersten Wahl. In 99% aller F\u00e4lle wird eine Besserung erreicht.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird entscheidend durch die Fr\u00fchzeitigkeit der Diagnose, die H\u00f6he des Tumorrisikos (niedrig oder hoch) und die Angemessenheit der Therapie bestimmt. \u00b4\u00b4", "summary": "Die Jahres-Inzidenz ist nicht sicher bekannt, sie wird auf 1:1.000.000 Frauen pro Jahr gesch\u00e4tzt. GTTs treten nach Blasenmolen (s. dort) (bei 15% der kompletten und etwa 3% der partiellen Molen), nach spontanen Fehlgeburten (1:150) oder nach Geburt (1:40.000) auf."}, {"name": "Schwannomatose", "sub_name": "Neurofibromatose Typ 3", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Neurofibromatosis (NF) type 3 (NF3), also known as schwannomatosis, is the least frequent form of the rare genetic disorder neurofibromatosis. It is clinically and genetically distinct from NF1 and NF2 and is characterized by the development of multiple schwannomas (nerve sheath tumors), without involvement of the vestibular nerves. NF3 develops in adulthood and is often associated with chronic pain. Dysesthesia and paresthesia may also be present. Common localizations include the spine, peripheral nerves, and the cranium.", "synonyms": "NF3, Neurilemmomatosis, Neurofibromatosis type 3, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "Q85.0", "omim": "162091\u00a0 162260\u00a0 615670", "umls": "C0917817\u00a0 C1335929\u00a0 C2931480", "mesh": "C536641", "gard": "4768"}, {"name": "Schwannom, benignes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare benign peripheral nerve sheath tumor characterized by a usually encapsulated space-occupying lesion composed of differentiated neoplastic Schwann cells. It most commonly arises from peripheral nerves in the head and neck region and extensor aspects of the extremities, but also from spinal and cranial nerves, especially the vestibular nerve. The tumor may be asymptomatic or cause symptoms related to a mass effect. It grows slowly and only rarely undergoes malignant transformation.", "synonyms": "Neurilemmoma, Neurilemoma, Peripheral fibroblastoma, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "D36.1", "umls": "C0027809\u00a0 C0854906", "gard": "4767", "meddra": "10029234\u00a0 10029235"}, {"name": "Schwannom, isoliertes melanotisches", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare nervous system tumor characterized by cells phenotypically representing Schwann cells but containing melanosomes and expressing melanoma markers. The entity occurs as a non-psammomatous (typically affecting spinal nerves) or a psammomatous (also involving nerves of the intestinal tract and heart) variant. About 50% of psammomatous tumors are associated with Carney complex. Slightly over 10% of melanotic schwannomas follow a malignant course.", "synonyms": "Isolated melanocytic schwannoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "D36.1"}, {"name": "Schwannom, malignes", "german_description": "Das maligne Schwannom hat seinen Ursprung in den Markscheiden des peripheren Nervensystems. Andere Bezeichnungen sind 'neurogenes Sarkom', 'Neurofibrosarkom' oder 'maligner peripherer Markscheidentumor (MPNST)'. Letztere Bezeichnung ist jetzt allgemein akzeptiert, da sie auf den Ursprung des Tumors Bezug nimmt. Diese Tumoren machen 5% der b\u00f6sartigen Weichteiltumoren aus und treten meist bei Erwachsenen auf. Die Neurofibromatose Typ 1 (NF1) ist das gr\u00f6\u00dfte Risiko, diesen Tumor zu entwickeln: 50% der MPNST treten bei Patienten mit NF1 auf, und 5% der Patienten mit NF1 entwickeln einen MPNST. Patienten mit gro\u00dfen Deletionen im NF1-Gen scheinen ein noch h\u00f6heres Tumorrisiko zu haben. Eine seltene Variante des MPNST ist der bei NF1-Patienten sehr h\u00e4ufige maligne Triton-Tumor mit Rhabdomysarkomzellen und mesenchymaler Differenzierung. Der MPNST kann sich auf jedem Nerv des K\u00f6rpers entwickeln. Die hervorstechenden Symptome sind Schmerzen und eine schnell wachsende Tumormasse. In der Regel sind diese Tumoren sehr aggressiv und haben eine schlechte Prognose. Falls die Tumoren vollst\u00e4ndig exzidiert werden k\u00f6nnen, ist die Prognose besser. Wenn immer m\u00f6glich sollte deshalb eine chirurgische Intervention versucht werden. In einigen F\u00e4llen erweisen sich Chemotherapie und Strahlentherapie als wirksam. Die Patienten sollen von einem multidisziplin\u00e4ren Team, dem auch Chirurgen, Onkologen und Strahlentherapeuten angeh\u00f6ren, betreut werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor (MPNST) is a rare and often aggressive soft tissue sarcoma occurring in a wide range of anatomical sites.", "synonyms": "MPNST, Malignant neurilemmoma, Malignant neurofibroma, Malignant schwannoma, Neurofibrosarcoma, Neurogenic sarcoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C47.9", "umls": "C0206729\u00a0 C0751690", "gard": "10872\u00a0 8211", "meddra": "10029236", "epidemiology": "Exact prevalence and incidence are unknown. Incidence of MPNST in the general population has been reported to be 1/100,000. MPNSTs account for about 5 to 10% of all soft tissue sarcomas. The sex ratio is about equal. Incidence among neurofibromatosis type 1 patients (NF1; see this term) is reported to be approximately 5 to 10%.", "clinical_description": "The age of occurrence is highly variable but most cases are reported in adults (typically between 20 and 50 years of age). In most cases, tumors arise in major nerve trunks such as the sciatic nerve or in the brachial plexus and sacral plexus. They are highly variable in appearance and commonly present as a rapidly enlarging palpable mass that is sometimes painful, with associated neurologic deficits such as radicular pain, paresthesia, and motor weakness. Tumors are fusiform to globular in shape, usually well circumscribed, and can be white to yellow and soft or firm. They occur most commonly in the trunk, head, neck and proximal extremities. Very rare anatomical sites include the brain, breast, posterior mediastinum, bladder, adrenal gland and skin. Tumors are often aggressive and high-grade, with the tendency to recur or to metastasize. MPNSTs can occur sporadically or in patients with NF1. They occur either de novo or from a preexisting neurofibroma or rarely from a schwannoma.", "etiology": "The etiology is unknown. Identified gene alterations include loss of the NF1 (17q11.2) and TP53 tumor suppressor gene (17p13.1). About 10% of tumors are associated with prior therapeutic or environmental radiation exposure.", "diagnostic_methods": "Histopathological examination is needed for definitive diagnosis. Biopsy usually reveals MPNST to be an infiltrative neoplasm with a varied range of cell morphologies (spindle, rounded or fusiform cells), with cellular fascicles which alternate with myxoid regions (marbled pattern). Diagnosis may be challenging because there are no specific immunohistochemical or molecular markers. Radiological imaging is used to determine the site and extension of the tumor.", "differential_diagnosis": "Other malignant neoplasms to include in the differential diagnosis include synovial sarcoma, fibrosarcoma, undifferentiated pleomorphic sarcoma, angiosarcoma (see these terms), melanoma, and myoepithelial tumors.", "management_and_treatment": "Total surgical resection is the mainstay of treatment. If removal is not possible, excision combined with high-dose radiation therapy may be used. Local Radiotherapy may be beneficial, but appears to have little effect on long-term survival. Chemotherapy is generally not effective.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is generally poor and depends on the size of the tumor and success of treatment. A less favorable prognosis is associated with large tumors, NF1-associated cases, and truncal localization. The recurrence rate is reported to be as high as 40% and approximately two thirds of cases metastasize (lungs and bone). Five-year survival rate is reported to be 26% to 60%, and 10-year survival to be around 45%."}, {"name": "Schwannom, vestibul\u00e4res", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Vestibular schwannoma is a rare tumor of the posterior fossa originating in the Schwann cells of the vestibular transitional zone of the vestibulocochlear nerve that can be benign, small, slow growing and asymptomatic or large, faster growing and aggressive and potentially fatal, presenting with symptoms of hearing and balance impairment, vertigo, ataxia, headache and fifth, sixth or seventh cranial nerve dysfunction and facial numbness.", "synonyms": "Acoustic neurilemoma, Acoustic neurinoma, Acoustic neuroma, ", "icd_10": "D33.3", "umls": "C0027859", "gard": "223", "meddra": "10000523"}, {"name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Aberfeld-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom (SJS) ist gekennzeichnet durch Myotonie und Knochen- und Gelenkanomalien. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die klinischen Symptome treten bald nach der Geburt auf. Die Myotonie f\u00fchrt zu einem charakteristischen Gesicht mit Blepharophimose und einem runzligen Gesichtsausdruck. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber tiefsitzende, malformierte Ohren und Mikrogenie. Wegen eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit der Gelenke haben die Patienten einen unsicheren Gang. Die Steifheit der Gelenke nimmt im Verlauf zu und erreicht in der Adoleszenz den H\u00f6hepunkt. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind abgeflachte Wirbelk\u00f6rper, H\u00fcftdysplasie, gekr\u00fcmmte Diaphysen und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfige Epiphysen. Dazu kommen Kleinwuchs, Hirsutismus, Myopie und kleine Testes. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache des SJS sind Mutationen im HSPG2-Gen (1p36), das f\u00fcr Perlecan, eine Basalmembran- und Stromakomponente, kodiert. Die Myotonie wird elektromyographisch diagnostiziert, die Knochen-Knorpelanomalien radiologisch. Der Perlecan-Mangel wird immunzytochemisch in Haut- und Muskelbiopsien nachgewiesen. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an das St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom (s. dort) zu denken, das sich vom SJS durch die Art der Skelettanomalien und durch die schwerere fr\u00fche Prognose unterscheidet. Auch an schwere Formen der kongenitalen Myotonie mit Chloridkanal-Mutationen und an die Myotonie mit Natriumkanal-Mutationen soll hierbei gedacht werden. Die Behandlung der Myotonie ist schwierig, in einigen Studien erwies sich Carbamazepin als hilfreich. Die Krankheit scheint nach der Adoleszenz einen stabilen Zustand zu erreichen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic neuromuscular disease characterized by permanent myotonia, mask-like facies (with blepharospasm, narrow palpebral fissures, small mouth with pursed lips and puckered chin) , and chondrodysplasia (variably manifesting with short stature, pectus carinatum, kyphoscoliosis, bowing of long bones, epiphyseal, metaphyseal, and hip dysplasia).", "synonyms": "Aberfeld syndrome, Burton skeletal dysplasia, Burton syndrome, Catel-Hempel syndrome, Dysostosis enchondralis metaepiphysaria, Catel-Hempel type, Myotonic chondrodystrophy, Myotonic myopathy, dwarfism, chondrodystrophy, ocular and facial anomalies, Osteochondromuscular dystrophy, SJS, SJS1, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 1, Schwartz-Jampel-Aberfeld syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.1\u00a0 Q78.8", "omim": "255800", "umls": "C0036391", "gard": "250", "epidemiology": "Approximately, 130 cases have been described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically by 1 year to 2 years of age, but may occur earlier, with myotonia, maske-like facies, short stature, non-progressive muscle weakness, muscle hypertrophy, progressive restriction of range of motion and paucity of subcutaneous tissue. Facial features consist of blepharospasm, progressive blepharophimosis, pursed lips and a puckered chin. Micrognathia, low-set ears with folded helices and dystopia canthorum have also been reported. The myotonia is characterized by continuous muscle activity recorded on electroneuromyography. Limited joint mobility leads to an unsteady gait. Joint stiffness is progressive, reaching its peak during adolescence The severity of chondrodysplasia is variable and may consist of flattening of the vertebral bodies, hip dysplasia, metaphyseal widening, slender diaphyses, kypho-scoliosis, multiple joint contractures and bowing of long bones. Rarely, myopia, inguinal and umbilical hernias and micro-orchidism have been reported.", "etiology": "Loss of function mutations in HSPG2 (1p36) are causative. HSPG2  encodes perlecan, a major component of the cellular matrix that plays an important role in maintaining cartilaginous tissue integrity and regulating muscle excitability. The exact pathogenesis is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is established by demonstration of both myotonia via electromyography and chondrodysplasia via radiographs. Genetic testing may confirm diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Schwartz-Jampel syndrome (SJS) is non-allelic with Stuve-Wiedemann syndrome, a severe skeletal dysplasia that is typically fatal during the neonatal period and was formerly described as SJS type 2. Other differential diagnosis should include Freeman Sheldon and Marden Walker syndrome and, in cases with minimal skeletal abnormalities, myotonic disorders ( including myotonia congenita, myotonia permamens, and myotonic dystrophy).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families, informing them that the risk of disease transmission is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "The management of patients with SJS is primarily supportive and best offered by a team comprising a neurologist, a geneticist, a physical therapist, an orthopedic surgeon, an ophthalmologist and a psychologist. Medical treatment with muscle relaxants and antiepileptic drugs, such as carbamazepine, phenytoin, or procainamide, aimed to alleviate myotonia has limited usage, although early initiation of treatment may limit the extent of disability. Physical therapy is important to prevent contracture formation and fixed skeletal deformity. Botulinum toxin A injections for blepharospasm has been reported with limited and variable results Rarely, surgical intervention is considered for blepharospasm including orbicularis oculi myectomy or levator aponeurosis resection improve functional and cosmetic outcome. Malignant hyperthermia is a potentially lethal complication of anesthesia.", "prognosis": "Progressively worsening blepharospasm is an important morbidity that can interfere with vision. The disease appears to stabilize after adolescence and does not affect life span."}, {"name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom (SJS) ist gekennzeichnet durch Myotonie und Knochen- und Gelenkanomalien. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die klinischen Symptome treten bald nach der Geburt auf. Die Myotonie f\u00fchrt zu einem charakteristischen Gesicht mit Blepharophimose und einem runzligen Gesichtsausdruck. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber tiefsitzende, malformierte Ohren und Mikrogenie. Wegen eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit der Gelenke haben die Patienten einen unsicheren Gang. Die Steifheit der Gelenke nimmt im Verlauf zu und erreicht in der Adoleszenz den H\u00f6hepunkt. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind abgeflachte Wirbelk\u00f6rper, H\u00fcftdysplasie, gekr\u00fcmmte Diaphysen und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfige Epiphysen. Dazu kommen Kleinwuchs, Hirsutismus, Myopie und kleine Testes. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache des SJS sind Mutationen im HSPG2-Gen (1p36), das f\u00fcr Perlecan, eine Basalmembran- und Stromakomponente, kodiert. Die Myotonie wird elektromyographisch diagnostiziert, die Knochen-Knorpelanomalien radiologisch. Der Perlecan-Mangel wird immunzytochemisch in Haut- und Muskelbiopsien nachgewiesen. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an das St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom (s. dort) zu denken, das sich vom SJS durch die Art der Skelettanomalien und durch die schwerere fr\u00fche Prognose unterscheidet. Auch an schwere Formen der kongenitalen Myotonie mit Chloridkanal-Mutationen und an die Myotonie mit Natriumkanal-Mutationen soll hierbei gedacht werden. Die Behandlung der Myotonie ist schwierig, in einigen Studien erwies sich Carbamazepin als hilfreich. Die Krankheit scheint nach der Adoleszenz einen stabilen Zustand zu erreichen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic neuromuscular disease characterized by permanent myotonia, mask-like facies (with blepharospasm, narrow palpebral fissures, small mouth with pursed lips and puckered chin) , and chondrodysplasia (variably manifesting with short stature, pectus carinatum, kyphoscoliosis, bowing of long bones, epiphyseal, metaphyseal, and hip dysplasia).", "synonyms": "Aberfeld syndrome, Burton skeletal dysplasia, Burton syndrome, Catel-Hempel syndrome, Dysostosis enchondralis metaepiphysaria, Catel-Hempel type, Myotonic chondrodystrophy, Myotonic myopathy, dwarfism, chondrodystrophy, ocular and facial anomalies, Osteochondromuscular dystrophy, SJS, SJS1, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 1, Schwartz-Jampel-Aberfeld syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.1\u00a0 Q78.8", "omim": "255800", "umls": "C0036391", "gard": "250", "epidemiology": "Approximately, 130 cases have been described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically by 1 year to 2 years of age, but may occur earlier, with myotonia, maske-like facies, short stature, non-progressive muscle weakness, muscle hypertrophy, progressive restriction of range of motion and paucity of subcutaneous tissue. Facial features consist of blepharospasm, progressive blepharophimosis, pursed lips and a puckered chin. Micrognathia, low-set ears with folded helices and dystopia canthorum have also been reported. The myotonia is characterized by continuous muscle activity recorded on electroneuromyography. Limited joint mobility leads to an unsteady gait. Joint stiffness is progressive, reaching its peak during adolescence The severity of chondrodysplasia is variable and may consist of flattening of the vertebral bodies, hip dysplasia, metaphyseal widening, slender diaphyses, kypho-scoliosis, multiple joint contractures and bowing of long bones. Rarely, myopia, inguinal and umbilical hernias and micro-orchidism have been reported.", "etiology": "Loss of function mutations in HSPG2 (1p36) are causative. HSPG2  encodes perlecan, a major component of the cellular matrix that plays an important role in maintaining cartilaginous tissue integrity and regulating muscle excitability. The exact pathogenesis is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is established by demonstration of both myotonia via electromyography and chondrodysplasia via radiographs. Genetic testing may confirm diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Schwartz-Jampel syndrome (SJS) is non-allelic with Stuve-Wiedemann syndrome, a severe skeletal dysplasia that is typically fatal during the neonatal period and was formerly described as SJS type 2. Other differential diagnosis should include Freeman Sheldon and Marden Walker syndrome and, in cases with minimal skeletal abnormalities, myotonic disorders ( including myotonia congenita, myotonia permamens, and myotonic dystrophy).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families, informing them that the risk of disease transmission is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "The management of patients with SJS is primarily supportive and best offered by a team comprising a neurologist, a geneticist, a physical therapist, an orthopedic surgeon, an ophthalmologist and a psychologist. Medical treatment with muscle relaxants and antiepileptic drugs, such as carbamazepine, phenytoin, or procainamide, aimed to alleviate myotonia has limited usage, although early initiation of treatment may limit the extent of disability. Physical therapy is important to prevent contracture formation and fixed skeletal deformity. Botulinum toxin A injections for blepharospasm has been reported with limited and variable results Rarely, surgical intervention is considered for blepharospasm including orbicularis oculi myectomy or levator aponeurosis resection improve functional and cosmetic outcome. Malignant hyperthermia is a potentially lethal complication of anesthesia.", "prognosis": "Progressively worsening blepharospasm is an important morbidity that can interfere with vision. The disease appears to stabilize after adolescence and does not affect life span."}, {"name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom, neonatales", "sub_name": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom", "german_description": "SWS ist ein seltenes Syndrom und nur wenige Patienten wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben, aber die Krankheit ist in den Vereinigten Arabischen Emiraten relativ h\u00e4ufig, offenbar aufgrund einer hohen Anzahl von konsanguinen Verbindungen, mit einer berichteten Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 0,5/10.000 Geburten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann syndrome (SWS) is a rare autosomal recessive congenital primary skeletal dysplasia, characterized by small stature, bowing of the long bones, camptodactyly, hyperthermic episodes, respiratory distress/apneic episodes and feeding difficulties that usually lead to early mortality.", "synonyms": "Neonatal Schwartz-Jampel syndrome, SJS2, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 2, St\u00fcve-Wiedemann dysplasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "601559", "umls": "C0432240\u00a0 C0796176", "mesh": "C537502", "gard": "5045", "epidemiology": "SWS is a rare syndrome with few cases reported to date, but the disease is relatively common in the United Arab Emirates, apparently due to a high number of consanguineous unions, with a reported prevalence of approximately 0,5/10,000 births.", "clinical_description": "SWS is characterized by short stature, bowing of extremities that affect the lower limbs more than the upper limbs, camptodactyly, respiratory distress/apneic spells and hyperthermic episodes frequently associated with feeding/swallowing difficulties. Other clinical findings are mask-like face, pursed mouth, hypoplastic midface, osteopenia, congenital contractures and muscular hypotonia. The condition is fatal in most cases as a result of respiratory distress or hyperthermia. However, survival beyond one year have been reported in few cases, and patients develop severe spinal deformities, along with streaky osteoporosis and spontaneous fractures, bowing of the lower limbs (with prominent joints) and dysautonomia (including temperature instability, absent corneal and patellar reflexes, and smooth tongue). Motor development is generally delayed but no intellectual deficit has been reported.", "etiology": "SWS is due to missense or nonsense mutations in the leukemia inhibitory factor receptor (LIFR) gene (5p13.1). These null mutations lead to modifications in the stability of the LIFR transcripts, inhibiting synthesis of the LIFR protein and resulting in alterations in the JAK/STAT3 signaling pathway. In some patients diagnosed for SWS, LIFR mutations were not identified, suggesting that other genes may be involved in the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of SWS is mainly postnatal, based on clinical and radiological findings. Radiographic examination reveals bowed long bones with cortical thickening and rarefaction, wide metaphysis with decreased density and blurred margins, and abnormal trabecular pattern. Other features include flared iliac wings, hypoplasia of the lower ilia. Genetic molecular testing for LIFR mutation may be useful to confirm SWS diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Crisponi syndrome (cold-induced sweating syndrome) and other skeletal dysplasias, such as Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type IX, Campomelic dysplasia and autosomal dominant Larsen syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In some cases, ultrasound examination may be useful to predict the presence of SWS before birth. Prenatal symptoms can sometimes be seen in the late second- or third trimester and include oligohydramnios, intrauterine growth restriction despite normal Doppler findings about the umbilical artery, camptodactyly, bowing of the lower bones affecting the tibia more than the femur, and micromelia.", "genetic_counseling": "SWS is a congenital condition inherited as an autosomal recessive disorder.", "management_and_treatment": "To date, SWS management is only symptomatic and should include prevention of lung aspirations and chocking while eating (intubation, nasogastric tube feeding and/or gastrostomy often required during the first year of life), physiotherapy and/or surgery for bone malformations, eyes protection from damage to prevent visual loss, and osteopenia or osteoporosis treatment. Predisposition to hyperthermia necessitates caution during procedures requiring anesthesia.", "prognosis": "SWS is a life-threatening disease which is usually fatal during the neonatal period, due to respiratory distress or hyperthermic episode. However, more patients are surviving for longer (into and, in some cases, beyond adolescence), if diagnosed and monitored appropriately."}, {"name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom Typ 1", "sub_name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom (SJS) ist gekennzeichnet durch Myotonie und Knochen- und Gelenkanomalien. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die klinischen Symptome treten bald nach der Geburt auf. Die Myotonie f\u00fchrt zu einem charakteristischen Gesicht mit Blepharophimose und einem runzligen Gesichtsausdruck. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber tiefsitzende, malformierte Ohren und Mikrogenie. Wegen eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit der Gelenke haben die Patienten einen unsicheren Gang. Die Steifheit der Gelenke nimmt im Verlauf zu und erreicht in der Adoleszenz den H\u00f6hepunkt. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind abgeflachte Wirbelk\u00f6rper, H\u00fcftdysplasie, gekr\u00fcmmte Diaphysen und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfige Epiphysen. Dazu kommen Kleinwuchs, Hirsutismus, Myopie und kleine Testes. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache des SJS sind Mutationen im HSPG2-Gen (1p36), das f\u00fcr Perlecan, eine Basalmembran- und Stromakomponente, kodiert. Die Myotonie wird elektromyographisch diagnostiziert, die Knochen-Knorpelanomalien radiologisch. Der Perlecan-Mangel wird immunzytochemisch in Haut- und Muskelbiopsien nachgewiesen. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an das St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom (s. dort) zu denken, das sich vom SJS durch die Art der Skelettanomalien und durch die schwerere fr\u00fche Prognose unterscheidet. Auch an schwere Formen der kongenitalen Myotonie mit Chloridkanal-Mutationen und an die Myotonie mit Natriumkanal-Mutationen soll hierbei gedacht werden. Die Behandlung der Myotonie ist schwierig, in einigen Studien erwies sich Carbamazepin als hilfreich. Die Krankheit scheint nach der Adoleszenz einen stabilen Zustand zu erreichen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic neuromuscular disease characterized by permanent myotonia, mask-like facies (with blepharospasm, narrow palpebral fissures, small mouth with pursed lips and puckered chin) , and chondrodysplasia (variably manifesting with short stature, pectus carinatum, kyphoscoliosis, bowing of long bones, epiphyseal, metaphyseal, and hip dysplasia).", "synonyms": "Aberfeld syndrome, Burton skeletal dysplasia, Burton syndrome, Catel-Hempel syndrome, Dysostosis enchondralis metaepiphysaria, Catel-Hempel type, Myotonic chondrodystrophy, Myotonic myopathy, dwarfism, chondrodystrophy, ocular and facial anomalies, Osteochondromuscular dystrophy, SJS, SJS1, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 1, Schwartz-Jampel-Aberfeld syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.1\u00a0 Q78.8", "omim": "255800", "umls": "C0036391", "gard": "250", "epidemiology": "Approximately, 130 cases have been described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically by 1 year to 2 years of age, but may occur earlier, with myotonia, maske-like facies, short stature, non-progressive muscle weakness, muscle hypertrophy, progressive restriction of range of motion and paucity of subcutaneous tissue. Facial features consist of blepharospasm, progressive blepharophimosis, pursed lips and a puckered chin. Micrognathia, low-set ears with folded helices and dystopia canthorum have also been reported. The myotonia is characterized by continuous muscle activity recorded on electroneuromyography. Limited joint mobility leads to an unsteady gait. Joint stiffness is progressive, reaching its peak during adolescence The severity of chondrodysplasia is variable and may consist of flattening of the vertebral bodies, hip dysplasia, metaphyseal widening, slender diaphyses, kypho-scoliosis, multiple joint contractures and bowing of long bones. Rarely, myopia, inguinal and umbilical hernias and micro-orchidism have been reported.", "etiology": "Loss of function mutations in HSPG2 (1p36) are causative. HSPG2  encodes perlecan, a major component of the cellular matrix that plays an important role in maintaining cartilaginous tissue integrity and regulating muscle excitability. The exact pathogenesis is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is established by demonstration of both myotonia via electromyography and chondrodysplasia via radiographs. Genetic testing may confirm diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Schwartz-Jampel syndrome (SJS) is non-allelic with Stuve-Wiedemann syndrome, a severe skeletal dysplasia that is typically fatal during the neonatal period and was formerly described as SJS type 2. Other differential diagnosis should include Freeman Sheldon and Marden Walker syndrome and, in cases with minimal skeletal abnormalities, myotonic disorders ( including myotonia congenita, myotonia permamens, and myotonic dystrophy).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families, informing them that the risk of disease transmission is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "The management of patients with SJS is primarily supportive and best offered by a team comprising a neurologist, a geneticist, a physical therapist, an orthopedic surgeon, an ophthalmologist and a psychologist. Medical treatment with muscle relaxants and antiepileptic drugs, such as carbamazepine, phenytoin, or procainamide, aimed to alleviate myotonia has limited usage, although early initiation of treatment may limit the extent of disability. Physical therapy is important to prevent contracture formation and fixed skeletal deformity. Botulinum toxin A injections for blepharospasm has been reported with limited and variable results Rarely, surgical intervention is considered for blepharospasm including orbicularis oculi myectomy or levator aponeurosis resection improve functional and cosmetic outcome. Malignant hyperthermia is a potentially lethal complication of anesthesia.", "prognosis": "Progressively worsening blepharospasm is an important morbidity that can interfere with vision. The disease appears to stabilize after adolescence and does not affect life span."}, {"name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom Typ 2", "sub_name": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom", "german_description": "SWS ist ein seltenes Syndrom und nur wenige Patienten wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben, aber die Krankheit ist in den Vereinigten Arabischen Emiraten relativ h\u00e4ufig, offenbar aufgrund einer hohen Anzahl von konsanguinen Verbindungen, mit einer berichteten Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 0,5/10.000 Geburten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann syndrome (SWS) is a rare autosomal recessive congenital primary skeletal dysplasia, characterized by small stature, bowing of the long bones, camptodactyly, hyperthermic episodes, respiratory distress/apneic episodes and feeding difficulties that usually lead to early mortality.", "synonyms": "Neonatal Schwartz-Jampel syndrome, SJS2, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 2, St\u00fcve-Wiedemann dysplasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "601559", "umls": "C0432240\u00a0 C0796176", "mesh": "C537502", "gard": "5045", "epidemiology": "SWS is a rare syndrome with few cases reported to date, but the disease is relatively common in the United Arab Emirates, apparently due to a high number of consanguineous unions, with a reported prevalence of approximately 0,5/10,000 births.", "clinical_description": "SWS is characterized by short stature, bowing of extremities that affect the lower limbs more than the upper limbs, camptodactyly, respiratory distress/apneic spells and hyperthermic episodes frequently associated with feeding/swallowing difficulties. Other clinical findings are mask-like face, pursed mouth, hypoplastic midface, osteopenia, congenital contractures and muscular hypotonia. The condition is fatal in most cases as a result of respiratory distress or hyperthermia. However, survival beyond one year have been reported in few cases, and patients develop severe spinal deformities, along with streaky osteoporosis and spontaneous fractures, bowing of the lower limbs (with prominent joints) and dysautonomia (including temperature instability, absent corneal and patellar reflexes, and smooth tongue). Motor development is generally delayed but no intellectual deficit has been reported.", "etiology": "SWS is due to missense or nonsense mutations in the leukemia inhibitory factor receptor (LIFR) gene (5p13.1). These null mutations lead to modifications in the stability of the LIFR transcripts, inhibiting synthesis of the LIFR protein and resulting in alterations in the JAK/STAT3 signaling pathway. In some patients diagnosed for SWS, LIFR mutations were not identified, suggesting that other genes may be involved in the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of SWS is mainly postnatal, based on clinical and radiological findings. Radiographic examination reveals bowed long bones with cortical thickening and rarefaction, wide metaphysis with decreased density and blurred margins, and abnormal trabecular pattern. Other features include flared iliac wings, hypoplasia of the lower ilia. Genetic molecular testing for LIFR mutation may be useful to confirm SWS diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Crisponi syndrome (cold-induced sweating syndrome) and other skeletal dysplasias, such as Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type IX, Campomelic dysplasia and autosomal dominant Larsen syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In some cases, ultrasound examination may be useful to predict the presence of SWS before birth. Prenatal symptoms can sometimes be seen in the late second- or third trimester and include oligohydramnios, intrauterine growth restriction despite normal Doppler findings about the umbilical artery, camptodactyly, bowing of the lower bones affecting the tibia more than the femur, and micromelia.", "genetic_counseling": "SWS is a congenital condition inherited as an autosomal recessive disorder.", "management_and_treatment": "To date, SWS management is only symptomatic and should include prevention of lung aspirations and chocking while eating (intubation, nasogastric tube feeding and/or gastrostomy often required during the first year of life), physiotherapy and/or surgery for bone malformations, eyes protection from damage to prevent visual loss, and osteopenia or osteoporosis treatment. Predisposition to hyperthermia necessitates caution during procedures requiring anesthesia.", "prognosis": "SWS is a life-threatening disease which is usually fatal during the neonatal period, due to respiratory distress or hyperthermic episode. However, more patients are surviving for longer (into and, in some cases, beyond adolescence), if diagnosed and monitored appropriately."}, {"name": "Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsenadenom, papill\u00e4res", "sub_name": "Syringocystadenoma papilliferum", "german_description": "Das Syringocystadenoma papilliferum (SP) ist ein Hamartom der Haut, das sich vermutlich von den apokrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen herleitet oder seltener von den ekkrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen. Es ist eine au\u00dferordentlich seltene Neoplasie. Das SP ist entweder schon bei der Geburt vorhanden, oder es entwickelt sich im Kleinkindalter, in der Pubert\u00e4t oder sp\u00e4ter im Leben. Es wurden 3 klinische Typen beschrieben: (i) Der Plaque-Typ manifestiert sich als haarloses Areal auf der Kopfhaut, oft in Verbindung mit einem Naevus sebaceus Jadassohn, aber auch isoliert. (ii) Der lineare Typ tritt meist am Hals oder im Gesicht auf. (iii) Der solit\u00e4re nodul\u00e4re Typ tritt bevorzugt am Stamm auf. H\u00e4ufig ist das SP mit Hamartomen assoziiert, die ihren Usprung in Follikelzellen oder Talgdr\u00fcsen haben. In etwa einem Drittel der F\u00e4lle ist das SP mit einem Naevus sebaceus assoziiert. Bei bis zu 10% der F\u00e4lle tritt ein Basalzell-Karzinom auf. Sehr viel seltener sind Plattenepithelkarzinome und verruk\u00f6se und duktale Karzinome. Die klinische Verdachtsdiagnose wird histologisch best\u00e4tigt. Wenn immer m\u00f6glich ist, wegen des Risikos einer malignen Entartung, eine prophylaktische chirurgische Resektion anzuraten. Eine komplette chirurgische Exzision mit sorgf\u00e4ltiger histologischer Kontrolle ist die Therapie der Wahl. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-malignant adnexal neoplasm that originates from the apocrine or eccrine sweat glands and is characterized histologically by cystic, papillary, and ductal invaginations into the dermis lined by double-layered outer cuboidal and luminal high columnar epithelium and connected to the epidermis. Dilated capillaries and a dense infiltrate of plasma cells are characteristic. Clinically, lesions are asymptomatic with a heterogeneous, non-distinctive appearance ranging from skin-colored to pink papules or plaques, occurring most commonly in the head and neck area.", "synonyms": "Fistulous vegetative verrucous hydradenoma, Naevus syringocystadenomatosus papilliferus, Papillary syringocystadenoma, SCAP, Syringadenoma papilliferum, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Neonatal, Infancy, Adolescent", "icd_10": "D23.9", "umls": "C0406803", "gard": "5100", "meddra": "10042926", "epidemiology": "To date, approximately 730 cases have been reported in the literature. The condition has been reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Syringocystadenoma papilliferum (SCAP) may be present at birth (50% of cases) or develop around puberty (15-30% of cases). SCAP typically presents as slow developing, non-specific, smooth, skin-colored to pink papule, verruca or nodule, which may be exudative. It may also be seen as hairless plaques, smooth or raised, usually less than 4 cm in diameter, skin-colored to brown. It is rarely pigmented. In the majority of cases, it is asymptomatic, but it may grow progressively and has been occasionally associated with pruritus, pain, and/or bleeding. Three clinical types have been described: the plaque type, the linear type and the solitary nodular type. The plaque type usually presents as an alopecia plaque on the scalp which may increase in size at puberty and often transforms to nodular or verrucous lesions. The linear type consists of multiple pink to reddish, firm papules or umbilicated nodules, 1-10 mm in diameter, and is extremely rare. The solitary type includes dome-shaped, pedunculated nodules, 5-10 mm in diameter, with a predilection for the trunk, shoulder and axillae. Rarely, segmental variants are found. In 75% of cases, SCAP is located on the head or cervical region and less frequent in other regions, or on a postoperative scar. SCAP develops in existing nevus sebaceous in about one-third of cases, 10% of which are associated with he development of basal cell carcinoma and more rarely other carcinomas. SCAP can also be associated with other benign lesions. Transition to malignancy is rare but, possible. Syringocystadenocarcinoma papilliferum is the malignant counterpart to this lesion and may develop in a long-standing case of SCAP.", "etiology": "The etiology of SCAP has not been elucidated. It seems to arise from the pluripotent cells with the potential to exhibit either apocrine or eccrine lineage, although apocrine differentiation is more common. The pathogenesis of SCAP remains unclear although, both in sporadic cases and lesions arising in nevus sebaceous, the human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA and mutations in the RAS/mitogen-activated protein kinase signaling pathway have been detected. BRAF V600E mutation or activating mutations in HRAS (or in one case KRAS) have been reported in sporadic forms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation of non-distinctive lesions and confirmed on biopsy showing the characteristic histology. Immunohistochemically, the tumor cells stains positively for carcinoembryonic antigen. Dermatoscopy is not diagnostic.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis is broad, requiring histological confirmation of cases. The main diagnostic issue is the distinction of SCAP from hidradenoma papilliferum. Other conditions to be considered include basal cell carcinoma, cutaneous lymphoma, factitious dermatitis, viral warts, subcutaneous fungal infection, linear verrucous nevus, pyogenic granuloma, warty dyskeratoma, inverted follicular keratosis, as well as eccrine nevus, nevus comedonicus, cylindroma, and basaloid follicular hamartoma.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment involves complete surgical excision. However, recurrence is common. Carbon dioxide laser treatment can be useful for lesions in anatomic areas not favorable for excision and grafting. SCAP has also been successfully treated with Mohs micrograhic surgery.", "prognosis": "The condition is mostly benign but extensive lesions may have an impact on quality of life and transformation to malignancy cannot be ruled out."}, {"name": "Schwelende systemische Mastozytose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, langsam fortschreitende Form der systemischen Mastozytose (SM), die durch eine allm\u00e4hliche Ansammlung von neoplastischen Mastzellen in den viszeralen Organen gekennzeichnet ist. Die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise mit Splenomegalie, hyperzellul\u00e4rem Knochenmark und, in den meisten F\u00e4llen, Urtikaria-Pigmentosa-\u00e4hnlichen Hautl\u00e4sionen.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "\u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C96.2", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Das Erkrankungsalter der schwelenden systemischen Mastozytose (SSM) liegt im Erwachsenenalter, wobei die Patienten tendenziell etwas \u00e4lter sind als die Patienten mit isolierter SM (ISM). Die Erkrankung ist definiert durch das Vorhandensein von mindestens zwei B-Befunden, die auf eine hohe Mastzelllast (MC) hinweisen, und keinem C-Befund (Organfunktionsst\u00f6rung). Es besteht eine ausgepr\u00e4gte MC-Infiltration (>30% in der Knochenmark (BM)-Biopsie), Organomegalie und Tryptase-Werte \u00fcber 200 ng/ml. Der klinische Verlauf ist durch eine langsame Progression ohne Anzeichen einer aggressiven Erkrankung oder eines assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasmas (AHN) gekennzeichnet. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber Jahre stabil bleiben oder in eine fortgeschrittenere Variante (aggressive SM (ASM), Mastzellleuk\u00e4mie (MCL) oder SM mit einem AHN) \u00fcbergehen.", "etiology": "Obwohl die \u00c4tiologie der SSM nicht vollst\u00e4ndig gekl\u00e4rt ist, wird eine aktivierende Mutation im KIT-Gen (zumeist D816V) in den MCs praktisch aller SSM-F\u00e4lle gefunden. Diese Mutation ist wahrscheinlich f\u00fcr die abnorme Anh\u00e4ufung von MCs in Organ(en)/Gewebe(n) verantwortlich. Bei den SSM-Patienten liegt eine konstante multiline\u00e4re KIT D816V-Beteiligung vor.", "diagnostic_methods": "Basierend auf den WHO-Konsenskriterien wird zun\u00e4chst eine SM-Diagnose gestellt wird. Die Krankheit wird dann nach dem Vorhandensein von B- und C-Befunden kategorisiert. F\u00fcr die SSM-Diagnose sollten mindestens zwei B-Befunde (aber keine C-Befunde) vorhanden sein.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren alle anderen Formen von SM sowie andere Ursachen von MC-Aktivierungssyndromen (MCAS): prim\u00e4res (klonales, aber nicht die SM-Diagnosekriterien erf\u00fcllendes) MCAS; sekund\u00e4res MCAS, bei dem eine IgE-abh\u00e4ngige Allergie oder ein anderer reaktiver entz\u00fcndlicher Krankheitsprozess vorliegt; und idiopathisches MCAS, bei dem weder klonales MC noch eine IgE-abh\u00e4ngige Allergie oder eine andere zugrundeliegende Bedingung/Krankheit dokumentiert werden kann. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen umfassen andere Formen der Mastozytose (reine kutane Mastozytose, indolente SM, aggressive SM), endokrine Erkrankungen (Nebennierentumore, VIPom, Gastrinom) und einige gastrointestinale Pathologien. Auch die Waldenstr\u00f6m-Krankheit sollte in Betracht gezogen werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei stabilen SSM-Patienten kann eine symptomatische Behandlung die einzige Therapie sein. Die Vermeidung bekannter Ausl\u00f6ser, die prophylaktische Verschreibung eines Epi-Pens und Medikamente wie Antihistaminika, Antileukotriene, Cromolyn-Natrium, Omalizumab und Aspirin k\u00f6nnen eine Rolle bei der Pr\u00e4vention oder Behandlung von MC-vermittelten Symptomen spielen. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Nachuntersuchungen und die Beurteilung der Transformation in aggressivere Krankheitsvarianten sind erforderlich. Die Serum-Tryptase, die zur Beurteilung des Krankheitsansprechens verwendet werden kann, kann halbj\u00e4hrlich ausgewertet werden, um die Krankheitsaktivit\u00e4t zu \u00fcberwachen und die Therapie entsprechend anzupassen. Bei Patienten, die zu fortgeschritteneren Varianten der Erkrankung fortschreiten, kann die Einf\u00fchrung einer gezielten oder nicht gezielten zytoreduktiven Therapie diskutiert werden. W\u00e4hrend mit der derzeitigen zielgerichteten und nicht zielgerichteten Behandlung g\u00fcnstige Ergebnisse erzielt wurden, wurde kein Konsens \u00fcber die Behandlung von Patienten mit SSM erreicht.", "prognosis": "Einige SSM-Patienten k\u00f6nnen jahrelang stabil bleiben, w\u00e4hrend sich bei andere die fortgeschritteneren Varianten der Erkrankung (ASM oder MCL) entwickelt, die eine schlechtere Prognose haben. Im Allgemeinen ist die Prognose von SSM hinsichtlich des progressionsfreien \u00dcberlebens und des Gesamt\u00fcberlebens besser als die von ASM oder MCL, aber schlechter als bei typischem ISM.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Schwere Achondroplasie-Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung-Acanthosis nigricans-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch schwere Achondroplasie, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und Acanthosis nigricans. Es wurde bei 4 nicht miteinander verwandten Personen beschrieben. Als weitere, nicht obligate Symptome wurden Strukturanomalien des Zentralnervensystems, Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und Verbiegungen von Schl\u00fcsselbein, Femur, Tibia und Fibula beschrieben. Ursache ist die Mutation Lys650Met in der Kinase-Dom\u00e4ne des Fibroblasten-Wachstumfaktor-Rezeptors 3, der durch das FGFR3-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 4p16.3 kodiert wird. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe achondroplasia-developmental delay-acanthosis nigricans syndrome is characterised by the association of severe achondroplasia with developmental delay and acanthosis nigricans. It has been described in four unrelated individuals. Structural central nervous system anomalies, seizures and hearing loss were also reported, together with bowing of the clavicle, femur, tibia and fibula in some cases. The syndrome is caused by a Lys650Met substitution in the kinase domain of fibroblast growth factor receptor 3 (encoded by the FGFR3 gene; 4p16.3).", "synonyms": "SADDAN, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q77.4", "omim": "616482", "umls": "C2674173", "gard": "9443"}, {"name": "Schwere Dermatitis-multiple Allergien-metabolischer Verlust-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe dermatitis-multiple allergies-metabolic wasting syndrome is a rare, genetic, epidermal disorder characterized by congenital erythroderma with severe psoriasiform dermatitis, ichthyosis, severe palmoplantar keratoderma, yellow keratosis on the hands and feet, elevated immunoglobulin E, multiple food allergies, and metabolic wasting. Other variable features may include hypotrichosis, nail dystrophy, recurrent infections, mild global developmental delay, eosinophillia, nystagmus, growth impairment and cardiac defects.", "synonyms": "Congenital erythroderma-hypotrichosis-recurrent infections-multiple food allergies syndrome, SAM syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "615508"}, {"name": "Schwere disseminierte CMV-Infektion bei immunkompetenten Patienten", "sub_name": "Schwere disseminierte Zytomegalievirus-Infektion bei immunkompetenten Patienten", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare viral disease characterized by fulminant cytomegalovirus infection with multiple organ involvement including the brain, lung, liver, and/or heart, among others, and marked constitutional symptoms in immunocompetent patients. The condition is associated with a high case fatality rate.", "synonyms": "Severe disseminated CMV infection in immunocompetent patients, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B25.8"}, {"name": "Schwere disseminierte Zytomegalievirus-Infektion bei immunkompetenten Patienten", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare viral disease characterized by fulminant cytomegalovirus infection with multiple organ involvement including the brain, lung, liver, and/or heart, among others, and marked constitutional symptoms in immunocompetent patients. The condition is associated with a high case fatality rate.", "synonyms": "Severe disseminated CMV infection in immunocompetent patients, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B25.8"}, {"name": "Schwere Dystrophinopathie vom Typ Duchenne und Becker", "sub_name": "Duchenne- und Becker-Muskeldystrophien", "german_description": "Die DMD ist h\u00e4ufiger, manifestiert sich fr\u00fcher und verl\u00e4uft schwerer als die BMD. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der DMD unter m\u00e4nnlichen Neugeborenen ist 1:3.300. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BMD unter m\u00e4nnlichen Neugeborenen schwankt zwischen 1:18.000 und 1:31.000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A group of rare, genetic, progressive muscular dystrophies, including Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD), Becker muscular dystrophy (BMD) and a symptomatic form in female carriers. The diseases represent a spectrum of severity ranging from progressive skeletal and cardiac muscle wasting and weakness (DMD, BMD) to less severe muscle weakness or isolated cardiomyopathy affecting carrier females.", "synonyms": "Severe dystrophinopathy, Duchenne and Becker type, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "G71.0", "umls": "C0917713\u00a0 C3542021", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of DMD ranges between 1/3,500-1/ 9,300 male births. The prevalence of BMD varies from 1/16,700 to 1/18,500 male births. The prevalence of symptomatic female carriers is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Dystrophinopathies present with a spectrum of severity whereby BMD is at the mildest end and DMD the most severe, there is an intermediate phenotype in between. At the mildest end of the spectrum exercise-induced muscle cramps and myoglobinuria may be the only feature while at the severe end, there may be complete loss of muscle function, cardiomyopathy and respiratory failure. DMD presents in early childhood, motor milestones are delayed. Brain involvement leads to cognitive impairment (affecting about a third of patients) and/or pervasive behavioral disorders such as ADHD (attention deficit hyperactivity disorder), autism, anxiety and obsessive compulsive disorder. Muscle hypertrophy is evident, especially in the calf muscles. Progression is rapid, such that by the age of 5 there is likely to be a waddling gait and positive Gowers' sign. In untreated boys, walking is lost by 13 years of age (mean 9.5 years). Following loss of ambulation, scoliosis, respiratory failure and cardiomyopathy develop. BMD presents a broad spectrum of clinical severity, with onset of symptoms occurring from early childhood to as late as the sixth decade. Manifesting carriers of DMD and BMD may present with varying degrees of cardiomyopathy and muscle weakness. X-linked dilated cardiomyopathy (XLDCM), which may be caused by mutations in the dystrophin gene, presents with very severe, rapidly progressive, dilated cardiomyopathy.", "etiology": "Dystrophinopathies are allelic conditions caused by deletions, duplications and mutations in the DMD gene, located on the X chromosome (Xp21.2). DMD genetic variants are frame-shift, while BMD variants are in-frame.", "diagnostic_methods": "The clinical diagnosis can be confirmed by several methods. Creatine Kinase (CK) is very raised. Molecular genetic analysis by MLPA (multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification) will show a deletion in 60%; full gene sequencing is necessary to identify small deletions, duplications and nonsense mutations. Muscle biopsy for dystrophin analysis which is absent in DMD and reduced in BMD.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes LGMD and, in adults, other muscle disorders presenting with a raised CK.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis requires the most precise molecular diagnosis possible in the index case.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is X-linked recessive. Genetic counselling of affected families is recommended and screening of women carriers in the family is important.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no known cure for this group of dystrophinopathies. In DMD, treatment with corticosteroids stabilizes motor function and delays loss of ambulation and respiratory failure by several years. Physiotherapy and orthotics delay the onset of joint contractures. Non-invasive ventilation (NIV) to treat respiratory failure prolongs life expectancy. Regular cardiac monitoring from diagnosis with early treatment using ACE (angiotensin-converting enzyme) inhibitors and beta blockers stabilizes cardiomyopathy. For XLDCM, cardiac transplantation is the treatment of choice.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is shortened by cardiac and respiratory involvement, but can be substantially improved with regular monitoring and pro-active management."}, {"name": "Schwere fr\u00fch-beginnende Adipositas mit Insulin-Resistenz-Syndrom durch SH2B1-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic form of obesity characterized by severe early-onset obesity, hyperphagia, insulin resistance with hyperinsulinemia, reduced adult final height, delayed speech and language development and a tendency for social isolation and aggressive behavior.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "E66.8"}, {"name": "Schwere fr\u00fch-beginnende axonale Neuropathie durch MFN2-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene axonale heredit\u00e4re motorische und sensorische Neuropathie, die durch fr\u00fch einsetzende (<10 Jahre) progressive distale Muskelschw\u00e4che und Muskelschwund der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und sp\u00e4ter (in geringerem Ausma\u00df) auch der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen gekennzeichnet ist. Die Krankheit manifestiert sich durch Fallhand und H\u00e4ngefu\u00df, Areflexie, Skelettdeformit\u00e4ten (Kyphoskoliose, Pes cavus, Gelenkkontrakturen), leichten sensorischen Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen, bei denen der Vibrationssinn st\u00e4rker eingeschr\u00e4nkt ist als der Schmerzsinn, Optikusatrophie und H\u00f6rverlust. In der Regel werden die Patienten bis zum Jugendalter rollstuhlabh\u00e4ngig und m\u00f6glicherweise entwickeln sich Atemprobleme mit L\u00e4hmungen des Zwerchfells.", "synonyms": "AR-CMT2, Typ Ouvrier, Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit, autosomal-rezessive, Typ Ouvrier, SEOAN durch MFN2-Mangel, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G60.0"}, {"name": "Schwere fr\u00fch-beginnende pulmonale Alveolarproteinose durch MARS-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic interstitial lung disease characterized by accumulation of lipoproteins in the pulmonary alveoli leading to restrictive lung disease and respiratory failure. Patients present with dyspnea, tachypnea, cough, failure to thrive, and digital clubbing. Liver disease have been described in some cases including hepatomegaly, steatosis, fibrosis or cirrhosis.", "synonyms": "Hereditary pulmonary alveolar proteinosis with hepatic involvement, Interstitial lung and liver disease, PAP, Reunion island type, Pulmonary alveolar proteinosis, Reunion island type, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "J84.0", "omim": "615486"}, {"name": "Schwere fr\u00fch-einsetzende axonale Neuropathie durch Neurofilament-Leichtketten-Mangel", "sub_name": "Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 2B5", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare axonal hereditary motor and sensory neuropathy characterized by infantile onset of slowly progressive distal motor weakness and atrophy (more severe in legs and moderate in arms) with mildly delayed motor development, hypotonia, and distal sensory impairment of all sensory modalities.", "synonyms": "AR-CMT2B5, Autosomal recessive Charcot-Marie-Tooth disease type 2B5, SEOAN due to NEFL deficiency, Severe early-onset axonal neuropathy due to NEFL deficiency, Severe early-onset axonal neuropathy due to light neurofilament subunit deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy", "icd_10": "G60.0", "omim": "607734"}, {"name": "Schwere fr\u00fchkindliche Netzhautdegeneration", "sub_name": "Schwere Netzhautdystrophie mit Beginn in fr\u00fcher Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schwere Netzhautdystrophie mit Beginn in fr\u00fcher Kindheit (SECORD) ist eine vererbte Netzhautdystrophie, die durch eine schwere angeborene Nachtblindheit, eine progressive Netzhautdystrophie und Nystagmus gekennzeichnet ist. Die bestkorrigierte Sehsch\u00e4rfe kann im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt 0,3 erreichen und bis weit in das zweite Lebensjahrzehnt hinein bestehen. Die Erblindung ist oft bis zum Alter von 30 Jahren vollst\u00e4ndig.", "synonyms": "EOSRD, Fr\u00fchbeginnende schwere Netzhautdystrophie, SECORD, Schwere fr\u00fchkindliche Netzhautdegeneration, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "UMLS": "C1858080", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist schwer einzusch\u00e4tzen, da viele SECORD-Patienten zuvor als Patienten mit Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA) diagnostiziert wurden.", "clinical_description": "SECORD tritt im Kindesalter auf und umfasst Patienten mit schwerer angeborener Nachtblindheit, Nystagmus, einer deutlich reduzierten Sehsch\u00e4rfe (kleiner oder gleich 0,3) zusammen mit einer progressiven panretinalen Dystrophie unterschiedlichen Ausma\u00dfes und Befall der Makula. Die ersten Symptome k\u00f6nnen im ersten Lebensjahr erkannt werden. Das Farbsehen von ges\u00e4ttigten und unges\u00e4ttigten Farben in Tests ist beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Es kommt zu einer \u00dcberlappung mit der Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA), bei der die Patienten durch ihre Sehsch\u00e4rfe und die panretinale Dystrophie charakterisiert sind. Im Vergleich zur LCA ist die Sehfunktion bei SECORD jedoch deutlich besser, trotz des fortschreitenden Verlusts der Sehfunktion zu Beginn der Erkrankung, der je nach zugrundeliegendem Gen und Mutation zur Erblindung im zweiten bis dritten Lebensjahrzehnt f\u00fchren kann.", "etiology": "SECORD ist genetisch heterogen und wird von vielen Genen verursacht, einschlie\u00dflich derjenigen, die LCA verursachen (ABCA4 (1p22), ADAMTS18 (16q23), AIPL1 (17p13. 1), BEST1 (11q12), CRB1 (1q31.3), CRX (19q13.3), GUCY2D (17p13.1), IMPDH1 (7q31.3-q32), IMPG1 (6q14. 2-q15), IMPG2 (3q12.2-q12.3), IQCB1 (3q21.1), KCNJ13 (2q37), LCA5 (6q14), LRAT (4q32.1), MERTK (2q14.1), NMNAT1 (1p36. 22), RDH12 (14q24.1), RPE65 (1p31), RPGR (Xp11.4), RPGRIP1 (14q11.2), SPATA7 (14q31.3), TULP1 (6p21.3)). SECORD wurde jedoch haupts\u00e4chlich mit Mutationen in RPE65 (2-10% der SECORD-Patienten) und LRAT in Verbindung gebracht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose von SECORD umfasst St\u00e4bchen- und Zapfenantworten unterhalb oder nahe der Schwelle in der Elektroretinographie. Psychophysikalische Tests sagen Zapfen-St\u00e4bchen- und St\u00e4bchen-Zapfen-Dystrophien voraus. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen bei der Geburt einen normal erscheinenden Fundus aufweisen, entwickeln aber sp\u00e4ter im S\u00e4uglingsalter und in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit eine panretinale Dystrophie, die auch die Makula betrifft. Entsprechende Ver\u00e4nderungen der Netzhautschichten sind mit der optischen Koh\u00e4renztomographie im Spektralbereich zu sehen. Bei einer Untergruppe von Patienten mit RPE65- oder LRAT-Mutationen wird von fr\u00fcher Kindheit an ein Mangel an Fundusautofluoreszenz beobachtet. Die Goldmann-Perimetrie zeigt je nach Verlaufsform schwere Gesichtsfeldeinschr\u00e4nkungen und zentrale Skotomata. Knochenspicula werden in der Regel nicht nachgewiesen, jedoch entwickeln sich mit dem Fortschreiten der Erkrankung Pigmentansammlungen. Die molekulare Diagnose kann mit Hilfe eines NGS (Next Generation Sequencing)-Panels durchgef\u00fchrt werden, das die gesamte Sequenz der bekannten assoziierten Gene abdeckt (90% der F\u00e4lle). Identifizierte Mutationen und Segregationsanalysen bei den Eltern werden durch Sanger-Sequenzierung best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren LCA, Alstr\u00f6m-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessive Bestrophinopathie, Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom, Achromatopsie, Stargardt-Syndrom, Usher-Syndrom, Senior-Loken-Syndrom, Saldino-Mainzer-Syndrom, Joubert-Syndrom, Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie, infantile Refsum-Krankheit, neonatale Adrenoleukodystrophie, Zellweger-Syndrom und juvenile neuronale Ceroidlipofuszinose.", "genetic_counseling": "SECORD wird in der Regel autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, aber auch autosomal-dominante (CRX, GUCY2D, IMPDH1, IMPG1, IMPG2) und X-chromosomale Erbg\u00e4nge wurden beobachtet.", "management_and_treatment": "SECORD ist derzeit unheilbar. Einige Therapien werden derzeit untersucht, einschlie\u00dflich Gentherapien f\u00fcr RPE65, ABCA4 und MERTK. Eine Retinoid-Supplementierungstherapie (9-cis-Retinoid) wird bei Patienten mit Mutationen in RPE65 und LRAT eingesetzt. Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und umfasst die Korrektur des Refraktionsfehlers und die Verwendung von Low-Vision-Hilfen.", "prognosis": "Die Sehleistung bei hellem Licht erlaubt den Besuch von Regelschulen in den Grundschuljahren. Aufgrund der genetischen Heterogenit\u00e4t besteht ein breites Spektrum an Verl\u00e4ufen, die nicht mit spezifischen Mutationen korrelieren. Eine nutzbare Sehfunktion bleibt h\u00e4ufig \u00fcber die zweite Lebensdekade hinaus erhalten und eine Reihe von Patienten beh\u00e4lt auch in der dritten Lebensdekade noch Restinseln des peripheren Sehens, wenn auch erheblich eingeschr\u00e4nkt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist schwer einzusch\u00e4tzen, da viele SECORD-Patienten zuvor als Patienten mit Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA) diagnostiziert wurden."}, {"name": "Schwere F\u00fctterprobleme mit Gedeihst\u00f6rungen und Mikrozephalie durch ASXL3-Mangel", "sub_name": "Bainbridge-Ropers-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability disorder with a variable phenotypic presentation typically characterized by microcephaly, severe feeding difficulties, failure to thrive, severe global development delay that frequently results in absent/poor speech, moderate to severe intellectual disability and hypotonia. Distinctive craniofacial features include prominent forehead, high-arched, thin eyebrows, hypertelorism, downslanting palpebral fissures, long, tubular nose with broad tip and prominent nasal bridge and wide mouth with full, everted lower lip. Joint laxity and ulnar deviation of wrists are also frequently observed.", "synonyms": "Severe feeding difficulties-failure to thrive-microcephaly due to ASXL3 deficiency syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "615485", "epidemiology": "Less than 100 cases have been reported in literature and databases to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is usually in the first months of life; however, intrauterine growth retardation has been reported in some cases. Symptoms of global development delay include hypotonia, delay in achieving independent sitting and walking, and marked language delay. Intellectual disability ranges from moderate to severe. Affected individuals may also display autistic features. Feeding difficulties requiring support are frequent. Other frequent gastrointestinal features include gastroesophageal reflux and constipation. Distinct facial features include highly arched or delineated eyebrows and also synophrys, and frequently a highly arched palate. Patients may exhibited skeletal anomalies including scoliotic attitude, joint laxity, pectus excavatum or carinatum and ulnar deviation of wrists.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to loss of function mutations in ASXL3 gene (18q12.1).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on presentation of clinical features, and can be confirmed by genetic testing. Most of the patients described so far had been confirmed by next generation sequencing techniques.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other syndromes with moderate-severe intellectual disability and poor language. In some reported cases Cornelia de Lange syndrome was suspected due to feeding difficulties, developmental delay and eyebrow characteristics.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "There is no definitive antenatal diagnosis available, however ultrasound may show intrauterine growth retardation which should be investigated further. As germline mosaicism has been described, prenatal diagnosis may be considered where the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant; however, no familial transmission has been observed so far. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that, for each pregnancy, there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring. It is also important to counsel affected families about the possibility of recurrence due to germline mosaicism.", "management_and_treatment": "Given the multisystemic involvement, multidisciplinary follow-up is needed and should include neurological follow up, developmental assessments, physiotherapy (particularly for joint laxity and musculoskeletal issues), feeding interventions for those with persistent feeding issues, and ophthalmologic follow up for patients with strabismus and/or refractive error.", "prognosis": "Quality of life and the functional consequences depends on the severity of the developmental delay and intellectual disability."}, {"name": "Schwere generalisierte rezessive DEB", "sub_name": "Epidermolysis bullosa, dystrophe, generalisierte schwere, autosomal-rezessive", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung betr\u00e4gt 1/1.250.000 in Schottland und 1/2.381.000 in den Vereinigten Staaten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A severe form of dystrophic epidermolysis bullosa (DEB) characterized by generalized cutaneous and mucosal blistering and scarring associated with severe deformities and major extracutaneous involvement.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive dystrophic epidermolysis bullosa generalisata gravis, Autosomal recessive dystrophic epidermolysis bullosa, Hallopeau-Siemens type, Generalized RDEB, severe form, RDEB generalisata gravis, RDEB, Hallopeau-Siemens type, Severe generalized RDEB, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q81.2", "omim": "226600", "gard": "6308", "epidemiology": "The reported prevalence at birth varies between populations, from to 1/2,500,000 in the Unites States to 1/164,000 in Croatia.", "clinical_description": "Blisters develop spontaneously or after the mildest trauma at birth or during the neonatal period and affect all of the body (with predilection for skin over bony prominences) with extensive involvement of the oral and gastrointestinal mucosa. Congenital skin ulceration with extensive denudation of a body area may be present. Lesions heal with retracting scars and milia. Epidermolysis bullosa (EB) nevi may occur. Excessive scarring can lead to adhesion of fingers and toes resulting to pseudosyndactyly, and to joint contractures that further cause disabling hand and foot deformities (''mitten deformities''). Scarring alopecia of the scalp and permanent loss of nail plates are also observed. Eye involvement is frequent and includes blepharitis, loss of eyelashes, ectropion, symblepharon, and corneal blisters that can lead to loss of vision. Chewing and swallowing difficulties are due to ankyloglossia, obliteration of the oral vestibules and progressive microstomia. Dental caries are numerous. Esophageal stricture is frequent and results in severe dysphagia. Anal and perianal erosions cause major pain during defecation and foster constipation. Extensive gastrointestinal involvement in combination with a hypercatabolic state due to permanent wounding, infection and inflammation, induce a state of chronic malnutrition which contributes to growth retardation, delayed puberty, osteopenia and osteoporosis. Urethral strictures may occur. Refractory anemia, iron deficiency and hypoalbuminemia are also observed. Nearly all patients develop at least one aggressive squamous cell carcinoma (SCC), typically during the third-fourth decade of life.", "etiology": "The disease is caused by homozygous or compound heterozygous biallelic nonsense mutations in COL7A1 (3p21.31) that usually result in premature termination codons leading to a lack of functional collagen VII, the main constituent of anchoring fibrils that anchor the basement membrane to the dermis.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected at clinical examination and is confirmed by immunofluorescence antigen mapping and/or transmission electron microscopy on skin samples showing a cleavage plane located below the lamina densa of the cutaneous basement membrane zone. Genetic testing confirms the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes other forms of EB. In the neonatal period also herpes simplex infection, congenital erosive and vesicular dermatosis, epidermolytic ichthyosis, bullous pemphigoid, neonatal pemphigus and pemphigoid gestationis, and staphylococcal scalded skin syndrome may need to be considered.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is always recommended to parents having a child with severe RDEB. The disease-causing pathogenic variants should be disclosed before.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Protective padding of the skin reduces the blistering and careful wound care helps in preventing secondary infections. Treatment of pain and itch is highly warranted but partly limited in effectiveness. Regular follow-up at an EB-experienced dentist is recommended. Physiotherapy and occupational therapy are necessary to delay gradual loss of mobility and autonomy. Hand and foot deformities can be treated by surgery. Follow-up by a dietitian is essential and gastrostomy feeding may be necessary. Esophageal strictures are treated by balloon dilatation with fluoroscopic guidance. Transfusions, iron supplementation, and erythropoietin administration improve anemia and iron deficiency. Vitamin D supplementation may be indicated to prevent osteoporosis. Regular follow-up is necessary for the surveillance of SCC. Psychological support should be offered.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is significantly reduced, mostly due to the development of aggressive SCC with frequent metastases. By the age of 55, the cumulative risk for developing SCC and death is greater than 90% and about 80%, respectively. Other complications that affect prognosis include chronic renal failure, and more rarely, multifactorial cardiomyopathy."}, {"name": "Schwere h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie durch G6PD-Mangel", "sub_name": "Glukose-6-Phosphat-Dehydrogenase-Mangel der Klasse I", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare constitutional hemolytic anemia due to an enzyme disorder characterized by severe glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency (typically <10% residual enzyme activity) associated with chronic non-spherocytic hemolytic anemia of highly variable severity. Patients are at risk of developing neonatal jaundice (potentially leading to kernicterus), gallstones, and reticulocytosis and splenomegaly. They have an increased susceptibility to oxidizing agents provoking episodes of acute hemolysis. Favism, which describes the occurrence of an acute hemolytic reaction in response to the ingestion of fava beans, is more common in infants and young children.", "synonyms": "Class I G6PD deficiency, Severe hemolytic anemia due to G6PD deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "D55.0", "omim": "300908"}, {"name": "Schwere heredit\u00e4re Thrombophilie durch kongenitalen Protein-C-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Heredit\u00e4re Thrombophilie durch PC-Mangel, Thrombophilie durch PC-Mangel, autosomal-rezessive, Thrombophilie durch kongenitalen Protein C-Mangel, autosomal-rezessive, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D68.2", "OMIM": "176860\u00a0 612304", "UMLS": "C0398625\u00a0 C2930896", "summary": "Der Kongenitale Protein C-Mangel ist eine erbliche Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung mit tiefen ven\u00f6sen Thrombosen als Folge verminderter Synthese und/oder Aktivit\u00e4t des Proteins C. Die Pr\u00e4valenz des schweren Protein C-Mangels (homozygote und compound-heterozygote Formen) wird auf 1:500.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Der partielle Mangel (heterozygote Formen) ist sehr viel h\u00e4ufiger (1:200 - 1:500). Beide Geschlechter sind gleich betroffen. Patienten mit nicht nachweisbarem Protein C-Spiegel entwickeln die Krankheit schon wenige Stunden bis Tage nach der Geburt mit Purpura fulminans (s. dort) oder massiven ven\u00f6sen Thrombosen. Die Prupura fulminans ist ein lebensbedrohlicher Zustand, mit ausgedehnter Blutgerinnung im ganzen K\u00f6rper mit der Folge von Gewebsnekrosen. Patienten mit niedrigen, aber nachweisbaren Protein C-Spiegeln haben leichtere Symptome die im allgemeinen den Symptomen heterozygoter Individuen \u00e4hneln. Individuen mit heterozygotem Protein C-Mangel bleiben in der Regel bis in das Erwachsenenalter hinein symptomfrei. Thrombotische Episoden werden vor allem durch andere Risikofaktoren ausgel\u00f6st, wie chirurgische Eingriffe, Schwangerschaft und Immobilisierung. Tiefe Venenthrombosen der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen mit oder ohne Lungenembolie ist die h\u00e4ufigste Krankheitsmanifestation. Auch Venenthrombosen im Hirn und Mesenterium sind m\u00f6glich. Ursache des Protein C-Mangels sind Mutationen im PROC-Gen (2q13-q14), dem Strukturgen von Protein C. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchrt die Messung des Protein C-Spiegels. Die Protein C-Aktivit\u00e4t reicht bei schwerem Mangel von 0% bis 30% und bei partiellen Defekten von 30% bis 70%. Die Krankheit tritt in zwei klinisch-chemischen Formen auf: Beim Typ I-Mangel sind Protein C-Aktivit\u00e4t und -Antigen gleichsinnig vermindert, beim Typ II ist nur die Aktivit\u00e4t vermindert, das Antigen nicht. Eine molekulare Analyse ist m\u00f6glich, wird f\u00fcr die Diagnosestellung aber nicht ben\u00f6tigt. Differentialdiagnosen sind andere erbliche Thrombophilien: der Antithrombin- und der Protein S-Mangel (s. diese Termini). Wenn in Familien mit betroffenen Kindern die urs\u00e4chlichen PROC-Mutationen bekannt sind, ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durch molekulare Analyse in der Chorionzottenbiopsie m\u00f6glich. F\u00fcr die initiale Therapie der neonatalen Purpura fulminans ist die Anwendung von Protein C-Konzentrat oder frisch gefrorenem Plasma unerl\u00e4sslich. Ggf. m\u00fcssen Thromben chirurgisch resiziert werden. Thrombosen werden mit Antikoagulantien behandelt. Auf das Risiko cumarin-induzierter Hautnekrosen muss geachtet werden. Bei famili\u00e4rer H\u00e4ufung thrombotischer Krankheiten ist peripartal und perioperativ eine pr\u00e4ventive Thrombosetherapie indiziert. Homozygote oder compound-heterozygote F\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen eine schwere Prognose haben. Heterozygote Patienten haben eine gute Prognose. Bei ad\u00e4quater Therapie und \u00dcberwachung ist das Risiko thromboembolischer Insulte erheblich reduziert. Lungenembolien sind eine Ursache von Mortalit\u00e4t."}, {"name": "Schwere heredit\u00e4re Thrombophilie durch kongenitalen Protein-S-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Thrombophilie durch kongenitalen Protein-S-Mangel, autosomal-rezessive, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D68.5", "OMIM": "612336\u00a0 614514", "summary": "Der Kongenitale Protein S-Mangel ist eine erbliche Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung mit rezidivierenden ven\u00f6sen Thrombosen als Folge verminderter Synthese und/oder Aktivit\u00e4t des Proteins S. Die Pr\u00e4valenz des partiellen Protein S-Mangels (heterozygote Individuen) in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 0,16% - 0,21% gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Pr\u00e4valenz des schweren Protein S-Mangels (homozygote oder compound-heterozygote Individuen) ist nicht bekannt, ist aber wahrscheinlich der gesch\u00e4tzten Pr\u00e4valenz des schweren Protein C-Mangels, 1:500.000, vergleichbar. Frauen und M\u00e4nner sind gleich betroffen. Der schwere Protein S-Mangel wird wenige Stunden bis Tage nach der Geburt mit Purpura fulminans (s. dort) oder massiven ven\u00f6sen Thrombosen manifest. Die Purpura fulminans ist eine lebensbedrohliche Situation mit ausgiebiger Blutgerinnung und Gewebsnekrosen im ganzen K\u00f6rper. Ein m\u00f6gliches Symptom ist die Fr\u00fchgeborenen-Retinopathie (s. dort). Heterozygote Individuen bleiben meist bis in das Erwachsenenalter hinein ohne Symptome. Risikofaktoren f\u00fcr thrombotische Episoden sind vor allem chirurgische Eingriffe, Schwangerschaft und Immobilisierung. Die h\u00e4ufigste Manifestation der Krankheit ist die tiefe Venenthrombose der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen mit oder ohne Lungenembolie. Auch arterielle Thrombosen sind m\u00f6glich. Ursache des Protein S-Mangels sind Mutationen im PROS1-Gen (3q11-q11.2). Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchrt die Messung des Protein S-Antigenspiegels (Gesamt-Protein S oder freies Protein S) und der Antikoagulans-Aktivit\u00e4t. Die Krankheit tritt in drei klinisch-chemischen Formen auf: Typ I und Typ III sind Formen mit quantitativem Mangel und niedrigen Spiegeln von freiem Antigen (Der Gesamt-Proteinspiegel des Proteins S ist beim Typ III im Normalbereich und beim Typ I erniedrigt). Der Typ II ist ein qualitativer Mangel mit normalen Konzentrationen des freien und gesamten Proteins C. Eine molekulare Testung ist m\u00f6glich, f\u00fcr die Diagnosestellung aber nicht erforderlich. Differentialdiagnosen sind andere erbliche Thrombophilien, darunter der Antithrombin-Mangel und der Protein C-Mangel (s. diese Termini). Wenn in Familien mit betroffenen Kindern die urs\u00e4chlichen PROS1-Mutationen bekannt sind, ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durch molekulare Analyse der Chorionzottenbiopsie m\u00f6glich. F\u00fcr die initiale Therapie der neonatalen Purpura fulminans ist die Anwendung von Protein C-Konzentrat oder frisch gefrorenem Plasma unerl\u00e4sslich. Ggf. m\u00fcssen Thromben chirurgisch resiziert werden. Thrombosen werden mit Antikoagulantien (Heparin, Phenprocoumon) behandelt. Auf das Risiko cumarin-induzierter Hautnekrosen muss geachtet werden. Bei famili\u00e4rer H\u00e4ufung thrombotischer Krankheiten ist peripartal und perioperativ eine pr\u00e4ventive Thrombosetherapie indiziert. Homozygote oder compound-heterozygote F\u00e4lle k\u00f6nnen eine schwere Prognose haben. Heterozygote Patienten haben eine gute Prognose. Bei ad\u00e4quater Therapie und \u00dcberwachung ist das Risiko thromboembolischer Insulte erheblich reduziert. Lungenembolien sind eine Ursache von Mortalit\u00e4t."}, {"name": "Schwere Hypotonie-psychomotorische Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung-Strabismus-Septumdefekt-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe hypotonia-psychomotor developmental delay-strabismus-cardiac septal defect syndrome is a rare, genetic, non-dystrophic congenital myopathy disorder characterized by a neonatal-onset of severe generalized hypotonia associated with mild psychomotor delay, congenital strabismus with abducens nerve palsy, and atrial and/or ventricular septal defects. Cryptorchidism is commonly reported in male patients and muscle biopsy typically reveals increased variability in muscle fiber size.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G71.2", "omim": "616816"}, {"name": "Schwere infantile axonale Neuropathie mit Atemversagen", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1 is a rare genetic motor neuron disease characterized by severe respiratory distress/respiratory failure in association with diaphragmatic eventration and palsy, as well as progressive, symmetrical, distal-to-proximal muscle weakness and atrophy (in lower limbs especially). Patients typically have a history of intrauterine growth retardation, low birth weight, feeble cry, weak suck and failure to thrive and present with inspiratory stridor, recurrent episodes of dyspnea or apnea, cyanosis and absent deep tendon reflexes. Kyphosis/scoliosis, foot deformities and joint contractures are frequently associated features.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive distal spinal muscular atrophy type 1, Autosomal recessive spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy, Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type 6, Distal-HMN type 6, SIANRF, SMARD1, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 1, dHMN6, dSMA1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "604320", "umls": "C1858517", "gard": "8592"}, {"name": "Schwere infantile axonale Neuropathie mit Atemversagen Typ 2", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 2 is a rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by progressive early respiratory failure associated with diaphragm paralysis, distal muscular weakness, joint contractures, and axial hypotonia with preserved antigravity limb movements. Phenotype overlaps considerably with SMARD type 1 but is differentiated by a mutation in a different gene.", "synonyms": "Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy type 2, SMARD2, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 2, X-linked spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2"}, {"name": "Schwere infantile Myoklonusepilepsie", "sub_name": "Dravet-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Dravet-Syndrom (DS) ist eine therapierefrakt\u00e4re epileptische Enzephalopathie bei sonst gesunden Kleinkindern. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird auf 1-2:40.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Das DS ist im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht doppelt so h\u00e4ufig wie im weiblichen. Die Krankheit beginnt im 1. Lebensjahr mit klonisch/tonisch-klonischen generalisierten oder einseitigen Krampfanf\u00e4llen. Die Anf\u00e4lle treten alle 1-2 Monate auf und sind anfangs oft mit Fieber verbunden. H\u00e4ufig entwickelt sich ein hemiklonischer oder generalisierter Status epilepticus. Andere Krampftypen (meist Myoklonus, atypische Absencen und komplex-partielle Anf\u00e4lle) treten im 2. und 3. Lebensjahr auf. In dieser Zeit nimmt die Dauer der Anf\u00e4lle ab, aber ihre H\u00e4ufigkeit nimmt zu. Ausl\u00f6sende Faktoren sind das Schlie\u00dfen der Augen oder intermittierende Lichtstimulation. Der Verlauf der Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch Verlangsamung der psychomotorischen Entwicklung, durch beginnende Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten und Ataxie. Photosensitivit\u00e4t wurde beschrieben. Mindestens 25% der Patienten mit DS haben eine Familiengeschichte mit Epilepsie und Fieberkr\u00e4mpfen. Bei mindestens 2/3 der F\u00e4lle von DS wurden Mutationen, meist Neumutationen, im SCN1A-Gen (Chromosomenregion 2q24.3) gefunden. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr einen spannungsgesteuerten Natrium-Kanal. Das DS wird anhand des klinischen Bildes diagnostiziert, d.h., der Nachweis einer SCN1A-Mutation sichert die Diagnose nicht. Im Anfangsstadium der Krankheit ist das EEG noch normal, im Alter von 2-3 Jahren treten dann generalisierte Spikes und Polyspike-Waves auf. Die Assoziation eines fr\u00fchen Anfallgeschehens mit Fieberepisoden kann diagnostisch richtungsweisend sein. Eine Variante des DS (borderline SMEI; SMEB) ohne myoklonische Kr\u00e4mpfe aber mit sonst allen Zeichen des DS wurde beschrieben. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen fr\u00fche Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe, das Lennox-Gastaut-Syndrom und die Epilepsie mit myoklonisch-astatischen Krisen (sh. diese Termini) ausgeschlossen werden. Die F\u00e4lle sprechen auf Antikonvulsiva nicht gut an, aber Valproat und Benzodiazepine (Clobazam) sind wahrscheinlich am wirksamsten. In neuerer Zeit hat sich die zus\u00e4tzliche Therapie mit Stiripentol als hilfreich erwiesen. Die Substanz erhielt im Januar 2007 in der EU die Marktzulassung als Orphan-Medikament f\u00fcr die adjuvante Therapie des DS. Offene klinische Studien ergaben Hinweise, dass Topiramat hilfreich bei Patienten sein kann, die nur schlecht auf Stiripentol ansprechen. Wegen des Risikos einer Verschlimmerung der Anf\u00e4lle sollte die Gabe von Carbamazepin und Vigabatrin vermieden werden. Weitere therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind ketogene Di\u00e4t, Krankengymnastik und Kommunikations-Training. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der Anf\u00e4lle nimmt mit zunehmendem Alter der Kinder ab, aber wegen kognitiver Einschr\u00e4nkung und bleibenden Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten ist die Langzeitprognose ung\u00fcnstig. Das Dravet-Syndrom ist auch mit pl\u00f6tzlichem Kindstod assoziiert, vor allem zwischen dem 2. und 4. Lebensjahr.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental and epileptic encephalopathy characterized by infantile onset of intractable seizures that are often febrile, and associated with cognitive and motor impairment.", "synonyms": "SMEI, Severe myoclonic epilepsy of infancy, Severe myoclonus epilepsy of infancy, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G40.4", "omim": "607208\u00a0 612164\u00a0 615744", "umls": "C0751122", "gard": "10430", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of Dravet syndrome is 1/30,000 (range 1/15,000-40,000).", "clinical_description": "Onset of the first seizure is mainly in the first year of life (usually at 5-8 months) in previously healthy infants. Seizures include clonic seizure, often unilateral that alternates between left and right, and generalized tonic-clonic seizures. Seizures are often febrile and long lasting, presenting as febrile status epilepticus (SE). SE is mainly frequent in the first years. Other seizures types may also occur, such as focal or atypical absence seizures, as well as possible clusters of nocturnal tonic or tonic-clonic seizures between age 4 and 11. Photosensitivity, high temperatures, photic stimulation and exercise may trigger seizures. Developmental delay is often apparent by age 2, followed by cognitive plateauing. Speech impairment, progressive gait deterioration with crouching, and sleeping difficulties may also appear at this stage.", "etiology": "Around 85% of cases are due to a mutation or deletion in the SCN1A gene (2q24.3), encoding a voltage-gated sodium channel. Most mutations are de novo but might be part of a familial spectrum of genetic epilepsy with febrile seizures-plus (GEFS+) in 5-10%. Mutations in the PCDH19 gene (Xq22.1), might account for about 5% of female cases. In about 10% of cases, the etiology is unknown. Somatic mosaic deletions or mutations in SCN1A are found in about 3% of the patients that are initially negative. Few patients are reported with pathogenic variants in other genes such as GABRG2 (5q34), GABRA1 (5q34), STXBP1 (9q34.11), SCN1B (19q13.12), and SCN2A (2q24.3).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and electroencephalographic (EEG) findings. At onset, EEG is usually normal but later spikes or poly spike-waves with a slowing of background and multifocal discharges are recorded. Brain magnetic resonance imaging is usually normal. SCN1A pathogenic variants can confirm the diagnosis in the clinical setting of Dravet syndrome.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes myoclonic atonic epilepsy.", "genetic_counseling": "In families with a known SCN1A mutation, inheritance is autosomal dominant and genetic counselling is possible, even though the phenotypic range in families can be wide. In cases with de novo mutations, counselling may helpful.", "management_and_treatment": "The main aim of treatment is to reduce seizure frequency and prevent SE. Valproate, clobazam, stiripentol and bromide may control the febrile seizures early in the disease. Stiripentol may be effective in reducing the duration and the frequency of seizures in combination with valproate and clobazam. The ketogenic diet, topiramate and levetiracetam may provide substantial efficacy as adjunctive therapy as well as cannabidiol in association with clobazam. Ongoing clinical trials showed substantial efficacy of fenfluramine as an add-on. Vagus nerve stimulation can be also considered. Sodium channel blockers (carbamazepine, oxcarbazepine, eslicarbazepine, lamotrigine and phenytoin) should be avoided as they worsen seizures. Benzodiazepines are used to treat acute seizures. Children with prominent seizures with falls need protective head gear. Treatment management should be handled by clinicians with expertise in rare and complex epilepsies.", "prognosis": "Seizures can decrease in frequency in adulthood but often remain refractory to therapies. Moderate to severe cognitive impairment and intractable epilepsy into adulthood is common. Children present a progressive cognitive decline after early language and visual function impairment. Intellectual deficiency is present in around 86% of patients. Autism spectrum disorder can also appear in 31%. Preventing the occurrence of convulsive SE in children may improve the long-term prognosis."}, {"name": "Schwere Intelligenzminderung-Aplasia/Hypoplasie des Daumens und Hallux-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Temple-Baraitser-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies syndrome defined by global developmental delay and severe intellectual disability, epilepsy, hypoplasia/aplasia of the nails of the thumb and great toe, and facial dysmorphism.", "synonyms": "Severe intellectual disability-aplasia/hypoplasia of thumb and hallux syndrome, TMBTS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "611816", "umls": "C2678486", "epidemiology": "To date, 9 cases have been reported in the literature.", "clinical_description": "Temple-Baraitser syndrome (TBS) is defined by the association of developmental delay (neonatal hypotonia, delayed developmental milestones), and intellectual disability which is most often severe. The characteristic finding is the presence of distal hypoplasia of digits (mostly the distal phalanges), which is more pronounced at, and often limited to, the thumbs and halluces; nail aplasia or hypoplasia is observed in all patients. In some patients, thumbs and halluces are broad or elongated, and pseudoepiphysis may be observed on X-ray imaging. Facial dysmorphism is characterized by a pseudo-myopathic appearance. Other reported facial features include high anterior or low frontal hairline with central cowlick, flat forehead, ptosis, hypertelorism, downslanting palpebral fissures, epicanthal folds, thick helices, broad depressed nasal bridge with anteverted nares, short columella, long philtrum, high-arched palate, broad mouth with thick vermilion border of the upper or the lower lip and downturned corners. Seizures are reported in all patients, starting at a various ages. Poor visual contact and autistic behaviour are observed in most patients.", "etiology": "TBS is due to heterozygous gain of function missense variants in the KCNH1 gene (1q32.2), lowering the activation threshold of the mutant voltage-gated potassium channel and delaying its deactivation. TBS is allelic to Zimmerman-Laband syndrome (ZLS), which differs from TBS by the presence of gingival fibromatosis, coarse facial features, hypertrychosis, hepato-splenomagly, and more severe digital anomalies. As both syndromes have been described with the same variant, and some patients with KCNH1 variant but without full-blown TBS or ZLS have been reported, it is likely that TBS is part of a broader KCNH1-related disorder.", "diagnostic_methods": "Confirmation of clinical diagnosis is based on KCNH1 sequencing by targeted sanger sequencing, or via NGS (next generation sequencing) multigene panel including KCNH1.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes DOORS, Lynch Bushby and Zimmerman-Laband syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "For parents of an index individual, prenatal diagnosis in subsequent pregnancies should be discussed.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant; however, most reported KCNH1 variants occur de novo. Mosaicism has been reported in two epileptic, but otherwise unaffected, mothers. Although not known, the recurrence risk to siblings is thus much higher than the usual theoretical 1% estimated risk in the presence of an apparent de novo variant.", "management_and_treatment": "Management and treatment are based on the phenotype. Antiepileptic drugs, and physical and occupational therapy may be needed. Nutritional and feeding status should be evaluated.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the severity of the phenotype."}, {"name": "Schwere Intelligenzminderung-Corpus callosum-Agenesie-faziale Dysmorphien-zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by congenital microcephaly, severe intellectual disability, hypertonia at birth lessening with age, ataxia, and specific dysmorphic facial features including hirsutism, low anterior hairline and bitemporal narrowing, arched, thick, and medially sparse eyebrows, long eyelashes, lateral upper eyelids swelling and a skin fold partially covering the inferior eyelids, low-set posteriorly rotated protruding ears, anteverted nares, and a full lower lip. Brain imaging shows partial to almost complete agenesis of the corpus callosum and variable degrees of cerebellar hypoplasia.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "616819"}, {"name": "Schwere Intelligenzminderung-eingeschr\u00e4nktes Sprachverm\u00f6gen-Strabismus-grimassierendes Gesicht-lange Finger-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe intellectual disability-poor language-strabismus-grimacing face-long fingers syndrome is a rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by global development delay with very limited or absent speech and language, severe intellectual disability, long slender fingers, ocular abnormalities (typically strabismus or hypermetropia), and facial dysmorphism that includes a grimacing facial expression, a tubular-shaped nose with a prominent, broad base and tip, and other variable features, such as broad forehead, hypertelorism, deep-set eyes, narrow palpebral fissures, short philtrum and/or broad mouth.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "615074", "gard": "12815"}, {"name": "Schwere Intelligenzminderung-Epilepsie-Analanomalien-Hypoplastische distale Phalangen", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch schwere geistige Behinderung, Epilepsie, Hypoplasie der Endphalangen und einen nach vorn verlagerten Anus. Es wurde bei 2 Schwestern mit konsanguinen Eltern beschrieben. Wahrscheinlich wird das Syndrom autosomal-rezessiv, mit Anomalien auf Chromosom 1 und 14, vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe intellectual disability-epilepsy-anal anomalies-distal phalangeal hypoplasia is characterised by severe intellectual deficit, epilepsy, hypoplasia of the terminal phalanges, and an anteriorly displaced anus. It has been described in two sisters born to consanguineous parents. The syndrome is transmitted as an autosomal recessive trait and appears to be caused by anomalies in to chromosome regions, one localised to chromosome 1 and the other to chromosome 14.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8"}, {"name": "Schwere Intelligenzminderung-Hypotonie-Strabismus-grobe Gesichtssz\u00fcge-Planovalgus-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by profound intellectual disability, hypotonia, coarse facial features, strabismus and impaired visual fixation, hypermobility of interphalangeal joints, contractures in the elbow joints, and pes planovalgus. Seizures and episodes of aggressive behavior during sleep have also been reported.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.8"}, {"name": "Schwere Intelligenzminderung-Kleinwuchs-Verhaltensst\u00f6rungen-Gesichtsdysmorphie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe intellectual disability-short stature-behavioral abnormalities-facial dysmorphism syndrome is a rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by severe intellectual disability with limited or absent speech and language, short stature, acquired microcephaly, kyphoscoliosis or scoliosis, and behavioral disturbances that include hyperactivity, stereotypy and aggressiveness. Facial dysmorphism, that typically includes sloping forehead, mild synophrys, deep-set eyes, strabismus, anteverted large ears, prominent nose and dental malposition, is also characteristic.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "615541"}, {"name": "Schwere Intelligenzminderung-progressive postnatale Mikrozephalie-stereotype Mittellinien-Handbewegungen-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe intellectual disability-progressive postnatal microcephaly-midline stereotypic hand movements syndrome is a rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by severe intellectual disability, non-inherited, progressive, post-natal microcephaly, hypotonia, hyperkinesia, absence of speech, strabismus, and midline stereotypic hand movements (e.g. hand washing/rubbing). Additional features include developmental delay, seizures and behavioral disturbances, such as self injury and unexplained crying episodes.", "synonyms": "IQSEC2-related syndromic intellectual disability, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8"}, {"name": "Schwere Intelligenzminderung-progressive spastische Diplegie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe intellectual disability-progressive spastic diplegia syndrome is a rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by intellectual disability, significant motor delay, severe speech impairment, early-onset truncal hypotonia with progressive distal hypertonia/spasticity, microcephaly, and behavioral anomalies (autistic features, aggression or auto-aggressive behavior, sleep disturbances). Variable facial dysmorphism includes broad nasal tip with small alae nasi, long and/or flat philtrum, thin upper lip vermillion. Visual impairment (strabismus, hyperopia, myopia) is commonly associated.", "synonyms": "CTNNB1 syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G80.1", "omim": "615075", "gard": "3505"}, {"name": "Schwere kongenitale hypochrome An\u00e4mie mit beringten Sideroblasten", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "STEAP3/TSAP6-related sideroblastic anemia is a very rare severe non-syndromic hypochromic anemia, which is characterized by transfusion-dependent hypochromic, poorly regenerative anemia, iron overload, resembling non-syndromic sideroblastic anemia (see this term) except for increased erythrocyte protoporphyrin levels.", "synonyms": "Severe congenital hypochromic sideroblastic anemia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D64.0", "omim": "615234", "epidemiology": "It has been reported in 3 siblings to date.", "etiology": "STEAP3/TSAP6-related sideroblastic anemia is caused by a nonsense heterozygous mutation in the STEAP3/TSAP6 gene. Transmission is most likely recessive with a low expression allele."}, {"name": "Schwere kongenitale Neutropenie - pulmonale Hypertension - superfizielle ven\u00f6se Angiektasie", "sub_name": "Neutropenie, kongenitale schwere, autosomal-rezessive, durch G6PC3-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive severe congenital neutropenia due to G6PC3 deficiency is a rare, genetic, primary immunodeficiency disorder characterized by increased susceptibility to recurrent, life-threatening bacterial infections, in association with typically severe neutropenia in peripheral blood and bone marrow and a prominent ectatic superficial vein pattern, resulting from recessively inherited mutations in the G6PC3 gene. Cardiac malformations (e.g. atrial septal defects, patent ductus arteriosus,valvular defects), urogenital anomalies (incl. cryptorchidism), growth and developmental delay, facial dysmorphism (e.g. frontal bossing, upturned nose, malar hypoplasia), and intermittent thrombocytopenia are frequently associated.", "synonyms": "SCN4, Severe congenital neutropenia type 4, Severe congenital neutropenia-pulmonary hypertension-superficial venous angiectasis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "D70", "omim": "612541", "umls": "C2675526"}, {"name": "Schwere laterale Tibia-Verkr\u00fcmmung mit Kleinwuchs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte prim\u00e4re Knochendysplasie, die durch eine signifikante, ein- oder beidseitige laterale Tibiaverkr\u00fcmmung gekennzeichnet ist, die in den distalen zwei Dritteln der Tibia lokalisiert ist. Es zeigt sich eine entsprechende kortikale Verdickung und Ausd\u00fcnnung der inneren und \u00e4u\u00dferen Tibiakurve, Verlust des normalen trabekul\u00e4ren Knochens und beidseitigen Anomalien der Tibiaepiphysen und Wachstumsplatten. Ebenfalls assoziiert sind Fu\u00dfanomalien (einschlie\u00dflich abnorm hoher Fu\u00dfgew\u00f6lbe). Betroffene Personen sind kleinw\u00fcchsig und weisen keine weiteren Skelettanomalien auf.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q68.4"}, {"name": "Schwere Mikrobrachyzephalie-Intelligenzminderung-athetoide Zerebralparese-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe microbrachycephaly-intellectual disability-athetoid cerebral palsy syndrome is an extremely rare, multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by craniofacial dysmorphism, including microbrachycephaly, sloping forehead, micro/anophthalmia, large ears, prominent nasal root, mild micrognathia, and cleft palate, associated with cerebral palsy with choreoathetoid movements, intellectual disability, dextrocardia and longitudinal folding of plantae pedis. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1992.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "No data available\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "gard": "3482\u00a0 841"}, {"name": "Schwere motorische und intellektuelle Beeintr\u00e4chtigung-sensorinsorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Dystonie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, neurological disorder characterized by intrauterine growth retardation, failure to thrive, infantile onset of sensorineural deafness, severe global developmental delay or absent psychomotor development, paraplegia or quadriplegia with dystonia and pyramidal signs, microcephaly, ocular abnormalities (strabismus, optic atrophy), mildly dysmorphic features (deep-set eyes, prominent nasal bridge, micrognathia), seizures and abnormalities of brain morphology (hypomyelinating white matter changes, cerebral atrophy).", "synonyms": "Severe motor and intellectual disabilities-sensorineural hearing loss-dystonia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "300475"}, {"name": "Schwere myoklonische Epilepsie des Kleinkindalters", "sub_name": "Dravet-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Dravet-Syndrom (DS) ist eine therapierefrakt\u00e4re epileptische Enzephalopathie bei sonst gesunden Kleinkindern. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird auf 1-2:40.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Das DS ist im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht doppelt so h\u00e4ufig wie im weiblichen. Die Krankheit beginnt im 1. Lebensjahr mit klonisch/tonisch-klonischen generalisierten oder einseitigen Krampfanf\u00e4llen. Die Anf\u00e4lle treten alle 1-2 Monate auf und sind anfangs oft mit Fieber verbunden. H\u00e4ufig entwickelt sich ein hemiklonischer oder generalisierter Status epilepticus. Andere Krampftypen (meist Myoklonus, atypische Absencen und komplex-partielle Anf\u00e4lle) treten im 2. und 3. Lebensjahr auf. In dieser Zeit nimmt die Dauer der Anf\u00e4lle ab, aber ihre H\u00e4ufigkeit nimmt zu. Ausl\u00f6sende Faktoren sind das Schlie\u00dfen der Augen oder intermittierende Lichtstimulation. Der Verlauf der Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch Verlangsamung der psychomotorischen Entwicklung, durch beginnende Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten und Ataxie. Photosensitivit\u00e4t wurde beschrieben. Mindestens 25% der Patienten mit DS haben eine Familiengeschichte mit Epilepsie und Fieberkr\u00e4mpfen. Bei mindestens 2/3 der F\u00e4lle von DS wurden Mutationen, meist Neumutationen, im SCN1A-Gen (Chromosomenregion 2q24.3) gefunden. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr einen spannungsgesteuerten Natrium-Kanal. Das DS wird anhand des klinischen Bildes diagnostiziert, d.h., der Nachweis einer SCN1A-Mutation sichert die Diagnose nicht. Im Anfangsstadium der Krankheit ist das EEG noch normal, im Alter von 2-3 Jahren treten dann generalisierte Spikes und Polyspike-Waves auf. Die Assoziation eines fr\u00fchen Anfallgeschehens mit Fieberepisoden kann diagnostisch richtungsweisend sein. Eine Variante des DS (borderline SMEI; SMEB) ohne myoklonische Kr\u00e4mpfe aber mit sonst allen Zeichen des DS wurde beschrieben. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen fr\u00fche Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe, das Lennox-Gastaut-Syndrom und die Epilepsie mit myoklonisch-astatischen Krisen (sh. diese Termini) ausgeschlossen werden. Die F\u00e4lle sprechen auf Antikonvulsiva nicht gut an, aber Valproat und Benzodiazepine (Clobazam) sind wahrscheinlich am wirksamsten. In neuerer Zeit hat sich die zus\u00e4tzliche Therapie mit Stiripentol als hilfreich erwiesen. Die Substanz erhielt im Januar 2007 in der EU die Marktzulassung als Orphan-Medikament f\u00fcr die adjuvante Therapie des DS. Offene klinische Studien ergaben Hinweise, dass Topiramat hilfreich bei Patienten sein kann, die nur schlecht auf Stiripentol ansprechen. Wegen des Risikos einer Verschlimmerung der Anf\u00e4lle sollte die Gabe von Carbamazepin und Vigabatrin vermieden werden. Weitere therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind ketogene Di\u00e4t, Krankengymnastik und Kommunikations-Training. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der Anf\u00e4lle nimmt mit zunehmendem Alter der Kinder ab, aber wegen kognitiver Einschr\u00e4nkung und bleibenden Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten ist die Langzeitprognose ung\u00fcnstig. Das Dravet-Syndrom ist auch mit pl\u00f6tzlichem Kindstod assoziiert, vor allem zwischen dem 2. und 4. Lebensjahr.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental and epileptic encephalopathy characterized by infantile onset of intractable seizures that are often febrile, and associated with cognitive and motor impairment.", "synonyms": "SMEI, Severe myoclonic epilepsy of infancy, Severe myoclonus epilepsy of infancy, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G40.4", "omim": "607208\u00a0 612164\u00a0 615744", "umls": "C0751122", "gard": "10430", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of Dravet syndrome is 1/30,000 (range 1/15,000-40,000).", "clinical_description": "Onset of the first seizure is mainly in the first year of life (usually at 5-8 months) in previously healthy infants. Seizures include clonic seizure, often unilateral that alternates between left and right, and generalized tonic-clonic seizures. Seizures are often febrile and long lasting, presenting as febrile status epilepticus (SE). SE is mainly frequent in the first years. Other seizures types may also occur, such as focal or atypical absence seizures, as well as possible clusters of nocturnal tonic or tonic-clonic seizures between age 4 and 11. Photosensitivity, high temperatures, photic stimulation and exercise may trigger seizures. Developmental delay is often apparent by age 2, followed by cognitive plateauing. Speech impairment, progressive gait deterioration with crouching, and sleeping difficulties may also appear at this stage.", "etiology": "Around 85% of cases are due to a mutation or deletion in the SCN1A gene (2q24.3), encoding a voltage-gated sodium channel. Most mutations are de novo but might be part of a familial spectrum of genetic epilepsy with febrile seizures-plus (GEFS+) in 5-10%. Mutations in the PCDH19 gene (Xq22.1), might account for about 5% of female cases. In about 10% of cases, the etiology is unknown. Somatic mosaic deletions or mutations in SCN1A are found in about 3% of the patients that are initially negative. Few patients are reported with pathogenic variants in other genes such as GABRG2 (5q34), GABRA1 (5q34), STXBP1 (9q34.11), SCN1B (19q13.12), and SCN2A (2q24.3).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and electroencephalographic (EEG) findings. At onset, EEG is usually normal but later spikes or poly spike-waves with a slowing of background and multifocal discharges are recorded. Brain magnetic resonance imaging is usually normal. SCN1A pathogenic variants can confirm the diagnosis in the clinical setting of Dravet syndrome.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes myoclonic atonic epilepsy.", "genetic_counseling": "In families with a known SCN1A mutation, inheritance is autosomal dominant and genetic counselling is possible, even though the phenotypic range in families can be wide. In cases with de novo mutations, counselling may helpful.", "management_and_treatment": "The main aim of treatment is to reduce seizure frequency and prevent SE. Valproate, clobazam, stiripentol and bromide may control the febrile seizures early in the disease. Stiripentol may be effective in reducing the duration and the frequency of seizures in combination with valproate and clobazam. The ketogenic diet, topiramate and levetiracetam may provide substantial efficacy as adjunctive therapy as well as cannabidiol in association with clobazam. Ongoing clinical trials showed substantial efficacy of fenfluramine as an add-on. Vagus nerve stimulation can be also considered. Sodium channel blockers (carbamazepine, oxcarbazepine, eslicarbazepine, lamotrigine and phenytoin) should be avoided as they worsen seizures. Benzodiazepines are used to treat acute seizures. Children with prominent seizures with falls need protective head gear. Treatment management should be handled by clinicians with expertise in rare and complex epilepsies.", "prognosis": "Seizures can decrease in frequency in adulthood but often remain refractory to therapies. Moderate to severe cognitive impairment and intractable epilepsy into adulthood is common. Children present a progressive cognitive decline after early language and visual function impairment. Intellectual deficiency is present in around 86% of patients. Autism spectrum disorder can also appear in 31%. Preventing the occurrence of convulsive SE in children may improve the long-term prognosis."}, {"name": "Schwere Myopie-generalisierte \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke-Kleinwuchs-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare developmental defect with connective tissue involvement characterized by joint hyperextensibility and multiple dislocations of large joints, severe myopia, and short stature. Other common features include retinal detachment, iris and chorioretinal coloboma, kyphoscoliosis and other spine deformities, pectus carinatum, talipes equinovarus, and progressive hearing loss.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "omim": "617662"}, {"name": "Schwere neonatale Hypotonie-Kr\u00e4mpfe-Enzephalopathie-Syndrom durch Mikrodeletion 5q31.3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Del(5)(q31.3), Mikrodeletionssyndrom 5q31.3, Monosomie 5q31.3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q93.5", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter PURA-abh\u00e4ngige schwere neonatale Hypotonie-Kr\u00e4mpfe-Enzephalopathie-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Schwere neonatale Hypotonie-Kr\u00e4mpfe-Enzephalopathie-Syndrom durch Punktmutationen im PURA-Gen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G40.4", "OMIM": "616158", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter PURA-abh\u00e4ngige schwere neonatale Hypotonie-Kr\u00e4mpfe-Enzephalopathie-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Schwere neonatale Laktatazidose durch NFS1-ISD11-Komplex-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe neonatal lactic acidosis due to NFS1-ISD11 complex deficiency is a rare, hereditary, mitochondrial oxidative phosphorylation disorder characterized by severe neonatal lactic acidosis and deficiency of mitochondrial complexes I, II and III. Clinical features are variable and may include hypotonia, respiratory distress with cyanosis, failure to thrive, feeding difficulties, hypoglycemia, dehydration, vomiting, seizures, and a risk of multiple organ failure.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "615595"}, {"name": "Schwere Netzhautdystrophie mit Beginn in fr\u00fcher Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schwere Netzhautdystrophie mit Beginn in fr\u00fcher Kindheit (SECORD) ist eine vererbte Netzhautdystrophie, die durch eine schwere angeborene Nachtblindheit, eine progressive Netzhautdystrophie und Nystagmus gekennzeichnet ist. Die bestkorrigierte Sehsch\u00e4rfe kann im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt 0,3 erreichen und bis weit in das zweite Lebensjahrzehnt hinein bestehen. Die Erblindung ist oft bis zum Alter von 30 Jahren vollst\u00e4ndig.", "synonyms": "EOSRD, Fr\u00fchbeginnende schwere Netzhautdystrophie, SECORD, Schwere fr\u00fchkindliche Netzhautdegeneration, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "UMLS": "C1858080", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist schwer einzusch\u00e4tzen, da viele SECORD-Patienten zuvor als Patienten mit Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA) diagnostiziert wurden.", "clinical_description": "SECORD tritt im Kindesalter auf und umfasst Patienten mit schwerer angeborener Nachtblindheit, Nystagmus, einer deutlich reduzierten Sehsch\u00e4rfe (kleiner oder gleich 0,3) zusammen mit einer progressiven panretinalen Dystrophie unterschiedlichen Ausma\u00dfes und Befall der Makula. Die ersten Symptome k\u00f6nnen im ersten Lebensjahr erkannt werden. Das Farbsehen von ges\u00e4ttigten und unges\u00e4ttigten Farben in Tests ist beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Es kommt zu einer \u00dcberlappung mit der Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA), bei der die Patienten durch ihre Sehsch\u00e4rfe und die panretinale Dystrophie charakterisiert sind. Im Vergleich zur LCA ist die Sehfunktion bei SECORD jedoch deutlich besser, trotz des fortschreitenden Verlusts der Sehfunktion zu Beginn der Erkrankung, der je nach zugrundeliegendem Gen und Mutation zur Erblindung im zweiten bis dritten Lebensjahrzehnt f\u00fchren kann.", "etiology": "SECORD ist genetisch heterogen und wird von vielen Genen verursacht, einschlie\u00dflich derjenigen, die LCA verursachen (ABCA4 (1p22), ADAMTS18 (16q23), AIPL1 (17p13. 1), BEST1 (11q12), CRB1 (1q31.3), CRX (19q13.3), GUCY2D (17p13.1), IMPDH1 (7q31.3-q32), IMPG1 (6q14. 2-q15), IMPG2 (3q12.2-q12.3), IQCB1 (3q21.1), KCNJ13 (2q37), LCA5 (6q14), LRAT (4q32.1), MERTK (2q14.1), NMNAT1 (1p36. 22), RDH12 (14q24.1), RPE65 (1p31), RPGR (Xp11.4), RPGRIP1 (14q11.2), SPATA7 (14q31.3), TULP1 (6p21.3)). SECORD wurde jedoch haupts\u00e4chlich mit Mutationen in RPE65 (2-10% der SECORD-Patienten) und LRAT in Verbindung gebracht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose von SECORD umfasst St\u00e4bchen- und Zapfenantworten unterhalb oder nahe der Schwelle in der Elektroretinographie. Psychophysikalische Tests sagen Zapfen-St\u00e4bchen- und St\u00e4bchen-Zapfen-Dystrophien voraus. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen bei der Geburt einen normal erscheinenden Fundus aufweisen, entwickeln aber sp\u00e4ter im S\u00e4uglingsalter und in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit eine panretinale Dystrophie, die auch die Makula betrifft. Entsprechende Ver\u00e4nderungen der Netzhautschichten sind mit der optischen Koh\u00e4renztomographie im Spektralbereich zu sehen. Bei einer Untergruppe von Patienten mit RPE65- oder LRAT-Mutationen wird von fr\u00fcher Kindheit an ein Mangel an Fundusautofluoreszenz beobachtet. Die Goldmann-Perimetrie zeigt je nach Verlaufsform schwere Gesichtsfeldeinschr\u00e4nkungen und zentrale Skotomata. Knochenspicula werden in der Regel nicht nachgewiesen, jedoch entwickeln sich mit dem Fortschreiten der Erkrankung Pigmentansammlungen. Die molekulare Diagnose kann mit Hilfe eines NGS (Next Generation Sequencing)-Panels durchgef\u00fchrt werden, das die gesamte Sequenz der bekannten assoziierten Gene abdeckt (90% der F\u00e4lle). Identifizierte Mutationen und Segregationsanalysen bei den Eltern werden durch Sanger-Sequenzierung best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren LCA, Alstr\u00f6m-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessive Bestrophinopathie, Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom, Achromatopsie, Stargardt-Syndrom, Usher-Syndrom, Senior-Loken-Syndrom, Saldino-Mainzer-Syndrom, Joubert-Syndrom, Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie, infantile Refsum-Krankheit, neonatale Adrenoleukodystrophie, Zellweger-Syndrom und juvenile neuronale Ceroidlipofuszinose.", "genetic_counseling": "SECORD wird in der Regel autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, aber auch autosomal-dominante (CRX, GUCY2D, IMPDH1, IMPG1, IMPG2) und X-chromosomale Erbg\u00e4nge wurden beobachtet.", "management_and_treatment": "SECORD ist derzeit unheilbar. Einige Therapien werden derzeit untersucht, einschlie\u00dflich Gentherapien f\u00fcr RPE65, ABCA4 und MERTK. Eine Retinoid-Supplementierungstherapie (9-cis-Retinoid) wird bei Patienten mit Mutationen in RPE65 und LRAT eingesetzt. Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und umfasst die Korrektur des Refraktionsfehlers und die Verwendung von Low-Vision-Hilfen.", "prognosis": "Die Sehleistung bei hellem Licht erlaubt den Besuch von Regelschulen in den Grundschuljahren. Aufgrund der genetischen Heterogenit\u00e4t besteht ein breites Spektrum an Verl\u00e4ufen, die nicht mit spezifischen Mutationen korrelieren. Eine nutzbare Sehfunktion bleibt h\u00e4ufig \u00fcber die zweite Lebensdekade hinaus erhalten und eine Reihe von Patienten beh\u00e4lt auch in der dritten Lebensdekade noch Restinseln des peripheren Sehens, wenn auch erheblich eingeschr\u00e4nkt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist schwer einzusch\u00e4tzen, da viele SECORD-Patienten zuvor als Patienten mit Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA) diagnostiziert wurden."}, {"name": "Schwere neurologische Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung mit F\u00fctterproblemen-stereotype Handbewegungen-bilateraler Katarakt", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare pervasive developmental disorder characterized by microcephaly, profound developmental delay, intellectual disability, bilateral cataracts, severe epilepsy including infantile spasms, hypotonia, irritability, feeding difficulties leading to failure to thrive, and stereotypic hand movements. The disease manifests in infancy. Brain imaging reveals delay in myelination and cerebral atrophy.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "F84.8", "omim": "617393"}, {"name": "Schwere Osteogenesis imperfecta", "sub_name": "Osteogenesis imperfecta Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der OI insgesamt wird auf 1:10.000 bis 1:20.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, die Pr\u00e4valenz des Typs III ist nicht bekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A severe type form osteogenesis imperfecta characterized by increased bone fragility and low bone mass clinically manifesting as susceptibility to bone fractures, severe short stature, a triangular face, moderate to severe scoliosis, blue or blue-grey sclera, and dentinogenesis imperfecta.", "synonyms": "OI type 3, Progressive deforming osteogenesis imperfecta, Severe osteogenesis imperfecta, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.0", "omim": "259420\u00a0 259440\u00a0 610682\u00a0 610915\u00a0 610968\u00a0 613848\u00a0 613982\u00a0 614856\u00a0 615220\u00a0 616229", "umls": "C0268362", "mesh": "C536044", "gard": "8695"}, {"name": "Schwere rekurrente Infektionen mit neutrophiler Dysfunktion", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schwerer Gliedma\u00dfendefekt", "sub_name": "Phokomelie Typ Schinzel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Al-Awadi/Raas-Rothschild-Syndrom \u00a0, Apoplasie/Hypoplasie von Gliedma\u00dfen und Becken, Kongenitales Fehlen von Ulna und Fibula, Schwerer Gliedma\u00dfendefekt, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.2", "OMIM": "276820", "GARD": "9212", "summary": "Das Schinzel-Phokomelie-Syndrom, auch Gliedma\u00dfen/Becken-Hypoplasie/Aplasie-Syndrom genannt, ist charakterisiert durch Skelettfehlbildungen an Ulna, Beckenknochen, Fibula und Femur. Da der Ph\u00e4notyp dem Fehlbildungssyndrom \u00e4hnelt, das als Al-Awadi/Raas-Rothschild-Syndrom bekannt ist, werden sie f\u00fcr die gleiche Krankheit gehalten. Nur wenige F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Die Patienten haben interkalare Reduktionsfehlbildungen der Gliedma\u00dfen (eine gelegentlich mit Polydaktylie, Oligodaktylie oder Ektrodaktylie kombinierte Phokomelie), fehlende oder hypoplastische Beckenknochen (einschlie\u00dflich Agenesie oder Hypoplasie des Stei\u00dfbeins) und Defekte von Sch\u00e4delknochen (h\u00e4ufig ein Defekt des Hinterhauptbeins mit oder ohne Meningozele). Zu m\u00f6glichen weiteren Symptomen geh\u00f6ren Thoraxdystrophie, faziale Dysmorphien (dysplastische gro\u00dfe Ohren, hoher schmaler Gaumen) und Fehlbildungen der Genitalien (Aplasie der M\u00fcllerschen G\u00e4nge, Agenesie von Uterus und Vagina, Mikropenis mit Kryptorchismus). Wachstum und geistige Entwicklung sind normal. Da die Eltern der meisten Patienten miteinander blutsverwandt waren, wird autosomal-rezessive Vererbung angenommen. Ursache des Syndroms war in einem Fall eine Nullmutation im WNT7A-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 3p25. Damit handelt es sich um eine schwere allelische Form des Fuhrmann-Syndroms. Die Reduktionsfehlbildungen der Gliedma\u00dfen und/oder das Fehlen des Beckens k\u00f6nnen pr\u00e4natal sonographisch erkannt werden. Die betroffenen Kinder sterben manchmal schon kurz nach der Geburt. "}, {"name": "Schwerer kombinierter Immundefekt durch LAT-Defizienz", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare severe combined immunodeficiency characterized by T-cell lymphopenia and absent T-cell proliferative responses, and normal B-cell and natural killer cell counts. Patients present in the first months of life with severe recurrent infections, failure to thrive, hematologic autoimmune disorders, and/or lymphoproliferation with splenomegaly.", "synonyms": "SCID due to LAT deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "D81.2", "omim": "617514"}, {"name": "Schwerer T-Zell-Immundefekt-kongenitale Alopezie-Nageldystrophie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch FOXN1-Defizienz", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": " A rare, genetic, primary immunodeficiency due to a defect in adaptive immunity characterized by the triad of congenital athymia (resulting in severe T-cell immunodeficiency), congenital alopecia totalis and nail dystrophy. Patients present neonatal or infantile-onset, severe, recurrent, life-threatening infections and low or absent circulating T cells. Additional features reported include erythroderma, lymphoadenopathy, diarrhea and failure to thrive.", "synonyms": "Alymphoid cystic thymic dysgenesis, Nude/SCID, Nude/severe combined immunodeficiency, SCID due to FOXN1 deficiency, Severe T-cell immunodeficiency-congenital alopecia-nail dystrophy syndrome, Winged helix deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D82.8", "omim": "601705\u00a0 618806", "gard": "4358"}, {"name": "Schweres akutes Atemwegssyndrom", "sub_name": "Schweres akutes respiratorisches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Lungenerkrankung, die durch eine Infektion mit dem SARS-CoV-Coronavirus ausgel\u00f6st wird, mit einer berichteten Inkubationszeit von 2 bis 7 Tagen. Die Patienten weisen grippe\u00e4hnliche Symptome auf, darunter Fieber, Unwohlsein, Myalgie, Kopfschmerzen, Durchfall und Rigor. H\u00e4ufig wird von trockenem, unproduktivem Husten und Dyspnoe berichtet. Schwere F\u00e4lle entwickeln sich rasch, schreiten zu Atemnot und Atemversagen fort und erfordern intensive Pflege. Die Sterblichkeitsrate liegt bei 10%. Die Krankheit trat 2002 in S\u00fcdchina auf und breitete sich 2003 auf 26 L\u00e4nder aus. Die gemeldete \u00dcbertragung von Mensch zu Mensch erfolgte in Toronto (Kanada), der Sonderverwaltungsregion Hongkong in China, Chinesisch-Taipeh, Singapur und Hanoi (Vietnam).", "synonyms": "SARS, SARS-1, Schweres akutes Atemwegssyndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "U04.9", "UMLS": "C1175175", "MeSH": "D045169", "GARD": "9237", "MedDRA": "10061982"}, {"name": "Schweres akutes respiratorisches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Lungenerkrankung, die durch eine Infektion mit dem SARS-CoV-Coronavirus ausgel\u00f6st wird, mit einer berichteten Inkubationszeit von 2 bis 7 Tagen. Die Patienten weisen grippe\u00e4hnliche Symptome auf, darunter Fieber, Unwohlsein, Myalgie, Kopfschmerzen, Durchfall und Rigor. H\u00e4ufig wird von trockenem, unproduktivem Husten und Dyspnoe berichtet. Schwere F\u00e4lle entwickeln sich rasch, schreiten zu Atemnot und Atemversagen fort und erfordern intensive Pflege. Die Sterblichkeitsrate liegt bei 10%. Die Krankheit trat 2002 in S\u00fcdchina auf und breitete sich 2003 auf 26 L\u00e4nder aus. Die gemeldete \u00dcbertragung von Mensch zu Mensch erfolgte in Toronto (Kanada), der Sonderverwaltungsregion Hongkong in China, Chinesisch-Taipeh, Singapur und Hanoi (Vietnam).", "synonyms": "SARS, SARS-1, Schweres akutes Atemwegssyndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "U04.9", "UMLS": "C1175175", "MeSH": "D045169", "GARD": "9237", "MedDRA": "10061982"}, {"name": "Schweres Neurodegeneratives Syndrom durch BSCL2-Mangel", "sub_name": "Schweres Neurodegeneratives Syndrom mit Lipodystrophie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe neurodegenerative syndrome with lipodystrophy is a rare, genetic, neurodegenerative disorder characterized by progressive psychomotor and cognitive regression (manifesting with gait ataxia, spasticity, loss of language, mild to severe intellectual disability, pyramidal and extrapyramidal signs and, frequently, development of tretraplegia or tetraparesis) associated with variable degrees of lipodystrophy, hepatomegaly, hypertriglyceridemia and muscular hypertrophy. Hyperactivity, tremor and development of seizures may also be associated.", "synonyms": "Severe neurodegenerative syndrome due to BSCL2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G31.8", "omim": "615924"}, {"name": "Schweres Neurodegeneratives Syndrom mit Lipodystrophie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe neurodegenerative syndrome with lipodystrophy is a rare, genetic, neurodegenerative disorder characterized by progressive psychomotor and cognitive regression (manifesting with gait ataxia, spasticity, loss of language, mild to severe intellectual disability, pyramidal and extrapyramidal signs and, frequently, development of tretraplegia or tetraparesis) associated with variable degrees of lipodystrophy, hepatomegaly, hypertriglyceridemia and muscular hypertrophy. Hyperactivity, tremor and development of seizures may also be associated.", "synonyms": "Severe neurodegenerative syndrome due to BSCL2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G31.8", "omim": "615924"}, {"name": "Schwere Wachstumsst\u00f6rung-Strabismus-extensive dermale Melanozytose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome with intellectual disability characterized by infantile onset of global developmental delay, severe intellectual disability, growth deficiency, microcephaly, strabismus, blue-gray sclerae, and extensive Mongolian spots. Some patients also present with epilepsy. Brain imaging may demonstrate variable abnormalities including cerebral atrophy, thin corpus callosum, ventriculomegaly, or arachnoid cysts.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "omim": "617051"}, {"name": "Schwere X-chromosomale Intelligenzminderung Typ Gustavson", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, X-linked syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by severe intellectual disability, microcephaly, post-natal growth retardation, severe visual impairment or blindness (due to optic atrophy), severe hearing defect, spasticity, epileptic seizures, restricted large-joint movements and early death (in infancy or early childhood). Facial dysmorphic features (large dysplastic ears and short broad nose) are additionally observed. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1993.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "F72.9", "omim": "309555", "umls": "C0795965", "gard": "5611"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6igkeit-Katarakt-Skelettanomalien-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Nathalie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic developmental defect during embryogenesis disorder characterized by sensorineural hearing impairment, childhood-onset cataract, underdeveloped secondary sexual characteristics, spinal muscular atrophy, growth retardation, and cardiac and skeletal anomalies. Sudden death, as well as fatal cardiomyopathy and heart failure, have been described in some cases.", "synonyms": "Deafness-cataract-skeletal anomalies syndrome, Sensorineural hearing loss-cataract-skeletal anomalies-cardiomyopathy syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "255990", "umls": "C1850626", "mesh": "C538342", "gard": "3929"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - D\u00fcndarm-Divertikulose - Neuropathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die gekennzeichnet ist durch progrediente sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, progressive sensorische Neuropathie und gastrointestinale Anomalien mit zunehmenden Verlust der Magenmotilit\u00e4t, D\u00fcndarm-Divertikulose und Ulzerationen, die zu Kachexie f\u00fchren. Zus\u00e4tzliche neurologische Manifestationen k\u00f6nnen Dysarthrie und fehlende Sehnenreflexe, sowie Ptosis und externe Ophthalmoplegie umfassen. Seit 1985 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G60.8", "OMIM": "221400", "UMLS": "C1857338", "GARD": "2568"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Enzephaloneuropathie-Adipositas-Valvulopathie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Enzephaloneuropathie-Adipositas-Valvulopathie-Syndrom ist eine seltene mitochondriale Erkrankung mit ausgepr\u00e4gter klinischer Variabilit\u00e4t, die typischerweise durch Enzephalomyopathie, Nierenerkrankungen (nephrotisches Syndrom), Optikusatrophie, fr\u00fch einsetzende Taubheit, Panzytopenie, Fettleibigkeit und Herzerkrankungen (Valvulopathie) gekennzeichnet ist. Dar\u00fcber hinaus wurden auch Makrozephalie, Intelligenzminderung, Hyperlaktat\u00e4mie, erh\u00f6htes Laktat/Pyruvat-Verh\u00e4ltnis, insulinabh\u00e4ngiger Diabetes, Livedo reticularis, Leberfunktionsst\u00f6rungen und Anf\u00e4lle assoziiert.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E88.8", "OMIM": "614651"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - epiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie - Kleinwuchs", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Kleinwuchs, dysplastische Femurepiphysen, Nabel- und Leistenhernien und verz\u00f6gerte Entwicklung (retardiertes Wachstum, leichtes intellektuelles Defizit). Es wurde bei 2 Br\u00fcdern mit blutsverwandten Eltern beschrieben. Diese hatten Dysmorphien (dreieckiges Gesicht, spitzes Kinn) und beiderseits eine Obstruktion der Tr\u00e4neng\u00e4nge. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndromic genetic deafness characterized by profound congenital bilateral sensorineural deafness, developmental delay, moderate intellectual disability, generalized delay in bone maturation, short stature, epiphyseal dysplasia particularly of the capital femoral epiphyses, and mild dysmorphic facial features such as prominent forehead and small, pointed chin. Bilateral obstruction of lacrimal ducts and inguinal and umbilical hernias have also been described.", "synonyms": "Chitty-Hall-Baraitser syndrome, Hearing loss-epiphyseal dysplasia-short stature syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "omim": "601351", "umls": "C1832438", "gard": "1688"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Genitalanomalien - Synostose der Mittelhand- und der Mittelfussknochen", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch sensorisch-neurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, beidseitige Synostose der Metacarpalia und Metatarsalia IV und V, Hypospadie im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht, psychomotorische Retardierung und abnorme Dermatoglyphen. Bisher wurde es bei 2 nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beschrieben. Beide Patienten hatten faziale Dysmorphien (prominente Stirn, malformierte Ohren, Gesichtsasymmetrie, Eindruck eines offen stehenden Mundes). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Deafness-genital anomalies-metacarpal and metatarsal synostosis syndrome is characterised by sensorineural deafness, bilateral synostosis of the 4th and 5th metacarpals and metatarsals, genital anomalies (hypospadias in males), psychomotor delay and abnormal dermatoglyphics. So far, it has been described in two unrelated patients. Facial dysmorphism was noted in both patients (prominent forehead, ear anomalies, facial asymmetry and an open mouth appearance).", "synonyms": "Hearing loss-genital anomalies-metacarpal and metatarsal synostosis syndrome, Pfeiffer-Kapferer syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "umls": "C2931654", "gard": "4303"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Hypogonadismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "H90.6", "OMIM": "304350", "UMLS": "C1844680", "GARD": "1691", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitalen gemischten H\u00f6rverlust mit perilymphatischem Erguss (Gusher-Syndrom oder DFN3; s. dort), Hypogonadismus und Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten. Es wurde bei 5 miteinander verwandten m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten mit m\u00f6glicher X-chromosomaler Vererbung beschrieben. Bei einem der Patienten wurde eine Mikrodeletion mit Einschluss des POU3F4-Gens (Xq21.1; DFN3-Locus) nachgewiesen. Wahrscheinlich handelt es sich also um ein Contiguous-Gene-Syndrom. "}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Infertilit\u00e4ts-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Infertilit\u00e4t-Syndrom (DIS) ist sehr selten und gekennzeichnet durch Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und m\u00e4nnliche Infertilit\u00e4t.", "synonyms": "DIS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q93.5", "OMIM": "611102", "UMLS": "C1970187", "GARD": "11911", "epidemiology": "Es wurde in weniger als 5 Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die m\u00e4nnliche Infertilit\u00e4t ist durch abnorme Morphologie und Motilit\u00e4t der Spermien bedingt.", "etiology": "DIS ist ein sog. \u201acontiguous gene'-Syndrom mit homozygoter Deletion der Gene CATSPER2 und STRC in der Chromosomenregion 15q15.3. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, die ph\u00e4notypisch unauff\u00e4lligen Eltern tragen die Deletion heterozygot. Die weiblichen Homozygoten sind schwerh\u00f6rig aber nicht infertil.", "summary": "Es wurde in weniger als 5 Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom vom Typ Martin-Probst", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch starke beidseitige Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, geistige Retardierung, Nabelhernie und abnorme Dermatoglyphen. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei 3 m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten aus 3 Generationen beschrieben. Zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome waren faziale Dysmorphien (Teleangiektasien, Hypertelorismus, Zahnanomalien, breite Nasenwurzel) und, nicht bei allen Patienten vorhanden, Minderwuchs, Panzytopenie, Mikrozephalie und Fehlbildungen des Urogenitalsystems. Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv. Das urs\u00e4chliche Gen wurde in die Chromosomenregion Xq1-q21 kartiertiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare X-linked syndromic intellectual disability characterized by congenital sensorineural hearing loss, varying degrees of intellectual disability, short stature, and dysmorphic facial features (such as telecanthus, epicanthic folds, broad nasal root, malar hypoplasia, low-set ears, dental anomalies, and micrognathia). Additional reported manifestations include microcephaly, renal and genitourinary abnormalities, widely spaced, hypoplastic nipples, and adult onset of progressive pancytopenia.", "synonyms": "Hearing loss-intellectual disability syndrome, Martin-Probst type, Martin-Probst syndrome, X-linked deafness-intellectual disability syndrome syndrome, X-linked hearing loss-intellectual disability syndrome syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "300519", "umls": "C1845285"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit mit Labyrinthaplasie - Mikrotie - Mikrodontie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit mit Labyrinth-Aplasie, Mikrotie und Mikrodontie (LAMM) ist ein erbliches Schwerh\u00f6rigkeits-Syndrom.", "synonyms": "LAMM-Syndrom, Mikrodontie - Typ I Mikrotie - Taubheit, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q16.5", "OMIM": "610706", "UMLS": "C1853144\u00a0 C2932664", "MeSH": "C548011", "GARD": "10707", "epidemiology": "Es wurde bisher in 6 Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die starke Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit ist verbunden mit vollst\u00e4ndigem Fehlen der Strukturen des inneren Ohres (Michel-Aplasie). Die Typ-I-Mikrotie ist manifest mit kleinen Ohrmuscheln und engem \u00e4u\u00dferem Geh\u00f6rgang. Die Mikrotie geht einher mit weitem Abstand der Z\u00e4hne.", "etiology": "Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Kopplungsanalyse und Sequenzierung von Kandidatengenen f\u00fchrte zum Nachweis von drei verschiedenen homozygoten Mutationen im FGF3-Gen (11q13) f\u00fcr den Fibroblasten-Wachstumsfaktor 3.", "summary": "Es wurde bisher in 6 Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale, genetisch-bedingte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Deafness is the most frequent form of sensorial deficit. In the vast majority of cases, the deafness is termed nonsyndromic or isolated and the hearing loss is the only clinical anomaly reported. In developed counties, 60-80% of cases of early-onset hearing loss are of genetic origin.", "synonyms": "Isolated genetic deafness, Isolated genetic hearing loss, Non-syndromic genetic hearing loss, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "H90.5", "epidemiology": "Between 1 in 1,000 and 1 in 700 children were born with profound or severe hearing loss.", "clinical_description": "The majority of cases presenting at birth concern perceptive deafness (with a neurosensory origin associated with the inner ear) rather than conductive deafness (anomalies in the amplification of sound waves between the middle ear - tympanum and auditory ossicles - and the outer ear). Autosomal dominant forms are characterised by very early onset and bilateral hearing loss with varying degrees of severity (ranging from mild to profound). No malformations of the inner ear can be detected by CT scan. Mutations in the PDS gene are responsible for 7% of cases of childhood deafness. In these cases, the deafness is marked by early-onset, usually bilateral (but sometimes asymmetric) hearing loss with autosomal recessive transmission. This form of deafness is always associated with malformations of the inner ear that can be detected by CT scan. In rare cases, thyroid gland disease may also be present. For the autosomal dominant forms of deafness, mutations in the COCH gene result in progressive postlingual deafness associated with severe attacks of vertigo and subjective tinnitus. This form of deafness should be distinguished from Meniere's disease (see this term). Autosomal dominant mutations in the  WFS1 gene cause either a form of hearing loss affecting mainly low frequency sounds or deafness associated with optic atrophy.", "etiology": "To date, 86 causative genes for sensorineural deafness have been identified and localised and 37 of these genes have been cloned. Eleven of these genes have been implicated in both isolated and syndromic forms of deafness. Mutations in the gene encoding connexin 26 appear to be responsible for the majority of cases of childhood perceptive deafness.", "diagnostic_methods": "Hearing loss can be evaluated by audiogram and grouped as either mild (loss between 20 and 40 dB), moderate (loss between 41 and 70 dB), severe (loss between 71 and 90 dB), profound (loss between 91 and 120 dB) or as cophosis (loss beyond 120 dB).", "genetic_counseling": "In 85% of cases, the deafness is transmitted as an autosomal recessive trait (DFNB type). Autosomal dominant inheritance accounts for between 10 and 15% of cases (DFNA type), whereas only 1% of cases are inherited as an X-linked trait (DFN type).", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be multidisciplinary (involving a paediatrician, general practitioner, ORL specialist, speech therapist and hearing aid specialist). Hearing aids (either implanted or external) generally provide the only management option for improving hearing loss, although surgical treatment may sometimes be proposed for some forms of conductive hearing loss."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale neurosensorische, autosomal-rezessive, Typ DFNB", "sub_name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale sensorineurale, autosomal-rezessive, Typ DFNB", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "H\u00f6rverlust, isolierter neurosensorischer, autosomal-rezessiver, Typ DFNB, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale neurosensorische, autosomal-rezessive, Typ DFNB, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "H90.3", "OMIM": "220290\u00a0 600060\u00a0 600316\u00a0 600791\u00a0 600792\u00a0 600971\u00a0 600974\u00a0 601071\u00a0 601072\u00a0 601386\u00a0 601869\u00a0 602092\u00a0 603010\u00a0 603098\u00a0 603629\u00a0 603678\u00a0 603720\u00a0 604060\u00a0 605428\u00a0 605818\u00a0 607039\u00a0 607084\u00a0 607101\u00a0 607239\u00a0 607821\u00a0 608219\u00a0 608264\u00a0 608265\u00a0 608565\u00a0 608653\u00a0 609006\u00a0 609439\u00a0 609533\u00a0 609646\u00a0 609647\u00a0 609706\u00a0 609823\u00a0 609941\u00a0 609946\u00a0 609952\u00a0 610143\u00a0 610153\u00a0 610154\u00a0 610212\u00a0 610220\u00a0 610248\u00a0 610265\u00a0 610419\u00a0 611022\u00a0 611451\u00a0 612433\u00a0 612645\u00a0 612789\u00a0 613079\u00a0 613285\u00a0 613307\u00a0 613391\u00a0 613392\u00a0 613453\u00a0 613685\u00a0 613718\u00a0 613865\u00a0 613916\u00a0 614035\u00a0 614414\u00a0 614617\u00a0 614861\u00a0 614899\u00a0 614934\u00a0 614944\u00a0 614945\u00a0 615429\u00a0 615540\u00a0 615837\u00a0 615974\u00a0 616042\u00a0 616515\u00a0 616705\u00a0 616958\u00a0 617637\u00a0 617639\u00a0 617654\u00a0 618145\u00a0 618257\u00a0 618410\u00a0 618422\u00a0 618434\u00a0 618456\u00a0 618481\u00a0 619093\u00a0 619174", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale, genetisch-bedingte"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale sensorineurale, autosomal-dominante, Typ DFNA", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "H\u00f6rverlust, isolierter neurosensorischer, autosomal-dominanter, Typ DFNA, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "H90.3", "OMIM": "600101\u00a0 600652\u00a0 600965\u00a0 600994\u00a0 601316\u00a0 601317\u00a0 601369\u00a0 601412\u00a0 601543\u00a0 601544\u00a0 601868\u00a0 602459\u00a0 603622\u00a0 603964\u00a0 604717\u00a0 605192\u00a0 605583\u00a0 606012\u00a0 606282\u00a0 606346\u00a0 606451\u00a0 606705\u00a0 607017\u00a0 607197\u00a0 607453\u00a0 607683\u00a0 607841\u00a0 608224\u00a0 608372\u00a0 608394\u00a0 608641\u00a0 608645\u00a0 608652\u00a0 609129\u00a0 609965\u00a0 612431\u00a0 612642\u00a0 612643\u00a0 612644\u00a0 613074\u00a0 613558\u00a0 614152\u00a0 614211\u00a0 614614\u00a0 615629\u00a0 615649\u00a0 615654\u00a0 616044\u00a0 616340\u00a0 616357\u00a0 616697\u00a0 616707\u00a0 616968\u00a0 616969\u00a0 617605\u00a0 617606\u00a0 617663\u00a0 618094\u00a0 618140\u00a0 618410\u00a0 618778\u00a0 618787\u00a0 618915\u00a0 619081\u00a0 619086\u00a0 619274", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale, genetisch-bedingte"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale sensorineurale, autosomal-rezessive, Typ DFNB", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "H\u00f6rverlust, isolierter neurosensorischer, autosomal-rezessiver, Typ DFNB, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale neurosensorische, autosomal-rezessive, Typ DFNB, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "H90.3", "OMIM": "220290\u00a0 600060\u00a0 600316\u00a0 600791\u00a0 600792\u00a0 600971\u00a0 600974\u00a0 601071\u00a0 601072\u00a0 601386\u00a0 601869\u00a0 602092\u00a0 603010\u00a0 603098\u00a0 603629\u00a0 603678\u00a0 603720\u00a0 604060\u00a0 605428\u00a0 605818\u00a0 607039\u00a0 607084\u00a0 607101\u00a0 607239\u00a0 607821\u00a0 608219\u00a0 608264\u00a0 608265\u00a0 608565\u00a0 608653\u00a0 609006\u00a0 609439\u00a0 609533\u00a0 609646\u00a0 609647\u00a0 609706\u00a0 609823\u00a0 609941\u00a0 609946\u00a0 609952\u00a0 610143\u00a0 610153\u00a0 610154\u00a0 610212\u00a0 610220\u00a0 610248\u00a0 610265\u00a0 610419\u00a0 611022\u00a0 611451\u00a0 612433\u00a0 612645\u00a0 612789\u00a0 613079\u00a0 613285\u00a0 613307\u00a0 613391\u00a0 613392\u00a0 613453\u00a0 613685\u00a0 613718\u00a0 613865\u00a0 613916\u00a0 614035\u00a0 614414\u00a0 614617\u00a0 614861\u00a0 614899\u00a0 614934\u00a0 614944\u00a0 614945\u00a0 615429\u00a0 615540\u00a0 615837\u00a0 615974\u00a0 616042\u00a0 616515\u00a0 616705\u00a0 616958\u00a0 617637\u00a0 617639\u00a0 617654\u00a0 618145\u00a0 618257\u00a0 618410\u00a0 618422\u00a0 618434\u00a0 618456\u00a0 618481\u00a0 619093\u00a0 619174", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale, genetisch-bedingte"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale sensorineurale, X-chromosomale, Typ DFN", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "H\u00f6rverlust, isolierter neurosensorischer, X-chromosomaler, Typ DFN, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "H90.3", "OMIM": "300030\u00a0 300066\u00a0 300914\u00a0 304500", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale, genetisch-bedingte"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Ohrfehlbildungen - Gesichtsl\u00e4hmung", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch hochgradige Leitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, verursacht durch Anomalien des Stapes, und durch unterschiedlich ausgepr\u00e4gte Ohrfehlbildungen und Gesichtsl\u00e4hmung. Es wurde bei 3 Geschwistern und deren Mutter beschrieben. Autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde angenommen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Deafness-ear malformation-facial palsy syndrome is characterized by profound conductive deafness due to stapedial abnormalities associated with variable malformations of the external ears and facial paralysis. It has been described in three sibs and their mother. Inheritance is autosomal dominant.", "synonyms": "Hearing loss-ear malformation-facial palsy syndrome, Sellars-Beighton syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "124490"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Oligodontie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Deafness-oligodontia syndrome is characterised by sensorineural hearing loss and oligodontia/hypodontia. It has been described in two pairs of siblings and in one isolated case. Dizziness was reported in one of the pairs of siblings. Transmission appears to be autosomal recessive.", "synonyms": "Hearing loss-oligodontia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "omim": "221740", "umls": "C1857333", "mesh": "C538049", "gard": "1698"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Onychodystrophie - Osteodystrophie - Intelligenzminderung", "sub_name": "DOORS-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien und intellektueller Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung, das durch Schallempfindungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Onychodystrophie, Osteodystrophie, leichte bis hochgradige Intelligenzminderung und Krampfanf\u00e4lle gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "DOOR-Syndrom, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Onychodystrophie - Osteodystrophie - Intelligenzminderung, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Onychodystrophie-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessives, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "220500", "UMLS": "C0795927", "GARD": "1685", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt; bisher wurden etwa 50 F\u00e4lle berichtet.", "clinical_description": "Der Krankheit manifestiert sich in der Regel kurz nach der Geburt (seltener erst im Kleinkindalter) mit ausgepr\u00e4gter sensorineuraler Taubheit, kleinen oder fehlenden N\u00e4geln und kurzen distalen Phalangen der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe. Etwa 1/4 der Patienten hat lange, fingerartige Daumen. Die Gesichtsmerkmale sind sehr variabel und in der H\u00e4lfte aller F\u00e4lle ist ein breiter Nasenr\u00fccken vorhanden. Seltenere Gesichtsmerkmale sind antevertierte Nasenl\u00f6cher, ein langes Philtrum, d\u00fcnne Oberlippe und tief angesetzte Ohren. \u00dcber Kraniosynostose wurde bei einem Patienten berichtet. Gelegentliche Merkmale sind Optikusatrophie, die zur Erblindung f\u00fchrt, Netzhautabl\u00f6sungen, Schielen, Nystagmus, hohe Myopie und Katarakte. Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen werden vom S\u00e4uglingsalter an beobachtet und k\u00f6nnen von leichten Verz\u00f6gerungen bei fr\u00fchen motorischen Meilensteinen bis zu generalisierter und lebenslanger Hypotonie reichen. H\u00e4ufig treten in den ersten Jahren Krampfanf\u00e4lle (oft generalisiert tonisch-klonisch) auf, die sich mit zunehmendem Alter st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gten. Neben Lernschwierigkeiten k\u00f6nnen auch Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten beobachtet werden. Seltene Manifestationen sind Zahnanomalien (hypoplastischer Zahnschmelz, abnorme Gr\u00f6\u00dfe der Z\u00e4hne) und innere Organfehlbildungen (kongenitale Herzfehler, einseitige Nierenagenesie, Zystenniere, Doppelniere). Die Erkrankung ist nicht-progredient.", "etiology": "Das DOORS-Syndrom ist ein Akronym f\u00fcr Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit (deafness), Onychodystrophie, Osteodystrophie, Intelligenzminderung (mental retardation) und Kr\u00e4mpfe (seizures). Das Syndrom wird durch Mutationen im TBC1D24-Gen (16p13.3) verursacht, das f\u00fcr ein Protein kodiert, welches an der Regulierung des Membrantransportes beteiligt ist. Es wird angenommen, dass es sich bei dem DOORS-Syndrom um eine genetisch heterogene Erkrankung handelt und zuk\u00fcnftig weitere urs\u00e4chliche Gene identifiziert werden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Patienten werden auf jedes der 5 Hauptmerkmale des Syndroms untersucht, indem R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, eine Untersuchung der auditorischen Hirnstammreaktion auf H\u00f6rverlust und ein Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Erh\u00f6hte Werte von 2-Oxoglutars\u00e4ure in Urin und Plasma wurden bei Patienten mit und ohne Mutationen im TBC1D24-Gen wiederholt beschrieben. Liegt eine solche Mutation vor, besteht der Verdacht auf ein DOORS-Syndrom, obwohl erh\u00f6hte Werte auch bei anderen Erkrankungen auftreten k\u00f6nnen. Ein molekulargenetischer Test, der eine Mutation in TBC1D24 identifiziert, kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen, aber das Fehlen der Mutation schlie\u00dft sie nicht aus.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren das Coffin-Siris-Syndrom, das Nicolaides-Baraitser-Syndrom, das Zimmermann-Laband-Syndrom, das fetale Alkoholsyndrom und das Temple-Baraitser-Syndrom, das autosomal-dominante Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Onychodystrophie-Syndrom und St\u00f6rungen der Glykosphingolipid- und Glykosylphosphatidylinositol-Anker-Glykosylierung.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose ist in Familien mit einer bekannten krankheitsverursachenden Mutation m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Das DOORS-Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Wenn die klinische Diagnose mit einem hohen Grad an Sicherheit gestellt wurde, sollte eine entsprechende genetische Beratung erfolgen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend. Langfristiges Management beinhaltet regelm\u00e4\u00dfige augen\u00e4rztliche und h\u00f6rtechnische Untersuchungen sowie neurologische Untersuchungen wie EEGs. Bei S\u00e4uglingen mit F\u00fctterungsproblemen kann eine Ern\u00e4hrungssonde erforderlich sein. Antiepileptische Medikamente k\u00f6nnen eingesetzt werden, um die H\u00e4ufigkeit von Anf\u00e4llen zu verhindern oder zu verringern, sind aber nicht immer wirksam.", "prognosis": "Die Lebenserwartung ist in der Regel normal. Die intellektuelle Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung ist permanent, aber es ist keine Korrelation zwischen den klinischen Manifestationen und der Kognition bekannt. Die Zahl der bekannten Erwachsenen mit DOORS-Syndrom ist derzeit zu gering, um die Langzeitprognose vorherzusagen. Parkinsonismus wurde bei einem Erwachsenen berichtet.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt; bisher wurden etwa 50 F\u00e4lle berichtet."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Onychodystrophie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Deafness-onychodystrophy syndrome is a group of rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis disorders characterized by the association of sensorineural deafness and onychodystrophy (e.g. absent/hypoplastic finger and toenails), as well as brachydactyly and finger-like thumbs. Additional features present in one of the diseases comprising this group include osteodystrophy, intellectual disability, seizures, developmental delay, and distinctive facies.", "synonyms": "Hearing loss-onychodystrophy syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "124480\u00a0 220500"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Onychodystrophie-Syndrom, autosomal-dominantes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by congenital hearing impairment, small or absent nails on the hands and feet, and small or absent terminal phalanges.", "synonyms": "Autosomal dominant hearing loss-onychodystrophy syndrome, DDOD syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "124480", "umls": "C2675730", "gard": "4732", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is unknown but it has been reported in 22 individuals from ten families to date.", "clinical_description": "The main clinical characteristics of dominant deafness-onychodystrophy (DDOD) syndrome are severe sensorineural hearing loss or deafness and onychodystrophy (small or absent fingernails and toenails, sometimes limited to the nails of the first and fifth digits). Brachydactyly, long, finger-like or tri-phalangeal thumbs as well as conical, hypoplastic teeth or oligodontia have also been reported in several patients. Syndactyly, minor facial dysmorphism (mild hypotelorism, deep set eyes and midface hypoplasia), and epilepsy have been seen in individual cases. Unlike DOORS syndrome, most patients with DDOD follow a normal development and have normal intelligence.", "etiology": "DDOD syndrome is caused, in some cases, by heterozygous mutations in the ATP6V1B2 gene (8p21.3) encoding a vacuolar ATPase (V-ATPase) involved in protein translocation. It is at present unknown whether there can be genetic heterogeneity or not, as not all known families have been tested.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the presence of characteristic clinical findings. X-rays of the hands and feet and a brain stem auditory evoked response (BAER) test for hearing loss should be performed. Molecular genetic testing identifying a ATP6V1B2 mutation may confirm the diagnosis but as it is at present uncertain whether DDOD syndrome is genetically heterogeneous, the absence of a mutation will not mean that a diagnosis of DDOD syndrome is incorrect.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnosis is DOORS syndrome and Coffin-Siris syndrome. The limb anomalies seen in DDOD syndrome can also be found in several other entities including Zimmermann-Laband syndrome, Adams-Oliver syndrome, Temple-Baraitser syndrome and Fontaine Progeroid Syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis of DDOD syndrome has not been performed to date.", "genetic_counseling": "DDOD syndrome is inherited autosomal dominantly so if the clinical diagnosis has been established reliably, genetic counseling is possible. In this case, affected families should be informed that risk of transmission from an affected parent to offspring is 50%.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is supportive and involves special education for the hearing impaired as well as regular follow-up. Corrective surgery is in principle possible for those with syndactyly, although generally not necessary.", "prognosis": "The disease is not life threatening. The main influence on quality of life is hearing loss."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Onychodystrophie-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessives", "sub_name": "DOORS-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien und intellektueller Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung, das durch Schallempfindungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Onychodystrophie, Osteodystrophie, leichte bis hochgradige Intelligenzminderung und Krampfanf\u00e4lle gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "DOOR-Syndrom, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Onychodystrophie - Osteodystrophie - Intelligenzminderung, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Onychodystrophie-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessives, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "220500", "UMLS": "C0795927", "GARD": "1685", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt; bisher wurden etwa 50 F\u00e4lle berichtet.", "clinical_description": "Der Krankheit manifestiert sich in der Regel kurz nach der Geburt (seltener erst im Kleinkindalter) mit ausgepr\u00e4gter sensorineuraler Taubheit, kleinen oder fehlenden N\u00e4geln und kurzen distalen Phalangen der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe. Etwa 1/4 der Patienten hat lange, fingerartige Daumen. Die Gesichtsmerkmale sind sehr variabel und in der H\u00e4lfte aller F\u00e4lle ist ein breiter Nasenr\u00fccken vorhanden. Seltenere Gesichtsmerkmale sind antevertierte Nasenl\u00f6cher, ein langes Philtrum, d\u00fcnne Oberlippe und tief angesetzte Ohren. \u00dcber Kraniosynostose wurde bei einem Patienten berichtet. Gelegentliche Merkmale sind Optikusatrophie, die zur Erblindung f\u00fchrt, Netzhautabl\u00f6sungen, Schielen, Nystagmus, hohe Myopie und Katarakte. Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen werden vom S\u00e4uglingsalter an beobachtet und k\u00f6nnen von leichten Verz\u00f6gerungen bei fr\u00fchen motorischen Meilensteinen bis zu generalisierter und lebenslanger Hypotonie reichen. H\u00e4ufig treten in den ersten Jahren Krampfanf\u00e4lle (oft generalisiert tonisch-klonisch) auf, die sich mit zunehmendem Alter st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gten. Neben Lernschwierigkeiten k\u00f6nnen auch Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten beobachtet werden. Seltene Manifestationen sind Zahnanomalien (hypoplastischer Zahnschmelz, abnorme Gr\u00f6\u00dfe der Z\u00e4hne) und innere Organfehlbildungen (kongenitale Herzfehler, einseitige Nierenagenesie, Zystenniere, Doppelniere). Die Erkrankung ist nicht-progredient.", "etiology": "Das DOORS-Syndrom ist ein Akronym f\u00fcr Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit (deafness), Onychodystrophie, Osteodystrophie, Intelligenzminderung (mental retardation) und Kr\u00e4mpfe (seizures). Das Syndrom wird durch Mutationen im TBC1D24-Gen (16p13.3) verursacht, das f\u00fcr ein Protein kodiert, welches an der Regulierung des Membrantransportes beteiligt ist. Es wird angenommen, dass es sich bei dem DOORS-Syndrom um eine genetisch heterogene Erkrankung handelt und zuk\u00fcnftig weitere urs\u00e4chliche Gene identifiziert werden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Patienten werden auf jedes der 5 Hauptmerkmale des Syndroms untersucht, indem R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, eine Untersuchung der auditorischen Hirnstammreaktion auf H\u00f6rverlust und ein Elektroenzephalogramm (EEG) durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Erh\u00f6hte Werte von 2-Oxoglutars\u00e4ure in Urin und Plasma wurden bei Patienten mit und ohne Mutationen im TBC1D24-Gen wiederholt beschrieben. Liegt eine solche Mutation vor, besteht der Verdacht auf ein DOORS-Syndrom, obwohl erh\u00f6hte Werte auch bei anderen Erkrankungen auftreten k\u00f6nnen. Ein molekulargenetischer Test, der eine Mutation in TBC1D24 identifiziert, kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen, aber das Fehlen der Mutation schlie\u00dft sie nicht aus.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren das Coffin-Siris-Syndrom, das Nicolaides-Baraitser-Syndrom, das Zimmermann-Laband-Syndrom, das fetale Alkoholsyndrom und das Temple-Baraitser-Syndrom, das autosomal-dominante Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Onychodystrophie-Syndrom und St\u00f6rungen der Glykosphingolipid- und Glykosylphosphatidylinositol-Anker-Glykosylierung.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose ist in Familien mit einer bekannten krankheitsverursachenden Mutation m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Das DOORS-Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Wenn die klinische Diagnose mit einem hohen Grad an Sicherheit gestellt wurde, sollte eine entsprechende genetische Beratung erfolgen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend. Langfristiges Management beinhaltet regelm\u00e4\u00dfige augen\u00e4rztliche und h\u00f6rtechnische Untersuchungen sowie neurologische Untersuchungen wie EEGs. Bei S\u00e4uglingen mit F\u00fctterungsproblemen kann eine Ern\u00e4hrungssonde erforderlich sein. Antiepileptische Medikamente k\u00f6nnen eingesetzt werden, um die H\u00e4ufigkeit von Anf\u00e4llen zu verhindern oder zu verringern, sind aber nicht immer wirksam.", "prognosis": "Die Lebenserwartung ist in der Regel normal. Die intellektuelle Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung ist permanent, aber es ist keine Korrelation zwischen den klinischen Manifestationen und der Kognition bekannt. Die Zahl der bekannten Erwachsenen mit DOORS-Syndrom ist derzeit zu gering, um die Langzeitprognose vorherzusagen. Parkinsonismus wurde bei einem Erwachsenen berichtet.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt; bisher wurden etwa 50 F\u00e4lle berichtet."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Schmelzhypoplasie - Nageldefekte", "german_description": "Dieses Sydrom ist charakterisiert durch sensorisch-neurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, generalisierte Schmelzhypoplasie des Dauergebisses bei normalem Milchgebiss und durch Nageldefekte (Beau-Linien und Leukonychie). Bisher wurden weniger als 10 Patienten beschrieben. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by sensorineural hearing loss, abnormalities in the secondary dentition (such as enamel hypoplasia, taurodontism, or dental overcrowding), and nail abnormalities (including leukonychia and presence of transverse ridges). Association with macular dystrophy has also been reported.", "synonyms": "Hearing loss-enamel hypoplasia-nail defects syndrome, Heimler syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "omim": "234580\u00a0 616617", "umls": "C1856186", "mesh": "C535994", "gard": "1687"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, seltene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "UMLS": "C0581883\u00a0 C3711374", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Skelettdysplasie - Lippen-Granulom", "sub_name": "Fountain-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Fountain-Syndrom ist eine extrem seltene genetische Multisystemst\u00f6rung mit Intelligenzminderung, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Skelettanomalien und vergr\u00f6berten Gesichtsz\u00fcgen.", "synonyms": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Skelettdysplasie - Lippen-Granulom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "229120", "UMLS": "C0795944", "MeSH": "C537270", "GARD": "64", "epidemiology": "Das Syndrom ist au\u00dferordentlich selten und wurde bisher bei nur wenigen Patienten beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind betroffen.", "clinical_description": "Die haupts\u00e4chlichen Merkmale des Fountain-Syndroms sind moderate bis schwere intellektuelle Behinderung, angeborene Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und breite, stummelhafte H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe. Das Gesicht ist vergr\u00f6bert, mit vollen Lippen und Wangen. Die Schwere der Anomalien nimmt mit dem Alter zu. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber fr\u00fch einsetzende generalisierte Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Kleinwuchs, gro\u00dfen Kopfumfang und ein besonderes freundliches Verhalten.", "etiology": "Die Ursache des Fountain-Syndroms ist nicht gekl\u00e4rt.", "genetic_counseling": "Vermutlich wird das Syndrom autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Das Syndrom ist au\u00dferordentlich selten und wurde bisher bei nur wenigen Patienten beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind betroffen."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Symphalangie-Syndrom, Typ Hermann", "sub_name": "Multiple Synostosen", "german_description": "Das Syndrom der Multiplen Synostosen ist eine seltene, autosomal-dominant vererbte Dysostose mit vorzeitiger Ankylose der Gelenke. Es wurde in etwa 20 Familien mit mehreren Betroffenen beschrieben. Die Patienten haben ein charakteristisches langes, schmales Gesicht, eine breite, halbzylinderf\u00f6rmige Nase mit flachen Nasenfl\u00fcgeln und schmales Oberlippenrot. Die meisten Betroffenen werden schon fr\u00fch schwerh\u00f6rig, wegen einer Otosklerose, die mit Stapes-Ektomie gut behandelt werden kann. Die Gelenkankylosen nehmen ihren Anfang in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit und sind danach progredient. Der Proze\u00df beginnt in der Regel im proximalen Interphalangealgelenk der Kleinfinger und schreitet von ulnar nach radial und von proximal nach distal fort, typischerweise am 3., 4. und 5. Finger. Weitere Befunde sind Klinodaktylie, Brachydaktylie, verk\u00fcrzte Gro\u00dfzehe, Syndaktylie der 2. und 3. Zehe und leichter Minderwuchs. R\u00f6ntgenologisch werden in vielen Bereichen des Skeletts eine progrediente Verengung der Gelenkr\u00e4ume und, hieraus resultierend, Gelenkfusionen gesehen. Die Einengung der interphalangealen Gelenkr\u00e4ume beginnt schon fr\u00fch, und in der Folge verschmelzen die Phalangen. Eine Komplikation des Syndroms, die Einengung des Halswirbelkanals, erfordert eine neurologische Betreuung. Diese Patienten sollen m\u00f6glichst auch Aktivit\u00e4ten vermeiden, die mit einem Risiko f\u00fcr Hals- oder Wirbels\u00e4ulenverletzungen verbunden sind. Das Gen f\u00fcr das Syndrom der Multiplen Synostosen wurde in die Chromosomenregion 17q21-q22 kartiert, in der auch das SYM1-Gen f\u00fcr die Proximale Symphalangie liegt. Aus diesem Grund und wegen vergleichbaren Symptomen (fr\u00fch beginnende und progrediente Symphalangie, H\u00f6rverlust) wird angenommen, da\u00df beide Syndrome allelische Manifestationen des gleichen Gens sind. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Multiple synostoses syndrome (MSS) is a rare developmental bone disorder characterized by proximal symphalangism of the fingers and/or toes often associated with fusion of carpal and tarsal, humeroradial, and cervical spine joints.", "synonyms": "Deafness-Hermann type symphalangism syndrome, Facio-audio-symphalangism, Hearing loss-Hermann type symphalangism syndrome, Symphalangism-brachydactyly syndrome, WL syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "186500\u00a0 610017\u00a0 612961", "umls": "C0175700\u00a0 C0342282", "gard": "3836"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, syndromale, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "H90.3", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, syndromale sensorineurale, durch COXPD", "sub_name": "Syndromale sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit durch kombinierten Defekt der oxidativen Phosphorylierung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare mitochondrial disease characterized by a variable phenotype comprising congenital sensorineural deafness, intermittent or persistent hypoglycemia, and hepatic and renal dysfunction potentially progressing to organ failure. Serum lactate levels are variably increased, deficiency of mitochondrial respiratory chain complexes I, III, and IV is observed in the liver and in fibroblasts.", "synonyms": "Syndromic sensorineural deafness due to COXPD, Syndromic sensorineural hearing loss due to COXPD, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "617872"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - tubul\u00e4re Azidose - An\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, syndromic, neurological disorder characterized by early infantile-onset of the progressive brain and spinal cord calcification, growth retardation, psychomotor deterioration, deafness, microcytic hypochromic anemia, and variable distal renal tubular acidosis. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1997.", "synonyms": "Central nervous system calcification-hearing loss-tubular acidosis-anemia syndrome, Yoshimura-Takeshita syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "No data available"}, {"name": "Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Vitiligo - Achalasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "221350", "UMLS": "C1857339", "GARD": "1705", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch das gemeinsame Auftreten von Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Minderwuchs, Vitiligo, Muskelatrophie und Achalasie. Es wurde bei einem Bruder und seiner Schwester beschrieben. Die Eltern waren Vetter und Kusine I\u00b0. Wahrscheinlich wird das Syndrom autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. "}, {"name": "Schwerketten-Amyloidose", "sub_name": "AH-Amyloidose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, systemic amyloidosis characterized by the aggregation and deposition of amyloid fibrils composed of monoclonal immunoglobulin heavy-chain fragments, usually produced by a plasma cell neoplasm. Amyloid fibrils deposit in various organs, most commonly in the kidneys. It typically affects older patients and clinical presentation includes signs and symptoms of renal dysfunction, sometimes leading to nephrotic syndrome and end stage renal disease. Cardiac, liver and nerves involvement has also been described.", "synonyms": "Heavy chain amyloidosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E85.9"}, {"name": "Schwerketten-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schwerketten-Krankheiten (HCDs) sind seltene, monoklonale lymphozyt\u00e4r-plasmazellul\u00e4r-proliferative St\u00f6rungen. Involviert sind die B-Zellen mit der Produktion verk\u00fcrzter Schwerketten (heavy chains) ohne assoziierte Leichtketten (light chains).", "synonyms": "HCD, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C88.2\u00a0 C88.3", "UMLS": "C0018852", "MeSH": "D006362", "MedDRA": "10019350", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "HCDs wurden f\u00fcr drei haupts\u00e4chliche Klassen der Immunglobuline beschrieben: Alpha-HCD (s. dort) ist am h\u00e4ufigsten und hat das einheitlichste klinische Bild. Dagegen sind Gamma- und Mu-HCD (s. diese Termini) klinisch und histopathologisch variabel. Die HCDs k\u00f6nnen als varianter Typ des Non-Hodgkin-Lymphoms (NHL; s. dort) angesehen werden. Danach pr\u00e4sentiert sich die Alpha-HCD als extranodales Randzonen-Lymphom des Lymphgewebes der Mukosa, die Gamma-HCD als lympho-plasmazytoides NHL und die Mu-HCD als klein-lymphozyt\u00e4res NHL oder chronisch-lymphatische Leuk\u00e4mie (CLL; s. dort).", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose dieser Krankheiten erfordert den Nachweis verk\u00fcrzter schwerer Immunglobulinketten ohne gebundene leichte Ketten im Serum oder Urin.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist unterschiedlich. Im Fr\u00fchstadium kann die Alpha-HCD auf Antibiotika ansprechen. F\u00fcr die \u00fcbrigen Typen gibt es keine standardisiert wirksame Therapie.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Schwerketten-Speicherkrankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-amyloid monoclonal immunoglobulin deposition disease characterized by production of monoclonal immunoglobulins with truncated heavy chains and no detectable light chains, which are deposited in tissues and cause organ dysfunction, but do not form amyloid beta-pleated sheets or contain an amyloid P component. The condition frequently occurs in association with multiple myeloma. Patients most commonly present with renal involvement (manifesting as hypertension, progressive renal dysfunction, anemia, and nephrotic syndrome with microhematuria), but other organs (such as the liver or skin) may also be affected. Production of IgG1 or IgG3 isotypes results in hypercomplementemia.", "synonyms": "HCDD, ", "icd_10": "D89.8"}, {"name": "SCID", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der schwere kombinierte Immundefekt (SCID) umfasst eine Gruppe seltener monogener prim\u00e4rer Immundefektst\u00f6rungen, die durch das Fehlen funktionaler peripherer T-Lymphozyten gekennzeichnet ist. Folgen sind fr\u00fch einsetzende schwere Atemwegsinfektionen und Gedeihst\u00f6rung. Die St\u00f6rungen werden entsprechend ihrem immunologischen Ph\u00e4notyp unterteilt in SCID mit fehlenden T-Zellen, aber vorhandenen B-Zellen (T-B+ SCID; siehe dort) oder SCID, dem beide Zellen fehlen (T-B- SCID; siehe dort). Beide Gruppen umfassen mehrere Formen, mit oder ohne Nat\u00fcrliche Killer (NK)-Zellen.", "synonyms": "SCID, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D81.0\u00a0 D81.1\u00a0 D81.2\u00a0 D81.3\u00a0 D81.9", "UMLS": "C0085110", "MeSH": "D016511", "GARD": "7628", "MedDRA": "10069566", "epidemiology": "Die Gesamt-Inzidenz wird auf etwa 1/50.000 Lebendgeburten gesch\u00e4tzt, wobei es regionale Unterschiede und eine h\u00f6here Inzidenz in Populationen mit einer h\u00f6heren Konsanguinit\u00e4tsrate gibt. Von der Erkrankung sind, wegen der X-chromosomalen Variante (SCID T-B+ durch einen Gammaketten-Mangel; siehe dort), die in westlichen L\u00e4ndern rund 30% aller SCID-F\u00e4lle ausmacht, h\u00e4ufiger m\u00e4nnliche Personen betroffen.", "clinical_description": "Der SCID wird in der Regel in den ersten wenigen Lebensmonaten mit Gedeihst\u00f6rung, schweren Infektionen (Pneumonie, Magen-Darm-Infektionen, Sepsis), rezidivierendem oder persistierendem Soor, chronischer Diarrh\u00f6e und/oder fehlenden Lymphknoten manifest. Die Patienten weisen eine erh\u00f6hte Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr opportunistische Infektionen auf (meist im Atemwegstrakt und im Darm), in den meisten F\u00e4llen aufgrund von Pneumocystis jiroveci, einigen Viren (z.B. Cytomegalovirus, Adenovirus) und Pilzen. Eine Alopezie und Hautausschlag k\u00f6nnen auftreten, je nach der Form (z.B. SCID durch Gammaketten-Mangel oder SCID durch JAK3-Mangel; siehe dort). Die Patienten sind nicht in der Lage, nach einer Impfung oder nat\u00fcrlichen Infektion spezifische Antik\u00f6rper zu produzieren. Sie k\u00f6nnen au\u00dferdem extra-immune Symptome aufweisen, etwa eine neurologische Entwicklungsanomalien, sensorisch-neurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und Leberfunktionsst\u00f6rungen (SCID durch einen Adenosin-Deaminase- (ADA-)Mangel; siehe dort), mit sensorineuraler Taubheit (retikul\u00e4re Dysgenesie, SCID durch Adenosin-Deaminase- (ADA-)Mangel; siehe jeweils dort) und andere k\u00f6nnen eine Mikrozephalie mit verz\u00f6gerter neuronaler Entwicklung (z.B. LIG4-Syndrom; siehe dort) aufweisen.", "etiology": "Ursache der X-chromosomalen Form sind Mutationen im IL2RG-Gen (Xq13), das die normale Gamma-Kette kodiert. Bei den \u00fcbrigen SCID-Formen wurden bisher Mutationen in etwa 15 Genen identifiziert, die alle einem autosomal-rezessiven Erbgang folgen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Nachweis einer Lymphopenie und einer deutlichen Reduzierung der Zahl der T-Zellen. In 50% der F\u00e4lle tritt eine transplazentale \u00dcbertragung m\u00fctterlicher T-Lymphozyten auf. In diesem Fall kann die Zahl der T-Zellen erhalten bleiben, jedoch besitzen die zirkulierenden T-Lymphozyten einen aktivierten Ph\u00e4notyp (sie exprimieren den CD45R0-Marker, w\u00e4hrend sie bei normalen S\u00e4uglingen CD45RA exprimieren). Die Werte der zirkulierenden B- und NK-Zellen k\u00f6nnen dabei helfen, die zugrunde liegende Ursache des SCID besser zu bestimmen, die dann durch einen Gentest best\u00e4tigt werden kann. Ein Screening Neugeborener auf SCID steht nunmehr zur Verf\u00fcgung und basiert auf der Quantifizierung der T-cell receptor excision circles (TRECs) in bei der Geburt asservierten getrockneten Blutstropfen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere kombinierte B-Zell- und T-Zell-St\u00f6rungen, DiGeorge-Syndrom, kongenitale TORCH-Infektion, X-chromosomale oder autosomal-rezessive Agammaglobulin\u00e4mie und andere Formen der Hypogammaglobulin\u00e4mie (siehe jeweils dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die pr\u00e4natale Diagnose erm\u00f6glicht die Vorbereitung einer Knochenmarktransplantation.", "genetic_counseling": "Eine genetische Beratung soll angeboten werden. Wenn der Gendefekt bekannt ist, kann ein pr\u00e4nataler Test (per Chorionzottenbiopsie) empfohlen werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Grundlage der Behandlung sind kontinuierliche antimikrobielle Prophylaxe, Immunoglobulin-Substitution und strenge Hygienema\u00dfnahmen. Jedoch erfordert eine dauerhafte Heilung eine Wiederherstellung des Immunsystems, die in den meisten F\u00e4llen durch eine allogene Transplantation blutbildender Stammzellen erreicht wird. Eine Gentherapie hat sich bei Patienten mit ADA-Mangel (ebenso eine Enzymersatz-Therapie) und bei X-chromosomalem SCID als wirksam erwiesen.", "prognosis": "Unbehandelt f\u00fchrt der SCID in der Regel bei Kindern bis zum zweiten Lebensjahr zu einer schweren Infektion und zum Tod. Eine Transplantation blutbildender Stammzellen von einem HLA-identischen Geschwister in den ersten Lebensmonaten erm\u00f6glicht eine langfristige \u00dcberlebensquote von mehr als 90%.", "summary": "Die Gesamt-Inzidenz wird auf etwa 1/50.000 Lebendgeburten gesch\u00e4tzt, wobei es regionale Unterschiede und eine h\u00f6here Inzidenz in Populationen mit einer h\u00f6heren Konsanguinit\u00e4tsrate gibt. Von der Erkrankung sind, wegen der X-chromosomalen Variante (SCID T-B+ durch einen Gammaketten-Mangel; siehe dort), die in westlichen L\u00e4ndern rund 30% aller SCID-F\u00e4lle ausmacht, h\u00e4ufiger m\u00e4nnliche Personen betroffen."}, {"name": "SCID, Athabasca-Typ", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch DCLRE1C-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) due to DCLRE1C deficiency is a type of SCID (see this term) characterized by severe and recurrent infections, diarrhea, failure to thrive, and cell sensitivity to ionizing radiation.", "synonyms": "SCID due to ARTEMIS deficiency, SCID due to DCLRE1C deficiency, SCID, Athabascan type, SCID, Athabaskan type, Severe combined immunodeficiency due to ARTEMIS deficiency, Severe combined immunodeficiency, Athabascan type, Severe combined immunodeficiency, Athabaskan type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D81.1", "omim": "602450", "umls": "C1865372", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Patients present with the classical features of SCID such as failure to thrive, severe infections (pneumonia, gastrointestinal infections, sepsis), recurrent or persistent thrush, and chronic diarrhea. Materno-fetal transfusion-associated graft versus host disease is also associated with the disease. Immunological findings include absence of T and B lymphocytes with normal natural killer (NK) cell count.", "etiology": "SCID due to DCLRE1C deficiency results from null mutations in the  DCLRE1C gene (10p13) that lead to a defect in the V(D)J recombination and thus to an early arrest of both B and T cell maturation.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive."}, {"name": "SCID, Athabaskan-Typ", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch DCLRE1C-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) due to DCLRE1C deficiency is a type of SCID (see this term) characterized by severe and recurrent infections, diarrhea, failure to thrive, and cell sensitivity to ionizing radiation.", "synonyms": "SCID due to ARTEMIS deficiency, SCID due to DCLRE1C deficiency, SCID, Athabascan type, SCID, Athabaskan type, Severe combined immunodeficiency due to ARTEMIS deficiency, Severe combined immunodeficiency, Athabascan type, Severe combined immunodeficiency, Athabaskan type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D81.1", "omim": "602450", "umls": "C1865372", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Patients present with the classical features of SCID such as failure to thrive, severe infections (pneumonia, gastrointestinal infections, sepsis), recurrent or persistent thrush, and chronic diarrhea. Materno-fetal transfusion-associated graft versus host disease is also associated with the disease. Immunological findings include absence of T and B lymphocytes with normal natural killer (NK) cell count.", "etiology": "SCID due to DCLRE1C deficiency results from null mutations in the  DCLRE1C gene (10p13) that lead to a defect in the V(D)J recombination and thus to an early arrest of both B and T cell maturation.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive."}, {"name": "SCID durch ARTEMIS-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch DCLRE1C-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) due to DCLRE1C deficiency is a type of SCID (see this term) characterized by severe and recurrent infections, diarrhea, failure to thrive, and cell sensitivity to ionizing radiation.", "synonyms": "SCID due to ARTEMIS deficiency, SCID due to DCLRE1C deficiency, SCID, Athabascan type, SCID, Athabaskan type, Severe combined immunodeficiency due to ARTEMIS deficiency, Severe combined immunodeficiency, Athabascan type, Severe combined immunodeficiency, Athabaskan type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D81.1", "omim": "602450", "umls": "C1865372", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Patients present with the classical features of SCID such as failure to thrive, severe infections (pneumonia, gastrointestinal infections, sepsis), recurrent or persistent thrush, and chronic diarrhea. Materno-fetal transfusion-associated graft versus host disease is also associated with the disease. Immunological findings include absence of T and B lymphocytes with normal natural killer (NK) cell count.", "etiology": "SCID due to DCLRE1C deficiency results from null mutations in the  DCLRE1C gene (10p13) that lead to a defect in the V(D)J recombination and thus to an early arrest of both B and T cell maturation.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive."}, {"name": "SCID durch CARD11-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch CARD11-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe combined immunodeficiency due to CARD11 deficiency is a rare combined T and B cell immunodeficiency characterized by normal numbers of T and B lymphocytes, increased numbers of transitional B cells and hypo- to agammaglobulinemia, decreased numbers of regulatory T cells and defects in T-cell functions. It presents with severe susceptibility to infections, including opportunistic infections.", "synonyms": "SCID due to CARD11 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D81.2", "omim": "615206"}, {"name": "SCID durch CD70-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch CD70-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive primary immunodeficiency characterized by susceptibility to Epstein-Barr virus (EBV)-related disorders (B-cell lymphoproliferative disorders including Hodgkin lymphoma) as well as dysgammaglobulinemia and recurrent infections. Patients can present with recurrent fever, lymphadenopathy, hepatosplenomegaly, Beh\u00e7et-like stomatitis, pharyngitis, tonsillitis, adenitis, and viral encephalitis.", "synonyms": "CID due to CD70 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "D82.3", "omim": "618261"}, {"name": "SCID durch CORO1A-Defekt", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch CORO1A-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch Coronin 1A Defekt, SCID durch CORO1A-Defekt, SCID durch CORO1A-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D81.2", "OMIM": "615401", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer"}, {"name": "SCID durch CORO1A-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch CORO1A-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch Coronin 1A Defekt, SCID durch CORO1A-Defekt, SCID durch CORO1A-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D81.2", "OMIM": "615401", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer"}, {"name": "SCID durch CTPS1-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch CTPS1-Defizienz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der schwere kombinierte Immundefekt (SCID) aufgrund von CTPS1-Defizient ist eine seltene prim\u00e4re Immundefektst\u00f6rung, die auf die beeintr\u00e4chtigte F\u00e4higkeit aktivierter T- und B-Zellen zur Proliferation als Reaktion auf eine Antigenrezeptor-vermittelte Aktivierung zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren ist. Die Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch fr\u00fches Auftreten von schweren, persistierenden und/oder rezidivierenden Virusinfektionen durch das Epstein-Barr-Virus (EBV) und das Varizella-Zoster-Virus (VZV, einschlie\u00dflich generalisierter Varizellen)) sowie rezidivierenden sino-pulmonalen bakteriellen Infektionen durch eingekapselte Erreger.", "synonyms": "SCID durch CTPS1-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D81.2", "OMIM": "615897"}, {"name": "SCID durch DCLRE1C-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch DCLRE1C-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) due to DCLRE1C deficiency is a type of SCID (see this term) characterized by severe and recurrent infections, diarrhea, failure to thrive, and cell sensitivity to ionizing radiation.", "synonyms": "SCID due to ARTEMIS deficiency, SCID due to DCLRE1C deficiency, SCID, Athabascan type, SCID, Athabaskan type, Severe combined immunodeficiency due to ARTEMIS deficiency, Severe combined immunodeficiency, Athabascan type, Severe combined immunodeficiency, Athabaskan type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D81.1", "omim": "602450", "umls": "C1865372", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is unknown.", "clinical_description": "Patients present with the classical features of SCID such as failure to thrive, severe infections (pneumonia, gastrointestinal infections, sepsis), recurrent or persistent thrush, and chronic diarrhea. Materno-fetal transfusion-associated graft versus host disease is also associated with the disease. Immunological findings include absence of T and B lymphocytes with normal natural killer (NK) cell count.", "etiology": "SCID due to DCLRE1C deficiency results from null mutations in the  DCLRE1C gene (10p13) that lead to a defect in the V(D)J recombination and thus to an early arrest of both B and T cell maturation.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive."}, {"name": "SCID durch DNA-PKcs-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch DNA-PKcs-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der kombinierte schwere Immundefekt (SCID) durch DNA-PKcs-Mangel ist ein extrem seltener Typ des SCID (siehe dort), der durch die klassischen Anzeichen des SCID (schwere und rekurrierende Infektionen, Diarrh\u00f6e, Gedeihst\u00f6rung), das Fehlen von T- und B-Lymphozyten und eine Zellsensitivit\u00e4t gegen\u00fcber ionisierender Strahlung gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "SCID durch DNA-PKcs-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "D81.1", "OMIM": "615966"}, {"name": "SCID durch DOCK8-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch DOCK8-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Kombinierte Immundefekt durch Mangel des dedicator of cytokinesis 8-Proteins (DOCK8) ist eine Form von T- und B-Zell-Immundefekt und gekennzeichnet durch rezidivierende virale Hautinfektionen, Krebsneigung und erh\u00f6hte Immunglobulin E (IgE)-Serumspiegel.", "synonyms": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch DOCK8-Defekt, SCID durch DOCK8-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D81.1", "OMIM": "243700", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden 11 Patienten in 8 Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten erkranken im Kindesalter mit atopischer Dermatitis, schweren Allergien gegen Nahrungsmittel und Umweltallergene, Asthma, rezidivierenden Infektionen der oberen und unteren Atemwege, Otitis media, rezidivierender Sinusitis, Bronchitis und Pneumonie und ausgedehnten viralen und bakteriellen Infektionen der Haut (u.a. oberfl\u00e4chliche, oft ulzerierende Herpes simplex-Infektionen, flache und verruk\u00f6se Warzen, Molluscum contagiosum-Infektionen, S. aureus-Hautinfektionen oder -Abszesse), Schleimhaut- oder Nagel-Candidiasis und Otitis externa. Bei lange bestehenden Infektionen mit Herpes simplex-, humanem Papilloma- oder Molluscum contagiosum-Virus entwickelten die Patienten Plattenepithelzell-Dysplasien und -Karzinome der Vulva, des Gesichtes und der Analregion. Neurologische, vaskulitische und Autoimmun-Symptome, wie sie beim autosomal-dominanten Hyper-IgE-Syndrom mit STAT3-Mutationen (s. dort) auftreten, werden nicht gesehen.", "etiology": "Ursache des CID durch DOCK8-Mangel sind homozygote oder compound-heterozygote Mutationen im DOCK8-Gen (9p24), die zum Fehlen des DOCK8-Proteins in Lymphozyten f\u00fchren. Die Folge sind niedrige absolute Zahlen der T- und B-Lymphozyten, leichte bis moderate Eosinophilie und sehr hohe IgE-Serumspiegel.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden 11 Patienten in 8 Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "SCID durch FOXN1-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch FOXN1-Defizienz", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": " A rare, genetic, primary immunodeficiency due to a defect in adaptive immunity characterized by the triad of congenital athymia (resulting in severe T-cell immunodeficiency), congenital alopecia totalis and nail dystrophy. Patients present neonatal or infantile-onset, severe, recurrent, life-threatening infections and low or absent circulating T cells. Additional features reported include erythroderma, lymphoadenopathy, diarrhea and failure to thrive.", "synonyms": "Alymphoid cystic thymic dysgenesis, Nude/SCID, Nude/severe combined immunodeficiency, SCID due to FOXN1 deficiency, Severe T-cell immunodeficiency-congenital alopecia-nail dystrophy syndrome, Winged helix deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D82.8", "omim": "601705\u00a0 618806", "gard": "4358"}, {"name": "SCID durch IKK2-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch IKK2-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Severe combined immunodeficiency due to IKK2 deficiency is a rare, genetic form of primary immunodeficiency characterized by life-threatening bacterial, fungal and viral infections with the onset in infancy, and failure to thrive. Typically, hypogammaglobulinemia or agammaglobulinemia and normal levels of T and B cells are present.", "synonyms": "SCID due to IKK2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "D81.2", "omim": "615592\u00a0 618204"}, {"name": "SCID durch kompletten RAG1/2-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch kompletten RAG1/2-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltener kombinierter T- und B-Zell-Immundefekt aufgrund von Null-Mutationen im rekombinationsaktivierenden Gen RAG 1 und/oder RAG2, die zu weniger als 1 % der Wildtyp-V(D)J-Rekombinationsaktivit\u00e4t f\u00fchren. Die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich mit lebensbedrohlichen, schweren, rezidivierenden Infektionen durch opportunistische Pilz-, Virus- und bakterielle Mikroorganismen sowie Hautausschl\u00e4gen, chronischem Durchfall, Gedeihst\u00f6rung und Fieber nach der Geburt. Zu den immunologischen Beobachtungen geh\u00f6ren eine ausgepr\u00e4gte T- und B-Zell-Lymphopenie, normale NK-Zahlen und niedrige oder fehlende Serum-Immunglobuline; einige Patienten k\u00f6nnen eine Eosinophilie aufweisen.", "synonyms": "SCID durch kompletten RAG1/2-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "D81.1", "OMIM": "601457", "UMLS": "C1832322", "GARD": "10339"}, {"name": "SCID durch LAT-Mangel", "sub_name": "Schwerer kombinierter Immundefekt durch LAT-Defizienz", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare severe combined immunodeficiency characterized by T-cell lymphopenia and absent T-cell proliferative responses, and normal B-cell and natural killer cell counts. Patients present in the first months of life with severe recurrent infections, failure to thrive, hematologic autoimmune disorders, and/or lymphoproliferation with splenomegaly.", "synonyms": "SCID due to LAT deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "D81.2", "omim": "617514"}, {"name": "SCID durch LCK-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch LCK-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, combined T- and B-cell immunodeficiency characterized by failure to thrive, severe diarrhea, opportunistic infections, and abnormal T-cell differentiation and function due to LCK deficiency, leading to an important risk factor for inflammation and autoimmunity.", "synonyms": "SCID due to LCK deficiency, SCID due to lymphocyte-specific protein tyrosine kinase deficiency, Severe combined immunodeficiency due to lymphocyte-specific protein tyrosine kinase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D81.1", "omim": "615758"}, {"name": "SCID durch Leukozyten-spezifischen Protein-Tyrosin-Kinase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch LCK-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, combined T- and B-cell immunodeficiency characterized by failure to thrive, severe diarrhea, opportunistic infections, and abnormal T-cell differentiation and function due to LCK deficiency, leading to an important risk factor for inflammation and autoimmunity.", "synonyms": "SCID due to LCK deficiency, SCID due to lymphocyte-specific protein tyrosine kinase deficiency, Severe combined immunodeficiency due to lymphocyte-specific protein tyrosine kinase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D81.1", "omim": "615758"}, {"name": "SCID mit Leukopenie", "sub_name": "Retikul\u00e4re Dysgenesie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Retikul\u00e4re Dysgenesie, die schwerste Form des Schweren kombinierten Immundefektes (SCID; s. dort), ist gekennzeichnet durch beidseitige Schallempfindungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit und fehlende angeborene und erworbene Immunfunktionen. Die Folge ist eine Septik\u00e4mie, die unbehandelt innerhalb weniger Tage nach der Geburt zum Tod f\u00fchrt.", "synonyms": "AK2-Mangel, Aleukozytose, kongenitale, De Vaal-Krankheit, Hypoplasie, h\u00e4matopoetische generalisierte, Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, mit Leukopenie, SCID mit Leukopenie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D81.0", "OMIM": "267500", "UMLS": "C0272167\u00a0 C1282908", "MeSH": "C538361", "GARD": "8625", "epidemiology": "Die Retikul\u00e4re Dysgenesie ist f\u00fcr weniger als 2% aller SCID-F\u00e4lle verantwortlich. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird auf 1:3.000.000-1:5.000.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Beide Geschlechter sind betroffen, in mehreren Familien Bestand Konsanguinit\u00e4t.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheitssymptome beginnen fr\u00fcher als bei anderen Formen des SCID, schon bei Geburt oder in der fr\u00fchen Neugeborenenperiode, mit Zeichen von Sepsis, mit Gedeihst\u00f6rung, Diarrhoe, Fieber, rezidivierenden Infektionen der oberen Luftwege, oraler Candidiasis, mit perianalen Infektionen und Abszessen und mit beidseitiger Schallempfindungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit. Trotz der rezidivierenden Infektionen fehlt signifikantes Lymph- und Tonsillengewebe. Die H\u00e4moglobinkonzentration ist bei Geburt in der Regel noch im Referenzbereich, aber als Folge der Sepsis und der chronischen Erkrankung k\u00f6nnen die Patienten eine An\u00e4mie entwickeln.", "etiology": "Die Retikul\u00e4re Dysgenesie ist gekennzeichnet durch profunde Neutropenie und T- und natural killer (NK)-Zell-Lymphozytopenie. Ursache sind Mutationen im AK2-Gen (1p34). Der resultierende Mangel der Adenylat-Kinase 2 verst\u00e4rkt die Apoptose von myeloischen und lymphoiden Vorstufen. Es wurden jedoch auch Patienten ohne diese Mutationen gefunden, ein Hinweis auf eine weitere Ursache. Vermutet wurde eine Imbalance des growth factor independent-1 transcription repressor (Gfi-1) und/oder Gfi-1b.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Nachweis einer Schallempfindungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit mit Hinweisen auf eine erhebliche Reduktion der T- und NK-Zellzahlen im Vergleich zu Gesunden gleichen Alters. In der Regel besteht ein materno-fetaler Graft.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind alle anderen Formen von SCID.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik kann durchgef\u00fchrt werden, wenn in der betroffenen Familie die Mutation identifiziert wurde.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv.", "management_and_treatment": "Einzige kurative Behandlung der Krankheit ist die Transplantation allogener h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen.", "prognosis": "Unbehandelt sterben die Patienten innerhalb weniger Tage nach der Geburt an den Folgen der Sepsis.", "summary": "Die Retikul\u00e4re Dysgenesie ist f\u00fcr weniger als 2% aller SCID-F\u00e4lle verantwortlich. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird auf 1:3.000.000-1:5.000.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Beide Geschlechter sind betroffen, in mehreren Familien Bestand Konsanguinit\u00e4t."}, {"name": "SCIDX1", "sub_name": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, durch Gamma-Ketten-Defekt, T- B+", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der kombinierte schwere Immundefekt (SCID) durch Gammaketten-Defekt, auch als SCID-X1 bezeichnet, ist eine Form des SCID (siehe dort) und gekennzeichnet durch schwere und rezidivierende Infektionen in Verbindung mit Diarrh\u00f6e und Gedeihst\u00f6rung.", "synonyms": "Immundefekt, kombinierter schwerer, X-chromosomaler, T- B+, SCIDX1, T-B+ SCID durch Gamma-Ketten-Defekt, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D81.2", "OMIM": "300400", "UMLS": "C2931540", "GARD": "5618", "epidemiology": "Diese Form macht etwa 50% der SCID-F\u00e4lle aus und ist in Europa die h\u00e4ufigste Form des SCID. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt ist je nach Population unterschiedlich, wird aber auf etwa 1/200.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Erkrankung tritt bei m\u00e4nnlichen Personen auf.", "clinical_description": "Der SCID-X1 manifestiert sich w\u00e4hrend der ersten Lebensmonate mit schweren und oft lebensbedrohlichen viralen, bakteriellen oder Pilzinfektionen (z.B. Pneumocystis jiroveci pneumonitis; disseminierte BCG-Infektion, wenn zuvor geimpft wurde) und Gedeihst\u00f6rung. Eine chronische Diarrh\u00f6e geh\u00f6rt zu den h\u00e4ufigen Befunden. Einige Patienten k\u00f6nnen Hautausschl\u00e4ge und Leberfunktionsst\u00f6rungen aufweisen. Die maternal-f\u00f6tale Transfusions-assoziierte Graft-versus-Host-Reaktion (Tranplantat-Wirt-Reaktion) ist ebenfalls mit dieser Erkrankung assoziiert. Immunologische Befunde sind Lymphopenie mit fehlenden T- und NK-Zellen, Hypogammaglobulin\u00e4mie und normale oder erh\u00f6hte Anzahl von B-Zellen.", "etiology": "Ursache des SCID-X1 sind Mutationen im X-chromosomalen IL2RG-Gen, das die Gamma-Kette kodiert.", "genetic_counseling": "Diese SCID-Form wird X-chromosomal vererbt.", "summary": "Diese Form macht etwa 50% der SCID-F\u00e4lle aus und ist in Europa die h\u00e4ufigste Form des SCID. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt ist je nach Population unterschiedlich, wird aber auf etwa 1/200.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Erkrankung tritt bei m\u00e4nnlichen Personen auf."}, {"name": "Scimitar-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Anomalie der epibronchialen rechten Pulmonalarterie, Halasz-Syndrom, Hypogenetisches Lungensyndrom, Kongenitales pulmonales venolobares Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q26.8", "UMLS": "C0036400", "MeSH": "D012587", "MedDRA": "10051951", "summary": "Das Scimitar-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch eine Kombination kardiopulmonaler Anomalien, darunter eine abnorme Return-Verbindung der rechten Lungenvene zur Vena cava inferior, was einen Links-Recht-Shunt etabliert. Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen wird auf 1-3:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit scheint im weiblichen Geschlecht h\u00e4ufiger als im m\u00e4nnlichen zu sein. Bei den meisten F\u00e4llen beginnen die Symptome in den ersten Lebensmonaten. In der Neugeborenenzeit wird die Krankheit durch kongestive Herzinsuffizienz (verursacht durch pulmonale Hypertension) und Atemnotsyndrom manifest. Am h\u00e4ufigsten ist die rechte Lunge beteiligt. In der betroffenen Lunge sind die Lungenarterien hypoplastisch oder malformiert, daneben erfolgt die arterielle Versorgung von \u00c4sten der Aorta, die oberhalb und unterhalb des Zwerchfells entspringen k\u00f6nnen. Das Herz liegt meist rechts. Selten \u00e4u\u00dfert sich die Krankheit bei Kindern und Erwachsenen mit kleinem Shunt, Herzger\u00e4usch und rezidivierenden Atemwegsinfekten. Etwa ein Viertel der Patienten haben einen angeborenen Herzfehler (Aorten-Koarktation, Fallotsche Tetralogie, persistierender Ductus arteriosus oder Ventrikelseptumdefekt, sh. diese Termini). Andere assoziierte Fehlbildungen sind bronchogene Zysten, Hufeisenlunge, akzessorisches Zwerchfell und Hernien. Die Ursache ist teilweise noch unklar. Bei mehreren Patienten mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Lungenvenen-Transposition wurde der Genort in die Chromosomenregion 4q12 kartiert. Die Diagnose st\u00fctzt sich auf das klinische Bild und die Befunde der trans-thorakalen oder trans-oesophagealen Echokardiographie, der Angiographie, Computertomographie und Magnetresonanz-Angiographie. Das charakteristische Merkmal im R\u00f6ntgen-Thorax, der der Krankheit den Namen gab, ist eine L\u00e4sion in Form eines Scimitar (ein Typ eines t\u00fcrkischen Krummschwertes). Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose durch fetale Echokardiographie ist m\u00f6glich. In seltenen F\u00e4llen wird das Scimitar-Syndrom zuf\u00e4llig bei \u00e4lteren Kindern und Erwachsenenw\u00e4hrend einer Thorax-R\u00f6ntgenuntersuchung aus anderen Indikationen gefunden. Das Scimitar-Syndrom muss vom Pseudo-Scimitar-Syndrom (abnorme absteigende, in den linken Vorhof m\u00fcndende Vene) und vom Kartagener-Syndrom (sh. dort) abgegrenzt werden. Die Art der Behandlung wird durch den h\u00e4modynamischen Status bestimmt. Eine Therapie ist nicht erforderlich, wenn nur wenig Blut zur Vena cava inferior flie\u00dft. Bei signifikantem Links-Rechts-Shunt und Lungenhochdruck ist eine chirurgische Korrektur mit derhrend einer Thorax-R\u00f6ntgenuntersuchung aus anderen Indikationen gefunden. Das Scimitar-Syndrom muss vom Pseudo-Scimitar-Syndrom (abnorme absteigende, in den linken Vorhof m\u00fcndende Vene) und vom Kartagener-Syndrom (sh. dort) abgegrenzt werden. Die Art der Behandlung wird durch den h\u00e4modynamischen Status bestimmt. Eine Therapie ist nicht erforderlich, wenn nur wenig Blut zur Vena cava inferior flie\u00dft. Bei signifikantem Links-Rechts-Shunt und Lungenhochdruck ist eine chirurgische Korrektur mit der M\u00f6glichkeit der Reparatur der Lungenvenen-Transposition, der Ligatur der Kollateralarterien und einer Resektion der rechten Lunge angezeigt. Bei Manifestation bereits im S\u00e4uglings- und Kleinkindalter besteht als Folge von schwerer Ateminsuffizienz, Herzversagen und pulmonalen Infekten eine signifikante Mortalit\u00e4t."}, {"name": "SCLC", "sub_name": "Bronchialkarzinom, kleinzelliges", "german_description": "Das Kleinzellige Bronchialkarzinom (Kleinzelliger Lungenkrebs, SCLC) ist ein hochmalignes bronchogenes Karzinom, das \u00fcberwiegend im Zentrum der Lunge, in einem Hauptbronchus entsteht. Die mittlere Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1/20.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Vom SCLC sind haupts\u00e4chlich Peronen mittleren Alters (27-66 Jahre) mit Raucheranamnese betroffen. Etwa 70% der Patienten mit SCLC haben bei Stellung der Diagnose schon extra-thorakale Symptome. Zu den Symptomen geh\u00f6ren Thoraxschmerz, Dyspnoe, Husten und pfeifende Atmung. Die Beteiligung benachbarter Bereiche verursacht Heiserkeit, Dysphagie und Oberes Vena-cava-Syndrom (Obstruktion des Blutflusses durch die Vena cava superior). Zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome als Folge einer Fernmetastasierung sind ebenfalls m\u00f6glich. Rauchen und Strahlenexposition sind synergistisch wirkende Risikofaktoren. Die industrielle Exposition mit Bis (Chlormethyl\u00e4ther) ist ein weiterer Risikofaktor. R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen des Thorax sind nicht ausreichend empfindlich, um einen SCLC fr\u00fchzeitig zu erkennen. R\u00f6ntgenologischen Auff\u00e4lligkeiten mu\u00df weiter nachgegangen werden, meist mit Computertomographie. Die Diagnose wird bioptisch gesichert. Patienten mit SCLC erhalten meist Bestrahlung und/oder Chemotherapie. In Hinblick auf eine Verbesserung der \u00dcberlebenschancen der Patienten ist sowohl bei ausgedehnten und bei begrenzten SCLC eine kombinierte Chemotherapie wirksamer als die Behandlung mit Einzelsubstanzen. Es kann auch eine prophylaktische Bestrahlung des Sch\u00e4dels erwogen werden, da innerhalb von 2-3 Jahren nach Behandlungsbeginn ein hohes Risiko f\u00fcr zentralnerv\u00f6se Metastasen besteht. Das Kleinzellige Bronchialkarzinom ist der aggressivste Lungentumor: Die 5-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate betr\u00e4gt 1-5%, der Median des gesamten \u00dcberlebens liegt bei etwa 6 bis 10 Monaten. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Small cell lung cancer (SCLC) is a highly aggressive malignant neoplasm, accounting for 10-15% of lung cancer cases, characterized by rapid growth, and early metastasis. SCLC usually manifests as a large hilar mass with bulky mediastinal lymphadenopathy presenting clinically with chest pain, persistent cough, dyspnea, wheezing, hoarseness, hemoptysis, loss of appetite, weight loss, and neurological and endocrine paraneoplastic syndromes. SCLC is primarily reported in elderly people with a history of long-term tobacco exposure.", "synonyms": "SCLC, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C34.9", "omim": "182280", "umls": "C0149925"}, {"name": "SCM", "sub_name": "Split-Cord-Malformation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SCM, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Jugendalter, Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SCM Typ 1", "sub_name": "Split-Cord-Malformation Typ I", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, neural tube defect characterized by localized longitudinal division of the spinal cord with an interposed osseous, cartilaginous or fibrous septum and double dural sac, typically occurring at the thoracic or lumbar level. Local vertebral segmental defects, syringomyelia, meningocele and intraspinal tumors may be associated. Variable clinical presentation includes pain, scoliosis, asymmetry and weakness of the lower limbs, neurological deficits, sphincter dysfunction, and various cutaneous abnormalities overlying the spine, such as hypertrichosis, dimple, hemangioma, subcutaneous mass or pigmented nevus.", "synonyms": "SCM type 1, SCM type I, Split cord malformation type 1, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "Q06.2", "omim": "222500", "umls": "C0011999", "gard": "1851", "meddra": "10012750"}, {"name": "SCM Typ 2", "sub_name": "Split-Cord-Malformation Typ II", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SCM Typ 2, SCM Typ II, Split-Cord-Malformation Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SCM Typ I", "sub_name": "Split-Cord-Malformation Typ I", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, neural tube defect characterized by localized longitudinal division of the spinal cord with an interposed osseous, cartilaginous or fibrous septum and double dural sac, typically occurring at the thoracic or lumbar level. Local vertebral segmental defects, syringomyelia, meningocele and intraspinal tumors may be associated. Variable clinical presentation includes pain, scoliosis, asymmetry and weakness of the lower limbs, neurological deficits, sphincter dysfunction, and various cutaneous abnormalities overlying the spine, such as hypertrichosis, dimple, hemangioma, subcutaneous mass or pigmented nevus.", "synonyms": "SCM type 1, SCM type I, Split cord malformation type 1, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "Q06.2", "omim": "222500", "umls": "C0011999", "gard": "1851", "meddra": "10012750"}, {"name": "SCM Typ II", "sub_name": "Split-Cord-Malformation Typ II", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SCM Typ 2, SCM Typ II, Split-Cord-Malformation Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SCN4", "sub_name": "Neutropenie, kongenitale schwere, autosomal-rezessive, durch G6PC3-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive severe congenital neutropenia due to G6PC3 deficiency is a rare, genetic, primary immunodeficiency disorder characterized by increased susceptibility to recurrent, life-threatening bacterial infections, in association with typically severe neutropenia in peripheral blood and bone marrow and a prominent ectatic superficial vein pattern, resulting from recessively inherited mutations in the G6PC3 gene. Cardiac malformations (e.g. atrial septal defects, patent ductus arteriosus,valvular defects), urogenital anomalies (incl. cryptorchidism), growth and developmental delay, facial dysmorphism (e.g. frontal bossing, upturned nose, malar hypoplasia), and intermittent thrombocytopenia are frequently associated.", "synonyms": "SCN4, Severe congenital neutropenia type 4, Severe congenital neutropenia-pulmonary hypertension-superficial venous angiectasis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "D70", "omim": "612541", "umls": "C2675526"}, {"name": "SCOT-Mangel", "sub_name": "Succinyl-CoA:3-Ketos\u00e4ure-CoA-Transferase-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SCOTD ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden 33 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic disorder in ketone body utilization characterized by severe, potentially fatal intermittent episodes of ketoacidosis.", "synonyms": "OXCT1 deficiency, SCOT deficiency, Succinyl-CoA acetoacetate transferase deficiency, Succinyl-CoA:3-ketoacid CoA transferase deficiency, ", "epidemiology": "Over 30 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Neonatal onset occurs in half of patients, presenting with a first ketoacidotic attack 2-4 days after birth. Patients with later onset present with an initial episode of ketoacidosis between 6-20 months of age. Initial episodes are often severe, and further episodes may be triggered by metabolic stress, infection or extended periods of fasting. Symptoms include tachypnea, vomiting, lethargy, hypotonia, and, in severe cases, coma. Episode intensity and frequency is variable and severe attacks are potentially fatal. Patients are generally healthy and develop normally between episodes, but infants may present with failure to thrive and poor feeding prior to diagnosis. Cardiomegaly has developed in two cases and may lead to congestive heart failure.", "etiology": "This disease is caused by mutations in the OXCT1 gene (5p13) that encodes the mitochondrial enzyme, succinyl-CoA:3-oxoacid CoA transferase, essential for ketone body metabolism in all extrahepatic tissue. Over 30 different mutations to OXCT1 have been identified, all leading to the accumulation of ketone bodies and ketoacidosis during periods of catabolic stress. Partial loss-of-function mutations have been identified that also lead to severe ketoacidosis, but without permanent ketosis.", "diagnostic_methods": "Permanent ketosis or persistent ketouria are pathognomic features; however, some mild cases may not present with these signs. Patients display metabolic acidosis during crises and both serum and urinalysis reveal high levels of ketones, pH levels between 6.8 and 7.12, and HCO3 levels between 3-8 mmol/L may be observed. There is no characteristic organic acid or acylcarnitine profile. The ratio of free fatty acids to total ketone bodies becomes less than 0.3 during a short fast and this may lead one to suspect the disease. Enzyme activity assays using fibroblasts, lymphocytes or platelets reveal a lack, or great reduction, of functional succinyl-CoA:3-oxoacid CoA transferase.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include physiological ketosis (e.g. ketoacidosis due to significant catabolism due to rotavirus infection) and ketoacidosis due to beta-ketothiolase deficiency or monocarboxylate transporter 1 deficiency.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis by enzyme activity assays is possible using cultured amniocytes.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. There is a 25% risk of disease transmission to offspring where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "Ketoacidotic crises must be treated immediately with intravenous fluid therapy including enough glucose, even when patients show normo- or hyper-glycemia, to suppress ketogenesis. Treatment of metabolic acidosis using sodium bicarbonate is controversial. Minimal usage of sodium bicarbonate is recommended. Patients must avoid prolonged fasting. A fat-rich diet which induces ketogenesis should be avoided. Protein restriction may be not necessary, because the effect of prevention of ketoacidosis is not proven. Home monitoring of urinary ketones helps parents to follow the patient's condition. Carbohydrate-rich food or drink should immediately be provided if ketone levels are higher than usual. If patients become weak or vomit, intravenous glucose infusions should be considered. There is no recommended medication for the chronic phase. The use of oral sodium bicarbonate and L-carnitine have been reported in the literature, but the effect of prevention of ketoacidosis attack is not proven. Affected females should be closely monitored during pregnancy and delivery.", "prognosis": "Risk of premature death is highest during the neonatal and infantile period due to severe episodes of ketoacidosis. However, the frequency and severity of ketoacidosis decreases after 10 years of age; thus, beyond this period, life expectancy maybe as good as in the general population. Normal growth and development is expected when proper treatment and diet are followed."}, {"name": "Scott-Bryant-Graham-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kraniodigitales Syndrom mit Intelligenzminderung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Kraniodigitales Syndrom Scott, Scott-Bryant-Graham-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "312860", "UMLS": "C1839311", "GARD": "4776", "summary": "Das Kraniodigitale Syndrom mit Intelligenzminderung ist gekennzeichnet durch Syndaktylie der Finger und Zehen, charakteristisches Gesicht ('schreckhafter ' Gesichtsausdruck, kleine spitze Nase, Mikrogenie, lange dunkle Wimpern und prominente Augenbrauen) und Intelligenzminderung. Bei den bisher weniger als 10 F\u00e4llen wurden auch abnorme Dermatoglyphen, Kleinwuchs und Brachyzephalie beschrieben. Die Vererbung scheint autosomal- oder X-chromosomal-rezessiv zu sein. "}, {"name": "Scott-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Scott-Syndrom ist eine extrem seltene angeborene h\u00e4morrhagische Erkrankung, die durch h\u00e4morrhagische Episoden als Folge einer gest\u00f6rten Thrombozytengerinnung gekennzeichnet ist.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D69.8", "OMIM": "262890", "UMLS": "C0796149", "GARD": "4777"}, {"name": "Scott-Taor-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Small-Patella-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Coxo-podo-patellares Syndrom, Dysplasie, ischiopatellare, Scott-Taor-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q74.1", "OMIM": "147891", "UMLS": "C1840061\u00a0 C1868581", "GARD": "3030", "summary": "Das Syndrom der kleinen Patella (Small-Patella-Syndrom, SPS) ist eine sehr seltene benigne Knochendysplasie und betrifft die unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und das Becken. Weltweit wurden bisher weniger als 50 Patienten beschrieben. Das haupts\u00e4chliche klinische Symptom, eine Aplasie oder Hypoplasie der Patella, ist assoziiert mit fehlender oder verz\u00f6gerter oder unregelm\u00e4\u00dfiger Ossifikation der Scham- und Sitzbein\u00e4ste und/oder mit infra-azetabul\u00e4ren Kerben ('wie mit der Axt geschlagen'). Die meisten Patienten haben neben Anomalien des Femur auch Fu\u00dfanomalien (weiter Abstand zwischen erster und zweiter Zehe, verk\u00fcrzter 4. und 5. Strahl des Fu\u00dfskeletts, Pes planus). Gelegentlich wurde auch \u00fcber kranio-faziale Anomalien berichtet (Mikrogenie, Gaumenspalte, flache Nase, prominente Stirn). Die Patella-, Becken- und Fu\u00dfanomalien k\u00f6nnen innerhalb einer Familie unterschiedlich schwer ausgepr\u00e4gt sein. Die Zeichen und Symptome reichen von Schmerzen, die \u00e4ltere Patienten wegen einer Arthrose der Kniegelenke (Gonarthrose) haben, bis hin zu im Kindesalter erstmals auftretenden, rezidivierenden Luxationen, mit schmerzenden Knien und der Unf\u00e4higkeit schnell zu laufen und Fahrrad zu fahren. Andere Patienten wieder sind symptomfrei. Das SPS wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im TBX4-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 17q22. Mutationen in diesem Gen werden in Familien mit und ohne charakteristische faziale Anomalien gefunden, ohne dass eine Genotyp-Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelation erkennbar ist. Die Diagnose wird klinisch und r\u00f6ntgenologisch gestellt. Das SPS muss von anderen Krankheiten mit aplastischer oder hypoplastischer Patella differenziert werden, z.B. dem famili\u00e4ren Patella-Aplasie-Hypoplasie-Snndrom (PTLAH) und dem klinisch schwerer verlaufenden Nagel-Patella-Syndrom (NPS). Fr\u00fche chirurgische Behandlung, Schmerztherapie und unterst\u00fctzende Ma\u00dfnahmen sind angezeigt. "}, {"name": "SC-Phokomelie", "sub_name": "Roberts-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Pseudothalidomid-Syndrom, Roberts-SC-Phokomelie-Syndrom, SC-Phokomelie, SC-Pseudothalidomid-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q73.8", "OMIM": "268300", "UMLS": "C0392475", "MeSH": "C535687", "GARD": "7387", "summary": "Das Roberts-Syndrom (RBS) ist gekennzeichnet durch pr\u00e4- und postnatal verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum, schwere, symmetrische Reduktionsdefekte der Gliedma\u00dfen, kraniofaziale Anomalien und schwere geistige Retardierung. Die SC-Phokomelie ist eine leichtere Form des RBS. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt und in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung ist nicht bekannt. Weniger als 150 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben. Die oberen Gliedma\u00dfen sind h\u00e4ufiger und schwerer betroffen als die unteren Gliedma\u00dfen. Der Defekt ist meist mesomel, am st\u00e4rksten betroffen ist der Radius an den oberen Gliedma\u00dfen und die Fibula an den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen. Die schwersten Formen des Defektes werden als Phokomelie manifest. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind aplastische oder hypoplastische Daumen und Oligodaktylie oder Syndaktylie. Kraniofaziale Anomalien sind Mikrozephalie (st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gt im m\u00e4nnlichen als im weiblichen Geschlecht), hypoplastische Nasenfl\u00fcgel, hypoplastisches Jochbein, Hypertelorismus, Mikrogenie, kapill\u00e4res H\u00e4mangiom, Exophthalmus, antimongoloide Lidachsen, dyspastische oder kleine Ohren, Hornhauttr\u00fcbung oder Katarakt und Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte. Der Schweregrad der Gliedma\u00dfendefekte und der kraniofazialen Anomalien ist gleichsinnig ausgepr\u00e4gt. M\u00f6gliche andere Fehlbildungen sind angeborene Herzfehler, Zystenniere und gro\u00dfe Genitalien (Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung von Phallus oder Klitoris). Bei Patienten, die die Neugeborenenzeit \u00fcberleben, besteht eine schwere geistige Retardierung. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im ESCO2-Gen (8p21.1), das f\u00fcr ein Protein aus der Eco1/Ctf7-Familie der Acetyltransferasen kodiert. Das Enzym ist an der Koh\u00e4sion der Schwesterchromatiden w\u00e4hrend der S-Phase beteiligt. ESCO2-Mutationen f\u00fchren zu verlangsamter Zellteilung, geh\u00e4uftem Zelltod und gest\u00f6rter Zellproliferation. Wahrscheinlich ist ein Verlust von Vorl\u00e4uferzellen in der Embryogenese verantwortlich f\u00fcr die Entwicklungsdefekte des RBS. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Symptome und die Chromosomenanalyse (mit charakteristischem 'Bahnschienen'-Aspekt der Chromosomen als Folge der Repulsion der heterochromatischen Regionen und vorzeitiger Trennung der Zentromere). Durch direkte Sequenzierung des ESCO2-Gens kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden. Differentialdiagnosen sind Thalidomid-Embryopathie sowie Baller-Gerold-, Cornelia-de-Lange- und TAR-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Wenn bei einem betroffenen Kind die ESCO2-Mutationen bekannt sind, ist in weiteren Schwangerschaften der Mutter eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose durch DNA-Analyse aus Chorionzotten m\u00f6glich. In den \u00fcbrigen F\u00e4llen kann der ultrasonographische Nachweis charakteristischer RBS-Anomalien den Verdacht liefern, der dann durch Chromosomenanalyse best\u00e4tigt wird. Zur Betreuung geh\u00f6ren die chirurgische Korrektur der fazialen Fehlbildungen, die chirurgische und/oder orthop\u00e4dische Versorgung der Gliedma\u00dfendefekte und das Management der kognitiven Einschr\u00e4nkungen. Die Prognose ist relativ ung\u00fcnstig. Kardiale und renale Fehlbildungen bedingen eine hohe Mortalit\u00e4t in der Neugeborenenperiode und fr\u00fchen Kindheit."}, {"name": "SC-Pseudothalidomid-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Roberts-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Pseudothalidomid-Syndrom, Roberts-SC-Phokomelie-Syndrom, SC-Phokomelie, SC-Pseudothalidomid-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q73.8", "OMIM": "268300", "UMLS": "C0392475", "MeSH": "C535687", "GARD": "7387", "summary": "Das Roberts-Syndrom (RBS) ist gekennzeichnet durch pr\u00e4- und postnatal verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum, schwere, symmetrische Reduktionsdefekte der Gliedma\u00dfen, kraniofaziale Anomalien und schwere geistige Retardierung. Die SC-Phokomelie ist eine leichtere Form des RBS. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt und in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung ist nicht bekannt. Weniger als 150 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben. Die oberen Gliedma\u00dfen sind h\u00e4ufiger und schwerer betroffen als die unteren Gliedma\u00dfen. Der Defekt ist meist mesomel, am st\u00e4rksten betroffen ist der Radius an den oberen Gliedma\u00dfen und die Fibula an den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen. Die schwersten Formen des Defektes werden als Phokomelie manifest. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind aplastische oder hypoplastische Daumen und Oligodaktylie oder Syndaktylie. Kraniofaziale Anomalien sind Mikrozephalie (st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gt im m\u00e4nnlichen als im weiblichen Geschlecht), hypoplastische Nasenfl\u00fcgel, hypoplastisches Jochbein, Hypertelorismus, Mikrogenie, kapill\u00e4res H\u00e4mangiom, Exophthalmus, antimongoloide Lidachsen, dyspastische oder kleine Ohren, Hornhauttr\u00fcbung oder Katarakt und Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte. Der Schweregrad der Gliedma\u00dfendefekte und der kraniofazialen Anomalien ist gleichsinnig ausgepr\u00e4gt. M\u00f6gliche andere Fehlbildungen sind angeborene Herzfehler, Zystenniere und gro\u00dfe Genitalien (Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung von Phallus oder Klitoris). Bei Patienten, die die Neugeborenenzeit \u00fcberleben, besteht eine schwere geistige Retardierung. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im ESCO2-Gen (8p21.1), das f\u00fcr ein Protein aus der Eco1/Ctf7-Familie der Acetyltransferasen kodiert. Das Enzym ist an der Koh\u00e4sion der Schwesterchromatiden w\u00e4hrend der S-Phase beteiligt. ESCO2-Mutationen f\u00fchren zu verlangsamter Zellteilung, geh\u00e4uftem Zelltod und gest\u00f6rter Zellproliferation. Wahrscheinlich ist ein Verlust von Vorl\u00e4uferzellen in der Embryogenese verantwortlich f\u00fcr die Entwicklungsdefekte des RBS. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Symptome und die Chromosomenanalyse (mit charakteristischem 'Bahnschienen'-Aspekt der Chromosomen als Folge der Repulsion der heterochromatischen Regionen und vorzeitiger Trennung der Zentromere). Durch direkte Sequenzierung des ESCO2-Gens kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden. Differentialdiagnosen sind Thalidomid-Embryopathie sowie Baller-Gerold-, Cornelia-de-Lange- und TAR-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Wenn bei einem betroffenen Kind die ESCO2-Mutationen bekannt sind, ist in weiteren Schwangerschaften der Mutter eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose durch DNA-Analyse aus Chorionzotten m\u00f6glich. In den \u00fcbrigen F\u00e4llen kann der ultrasonographische Nachweis charakteristischer RBS-Anomalien den Verdacht liefern, der dann durch Chromosomenanalyse best\u00e4tigt wird. Zur Betreuung geh\u00f6ren die chirurgische Korrektur der fazialen Fehlbildungen, die chirurgische und/oder orthop\u00e4dische Versorgung der Gliedma\u00dfendefekte und das Management der kognitiven Einschr\u00e4nkungen. Die Prognose ist relativ ung\u00fcnstig. Kardiale und renale Fehlbildungen bedingen eine hohe Mortalit\u00e4t in der Neugeborenenperiode und fr\u00fchen Kindheit."}, {"name": "Scrub-Typhus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Scrub-Typhus (scrub = Buschwerk) ist eine seltene, von Milben \u00fcbertragene Infektion mit dem Bakterium Orientia tsutsugamushi. Kennzeichnend ist das akut einsetzende, potenziell schwere Fieber.", "synonyms": "Tsutsugamushi-Fieber, Tsutsugamushi-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A75.3", "UMLS": "C0036472", "MeSH": "D012612", "MedDRA": "10039766", "epidemiology": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz des Scrub-Typhus sind nicht bekannt. Weltweit besteht f\u00fcr 1 Milliarde Menschen die Gefahr, an Scrub-Typhus zu erkranken, und j\u00e4hrlich erkranken gesch\u00e4tzt 1 Million Menschen. Die Erkrankung ist in den l\u00e4ndlichen Gegenden S\u00fcd- und S\u00fcdostasiens und des westlichen Pazifiks (Korea bis Australien) und von Japan bis Indien und Pakistan weit verbreitet. In diesen Regionen betr\u00e4gt die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz etwa 1/4.000. Der Scrub-Typhus tritt vor allem im Fr\u00fchjahr und Herbst in l\u00e4ndlichen Gegenden auf und wurde h\u00e4ufig bei Personen beschrieben, die in endemische Regionen reisen.", "clinical_description": "Nach einer symptomfreien Inkubationszeit von 10 oder mehr Tagen setzt die Krankheit pl\u00f6tzlich mit konstant hohem Fieber, Kopfschmerzen, Benommenheit, Husten, Myalgie und \u00dcbelkeit ein. Ein blass-fleckiger Ausschlag ist h\u00e4ufig. In vielen F\u00e4llen ist die Stelle des Milbenbisses verschorft, oft mit schmerzhaften Satellitenlymphknoten. Splenomegalie wird bei 1/3 der F\u00e4lle beobachtet. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind mild, m\u00f6gliche Folgen sind jedoch Pneumonie, Meningoenzephalitis, Multiorganversagen und Blutungen. Vor allem bei unbehandelten Patienten ist auch ein letaler Ausgang m\u00f6glich.. R\u00fcckf\u00e4lle nach einer Erholung k\u00f6nnen vorkommen, sind dann aber in der Regel weniger schwer als die erste Episode.", "etiology": "Der Scrub-Typhus wird von Orientia tsutsugamushi verursacht, einem obligat intrazellul\u00e4ren Gram-negativen St\u00e4bchenbakterium, das auf Menschen \u00fcber den Biss der Larven von Trombiculiden-Milben (scrub-itch mites, Ernte-Milben) \u00fcbertragen wird.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Anzeichen (Fieber, Kopfschmerzen, Schorf an der Bissstelle, Ausschlag) in einer endemischen l\u00e4ndlichen Region. Nicht-spezifische Labortestergebnissen sind: Erh\u00f6hte Transaminase-Werte, Thrombozytopenie, Leukopenie und eine Umkehrung des CD4/CD8-Lymphozyten-Verh\u00e4ltnisses. Eine endg\u00fcltige Diagnose kann \u00fcber eine Shell-Vial-Kultur des O. tsutsugamushi oder durch PCR-Analyse einer Gewebsprobe (Haut, Lymphknoten, EDTA Blut) erfolgen. Die Organismen zeigen eine nur schwache Testf\u00e4rbung im Gimenez-Verfahren, jedoch eine deutliche F\u00e4rbung mit Giemsa. Auch die Immunhistochemie von Hautl\u00e4sionen kann die Infektion aufdecken. Eine sp\u00e4tere serologische Best\u00e4tigung ist \u00fcber eine indirekte Immunfluoreszenz m\u00f6glich.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind typhoides Fieber, Leptospirose, Malaria und Dengue (siehe jeweils dort) sowie HIV-Serokonversion und Rickettsiosen (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung umfasst in der Regel eine medikament\u00f6se Therapie mit Doxycyclin und Chloramphenicol. Doxycyclin wird \u00fcber einen kurzen Zeitraum (3-7 Tage) bei Erwachsenen (200 mg/Tag) und Kindern (2,2 mg/kg, zwei Mal t\u00e4glich) verabreicht. Alle Patienten mit dem Verdacht auf eine Infektion sollten behandelt werden. Patienten, die schlecht auf Doxycyclin und Chloramphenicol ansprechen, sowie schwangere Frauen k\u00f6nnen mit Rifampicin (600-900 mg/Tag) oder Azithromycin (500 mg am ersten Tag, dann 250 mg/Tag) behandelt werden.", "prognosis": "Der Verlauf der Erkrankung kann schwer sein. Die Mortalit\u00e4tsrate ist regional verschieden und reicht von 3% in Taiwan bis zu 30% in Nord-Japan. Die genauen Gr\u00fcnde f\u00fcr die unterschiedliche Mortalit\u00e4t in diesen Regionen sind nicht bekannt, jedoch ist es wahrscheinlich, dass unterschiedliche Serotypen f\u00fcr die unterschiedlichen Symptome der Erkrankung verantwortlich sind.", "summary": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz des Scrub-Typhus sind nicht bekannt. Weltweit besteht f\u00fcr 1 Milliarde Menschen die Gefahr, an Scrub-Typhus zu erkranken, und j\u00e4hrlich erkranken gesch\u00e4tzt 1 Million Menschen. Die Erkrankung ist in den l\u00e4ndlichen Gegenden S\u00fcd- und S\u00fcdostasiens und des westlichen Pazifiks (Korea bis Australien) und von Japan bis Indien und Pakistan weit verbreitet. In diesen Regionen betr\u00e4gt die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz etwa 1/4.000. Der Scrub-Typhus tritt vor allem im Fr\u00fchjahr und Herbst in l\u00e4ndlichen Gegenden auf und wurde h\u00e4ufig bei Personen beschrieben, die in endemische Regionen reisen."}, {"name": "SCS", "sub_name": "Saethre-Chotzen-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt liegt zwischen 1/25,000 und 1/50,000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A syndrome characterized by unilateral or bilateral coronal synostosis, facial asymmetry, ptosis, strabismus and small ears with prominent superior and/or inferior crus, among other less common manifestations.", "synonyms": "ACS3, Acrocephalosyndactyly type 3, SCS, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "101400\u00a0 180750", "umls": "C0175699", "gard": "7598", "epidemiology": "Saethre-Chotzen syndrome (SCS) prevalence ranges from 1/25,000 to 1/50,000 livebirths.", "clinical_description": "SCS has a variable spectrum of manifestations. Classic SCS presents at birth with synostosis of coronal (less commonly in conjunction with sagittal, metopic or lambdoid) sutures resulting in abnormal skull shape, facial asymmetry, low frontal hairline, ptosis, strabismus, tear duct stenosis and small ears with prominent crus. Brachydactyly, broad toes, partial cutaneous syndactyly of digits 2 and 3 of the hand, duplicated distal phalanx of the hallux are also often present. Intelligence is normal in most, but mild to severe developmental delay has been reported, primarily in cases with a large genomic deletion. Some may experience conductive and/or sensorineural hearing loss. Less common manifestations include short stature, hypertelorism, cleft palate, bifid uvula, maxillary hypoplasia, lacrimal duct stenosis, parietal foramina, vertebral anomalies, radioulnar synostosis, obstructive sleep apnea and congenital heart malformations. Mild phenotypes include patients with ptosis or blepharophimosis with or without craniosynostosis. Elevated intracranial pressure (ICP) associated with severe cases of synostosis may lead to headaches, visual loss, seizures and death if untreated.", "etiology": "SCS is due to point mutations or deletions involving (or removing completely) the TWIST1 gene (7p21), which encodes a basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) transcription factor responsible for cell lineage determination and differentiation. Loss of function mutations in this gene lead to the induction of premature cranial suture fusion. Gene deletions cause more severe phenotypes, usually associated with significant neurocognitive delays.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based mainly on the presence of characteristic clinical findings. CT of the head and radiographs are useful in characterizing abnormalities of the skull, spine and limbs. Molecular genetic testing can identify a TWIST1 mutation or deletion, confirming diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Although several features (such as 2-3 syndactyly of the hand) are unique to SCS, differential diagnoses include other syndromic forms of craniosynostosis such as Muenke, Baller-Gerold, Pfeiffer, and Crouzon syndromes as well as isolated unilateral coronal synostosis. Robinow-Sorauf syndrome is now considered within the spectrum of SCS, typically with milder features. Mutations in FGFR3, FGFR2, TCF12, RECQL4, and EFNB1 have been reported to cause synostosis conditions that phenotypically overlap with SCS. This is not surprising, as there is evidence that FGFR and TWIST1 may be integrated into overlapping pathways, including in osteoblast differentiation. In addition, TWIST1 mutations have been noted in some cases of isolated single-suture craniosynostosis, including sagittal and unicoronal cases.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing for a TWIST1 mutation is rare, but it can be performed in families with a known mutation or when an ultrasound shows craniosynostosis of unknown etiology.", "genetic_counseling": "SCS is inherited as an autosomal dominant trait. Genetic counseling is valuable. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment of SCS requires management by a multidisciplinary craniofacial team with follow-up until young adulthood. In general, patients must undergo cranioplasty in the first year of life to increase the intracranial volume and restore a more normal head shape. Recurrent increased ICP may necessitate further surgical expansion procedures. In childhood, orthodontic care and/or midfacial surgery may be necessary for treatment of airway obstruction and malocclusion. In those with cleft palate, surgical closure can be performed in the context of other malformations, with evaluation for velopharyngeal insufficiency and speech therapy offered as necessary. Routine evaluations of facial growth, hearing loss and psychomotor development are needed, as well as regular ophthalmologic examinations to monitor strabismus, amblyopia or chronic papilledema (that indicates increased ICP). Early intervention programs should be offered to children with developmental delay. Augmentation of hearing and supportive interventions related to deafness should be pursued when indicated.", "prognosis": "In most cases, when treated and monitored from an early age, the prognosis is excellent. Developmental prognosis is worse for patients with a TWIST1 deletion, compared to those with point mutations."}, {"name": "SD1a", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1, Typ Weidenreich, SD1a, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Weidenreich, Syndaktylie Typ 1a, Zygodaktylie, Typ Weidenreich, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.3", "OMIM": "609815", "UMLS": "C1853294", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "SD1b", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1, Typ Lueken, SD1b, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Lueken, Syndaktylie Typ 1b, Zygodaktylie Typ Lueken, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "SD1c", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1 Typ Montagu, SD1c, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Montagu, Syndaktylie Typ 1c, Zygodaktylie Typ Montagu, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "SD1d", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1 Typ Castilla, SD1d, Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Typ Castilla, Zygodaktylie Typ Castilla, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "SD1 Typ Castilla", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1 Typ Castilla, SD1d, Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Typ Castilla, Zygodaktylie Typ Castilla, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "SD1, Typ Lueken", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1, Typ Lueken, SD1b, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Lueken, Syndaktylie Typ 1b, Zygodaktylie Typ Lueken, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "SD1 Typ Montagu", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1 Typ Montagu, SD1c, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Montagu, Syndaktylie Typ 1c, Zygodaktylie Typ Montagu, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "SD1, Typ Weidenreich", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1, Typ Weidenreich, SD1a, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Weidenreich, Syndaktylie Typ 1a, Zygodaktylie, Typ Weidenreich, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.3", "OMIM": "609815", "UMLS": "C1853294", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "SD2a", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Vordingborg, SD2a, SPD Typ Vordingborg, SPD1, Synpolydaktylie Typ Vordingborg, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "186000", "UMLS": "C1861367", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SD2b", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Debeer, SD2b, SPD Typ Debeer, SPD2, Synpolydaktylie Typ Debeer, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "608180", "UMLS": "C1842422", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SD2c", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Malik, SD2c, SPD Typ Malik, SPD3, Synpolydaktylie, Typ Malik, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "610234", "UMLS": "C1853255", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SD2 Typ Debeer", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Debeer, SD2b, SPD Typ Debeer, SPD2, Synpolydaktylie Typ Debeer, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "608180", "UMLS": "C1842422", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SD2 Typ Malik", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Malik, SD2c, SPD Typ Malik, SPD3, Synpolydaktylie, Typ Malik, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "610234", "UMLS": "C1853255", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SD2 Typ Vordingborg", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Vordingborg, SD2a, SPD Typ Vordingborg, SPD1, Synpolydaktylie Typ Vordingborg, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "186000", "UMLS": "C1861367", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SDCD, CHST3-Typ", "sub_name": "CHST3-assoziierte Skelettdysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "CHST3-related skeletal dysplasia is a very rare bone disorder characterized clinically by short stature of prenatal onset; dislocation of the knees, hips or elbows; club feet; limitation of range of motion of large joints; progressive kyphosis; and occasional scoliosis. In a few patients, minor heart valve dysplasia has also been described. Intellect, vision and hearing are normal.", "synonyms": "Chondrodysplasia with congenital joint dislocations, CHST3 type, SDCD, CHST3 type, Spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia with congenital joint dyslocations, CHST3 type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q74.8", "omim": "143095", "umls": "C2931649"}, {"name": "sdCHC", "sub_name": "Kryohydrozytose mit reduziertem Stomatin, heredit\u00e4re Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hereditary cryohydrocytosis with reduced stomatin is a rare hemolytic anemia characterized by combination of neurologic features, such as psychomotor delay, seizures, variable movement disorders, and hemolytic anemia with stomatocytosis, resulting in cation-leaky erythrocytes, pseudohyperkalemia, hemolytic crises and hepatosplenomegaly. Cataracts are also a presenting feature.", "synonyms": "CHC type 2, Hereditary cryohydrocytosis type 2, Stomatin-deficient cryohydrocytosis, sdCHC, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D58.8", "omim": "608885", "umls": "C1837206"}, {"name": "SDRPL", "sub_name": "B-Zell-Lymphom der roten Pulpa, diffuses splenisches", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das diffuse kleine B-Zell-Lymphom der Milz ist ein seltenes, indolentes B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom, das durch eine abnorme Proliferation kleiner, monomorpher, basophiler B-Lymphozyten mit vill\u00f6sem Zytoplasma in der roten Pulpa der Milz, im Knochenmark und im peripheren Blut gekennzeichnet ist. Sie pr\u00e4sentiert sich typischerweise in den sp\u00e4ten klinischen Stadien mit Splenomegalie und moderater Lymphozytose. Zytopenien sind selten und sind vermutlich mit Hypersplenismus assoziiert.", "synonyms": "SDRPL, Splenisches diffuses kleinzelliges B-Zell-Lymphom der roten Pulpa, ", "ICD-10": "C83.0"}, {"name": "SDS", "sub_name": "Shwachman-Diamond-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Shwachman-Diamond-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch das Zusammentreffen eines h\u00e4matologischen Defektes, eines Dysmorphie-Syndroms und einer Pankreas-Lipomatose mit ekkriner Pankreasinsuffizienz. Die Krankheit ist sehr selten, in Frankreich wurden nicht mehr als 100 Patienten beschrieben. Weitere Symptome sind Ichthyose, Knochenanomalien (metaphys\u00e4re Dysostose, Pectus carinatum) und psychomotorische Retardierung. Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt typisch verringerte Intensit\u00e4t in T2. Zu den h\u00e4matologischen St\u00f6rungen geh\u00f6ren Neutropenie mit defekter Chemotaxis, moderate Thrombopenie und An\u00e4mie sowie eine erh\u00f6hte Konzentration des foetalen H\u00e4moglobins. Diese St\u00f6rungen nehmen an Schwere zu und m\u00fcnden in 25% der F\u00e4lle in der Aplasie. Trotz einiger \u00c4hnlichkeiten mit dem Pearson-Syndrom liegt kein mitochondrialer Defekt vor. Die meisten Patienten haben eine Mutation im ubiquit\u00e4r exprimierten SBDS-Gen auf Chromosom 7. Die Funktionen dieses Gens sind sehr vielf\u00e4ltig. Deshalb ist es schwierig, die Pathogenese des komplexen klinischen Bildes zu erkl\u00e4ren. Solange die Neutropenie moderat ist und keine symptome verursacht, beschr\u00e4nkt sich die Betreuung auf die Ern\u00e4hrung (Pankreasenzyme, N\u00e4hrstoffe, Vitamine). Manchmal ist eine Therapie mit dem h\u00e4matopoetischen Wachstumsfaktor G-CSF (granulocyte colony-stimulating factor) hilfreich. Die Patienten haben ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko, eine sekund\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mie zu entwickeln (in der Regel eine Akute Myeloblastenleuk\u00e4mie Typ FAB 5 oder 6) oder ein Myelodysplastisches Syndrom mit zytologischen Anomalien (klonale zytogenetische Anomalien, h\u00e4ufig unter Einbeziehung des Chromosoms 7). Wenn die Krankheit bis zur Markaplasie oder zu maligner Ver\u00e4nderun fortgeschritten ist, wird eine Knochenmarktransplantation erforderlich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Shwachman-Diamond syndrome (SDS) is a rare multisystemic syndrome characterized by chronic and usually mild neutropenia, pancreatic exocrine insufficiency associated with steatorrhea and growth failure, skeletal dysplasia with short stature, and an increased risk of bone marrow aplasia or leukemic transformation.", "synonyms": "Pancreatic insufficiency and bone marrow dysfunction, SDS, Shwachman syndrome, Shwachman-Bodian-Diamond syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "D61.0", "omim": "260400\u00a0 617941", "umls": "C0272170", "gard": "4863", "meddra": "10067940", "epidemiology": "Worldwide prevalence is estimated at about 1/350,000 and birth-prevalence at around 1/200,000 live births.", "clinical_description": "SDS shows a variable clinical picture, even within families. It generally manifests during infancy or early childhood. The most common anomaly is usually intermittent and moderate neutropenia that is associated with recurrent infections. Mild anemia and thrombocytopenia may also occur. Exocrine pancreatic insufficiency results in failure to thrive, growth retardation, and chronic steatorrhea. Bone involvement is characterized by delayed bone age and maturation with metaphyseal dysplasia resulting in short stature, pectus carinatum, and generalized osteopenia. Other features include cutaneous (e.g. eczema or ichthyosis) and dental anomalies, and psychomotor retardation. Mild or severe intellectual disability (50% of patients) causes learning difficulties. Hematologic manifestations may be complicated by bone marrow aplasia, acute myeloid leukemia or a myelodysplastic syndrome (see these terms). In the neonatal period there are generally no symptoms observed but some cases were reported with pancytopenia, respiratory distress, and severe spondylometaphyseal dysplasia (see this term).", "etiology": "SDS is caused in 95% of cases by mutations in the SBDS gene (7q11.22) encoding a ribosomal protein involved in ribosomal biogenesis and other cellular processes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical, laboratory, and radiologic findings. Blood analysis shows neutropenia (absolute neutrophil count <1500/mL) that can be associated with mild to moderate thrombocytopenia, moderate anemia, and a rise in fetal hemoglobin. Exocrine pancreatic insufficiency can be detected by serum analysis showing low levels of pancreatic isoamylase and/or trypsinogen, stool analysis showing low fecal elastase, and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) revealing a characteristic pancreatic aspect with fat degeneration (MRI could be normal until the age of 5). Imagery also allows detection, usually after the age of 5, of metaphyseal anomalies and abnormal growth plate development. Bone marrow smears usually reveal varying degrees of hypocellularity with dysgranulopoieisis or dyserythropoieisis. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include cystic fibrosis, Pearson syndrome, Fanconi anemia, Johanson-Blizzard syndrome, Blackfan-Diamond anemia, celiac disease, and autosomal recessive severe congenital neutropenia due to G6PC3 deficiency (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is feasible in families in which the disease-causing mutation has already been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Recurrence risk is of 25%.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is multidisciplinary, associating usually a hematologist, a gastroenterologist and other specialists such as a nutritionist, endocrinologist, or orthopedist. Pancreatic insufficiency requires pancreatic enzyme supplementation, adapted to the diet. Antibiotic therapy prophylaxis may be sufficient to avoid infections; otherwise, granulocyte colony-stimulating factor can be proposed. Severe hematological complications require hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. Surgery may be proposed for skeletal anomalies. Patients with learning difficulties require specific educational support.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable. Life-threatening complications include bone marrow aplasia and leukemic transformation, and occasionally viral infections. About 1/3 of patients present such complications, and some can be treated successfully by bone marrow transplant."}, {"name": "SD/THE", "sub_name": "Diarrhoe, syndromale", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt <1/1.000.000. Von 1982 bis 2012 wurden 44 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, 13 davon in Frankreich. Die Patienten wurden in der indischen, europ\u00e4ischen und mediterranen Bev\u00f6lkerung beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare gastroenterologic disease manifesting as intractable diarrhea in the first month of life with failure to thrive and associated with facial dysmorphism, hair abnormalities, and, in some cases, immune disorders and intrauterine growth restriction.", "synonyms": "Phenotypic diarrhea, SD/THE, Syndromic diarrhea/Tricho-hepato-enteric syndrome, Tricho-hepato-enteric syndrome, Trichohepatoenteric syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Antenatal", "omim": "222470\u00a0 614602", "umls": "C1857276", "gard": "5258", "epidemiology": "Syndromic diarrhea (SD/THE) prevalence is <1/1,000,000. More than 100 cases have been reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Severe, persistent and intractable diarrhea most often starts within the first month after birth (at latest 6 months) and is accompanied by severe malabsorption resulting in early and relentless protein-energy malnutrition and failure to thrive. SD children in most reported cases (>70%) were below the 10th percentile of birth weight and nearly half were born preterm suffering from intrauterine growth restriction. Patients present with facial dysmorphism including prominent forehead and cheeks, broad nasal root and hypertelorism. Hair is woolly, easily removable and in some cases sparse and poorly pigmented; further analysis reveals trichorrhexis nodosa, pili torti, trichothiodystrophy and aniso- and poikilotrichosis. Liver disease, with extensive fibrosis or cirrhosis and siderosis, affects about half of the patients, and hepatomegaly may be observed. Patients are prone to frequent infections and may fail to produce antibodies upon vaccination or present low immunoglobulin levels. Skin abnormalities including caf\u00e9 au lait spots, xerosis and rubbery skin are seen in half of the reported cases and are more prevalent with time. Cardiac abnormalities have been reported in a few cases and mild intellectual deficiency in half of patients.", "etiology": "Autosomal recessive mutations in SKIV2L (40% of cases) and TTC37 (60% of cases) lead to SD/THE. These genes encode proteins that form the Ski complex, a group of proteins responsible for the 3'-5' degradation of aberrant mRNA. Many different mutations have been identified and are spread along the genes. How Ski complex defects lead to the observed phenotype has yet to be elucidated and no genotype/phenotype correlation has been established to date.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suggested by clinical features. Small intestine biopsy shows non-specific villous atrophy with variable mononuclear cell infiltration of the lamina propria, but no specific histological abnormalities involving the epithelium. Genetic testing confirms these observations.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include all causes of chronic diarrhea, copper and iron deficiencies due to malnutrition, intestinal epithelial dysplasia, and microvillus inclusion disease.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis should be offered to the parents of an affected child once the molecular defect has been characterized.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Intractable diarrhea requires parenteral nutrition during a variable period of time ranging from a few months to over a decade. In some cases, the association of enteral with parenteral nutrition can be indicated. Immunoglobulin supplementation may be necessary and antibody production after vaccination should be monitored. Finally, some children can present with a severe liver disease, independent of parenteral nutrition, but which could be worsened by it. In cases of severe liver disease, the only therapeutic option is a liver graft.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is poor with a mortality rate of up to 50%. The main complications are severe liver disease and infections. Some patients are rapidly weaned off parenteral nutrition but others remain under parenteral dependence for more than 10 years. Most of the children achieve a small final stature and half manifest mild intellectual deficit."}, {"name": "Seborrh\u00f6-\u00e4hnliche Dermatitis mit psoriasiformen Ausschl\u00e4gen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Seborrhea-like dermatitis with psoriasiform elements is a rare, genetic, epidermal disorder characterized by a chronic, diffuse, fine, scaly erythematous rash on the face (predominantly the chin, nasolabial folds, eyebrows), around the earlobes and over the scalp, associated with hyperkeratosis over elbows, knees, palms, soles and metacarpophalangeal joints, in the absence of associated rheumatological or neurological disorders. Cold weather, emotional stress and strenuous physical activity may exacerbate symptoms.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "omim": "610227", "umls": "C1853258"}, {"name": "Sebozystomatose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Steatocystoma multiplex, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "L72.2", "OMIM": "184500", "UMLS": "C0259771\u00a0 C3671377", "GARD": "4780\u00a0 5003", "summary": "Die Sebokystomatose ist gekennzeichnet durch multiple (100 bis 2.000) asymptomatische Hautzysten, die meist im Bereich des Sternums, im oberen Anteil des R\u00fcckens, in den Axillen und an den proximalen Bereichen der Gliedma\u00dfen auftreten. Mindestens 30 F\u00e4lle aus nicht miteinander verwandten Familien \u00fcber 3 bis 5 Generationen und eine Reihe sporadischer F\u00e4lle wurden beschrieben. In der Regel treten die Symptome der Sebokystomatose im ersten oder zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt auf. Beide Geschlechter sind betroffen, in einigen Studien die M\u00e4nner etwas h\u00e4ufiger. Ursache sind Mutationen im Keratin-17-Gen (KRT17, 17q12-q21). Vorgeschlagen wurde autosomal-dominante Vererbung. "}, {"name": "SEC23B-CDG", "sub_name": "An\u00e4mie, dyserythropoetische, kongenitale, Typ II", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Kongenitale dyserythropoietische An\u00e4mie Typ II (CDA II) ist die h\u00e4ufigste Form der CDA (siehe dort). Charakteristische Symptome sind An\u00e4mie, Ikterus und Splenomegalie. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Eisen\u00fcberlastung der Leber und Gallensteine.", "synonyms": "CDA II, CDA Typ 2, CDA Typ II, Heredit\u00e4re erythroblastische Multinuklearit\u00e4t mit positivem S\u00e4ure-Serumtest (HEMPAS), Kongenitale dyserythropoetische An\u00e4mie Typ 2, SEC23B-CDG, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D64.4", "OMIM": "224100", "UMLS": "C1306589", "GARD": "2001", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Innerhalb von 42 Jahren (1967-2009) wurden in Europa 367 CDA II-F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit manifestiert sich in der Regel bei Neugeborenen mit Ikterus und normozyt\u00e4rer An\u00e4mie (leicht bis schwer). Bei nur leichten Symptomen wird die Diagnose eventuell erst im Erwachsenenalter gestellt. Splenomegalie und Hepatomegalie sind ebenfalls h\u00e4ufige Symptome. Seltener werden im hinteren Mediastinum oder paravertebral Verdichtungen gefunden, bei denen es sich um extramedull\u00e4res blutbildendes Gewebe handelt. In seltenen F\u00e4llen von CDA II wurde Hydrops fetalis (siehe dort) beschrieben. Eine langfristige Komplikation ist die sekund\u00e4re H\u00e4mochromatose, die zu Organsch\u00e4den f\u00fchrt.", "etiology": "Ursache der meisten F\u00e4lle von CDA II sind Mutationen im SEC23B-Gen (20p11.23), das f\u00fcr ein am Transport zwischen Endoplasmatischem Reticulum und Golgiapparat beteiligtes H\u00fcllprotein kodiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose der CDA II f\u00fchren angeborene An\u00e4mie, Zweikernigkeit von 10-50 % der Erythroblasten im Knochenmark und erh\u00f6hte Ferritin-Spiegel. Weitere diagnostische Befunde sind ein positiver Ham-Test (Serum-Azidifizierun), ein schnell wanderndes Band 3 in der SDS-PAGE-Elektrophorese der Erythrozytenmembran und der elektronen-mikroskopische Befund von Erythrozyten-Vorstufen mit Doppelmembranen. Die molekulargenetische Analyse identifiziert SECC23B-Mutationen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Diagnose einer CDA muss erwogen werden nach dem Ausschluss anderer Ursachen h\u00e4molytischer An\u00e4mien (besonders heredit\u00e4re Sph\u00e4rozytose), erworbener Dyserythropoese (myelodysplastische Syndrome, akute erythroide Leuk\u00e4mie) und mikrozyt\u00e4rer An\u00e4mien (Thalassaemien, Eisenmangelan\u00e4mie) (siehe diese Termini). Auch das Gilbert-Syndrom und Infektionen m\u00fcssen ausgeschlossen werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die pr\u00e4natale Diagnose in Risikoschwangerschaften erfordert die vorherige Identifizierung der in der Familie urs\u00e4chlichen Mutationen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die CDA II wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung soll empfohlen werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Schwere der Krankheit und Alter der Patienten bestimmen die gew\u00e4hlte Behandlung. Neugeborene ben\u00f6tigen eventuell eine Erythrozyten-Transfusion und bleiben in schweren F\u00e4llen \u00fcber lange Jahre transfusionsabh\u00e4ngig. In der Adoleszenz und im Erwachsenenalter nimmt der Bedarf in der Regel ab, au\u00dfer in bestimmten Situationen (Schwangerschaft, aplastische Krise, gro\u00dfe Operationen, Infektionen). Die Hydrops fetalis-assoziierte An\u00e4mie kann mit intrauterinen Transfusionen behandelt werden. H\u00e4ufig werden zus\u00e4tzliche Gaben von Vitamin B12 und Fols\u00e4ure verordnet, obwohl Evidenz f\u00fcr deren Wirksamkeit fehlt. Die Anwendung von Erythropoetin-Pr\u00e4paraten scheint wirkungslos zu sein. In einigen schweren F\u00e4llen wurde eine allogene Knochenmarkstransplantation erfolgreich durchgef\u00fchrt. Bei Gallensteinen wird oft die Cholezystektomie empfohlen. Da Transfusionen das Problem der Eisen\u00fcberladung versch\u00e4rfen k\u00f6nnen, soll j\u00e4hrlich der Ferritin-Spiegel kontrolliert werden. Die Eisen\u00fcberladung des K\u00f6rpers kann auch durch Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung \u00fcberwacht werden. Der Ferritin-Spiegel kann durch Aderlass vermindert werden, was aber von einigen Patienten nicht gut toleriert wird. Ein Aderlass muss durch die orale Gabe chelierender Substanzen erg\u00e4nzt werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose der CDA II ist in der Regel g\u00fcnstig. Die Morbidit\u00e4t durch Komplikationen der Eisen\u00fcberladung ist aber erheblich und kann ohne Behandlung letal verlaufen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Innerhalb von 42 Jahren (1967-2009) wurden in Europa 367 CDA II-F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Seckel-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Seckel-Syndrom ist eine Form des mikrozephalen primordialen Kleinwuchses, der durch einen proportionalen pr\u00e4natalen Kleinwuchs, eine schwere Mikrozephalie, ein typisch dysmorphes Gesicht (vogelartig) und eine leichte bis schwere Intelligenzminderung gekennzeichnet ist.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "210600\u00a0 600546\u00a0 606744\u00a0 613676\u00a0 613823\u00a0 615807\u00a0 616051\u00a0 616171\u00a0 616777", "UMLS": "C0265202", "MeSH": "C537533", "GARD": "8562"}, {"name": "SECORD", "sub_name": "Schwere Netzhautdystrophie mit Beginn in fr\u00fcher Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schwere Netzhautdystrophie mit Beginn in fr\u00fcher Kindheit (SECORD) ist eine vererbte Netzhautdystrophie, die durch eine schwere angeborene Nachtblindheit, eine progressive Netzhautdystrophie und Nystagmus gekennzeichnet ist. Die bestkorrigierte Sehsch\u00e4rfe kann im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt 0,3 erreichen und bis weit in das zweite Lebensjahrzehnt hinein bestehen. Die Erblindung ist oft bis zum Alter von 30 Jahren vollst\u00e4ndig.", "synonyms": "EOSRD, Fr\u00fchbeginnende schwere Netzhautdystrophie, SECORD, Schwere fr\u00fchkindliche Netzhautdegeneration, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "UMLS": "C1858080", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist schwer einzusch\u00e4tzen, da viele SECORD-Patienten zuvor als Patienten mit Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA) diagnostiziert wurden.", "clinical_description": "SECORD tritt im Kindesalter auf und umfasst Patienten mit schwerer angeborener Nachtblindheit, Nystagmus, einer deutlich reduzierten Sehsch\u00e4rfe (kleiner oder gleich 0,3) zusammen mit einer progressiven panretinalen Dystrophie unterschiedlichen Ausma\u00dfes und Befall der Makula. Die ersten Symptome k\u00f6nnen im ersten Lebensjahr erkannt werden. Das Farbsehen von ges\u00e4ttigten und unges\u00e4ttigten Farben in Tests ist beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Es kommt zu einer \u00dcberlappung mit der Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA), bei der die Patienten durch ihre Sehsch\u00e4rfe und die panretinale Dystrophie charakterisiert sind. Im Vergleich zur LCA ist die Sehfunktion bei SECORD jedoch deutlich besser, trotz des fortschreitenden Verlusts der Sehfunktion zu Beginn der Erkrankung, der je nach zugrundeliegendem Gen und Mutation zur Erblindung im zweiten bis dritten Lebensjahrzehnt f\u00fchren kann.", "etiology": "SECORD ist genetisch heterogen und wird von vielen Genen verursacht, einschlie\u00dflich derjenigen, die LCA verursachen (ABCA4 (1p22), ADAMTS18 (16q23), AIPL1 (17p13. 1), BEST1 (11q12), CRB1 (1q31.3), CRX (19q13.3), GUCY2D (17p13.1), IMPDH1 (7q31.3-q32), IMPG1 (6q14. 2-q15), IMPG2 (3q12.2-q12.3), IQCB1 (3q21.1), KCNJ13 (2q37), LCA5 (6q14), LRAT (4q32.1), MERTK (2q14.1), NMNAT1 (1p36. 22), RDH12 (14q24.1), RPE65 (1p31), RPGR (Xp11.4), RPGRIP1 (14q11.2), SPATA7 (14q31.3), TULP1 (6p21.3)). SECORD wurde jedoch haupts\u00e4chlich mit Mutationen in RPE65 (2-10% der SECORD-Patienten) und LRAT in Verbindung gebracht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose von SECORD umfasst St\u00e4bchen- und Zapfenantworten unterhalb oder nahe der Schwelle in der Elektroretinographie. Psychophysikalische Tests sagen Zapfen-St\u00e4bchen- und St\u00e4bchen-Zapfen-Dystrophien voraus. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen bei der Geburt einen normal erscheinenden Fundus aufweisen, entwickeln aber sp\u00e4ter im S\u00e4uglingsalter und in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit eine panretinale Dystrophie, die auch die Makula betrifft. Entsprechende Ver\u00e4nderungen der Netzhautschichten sind mit der optischen Koh\u00e4renztomographie im Spektralbereich zu sehen. Bei einer Untergruppe von Patienten mit RPE65- oder LRAT-Mutationen wird von fr\u00fcher Kindheit an ein Mangel an Fundusautofluoreszenz beobachtet. Die Goldmann-Perimetrie zeigt je nach Verlaufsform schwere Gesichtsfeldeinschr\u00e4nkungen und zentrale Skotomata. Knochenspicula werden in der Regel nicht nachgewiesen, jedoch entwickeln sich mit dem Fortschreiten der Erkrankung Pigmentansammlungen. Die molekulare Diagnose kann mit Hilfe eines NGS (Next Generation Sequencing)-Panels durchgef\u00fchrt werden, das die gesamte Sequenz der bekannten assoziierten Gene abdeckt (90% der F\u00e4lle). Identifizierte Mutationen und Segregationsanalysen bei den Eltern werden durch Sanger-Sequenzierung best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren LCA, Alstr\u00f6m-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessive Bestrophinopathie, Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom, Achromatopsie, Stargardt-Syndrom, Usher-Syndrom, Senior-Loken-Syndrom, Saldino-Mainzer-Syndrom, Joubert-Syndrom, Abetalipoprotein\u00e4mie, infantile Refsum-Krankheit, neonatale Adrenoleukodystrophie, Zellweger-Syndrom und juvenile neuronale Ceroidlipofuszinose.", "genetic_counseling": "SECORD wird in der Regel autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, aber auch autosomal-dominante (CRX, GUCY2D, IMPDH1, IMPG1, IMPG2) und X-chromosomale Erbg\u00e4nge wurden beobachtet.", "management_and_treatment": "SECORD ist derzeit unheilbar. Einige Therapien werden derzeit untersucht, einschlie\u00dflich Gentherapien f\u00fcr RPE65, ABCA4 und MERTK. Eine Retinoid-Supplementierungstherapie (9-cis-Retinoid) wird bei Patienten mit Mutationen in RPE65 und LRAT eingesetzt. Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und umfasst die Korrektur des Refraktionsfehlers und die Verwendung von Low-Vision-Hilfen.", "prognosis": "Die Sehleistung bei hellem Licht erlaubt den Besuch von Regelschulen in den Grundschuljahren. Aufgrund der genetischen Heterogenit\u00e4t besteht ein breites Spektrum an Verl\u00e4ufen, die nicht mit spezifischen Mutationen korrelieren. Eine nutzbare Sehfunktion bleibt h\u00e4ufig \u00fcber die zweite Lebensdekade hinaus erhalten und eine Reihe von Patienten beh\u00e4lt auch in der dritten Lebensdekade noch Restinseln des peripheren Sehens, wenn auch erheblich eingeschr\u00e4nkt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist schwer einzusch\u00e4tzen, da viele SECORD-Patienten zuvor als Patienten mit Leber congenital amaurosis (LCA) diagnostiziert wurden."}, {"name": "SED-BDS", "sub_name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie-Brachydaktylie-Sprachst\u00f6rung-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie Typ Cantu ist ein extrem seltener Typ der Spondyloepiphys\u00e4ren Dysplasie (s. dort) und wurde bisher bei etwa 5 Patienten beschrieben. Charakteristische klinische Zeichen sind Kleinwuchs, auff\u00e4lliges Gesicht (Blepharophimose, schr\u00e4g aufw\u00e4rts gerichtete Lidspalten, \u00fcppige Augenbrauen und Wimpern), raue Stimme und kurze H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe (verk\u00fcrzte Metacarpalia, Metatarsalia und Phalangen).", "synonyms": "SED-BDS, Tattoo-Dysplasie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "611717", "UMLS": "C2673649", "GARD": "10629"}, {"name": "Sedlackova-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Deletion 22q11", "german_description": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz bei lebend Geborenen wird auf 1/2.000-1/4.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare chromosomal anomaly which causes a congenital malformation disorder that is typically characterized by cardiac defects, palatal anomalies, facial dysmorphism, developmental delay and immune deficiency.", "synonyms": "22q11DS, CATCH 22, Cayler cardiofacial syndrome, Conotruncal anomaly face syndrome, DiGeorge sequence, DiGeorge syndrome, Microdeletion 22q11.2, Monosomy 22q11, Sedlackova syndrome, Shprintzen syndrome, Takao syndrome, Velocardiofacial syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D82.1", "omim": "188400\u00a0 192430", "umls": "C0012236\u00a0 C0220704\u00a0 C0431406\u00a0 C0795907\u00a0 C2936346\u00a0 C3266101", "mesh": "D058165", "gard": "10299", "meddra": "10012979\u00a0 10066430", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence at birth is estimated at 1/4,500-1/10,000.", "clinical_description": "22q11.2 deletion syndrome shows a variable clinical phenotype that can range from mild to severe. Congenital heart defects (two-thirds of cases) include mainly conotruncal malformations such as ventricular septal defect, truncus arteriosus, tetralogy of Fallot and interrupted aortic arch. Anomalies of the aortic arch and vascular ring are frequent. More than 65% of patients present with palatal anomalies (e.g. velopharyngeal incompetence, submucous cleft palate or bifid uvula) that may lead to hypernasal speech and feeding difficulties. Overt cleft palate and cleft lip are less frequent. Most patients display subtle but recognizable facial features (e.g. ptosis, hypertelorism, epicanthal folds, prominent nasal root, malar flatness, small ears). Immune deficiency is the consequence of thymic aplasia/hypoplasia and improvement in T-cell production occurs over time. Patients have a higher risk of developing an autoimmune disease such as idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura and juvenile idiopathic arthritis. Hypocalcemia as a consequence of hypoparathyroidism is frequent in the neonatal period and usually resolves but can reappear at any age. Additional clinical findings may include gastrointestinal anomalies (intestinal malrotation, imperforate anus), hearing loss, renal anomalies (renal agenesis), dental anomalies (enamel hypoplasia), and skeletal anomalies (scoliosis, clubfoot). Learning difficulties and developmental delay are almost always present. Psychiatric illness (anxiety, depression, schizophrenia) and Parkinson's disease are more frequent than in the general population.", "etiology": "In most cases, the syndrome is due to a 3 million base pair (Mb) deletion on the chromosomal region 22q11.2 that is flanked by low copy number repeats. The deletion is due to a non-allelic meiotic recombination during spermatogenesis or oogenesis. In ~15% of cases, the deletion is nested within the 3 Mb DiGeorge critical region and varies in size. Most deletions include the TBX1 gene that has been shown to be implicated in cardiac, parathyroid, thymus and facial structure development. The variable expression of the 22q11.2 phenotype is thought to be due to genetic modifiers on either the other 22q11.2 allele or on other chromosomes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected upon clinical examination and confirmed by detection of the 22q11.2 deletion, using fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH), multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification (MLPA), array comparative genomic hybridization (aCGH) or genome-wide SNP (single nucleotide polymorphism) microarrays.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Smith-Lemli-Opitz syndrome, CHARGE syndrome, Alagille syndrome, VATER syndrome, Goldenhar syndrome and isotretinoin embryopathy.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible in familial cases by chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis, and in pregnancies where associated anomalies have been noted by fetal echocardiography. Preimplantation genetic diagnosis is possible.", "genetic_counseling": "The deletion arises de novo in ~90% of the cases. The recurrence risk in the sibship of a de novo case is 2-3% due to of low-grade germline parental mosaicism. Affected individuals have a 50% risk of having an affected child.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptom-based and requires a multidisciplinary approach. It may consist of heart and/or palate surgery, nasogastric feeding, calcium supplementation, occupational, physical, and speech therapy, educational and behavioral therapy, as well as support and treatment for psychiatric disease. Tonsillectomy is not recommended unless indicated by a center of expertise. A regular surveillance of calcium, thyroid function and blood cell count is necessary. Immune function must be evaluated before administering live vaccines.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is variable and depends on the severity of the disease. The infant mortality rate is relatively low (~4%); in adults mortality is higher than that of the rest of the adult population. Most congenital malformations and medical problems can be managed. Prognosis in adults depends on the degree of autonomy."}, {"name": "SED mit metatarsaler Verk\u00fcrzung", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepiphys\u00e4re, mit metatarsaler Verk\u00fcrzung", "german_description": "Der metatarsale Typ der Tschechischen Dysplasie ist eine Form von Skelettdysplasie mit schwerer, im Kindesalter einsetzender Arthropathie und Hypoplasie/Dysplasie der dritten, vierten und/oder f\u00fcnften Zehe. Bisher wurden weniger als 20 Patienten beschrieben, darunter auch mehrfache F\u00e4lle in 5 Familien aus der Republik Tschechien. K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe und Intelligenz sind normal. R\u00f6ntgenologisch werden Platyspondylie, irregul\u00e4re Wirbelendplatten, deformierte Femurk\u00f6pfe, dysplastisches Becken und verschm\u00e4lerte Intervertebralspalte nachgewiesen. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. Bei mehreren Patienten wurden Mutationen im COL2A1-Gen (12q13) gefunden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by early-onset, progressive pseudorheumatoid arthritis, platyspondyly, and hypoplasia/dysplasia of the third and fourth metatarsals, in the absence of ophthalmologic, cleft palate, and height anomalies.", "synonyms": "Czech dysplasia, metatarsal type, SED with metatarsal shortening, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "609162", "umls": "C1836683", "mesh": "C535766", "gard": "10220", "epidemiology": "To date, fewer than 15 families have been reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "The first clinical signs appearing in childhood are broad knees and flat nasal bridge, followed in late childhood and adolescence by short 3rd and 4th metatarsals (not always present), joint pain in knees and hips and later osteoarthritis of the spine, shoulder, hips, and knees. Shortening of the metacarpals may also be present. Vertebral abnormalities include mild platyspondyly, irregular end plates, and reduced intervertebral distances. Stature is within average range. Brachydactyly is restricted to metatarsals III, IV and, more variably, V. Progressive hearing loss may be associated and typically starts in early adulthood, although subclinical hearing impairment for high frequencies may be detected in children.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to the R275C mutation in the geneCOL2A1 (12q13.11).", "diagnostic_methods": "Disorder is suspected based on family history and clinical presentation, but this may be difficult to detect in early childhood. Skeletal radiographs showing platyspondyly and shortened metatarsals and metacarpals may be helpful in the diagnosis work up. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing for the R275C mutation in COL2A1.", "differential_diagnosis": "Disorders with early-onset osteoarthritis and polyarticular arthritis form the main differential diagnoses and include juvenile idiopathic osteoarthritis and mild spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia due to COL2A1 mutation with early-onset osteoarthritis. Whilst COL2A1 mutations are involved in a spectrum of skeletal dysplasias, this specific disorder is typically distinguished by the absence of cleft palate, ophthalmologic pathology and short stature.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic prenatal diagnosis is possible when the mutation has been previously identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal dominant. The risk of transmission to offspring is 50% and there is full disease penetrance.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is symptomatic and frequently includes hip replacement (often by the age of 40), hearing aids for hearing loss, and anti-rheumatic medication for osteoarthritis. Appropriate surveillance of hearing loss and progression of osteoarthritis is required.", "prognosis": "The disorder is associated with early-onset, progressive arthritis that is typically associated with significant joint pain and restricted mobility that can adversely impact quality of life. Early joint replacements are often recommended. Longevity does not appear to be different to that of the general population."}, {"name": "Sedoheptulose Kinase-Mangel, isolierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, hereditary disorder of pentose phosphate metabolism characterized by increased urine levels of sedoheptulose and erythritol, and low-to-normal excretion of sedoheptulose-7P. Clinical presentation of this disorder is currently unclear.", "synonyms": "Isolated SHPK deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "617213"}, {"name": "SED und SEMD", "sub_name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re und spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SED und SEMD, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "UMLS": "C0038015", "MedDRA": "10062920", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "SED, vom Typ Stanescu", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepiphys\u00e4re, Typ Stanescu", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia characterized by progressive joint contractures with premature degenerative joint disease, particularly in the knee, hip, and finger joints. Patients are of normal height and present with gait problems, joint pain, and enlarged joints with joint restriction and contractures. Radiological features include generalized platyspondyly, hypoplastic ilia, epiphyseal flattening with metaphyseal splaying of the tubular bones, and broad, elongated femoral necks with marked coxa valga. Histopathologic examination of cartilage shows PAS-positive cytoplasmic inclusion bodies in chondrocytes.", "synonyms": "SED, Stanescu type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "616583"}, {"name": "Seemanova-Lesny-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Mikrozephalie-Mikrokornea-Syndrom, Typ Seemanova", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Mikrozephalie, Brachydaktylie, Augenanomalien (Mikrophthalmie, Mikrocornea, angeborene Katarakt), Hypogenitalismus, schwere geistige Behinderung, retardiertes Wachstum und progrediente spastische Parese. Es wurde bei 2 Patienten (ein Mann und der Sohn seiner Schwester) beschrieben. Beide Patienten hatten auch faziale Dysmorphien (u.a. mongoloide Lidachsen, Epikanthus), einen hohen Gaumen, Mikrostomie und Retrogenie. Wahrscheinlich wird das Syndrom X-chromosomal vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Microcephaly-microcornea syndrome, Seemanova type is characterised by microcephaly and brachycephaly, eye anomalies (microphthalmia, microcornea, congenital cataract), hypogenitalism, severe intellectual deficit, growth retardation and progressive spasticity. It has been described in two patients (a male and his sister's son). Both patients also presented with facial dysmorphism, including upslanting palpebral fissures, epicanthal folds, highly arched palate, microstomia, and retrognathia. This syndrome is transmitted as an X-linked trait.", "synonyms": "Seemanova-Lesny syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "umls": "C0796151\u00a0 C2931524", "mesh": "C537536\u00a0 C537539", "gard": "3627"}, {"name": "Seemanova-Syndrom, Typ 2", "sub_name": "Nijmegen-Chromosomenbruch-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die H\u00e4ufigkeit des NBS ist nicht bekannt. In der Literatur wurden bisher etwa 150 Patienten beschrieben, weitaus mehr Patienten sind in Patienregistern dokumentiert. Die Krankheit kommt wahrscheinlich weltweit vor, wegen einer Gr\u00fcndermutation ist sie in mittel- und osteurop\u00e4ischen slawischen Populationen besonders h\u00e4ufig.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic chromosomal instability syndrome presenting at birth with microcephaly, dysmorphic facial features which become more noticeable with age, growth delay, recurring sinopulmonary infections and extremely high frequency of malignancies.", "synonyms": "AT V1, Ataxia-telangiectasia, variant 1, Berlin breakage syndrome, Immunodeficiency-microcephaly-chromosomal instability syndrome, Microcephaly-immunodeficiency-lymphoid malignancy syndrome, NBS, Seemanova syndrome type 2, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "251260", "umls": "C0398791\u00a0 C2930831", "mesh": "C531759\u00a0 D049932", "gard": "3904", "meddra": "10067857", "epidemiology": "Whilst global prevalence is unknown, the disease seems to occur worldwide, but has a much higher prevalence among Central and Eastern European Slavic populations due to a founder mutation. Average prevalence of NBS in patients with Eastern Slavic origin (Belarus, Ukraine, Russia, and Latvia) was recently estimated as 1/1,000,000 and, based on carrier frequency, the prevalence in the Western Slavic region (Poland, Slovakia and Czech Republic) is estimated at 1/330,000.", "clinical_description": "Clinical manifestations are not pathognomonic and may vary in severity. The main signs are microcephaly, present at birth and progressing with age, dysmorphic facial features (prominent midface emphasized by a sloping forehead and receding mandible), mild growth retardation and, in females, premature ovarian insufficiency are common. Various congenital anomalies have been reported, including central nervous system (hydrocephaly, schizencephaly, arachnoid cysts), respiratory tract (cleft lip/palate, choanal atresia), urogenital system (horseshoe kidney, ectopic/dystopic kidneys, hypospadias, cryptorchidism, ovary hypoplasia), mild skeletal anomalies (pre- and postaxial polydactyly, hypoplastic or duplicated thumb, clinodactyly of 5th fingers). Caf\u00e9 au lait and/or vitiligo spots are frequently observed and, in some patients, multiple pigmented nevi occur. Other principal manifestations include immune deficiency with recurrent respiratory tract infections, a strong predisposition to malignancies (predominantly lymphoid, but solid tumors also occur), and radiosensitivity. By age 20, over 40% of patients develop a malignant disease and are prone to develop secondary malignancies. Cognitive development is close to the average (normal/borderline) in infancy and preschool age, but intellectual skills gradually decline with age (from mild to moderate).", "etiology": "Nijmegen breakage syndrome (NBS) is caused by mutations in the NBN gene (8q21-q24), specifically within exons 6-10, which lead to partially functional truncated fragments of nibrin, the gene product involved in repairing DNA double strand breaks. Over 90% of patients are homozygous for the founder mutation of Slavic origin (c.657_661del5).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical manifestations and confirmed by either single gene sequencing (typically for Slavic populations) or multigene next generation sequencing panels. Where genetic testing is unavailable, diagnosis can be supported by evidence of chromosomal instability (spontaneous and induced), increased cellular sensitivity to ionizing radiation in vitro, combined immunodeficiency, and complete absence of full-length nibrin. A family history (malignancies, microcephaly or hydrocephaly, early death of a sibling) can also support diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Fanconi anemia, LIG4 syndrome, Cernunnos-XLF deficiency, NBS-like disorder, ataxia-telangiectasia-like disorder, Bloom syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Affected families may be offered prenatal diagnosis by molecular analysis if both disease-causing gene mutations are known.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. Parents of an affected child are obligate carriers of NBN mutations and thus, for each pregnancy, there is a 25% risk that offspring inherit the disease. Carriers of a Slavic founder mutation should be offered monitoring for cancer, in particular breast in women and prostate in men.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific therapy. Early diagnosis is important to avoid severe recurrent infections, unnecessary radiation exposure for diagnostic purposes and adverse effects of radiotherapy of tumors. Patients require multidisciplinary management and long-term follow-up (malignancy, immunodeficiency, growth, hypergonadotropic hypogonadism in females). Monitoring of the immune system is extremely important throughout life; specific modes and types of immunization are necessary (acellular vaccines are recommended). In case of lymphoid malignancy, hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT) is recommended after the first complete remission. Females should be monitored for puberty progress from the age of 12 (endocrinologist/ gynecologist) and hormonal replacement therapy should be offered at appropriate age.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is poor, with malignancy as the major cause of death. Patients who developed lymphoma or leukemia die from disease progression, relapses and secondary malignancies. A beneficial effect of HSCT on the long-term survival has been confirmed in recent studies."}, {"name": "SEGA", "sub_name": "Riesenzellastrozytom, subependymales", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare low-grade astrocytoma characterized by a benign, slowly growing lesion typically arising in the wall of the lateral ventricles, composed of large ganglioid astrocytes. The tumor corresponds to WHO grade I and typically occurs during the first two decades of life in patients with tuberous sclerosis complex. Most patients present with worsening of epilepsy or symptoms of increased intracranial pressure.", "synonyms": "SEGA, ", "icd_10": "D43.2", "umls": "C0205768", "gard": "10632"}, {"name": "Segawa-Syndrom, autosomal-dominantes", "sub_name": "Dopa-responsive Dystonie, autosomal-dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante Dopa-responsive Dystonie (DYT5a) ist eine seltene neurometabolische Erkrankung. Charakteristisches Symptom ist eine im Kindesalter beginnende Dystonie, die dramatisch und dauerhaft auf niedrigdosiertes Levodopa (L-Dopa) anspricht und im h\u00f6heren Alter mit einem Parkinsonismus einhergehen kann.", "synonyms": "DYT5a, GTPCH1-defiziente DRD, GTPCH1-defiziente dopa-responsive Dystonie, Heredit\u00e4re progressive Dystonie mit tageszeitlicher Fluktuation, Segawa-Syndrom, autosomal-dominantes, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G24.1", "OMIM": "128230", "GARD": "9817", "epidemiology": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz der Dopa-responsiven Dystonie (DRD; siehe dort) in Europa reichen von 1/1.000.000-1/200.000. DYT5a tritt h\u00e4ufiger auf als die autosomal-rezessive DRD (DYT5b; siehe dort).", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit beginnt in der Regel im Kindesalter (mittleres Alter 6 Jahre). M\u00e4dchen erkranken 2-4-mal h\u00e4ufiger als Knaben. Typisches Anfangssymptom der DYT5a ist eine Dystonie der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, am h\u00e4ufigsten mit Flexions-Inversions (Equinovarus)-Haltung der F\u00fc\u00dfe. Hieraus resultieren Gangst\u00f6rungen (mit Stolpern und St\u00fcrzen) mit tageszeitlichen Schwankungen: die Symptome nehmen abends an St\u00e4rke zu und sind nach dem Schlaf gebessert. Durch k\u00f6rperliche Belastung ist eine Verschlechterung der Symptome m\u00f6glich. Seltene Erstsymptome sind Dystonie der Arme, Haltungstremor der H\u00e4nde, verlangsamte Bewegungen (Bradykinesie) und Dystonie des Halses. Bei der Untersuchung fallen bei vielen Patienten verst\u00e4rkte tiefe Sehnenreflexe und/oder eine dystone Streckung der Gro\u00dfzehe (striatale Zehen) auf. Im Verlauf entwickelt sich in der Regel eine generalisierte Dystonie. Einige Patienten, besonders solche mit Krankheitsbeginn in der Adoleszenz oder im Erwachsenenalter, manifestieren zus\u00e4tzlich einen Parkinsonismus (mit Bradykinesie, Rigidit\u00e4t und vor allem Haltungstremor). Die kognitiven oder intellektuellen Funktionen sind nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Der Ph\u00e4notyp der Patienten mit sp\u00e4terem Krankheitsbeginn ist weniger schwer. In seltenen F\u00e4llen wurden Depression, Angst, Schlafst\u00f6rungen und obsessiv-kompulsives Verhalten beschrieben. Ohne Behandlung k\u00f6nnen sich im Erwachsenenalter Kontrakturen entwickeln.", "etiology": "Ursache der DYT5a sind Mutationen im GCH1-Gen (14q22.1-q22.2), das f\u00fcr die GTP-Cyclohydrolase 1 (GTPCH1) kodiert. Dieses Enzym ist an der Biosynthese des Tetrahydrobiopterins (dem essentiellen Kofaktor der Tyrosin-Hydroxylase) beteiligt und ist gleichzeitig der geschwindigkeitsbestimmende Schritt der Biosynthese des Dopamins.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die charakteristischen klinischen Symptome und deren dramatische und anhaltende Besserung nach niedrigdosierter oraler Gabe von L-Dopa. Ein typischer Befund in der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (CSF) der DYT5a-Patienten sind erniedrigte Spiegel des Gesamt-Biopterins und des Neopterins. In den Zellen des peripheren Blutes ist die GTPCH1-Aktivit\u00e4t vermindert. Der molekulargenetische Nachweis einer pathogenen Mutation im GCH1-Gen sichert die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Formen der DRD (z.B. autosomal-rezessive DRD), Torsionsdystonie mit fr\u00fchem Beginn, myoklonische Dystonie, Hyperphenylalanin\u00e4mie, heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, Parkinsonismus mit Beginn im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter (siehe diese Termini) oder Zerebralparese.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, wenn in der Familie die urs\u00e4chliche GCH1-Mutation bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die DYT5a wird autosomal-dominant vererbt, durch geschlechtsabh\u00e4ngig unvollst\u00e4ndige Penetranz erkranken aber nicht alle Mutationstr\u00e4ger. Bei etwa 30-50 % der Patienten mit DRD ist die Familienanamnese unauff\u00e4llig. Unter diesen F\u00e4llen gibt es auch Neumutationen.", "management_and_treatment": "Diese Form der Dystonie spricht dramatisch und dauerhaft auf L-Dopa-Therapie an. Als Anfangsdosis von L-Dopa/Decarboxylase -Inhibitor wird gegenw\u00e4rtig f\u00fcr Kinder 25 mg oder weniger, einmal t\u00e4glich, und f\u00fcr Erwachsene 50 mg ein- oder zweimal t\u00e4glich, empfohlen. Diese Dosierungen k\u00f6nnen, falls erforderlich, in kleinen Schritten erh\u00f6ht werden. Die typische optimale oder maximale Dosierung betr\u00e4gt10-20 mg/kg/Tag. Wenn nach der Gabe von L-Dopa eine Dyskinesie auftritt, muss die Dosis reduziert werden. Die Behandlung ist lebenslang erforderlich. Zur Besserung der Symptome kommt es wenige Wochen bis Monate nach Beginn der Behandlung.", "prognosis": "Die Lebenserwartung ist nicht vermindert. Typisch ist eine vollst\u00e4ndige oder fast vollst\u00e4ndige Befreiung von den Symptomen durch L-Dopa-Therapie.", "summary": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz der Dopa-responsiven Dystonie (DRD; siehe dort) in Europa reichen von 1/1.000.000-1/200.000. DYT5a tritt h\u00e4ufiger auf als die autosomal-rezessive DRD (DYT5b; siehe dort)."}, {"name": "Segawa-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessives", "sub_name": "Dopa-responsive Dystonie, autosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive Dopa-responsive Dystonie (DYT5b) ist eine sehr seltene Erkrankung und charakterisiert durch ein Symptomenspektrum, das vom Bild der Dopa-responsiven Dystonie (DRD; siehe dort) bis zur Symptomatik einer progressiven infantilen Enzephalopathie reicht.", "synonyms": "DYT5b, Segawa-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessives, Tyrosin-Hydroxylase-Mangel, Tyrosin-Hydroxylase-defiziente dopa-responsive Dystonie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G24.1", "OMIM": "605407", "UMLS": "C2673535", "GARD": "1902", "epidemiology": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz der DRD in Europa reichen von 1/1.000.000-1/200.000. D YT5b ist sehr viel seltener als die autosomal-dominante Form der DRD (DYT5a; siehe dort). Weltweit wurden bisher weniger als 50 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit wird im Kleinkindalter manifest (am h\u00e4ufigsten im 1. Lebensjahr), mit einem progressiven hypokinetisch-rigiden Syndrom mit generalisierter Dystonie, unwillk\u00fcrlichen ruckartigen Bewegungen, Haltungstremor oder Gangst\u00f6rungen, die im Verlauf des Tages wechseln und in den meisten F\u00e4llen (> 80 %) gut bis sehr gut auf Levodopa (L-Dopa) ansprechen. Einige Patienten manifestieren rollende Augenbewegungen und/oder haben ein nicht-progredientes intellektuelles Defizit. Weniger h\u00e4ufig besteht (schon vor dem 6. Lebensmonat) der schwerere Ph\u00e4notyp einer komplexen Enzephalopathie mit generalisierter Dystonie, manchmal mit Tage andauernden dystonen Krisen und (oft exzessiven) ruckartigen, myoklonus\u00e4hnlichen Bewegungen und Tremor ohne tageszeitliche Schwankungen. H\u00e4ufig bestehen vegetative St\u00f6rungen, wie exzessiver Speichelfluss und Schwitzen, Lethargie, Obstipation, schlechte Nahrungsaufnahme und 'Fieber unbekannter Ursache'. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind auch: Intellektuelles Defizit, verz\u00f6gerte motorische Entwicklung, beidseitige Ptose und okulogyre Krisen.", "etiology": "Ursache der DYT5b sind Mutationen im Tyrosin-Hydroxylase-Gen (TH; 11p15.5). Die Tyrosin-Hydroxylase katalysiert die Umwandlung von L-Tyrosin zu L-Dopa, der Vorstufe des Dopamins. F\u00fcr die beiden h\u00e4ufigsten Missense-Mutationen (c.698G>A, c.707T>C) und f\u00fcr heterozygote Kettenabbruch-Mutationen wurde keine Genotyp-Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelation gefunden, jedoch sind Mutationen in der Promoterregion durch einen milderen Ph\u00e4notyp gekennzeichnet.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Befunde und die Besserung der Symptome nach oraler Gabe von L-Dopa. Der Naachweis einer homozygoten TH-Mutation best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose. In der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (CSF) von Patienten mit DYT5b werden niedrige Spiegel der Dopamin-Metaboliten Homovanillins\u00e4ure (HVA), 5-Hydroxy-Indolessigs\u00e4ure (5-HIAA) und 3-Methoxy-4-Hydroxy-Phenyl\u00e4thylenglykol (MHPG) gefunden. Die HVA-Konzentrationen und das HVA/5-HIAA-Verh\u00e4ltnis in der CSF scheinen mit dem Erkrankungsalter und dem Schweregrad des Ph\u00e4notyps zu korrelieren.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differenzialdiagnosen sind verschiedene Formen der DRD (z.B. autosomal-dominante DRD), fr\u00fch einsetzende Torsionsdystonie, myoklonische Dystonie (siehe diese Termini) und andere Formen von fr\u00fch beginnendem Parkinsonismus. M\u00f6glich ist auch eine Verwechslung mit Zerebralparese oder spastischer Paraplegie. Differenzialdiagnosen des schwereren, enzephalopathie-\u00e4hnlichen Ph\u00e4notyps sind das Syndrom der zerebralen Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe, hypoxischer und isch\u00e4mischer Hirnschaden des Neugeborenen (siehe diese Termini), andere Enzymdefekte im Tetrahydrobiopterin (BH4)-Stoffwechsel und mitochondriale Krankheiten.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "In Familien mit bekannter TH-Mutation ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "DYT5b wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Den Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Therapie der ersten Wahl ist L-Dopa, in der Regel in Kombination mit Carbidopa. Patienten mit weniger schwerem Ph\u00e4notyp zeigen in typischen F\u00e4llen eine signifikant positive und schnelle Antwort. Patienten mit schwererem Ph\u00e4notyp reagieren reagieren h\u00e4ufig \u00fcberempfindlich auf L-Dopa. Trotz sorgf\u00e4ltiger Anpassung der Dosis und verl\u00e4ngerter Behandlung ist bei diesen Patienten der Nutzen h\u00e4ufig nur moderat oder fehlt ganz, und Nebenwirkungen sind h\u00e4ufiger. Die Dosierung muss in Hinblick auf Nebenwirkungen kontrolliert und, wenn n\u00f6tig, angepasst werden. Inhibitoren des Dopamin-Abbaus wie Selegilin k\u00f6nnen als alternative Therapie allein oder in Kombination mit L-Dopa erwogen werden, finden in der klinischen Praxis aber nur selten Anwendung.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird bestimmt durch den Schweregrad der Krankheit und den Zeitpunkt des Behandlungsbeginns.", "summary": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz der DRD in Europa reichen von 1/1.000.000-1/200.000. D YT5b ist sehr viel seltener als die autosomal-dominante Form der DRD (DYT5a; siehe dort). Weltweit wurden bisher weniger als 50 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Seghers-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Oropharynx imperforatus - costovertebrale Fehlbildungen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Imperforate oropharynx-costovertebral anomalies syndrome is a dysostosis with predominant vertebral and costal involvement characterized by oropharyngeal atresia, mild mandibulofacial dysostosis, auricular malformations, and costovertebral anomalies (hemivertebrae, block vertebra, partial fusion of the ribs, absent ribs). There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1989.", "synonyms": "Seghers syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "gard": "2989"}, {"name": "Segmentale hyalinisierende Vaskulitis", "sub_name": "Livedovaskulopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vascular skin disease characterized by recurrent focal non-inflammatory thrombosis of dermal venulae, predominantly of the lower extremities, resulting in a cutaneous response manifested as pruritus and painful papules and erythematous plaques. The lesions evolve into hemorrhagic vesicles or bullae, which rupture and turn into painful ulcers merging into reticulate, confluent, geometric, and painful ulcerations. During a period of a few months, the ulcerations change to porcelain-white atrophic scars with punctate telangiectasia (so-called atrophie blanche). In active disease, lesions in different stages coexist.", "synonyms": "Livedo reticularis with summer ulcerations, Milian atrophie blanche, Segmental hyalinizing vasculitis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "L95.0"}, {"name": "Segmentaler Auswuchs-Lipomatose-arterioven\u00f6se Fehlbildung-epidermaler Naevus-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisches, polymalformatives Syndrom, das sich in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit entwickelt. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch progressives, proportionales, asymmetrisches segmentales \u00dcberwachstum (mit Weichteilhypertrophie und Umfangszunahme/Ballonierung), welches schnell fortschreitet, sowie arterioven\u00f6se und lymphatische vaskul\u00e4re Fehlbildungen, Lipomatose und lineare epidermale N\u00e4vus (angeordnet in Quirlen entlang der Blaschko-Linien). Klinische Symptome des Cowden-Syndroms, wie Makrozephalie und progressive Entwicklung zahlreicher hypertropher hamartomat\u00f6ser und neoplastischer L\u00e4sionen, die mehrere Organe und Systeme betreffen, sind ebenfalls assoziiert. Die Patienten weisen ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko auf, an Krebs zu erkranken.", "synonyms": "SOLAMEN-Syndrom, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit"}, {"name": "Segmental-progressives Gro\u00dfwuchs-Syndrom mit fibroadip\u00f6ser Hyperplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndrome disease characterized by segmental and progressive overgrowth, predominantly involving the adipose tissue, or a mixture of adipose and fibrous tissue, with variable involvement of subcutaneous and muscular tissue, as well as skeletal overgrowth. Overgrowth severity and range is highly variable, although frequently it is asymmetric and disproportionate, it affects lower extremities more than the upper ones, and progresses in a distal to proximal patten. Congenital overgrowth is typically associated.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal"}, {"name": "Sehnerv-Hypoplasie/Aplasie, isolierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic optic nerve disorder characterized by visual impairment or blindness resulting from varying degrees of underdevelopment of the optic nerve or even complete absence of the optic nerve, ganglion cells, and central retinal vessels. It may be unilateral, typically with otherwise normal brain development, or bilateral with accompanying severe and widespread congenital malformations of the central nervous system.", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q07.8", "omim": "165550", "umls": "C0338502", "gard": "8419"}, {"name": "Sehnerv-Hypoplasie, syndromale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sehnerv\u00f6dem-Splenomegalie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Optic nerve edema-splenomegaly syndrome is a rare presumably genetic disorder characterized by idiopathic massive splenomegaly with pancytopenia and childhood-onset chronic optic nerve edema with slowly progressive vision loss. Additional reported features include anhidrosis, urticaria and headaches.", "synonyms": "Optic nerve edema-splenomegaly syndrome, ROSAH syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "omim": "614979"}, {"name": "Sehr langkettige-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Sehr langkettige Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase (VLCAD)-Mangel ist eine vererbte St\u00f6rung der mitochondrialen Oxidation der sehr langkettigen Fetts\u00e4uren. Das klinische Bild ist unterschiedlich, Symptome sind Kardiomyopathie, hypoketotische Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Leberfunktionsst\u00f6rung, Belastungsintoleranz und Rhabdomyolyse.", "synonyms": "Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel, sehr langkettige, VLCADD, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E71.3", "OMIM": "201475", "UMLS": "C3887523", "GARD": "5508", "epidemiology": "Weltweit wurden bisher \u00fcber 400 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Deutschland betr\u00e4gt 1:50.000.", "clinical_description": "Der VLCAD-Mangel ist eine klinisch heterogene Erkrankung mit 3 haupts\u00e4chlichen Ph\u00e4notypen. (i) Der schwere infantile VLCAD-Mangel beginnt fr\u00fch, meist in den ersten 3-12 Lebensmonaten, aber auch schon in der Neonatalperiode. H\u00e4ufige Ursachen der hohen Mortalit\u00e4t sind Hypoketotische Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Leberfunktionsst\u00f6rung, Herzrhythmusst\u00f6rungen und Kardiomyopathie. Beschrieben wurden auch Perikarderg\u00fcsse. (ii) Der mittelschwere infantile/kindliche VLCAD-Mangel beginnt sp\u00e4ter (von der fr\u00fchen Neugeborenenzeit bis zum fr\u00fchen Kindesalter) und wird mit hypoketotischer Hypoglyk\u00e4mie manifest. Kardiomyopathie ist selten, die Mortalit\u00e4t ist geringer. (iii) Der sp\u00e4te myopathische VLCAD-Mangel wird bei \u00e4lteren Kindern (meist > 10 Jahre) und jungen Erwachsenen mit isolierter Beteiligung der Muskulatur (Belastungsintoleranz, Myalgie, Rhabdomyolyse, Myoglobinurie) manifest. Ausl\u00f6ser sind k\u00f6rperliche Belastung, Fasten, K\u00e4lte/Hitze und/oder Stress. Auch virale Infektionen k\u00f6nnen diese Symptome ausl\u00f6sen oder verst\u00e4rken. Nierenversagen ist eine seltene, zum Tod f\u00fchrende Komplikation. Einige Patienten mit der myopathischen Form hatten im S\u00e4uglings- oder Kindesalter Hypoglyk\u00e4mien.", "etiology": "Ursache des VLCAD-Mangels sind Mutationen im VLCAD-Gen (ACADVL; 17p13.1).", "diagnostic_methods": "Praktisch alle Patienten mit schweren und mittelschweren Ph\u00e4notypen werden durch das abnorme Carnitinprofil im Plasma oder Blut identifiziert: C14:1 und das C14:1/C12:1- Verh\u00e4ltnis sind, zusammen mit den Fraktionen C12, C16, C16:1, C18 und C18:1, erh\u00f6ht. Einzelne Patienten, vor allem solche mit der myopathischen Form, haben bei stabiler Stoffwechsellage ein praktisch normales Profil. W\u00e4hrend Krisen zeigen die organischen S\u00e4uren im Urin ein unspezifisch-abnormes Muster von C6-C14-Dicarboxyl- und Hydroxycarboxyls\u00e4uren. Der VLCAD-Mangel wird best\u00e4tigt durch den Nachweis von 2 pathogenen Mutationen im ACADVL-Gen. F\u00fcr die Kl\u00e4rung diagnostisch schwieriger F\u00e4lle hilfreich sind auch die Messung des Oxidation-Fluxes in kultivierten Fibroblasten oder die direkte Messung der VLCAD-Aktivit\u00e4t in Lymphozyten oder Fibroblasten. Neugeborenenscreening ist verf\u00fcgbar in \u00d6sterreich, Tschechien, D\u00e4nemark, Deutschland, Ungarn, Island, in den Niederlanden, Portugal und Spanien. Hierbei werden 'Late-onset'-Patienten evtl. nicht gefunden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Oxidationsdefekte langkettiger Fetts\u00e4uren. Der myopathische Carnitin-Palmitoyl-Transferase II-Mangel (s. dort) und die myopathische Form des VLCAD-Mangels haben den gleichen klinischen Ph\u00e4notyp.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Wenn in der Familie beide pathogenen Mutationen gefunden wurden, ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Der VLCAD-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei S\u00e4uglingen und Kindern therapeutisch entscheidend ist neben der strikten Vermeidung von Fasten eine an langkettigen Fetts\u00e4uren reduzierte Di\u00e4t in Kombination mit der Gabe mittelkettiger Triglyzeride. Alle Patienten m\u00fcssen f\u00fcr den Notfall, dass sie ihre vorgeschriebene Di\u00e4t nicht vertragen, einen Therapieplan bereit haben Bei Anzeichen einer Dekompensation muss unmittelbar medizinische Behandlung gesucht werden. Patienten mit milderem Ph\u00e4notyp sollen Sport einschr\u00e4nken und K\u00e4lte, Hitze und Fasten vermeiden. Behandlung mit Bezafibrat kann bei myopathischen Patienten mit enzymatischer Restaktivit\u00e4t hilfreich sein, weitere klinische Pr\u00fcfungen stehen aber noch aus.", "prognosis": "Der VLCAD-Mangel kann einen letalen Verlauf nehmen, dank des Neugeborenenscreenings haben jedoch alle Ph\u00e4notypen verbesserte Behandlungsergebnisse. Wenn sie den Behandlungspl\u00e4nen folgen, haben die milderen Ph\u00e4notypen eine sehr viel g\u00fcnstigere Prognose.", "summary": "Weltweit wurden bisher \u00fcber 400 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Deutschland betr\u00e4gt 1:50.000."}, {"name": "SEI", "sub_name": "Ichthyose, epidermolytische superfizielle", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Epidermolytische superfizielle Ichthyose (SEI) ist eine seltene keratinopathische Ichthyose (KI; siehe dort) und gekennzeichnet durch oberfl\u00e4chlicher Blasen und Erosionen bei der Geburt.", "synonyms": "Ichthyosis bullosa Siemens, SEI, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.8", "OMIM": "146800", "UMLS": "C0432306", "MeSH": "D053560", "GARD": "2966", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden weniger als 30 Familien beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Merkmale der SEI sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei der epidermolytischen Ichthyose (EI; siehe dort), jedoch milder. SEI zeigt sich bei der Geburt oder im neonatalen Zeitraum mit milder oberfl\u00e4chlicher Blasenbildung, die h\u00e4ufiger im Bereich der Beugungen, Schienbeine, des Bauchs und der Extremit\u00e4ten auftritt. Nach wenigen Wochen beginnt sich die Haut zu sch\u00e4len und hinterl\u00e4sst dabei entbl\u00f6\u00dfte Bereiche mit normaler Haut (sogenanntes Mauserungs-Ph\u00e4nomen). Eine variable und milde, grau gerippte Hyperkeratose entwickelt sich vor allem an den Extremit\u00e4ten, dem unteren Rumpf und in den Beugebereichen. Die Blasenbildung verringert sich mit zunehmendem Alter, persistiert aber w\u00e4hrend der gesamten Kindheit und manchmal auch bis ins Erwachsenenalter als Reaktion auf Trauma, Hitze oder \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfiges Schwitzen. Eine palmoplantare Beteiligung wird in der Regel nicht beobachtet, palmoplantare Blasenbildung, meist in Verbindung mit Hyperhidrose, kann aber gelegentlich auftreten. Hautgeruch liegt nicht vor.", "etiology": "Die SEI wird durch Mutationen im KRT2-Gen (12q13) verursacht, das f\u00fcr Keratin 2 kodiert. Diese Mutationen beeintr\u00e4chtigen die Bildung der Keratinfilamente und schw\u00e4chen die strukturelle Stabilit\u00e4t des Zytoskeletts der Keratinozyten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Befunde und die histologische Untersuchung der Hautl\u00e4sionen. Histopathologische Befunde sind: Akanthose, verbreitertes Stratum granulosum, epidermolytische Ver\u00e4nderungen der oberen Schichten des Stratum spinosum und Stratum granulosum, Hyperorthokeratose und intrakorneale Blasenbildung. Bei der elektronenmikroskopischen Untersuchung zeigen die Keratinozyten der K\u00f6rnerschicht strukturelle Ver\u00e4nderungen der Tonofilamente. Die molekulare Analyse, sofern verf\u00fcgbar, zeigt KRT2-Mutationen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die epidermolytische Ichthyose, das Peeling-Skin-Syndrom (Schalenhaut-Syndrom), das staphylogene Lyell-Syndrom (siehe jeweils dort) und die atopische Dermatitis.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose ist im Fall der erblichen Ichthyosen (siehe dort) m\u00f6glich, wird aber in der Regel bei SEI aufgrund des milden Verlaufs nicht vorgeschlagen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung soll den betroffenen Familien angeboten werden. Die Wahrscheinlichkeit, dass ein betroffenes Elternteil die Erkrankung an ein Kind vererbt, betr\u00e4gt 50%.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfolgt symptomatisch. Emollientien und milde topische Keratolytika k\u00f6nnen eingesetzt werden, um die Hyperkeratose abzumildern. Geringe Dosen oraler Retinoide k\u00f6nnen eine Hyperkeratose ebenfalls abmildern, m\u00fcssen aber wegen ihrer Nebenwirkungen und der von ihnen bewirkten erh\u00f6hten Hautbr\u00fcchigkeit mit Vorsicht angewandt werden. Eine antibiotische Therapie ist erforderlich, um sekund\u00e4re Infektionen zu behandeln.", "prognosis": "Die SEI ist in der Regel eine milde Erkrankung. Die Lebenserwartung ist normal und die Lebensqualit\u00e4t ist nicht wesentlich beeintr\u00e4chtigt.", "summary": "Bisher wurden weniger als 30 Familien beschrieben."}, {"name": "Seitelberger Krankheit", "sub_name": "Infantile neuroaxonale Dystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Infantile neuroaxonale Dystrophie/atypische neuroaxonale Dystrophie (INAD/atypische NAD) ist eine Form der Neurodegeneration mit Eisenakkumulation im Gehirn (NBIA; siehe diesen Begriff), die durch psychomotorische Regression und zunehmende neurologische Probleme gekennzeichnet ist: Symmetrische Pyramidenbahnzeichen; ausgepr\u00e4gte Hypotonie des Stamms, die bis zu spastischer Tetraplegie fortschreitet; Sehst\u00f6rungen und Demenz. INAD kann klassisch oder atypisch sein und Patienten k\u00f6nnen das gesamte Spektrum der Symptome innerhalb dieses Kontinuums aufweisen.", "synonyms": "INAD, INAD1, PLAN, Phospholipase A2-assoziierte Neurodegeneration, Seitelberger Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G23.0", "OMIM": "256600\u00a0 610217", "UMLS": "C0270724", "GARD": "3957", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt, aber es wurden mehr als 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, von denen die meisten die klassische Form der INAD repr\u00e4sentieren.", "clinical_description": "Die Klassische INAD pr\u00e4sentiert sich in der Regel im Alter von sechs Monaten bis drei Jahren mit psychomotorischer Verz\u00f6gerung und Regression, verz\u00f6gertem Gehen oder Gangst\u00f6rungen. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine fr\u00fche Rumpfhypotonie, die zu einer Tetraparese (meist spastisch, kann aber auch areflexibel sein) und Demenz f\u00fchrt. Visuelle Zeichen wie Schielen, pendelnder Nystagmus, unkoordinierte Augenbewegungen, optische Atrophie und Fehlsichtigkeit sind in der Regel fr\u00fch und ausgepr\u00e4gt. Bei einigen Patienten k\u00f6nnen Krampfanf\u00e4lle auftreten. Atypische NAD beginnt in der Regel in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit, kann aber auch sp\u00e4ter einsetzen (sp\u00e4te Teenagerjahre) und die Progression ist langsamer. Im Rahmen der langsameren Krankheitsentwicklung k\u00f6nnen Patienten mit Sprachverz\u00f6gerung und neuroverhaltensbedingten St\u00f6rungen wie Impulsivit\u00e4t, schlechter Aufmerksamkeitsspanne und emotionaler Labilit\u00e4t auftreten. Die Tetraparese tritt erst sp\u00e4t in der Erkrankung auf und wird nicht unbedingt durch eine Rumpfhypotonie eingeleitet. Die Wahrscheinlichkeit, dass diese Patienten eine progressive Dystonie und Dysarthrie aufweisen, ist h\u00f6her. Optische Atrophie, Nystagmus und Anf\u00e4lle treten wie bei der klassischen INAD auf.", "etiology": "INAD wird durch Mutationen im PLA2G6-Gen (22q13.1) verursacht. Die Mutationen ver\u00e4ndern den Phospholipidstoffwechsel und f\u00fchren oft zu einer abnormen Eisenansammlung in den Basalganglien.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Mehrheit der Patienten mit INAD und atypischer NAD entwickelt bereits in relativ jungem Alter eine Kleinhirnatrophie, die auf der MRT erkennbar ist. Dies deutet bei gleichzeitigem Vorhandensein eines hohen Eisengehalts im Gehirn oder dem Vorliegen einer Optikusatrophie auf die Erkrankung hin. Gentests best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren infantile neuronale Ceroid-Lipofuszinose, Ataxia teleangiectasia und erbliche Ataxie (siehe diese Termini), obwohl die Kleinhirnatrophie bei diesen Erkrankungen in der Regel sp\u00e4ter auftritt, andere Formen von NBIA, einschlie\u00dflich der Pantothenat-Kinase-assoziierten Neurodegeneration (PKAN; siehe dort), der durch ein bei INAD nicht beobachtetes \"Auge des Tigers\" gekennzeichnet ist, infantile GM2-Gangliosidose, Niemann-Pick-Krankheit Typ C, Autismus und Morbus Menkes (siehe diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, wenn die urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist palliativ und umfasst die pharmakologische Behandlung der Spastik und Anf\u00e4lle, orales oder intrathekales Baclofen f\u00fcr Patienten mit signifikanter Dystonie, Physiotherapie und Ma\u00dfnahmen wie Magensonde oder Tracheostomie zur Vermeidung einer Aspirationspneumonie. Eine Eisenchelat-Therapie wird derzeit nicht empfohlen.", "prognosis": "Das Fortschreiten der klassischen INAD ist in der Regel schnell und viele Kinder lernen nie zu laufen. Schwere Spastik, zunehmender kognitiver Verfall und Sehst\u00f6rungen k\u00f6nnen zu einem vegetativen Zustand f\u00fchren. Viele betroffene Patienten \u00fcberleben nicht l\u00e4nger als das erste Jahrzehnt, aber einige von ihnen \u00fcberleben bis in ihre Jugend oder sp\u00e4ter. Die Lebensdauer der atypischen NAD ist nicht bekannt, vermutlich ist sie l\u00e4nger als bei der klassischen INAD.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt, aber es wurden mehr als 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, von denen die meisten die klassische Form der INAD repr\u00e4sentieren."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re akute myeloische Leuk\u00e4mie", "sub_name": "Therapiebedingte akute myeloische Leuk\u00e4mie und myelodysplastische Syndrome", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re AML, Sekund\u00e4re akute myeloische Leuk\u00e4mie, Therapiebedingte AML und MDS, ", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "C92.0", "OMIM": "601626", "UMLS": "C1292776", "GARD": "12762", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re AML", "sub_name": "Therapiebedingte akute myeloische Leuk\u00e4mie und myelodysplastische Syndrome", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re AML, Sekund\u00e4re akute myeloische Leuk\u00e4mie, Therapiebedingte AML und MDS, ", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "C92.0", "OMIM": "601626", "UMLS": "C1292776", "GARD": "12762", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re AVN", "sub_name": "Avaskul\u00e4re Nekrose, sekund\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re AVN, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re Erythromelalgie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "I73.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re Erythrozytose, autosomal-dominante", "sub_name": "Polyzyth\u00e4mie, sekund\u00e4re, autosomal-dominante", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, hematologic disease characterized by increased levels of serum hemoglobin, hematocrit and erythrocyte mass, associated with elevated or inappropriately normal erythropoietin serum levels, occurring in various members of a family and with autosomal dominant inheritance.", "synonyms": "Autosomal dominant secondary erythrocytosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D75.1", "omim": "609820\u00a0 611783"}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re Erythrozytose, autosomal-rezessive, nicht Chuvash-Typ", "sub_name": "Polyzyth\u00e4mie, sekund\u00e4re, autosomal-rezessive, nicht VHL-Gen-assoziierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, hereditary, hematologic disease characterized by an increase in hemoglobin, hematocrit and erythrocyte mass resulting in plethora or ruddy complexion, headache, dizziness, tinnitus and exertional dyspnea. In some cases, thrombophlebitis and arthralgia have also been reported.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive secondary erythrocytosis not associated with VHL gene, Autosomal recessive secondary erythrocytosis, non-Chuvash type, Autosomal recessive secondary polycythemia, non-Chuvash type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D75.1"}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter Bindewebskrankheit", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Lungenkrankheit, sekund\u00e4re, spezifische, der Kindheit , mit assoziierter Bindegewebskrankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter Bindewebskrankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter Granulomatose", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Lungenkrankheit, sekund\u00e4re, spezifische, der Kindheit , mit assoziierter Granulomatose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter Granulomatose, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter Stoffwechselkrankheit", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Lungenkrankheit, sekund\u00e4re, spezifische, der Kindheit , mit assoziierter Stoffwechselkrankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter Stoffwechselkrankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Lungenkrankheit, sekund\u00e4re, spezifische, der Kindheit , mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter systemischer Vaskulitis", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Lungenkrankheit, sekund\u00e4re, spezifische, der Kindheit , mit assoziierter systemischer Vaskulitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD der Kindheit mit assoziierter systemischer Vaskulitis, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Lungenkrankheit, sekund\u00e4re, spezifische, des Erwachsenen , mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Lungenkrankheit, sekund\u00e4re, des Kindes/Erwachsenen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter Stoffwechselkrankheit", "sub_name": "Sekund\u00e4re interstitielle Lungenkrankheit des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter Stoffwechselkrankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter Stoffwechselkrankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit", "sub_name": "Interstitielle Lungenkrankheit, sekund\u00e4re, des Kindes/Erwachsenen, mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Krankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Vaskultits", "sub_name": "Sekund\u00e4re interstitielle Lungenkrankheit des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Vaskultits", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Vaskultits, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD im Kindes- und Erwachsenenalter mit assoziierter Bindegewebskrankheit", "sub_name": "Sekund\u00e4re interstitielle Lungenkrankheit im Kindes- und Erwachsenenalter mit assoziierter Bindegewebsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "CTD-ILD, Sekund\u00e4re ILD im Kindes- und Erwachsenenalter mit assoziierter Bindegewebskrankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re interstitielle Lungenkrankheit des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter Stoffwechselkrankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter Stoffwechselkrankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re interstitielle Lungenkrankheit des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Vaskultits", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4re ILD des Kindes/Erwachsenen mit assoziierter systemischer Vaskultits, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re interstitielle Lungenkrankheit im Kindes- und Erwachsenenalter mit assoziierter Bindegewebsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "CTD-ILD, Sekund\u00e4re ILD im Kindes- und Erwachsenenalter mit assoziierter Bindegewebskrankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re neonatale autoimmune Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Transplazentar erworbene neonatale autoimmune Krankheit, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re nicht-traumatische AVN", "sub_name": "Avaskul\u00e4re Nekrose, nicht-traumatische sekund\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare osteonecrosis disease characterized by death of bone cellular components secondary to an interruption of the subchondral blood supply, typically manifesting with unilateral or bilateral, unifocal or multifocal lesions usually located on the epiphysis, metaphysis and/or diaphysis of the femoral heads, knees, shoulders, ankles and/or wrists, leading to gradual onset of pain and progressive joint degeneration resulting in loss of function. Association with corticosteroid usage, alcoholism, hyperbaric events, radiation or cytotoxic agent exposure, hemoglobinopathies, and/or underlying autoimmune or metabolic disease, amongst others, has been observed.", "synonyms": "Secondary non-traumatic AVN, Secondary non-traumatic osteonecrosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "M87.1\u00a0 M87.3"}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re nicht-traumatische Osteonekrose", "sub_name": "Avaskul\u00e4re Nekrose, nicht-traumatische sekund\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare osteonecrosis disease characterized by death of bone cellular components secondary to an interruption of the subchondral blood supply, typically manifesting with unilateral or bilateral, unifocal or multifocal lesions usually located on the epiphysis, metaphysis and/or diaphysis of the femoral heads, knees, shoulders, ankles and/or wrists, leading to gradual onset of pain and progressive joint degeneration resulting in loss of function. Association with corticosteroid usage, alcoholism, hyperbaric events, radiation or cytotoxic agent exposure, hemoglobinopathies, and/or underlying autoimmune or metabolic disease, amongst others, has been observed.", "synonyms": "Secondary non-traumatic AVN, Secondary non-traumatic osteonecrosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "M87.1\u00a0 M87.3"}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re PAN", "sub_name": "Sekund\u00e4re Polyarteriitis nodosa", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Secondary polyarteritis nodosa (PAN) is a rare serious form of PAN (see this term) characterized by vasculitis in a background of viral infection, primarily with hepatitis B virus (HBV).", "synonyms": "Secondary PAN, Secondary periarteritis nodosa, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "M30.8"}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re PAP", "sub_name": "Pulmonale Alveolarproteinose, sekund\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, acquired, interstitial lung disease, characterized by alveolar surfactant accumulation, cough, progressive dyspnea and respiratory insufficiency. The disease may be secondary to hematological disorder, toxic inhalation, and infection or may occur within the setting of immunosuppression after transplantation.", "synonyms": "Secondary PAP, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "J84.0"}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4re Polyarteriitis nodosa", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Secondary polyarteritis nodosa (PAN) is a rare serious form of PAN (see this term) characterized by vasculitis in a background of viral infection, primarily with hepatitis B virus (HBV).", "synonyms": "Secondary PAN, Secondary periarteritis nodosa, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "M30.8"}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4rer Carnitin-Mangel durch Mittelketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Mittelketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Mittelketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase (MCAD)-Mangel (MCADM) ist ein angeborener Stoffwechseldefekt der mitochondrialen Fetts\u00e4ureoxidation. Kennzeichnend sind schnell progrediente Stoffwechselkrisen mit hypoketotischer Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Lethargie, Erbrechen, Krampfanf\u00e4llen und Koma, die ohne notfallmedizinische Intervention einen letalen Verlauf nehmen k\u00f6nnen.", "synonyms": "ACADM-Mangel, MCAD-Mangel, MCADD, Sekund\u00e4rer Carnitin-Mangel durch Mittelketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E71.3", "OMIM": "201450", "UMLS": "C0220710", "MeSH": "C536038", "GARD": "540", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des MCADM bei der Geburt reicht in europiden Populationen vermutlich von 1/4,900 bis 1/27,000 und ist am h\u00f6chsten in der nordeurop\u00e4ischen Bev\u00f6lkerung. Weltweit betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt 1/14.600.", "clinical_description": "Der MCADM wird in der Regel bei zun\u00e4chst gesunden Kindern im Alter von 3 bis 24 Monaten manifest. Gut dokumentiert sind aber auch F\u00e4lle mit Beginn bei Neugeborenen und Erwachsenen, bei letzteren nach starkem metabolischen Stress, z.B. erheblichem Alkoholgenuss. Viele Tr\u00e4ger des Defektes bleiben lebenslang frei von Symptomen. Ausl\u00f6ser der hypoketotischen Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, der Lethargie und des Erbrechens sind Infekte, Fasten und chirurgische Eingriffe. Einige Patienten k\u00f6nnen trotz Ketose und normalem Blutzuckerspiegel eine progrediente Stoffwechselkrise manifestieren. Selten haben Patienten w\u00e4hrend der Krise eine ''paradox'' schwere Ketose. Symptome w\u00e4hrend einer Krise sind Lethargie, Erbrechen, Krampfanf\u00e4lle und Hepatomegalie. Ohne Notfallbehandlung ist ein schnelles Fortschreiten bis zum Atemstillstand und Herzstillstand m\u00f6glich. W\u00e4hrend dieser Episoden ist eine Hirnsch\u00e4digung mit dem langfristigen Risiko neurologischer Ausf\u00e4lle m\u00f6glich. Manchmal ist ein ungekl\u00e4rter pl\u00f6tzlicher Tod das erste Symptom der Krankheit. In der Vergangenheit starben etwa 25% der noch nicht diagnostizierten Patienten in der ersten metabolischen Krise.", "etiology": "Ursache des MCADM sind Mutationen im ACADM-Gen (1p31), das f\u00fcr das mitochondriale MCAD-Protein kodiert. Vor Beginn des Neugeborenenscreenings trugen etwa 80% der klinisch diagnostizierten Patienten die Mutation c.985A>G / p.(Lys329Glu). Seither ist eine gro\u00dfe Zahl weiterer ACADM-Mutationen gefunden worden", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die charakteristisch abnormen Metabolitenmuster im Blut auf der Filterpapierkarte (Plasma-Acylcarnitine: C6 und C8 vermehrt, C8/C10-Verh\u00e4ltnis erh\u00f6ht) und die organischen S\u00e4uren im Urin (C6-C10-Dicarboxyls\u00e4uren, Hexanoylglyzin und Suberylglyzin). Durch Mutationsanalyse wird die Diagnose gesichert. In vielen europ\u00e4ischen L\u00e4ndern (z.B. Gro\u00dfbritannien, Deutschland, Niederlande, Portugal, Spanien) ist der MCADM Teil des Neugeborenenscreenings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere St\u00f6rungen der mitochondrialen Fetts\u00e4ureoxidation, einschlie\u00dflich des Multiplen Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase-Mangels (MADD; s. dort).", "genetic_counseling": "Der MCADM wird autosomal-rezessiv verebt. Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Oberstes Gebot ist das strikte Vermeiden von Fasten. Mittelkettige Triglyzeride sollten vermieden werden, weitere di\u00e4tetische Einschr\u00e4nkungen sind nicht erforderlich. Informationen f\u00fcr sichere Zeitintervalle zwischen den Mahlzeiten sind f\u00fcr S\u00e4uglinge und Kleinkinder verf\u00fcgbar. Noch umstritten ist eine niedrigdosierte Carnitin-Supplementierung bei Patienten mit absinkendem Carnitin-Blutspiegel. Patienten w\u00e4hrend Krisen erhalten einfache Kohlehydrate per os (Glukosetabletten) oder i.v., bis der Blutzuckerspiegel stabil oberhalb 5 mmol/L verbleibt. Bei Auftreten von Infekten muss eine Notfallbehandlung bereitgehalten werden. Bei Dekopensation ist sofortige \u00e4rztliche Anwesenheit erforderlich. K\u00fcnstliche S\u00fc\u00dfstoffe m\u00fcssen vermieden werden.", "prognosis": "Patienten mit bekannter Diagnose haben eine exzellente Prognose, wenn Fasten vermieden wird und sie w\u00e4hrend interkurrenten Erkrankungen / metabolischen Krisen angemessen behandelt werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des MCADM bei der Geburt reicht in europiden Populationen vermutlich von 1/4,900 bis 1/27,000 und ist am h\u00f6chsten in der nordeurop\u00e4ischen Bev\u00f6lkerung. Weltweit betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt 1/14.600."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4res Fanconi-Syndrom als Folge monoklonaler Gammopathie", "sub_name": "Erworbenes monoklonales lg-Leichtketten-assoziiertes Fanconi-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Plasmazelldyskrasie, die durch eine Dysfunktion des proximalen Nierentubulus gekennzeichnet ist, sekund\u00e4r zu monoklonalen Kappa-Leichtketten-Ablagerungen in proximalen Tubuluszellen. Die klinische Pr\u00e4sentation ist mit variabler chronischer Nierenerkrankung, niedermolekularer Proteinurie, Aminos\u00e4ureurie, Hyperphosphaturie, Urikosurie, Bikarbonaturie und nicht-diabetischer Glykosurie. Der renale Phosphat- und Uratverlust kann zu Hypophosphat\u00e4mie und Hypourik\u00e4mie f\u00fchren.", "synonyms": "Sekund\u00e4res Fanconi-Syndrom als Folge monoklonaler Gammopathie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "E72.0", "epidemiology": "Bis heute sind weniger als 100 F\u00e4lle in der medizinischen Literatur beschrieben worden.", "clinical_description": "Die Erkrankung tritt h\u00e4ufig bei Patienten auf, die \u00e4lter als 50 Jahre sind und einen gewissen Grad an chronischer Nierenerkrankung (CKD) aufweisen. Es zeigt sich eine niedermolekulare (LMW) Proteinurie, generalisierte Aminos\u00e4ureurie, Urikosurie, Phosphaturie, Bikarbonaturie (die eine leichte metabolische Azidose verursachen kann) und normoglyk\u00e4mische Glykosurie. Die niedermolekulare Proteinurie ist der empfindlichste Test, und die nicht-diabetische Glykosurie ist der spezifischste. Hypophosphat\u00e4mie und Hypourik\u00e4mie und/oder eine leichte metabolische Azidose k\u00f6nnen vorhanden sein. Der Phosphatverlust im Urin kann schwerwiegend genug sein, um eine Demineralisierung der Knochen und Rachitis bei Kindern oder Osteomalazie bei Erwachsenen zu verursachen. Knochenschmerzen oder pathologische Frakturen sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome f\u00fcr diese Erkrankung. Die Erkrankung tritt h\u00e4ufig im Rahmen einer monoklonalen Gammopathie unklarer Signifikanz und seltener bei einem multiplen Myelom oder einer Waldenstrom-Makroglobulin\u00e4mie auf.", "etiology": "In den meisten F\u00e4llen geh\u00f6ren die monoklonalen Kappa-LC zur Untergruppe V-kappa1, die gegen die Proteolyse in den proximalen Tubuluszellen resistent ist, was zu einer Selbstaggregation und Kristallbildung im endolysosomalen Komplement f\u00fchrt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch den Nachweis des renalen Fanconi-Syndroms mit dem Vorliegen einer niedermolekularen Proteinurie (und Phosphaturie oder Glykosurie, falls vorhanden) zusammen mit einer monoklonalen Gammopathie gestellt. Die Diagnose kann durch eine Nierenbiopsie best\u00e4tigt werden (was bei der Feststellung der Myelom-Diagnose angezeigt sein kann). Lichtmikroskopische Befunde umfassen Atrophie, Dedifferenzierung und intrazytoplasmatische Einschl\u00fcsse im proximalen Tubulusepithel. Proximale Tubuluszellen sind typischerweise positiv f\u00fcr kappa-LCs (und seltener f\u00fcr lambda-LCs) in der Immunfluoreszenz. Ultrastrukturelle Untersuchungen zeigen Kristalle (rhomboid), die sich in den Lysosomen der proximalen Tubuluszellen oder frei im Zytoplasma befinden. Zu den zus\u00e4tzlich erforderlichen Untersuchungen geh\u00f6ren eine Knochenmarkaspiration oder -biopsie zur Identifizierung des Klons und die Auswertung der freien Immunglobulin-Leichtketten im Serum und Urin.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose sollte andere Arten der monoklonalen Gammopathie von renaler Bedeutung (AL-Amyloidose, monoklonale Immunglobulin-Ablagerungskrankheit und Myelom-gepr\u00e4gte Nephropathie) sowie andere Ursachen f\u00fcr FS (einschlie\u00dflich Autoimmunerkrankungen, Medikamente oder Schwermetallvergiftungen) umfassen.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei starkem Phosphatverlust im Urin oder Osteomalazie (niedrige Knochenmineraldichte) sollten Phosphatsupplemente gegeben werden. Die Demineralisierung des Knochens beginnt, bevor das Serumphosphat sinkt. Alle Patienten mit einer assoziierten offenen lymphatischen St\u00f6rung sollten eine geeignete Chemotherapie erhalten. Ansonsten sollte die Behandlung an den Grad der Niereninsuffizienz angepasst werden. CKD-Stadien 1-3: Eine Chemotherapie sollte in Betracht gezogen werden, um die Progression zur ESRD zu verlangsamen. Cyclophosphamid, Bortezomib oder eine Thalidomid-basierte Behandlung sind die besten Optionen. Hochdosiertes Melphalan (HDM), unterst\u00fctzt durch eine autologe periphere Blutzelltransplantation (ASCT), kann bei ausgew\u00e4hlten Patienten, die nicht darauf ansprechen, durchgef\u00fchrt werden, obwohl der Nutzen dieser Strategie noch nicht bewiesen ist. CKD 4-5 Stadien: Bei Patienten, die f\u00fcr eine Nieren-Allotransplantation in Frage kommen, sollte eine Chemotherapie (einschlie\u00dflich HDM/ASCT) vor der Transplantation in Betracht gezogen werden. Bei Patienten, die nicht f\u00fcr eine Nierentransplantation in Frage kommen, hat die Einleitung einer Chemotherapie keinen Nutzen.", "prognosis": "Die Progression der CKD ist langsam, und das Risiko einer malignen Transformation ist gering.", "summary": "Bis heute sind weniger als 100 F\u00e4lle in der medizinischen Literatur beschrieben worden."}, {"name": "Sekund\u00e4res SRNS", "sub_name": "Idiopathisches Steroid-sensitives nephrotisches Syndrom mit sekund\u00e4rer Steroid-Resistenz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Idiopathisches SSNS mit sekund\u00e4rer Steroid-Resistenz, Nephrotisches Syndrom, sekund\u00e4r Steroid-resistentes, Sekund\u00e4res SRNS, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "N04.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Selbstheilendes Kollodium-Baby", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Selbstheilende Kollodium-Baby (SHCB) ist eine leichte Variante der autosomal-rezessiven kongenitalen Ichthyose (ARCI) und gekennzeichnet durch eine Kollodiummembran bei Geburt, die in den ersten Lebenswochen abheilt.", "synonyms": "SHCB, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.2", "OMIM": "242100\u00a0 242300\u00a0 606545", "UMLS": "C1855789", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 25 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die betroffenen Babies werden in einer Kollodium-Membran geboren. Weitere Symptome sind Ektropion, Eklabium und eine eingeschr\u00e4nkte Gelenksbeweglichkeit. Nachdem die Membran abgeworfen wurde, zeigen die Patienten nur eine leichte Schuppung.", "etiology": "Die SCHB wird verursacht durch Mutationen in den Genen: TGM1, ALOXE3 oder ALOX12B, die f\u00fcr Transglutaminase 1 (beteiligt an der Verhornung des Stratum corneum) und die Arachidonat-3- und 12(R)-Lipoxygenasen (beteiligt am Lipidstoffwechsel) kodieren. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 25 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Selbstheilendes Kollodiumbaby, akrales", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A variant of self-healing collodion baby (SHCB) characterized by the presence at birth of a collodion membrane only at the extremities.", "synonyms": "Acral SHCB, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q80.2", "epidemiology": "Only 2 cases were described in the literature.", "clinical_description": "In both cases, the babies healed soon after birth.", "etiology": "In one case, molecular analysis was performed that revealed mutations in the TGM1 gene encoding transglutaminase 1, an enzyme involved in the cornification of the stratum corneum."}, {"name": "Selective Intrauterine Growth Restriction", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Selenoprotein N1, qualitative oder quantitative Defekte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene allergische Krankheit des respiratorischen Systems", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C1504369", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene angeborene Stoffwechselkrankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Stoffwechselkrankheit, ", "UMLS": "C0025517\u00a0 C0025521", "MeSH": "D008659\u00a0 D008661", "MedDRA": "10058097\u00a0 10062018", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene arterioven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "Q27.3", "UMLS": "C0003857\u00a0 C0334533", "MeSH": "D001165", "MedDRA": "10003193", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Augenkrankheit mit Hirnnervenbeteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Augenkrankheit mit kortikaler Beteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Autismusspektrumst\u00f6rung", "sub_name": "Seltene tiefgreifende Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Autismusspektrumst\u00f6rung, ", "ICD-10": "F84.0\u00a0 F84.1\u00a0 F84.2\u00a0 F84.3\u00a0 F84.4\u00a0 F84.5\u00a0 F84.8\u00a0 F84.9", "UMLS": "C0524528", "MeSH": "D002659", "MedDRA": "10061345", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Bewegungsst\u00f6rung mit Chorea", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0008489", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit, Seltene St\u00f6rung der Gerinnung, ", "UMLS": "C0005779\u00a0 C0019087", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie, Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Bluterkrankeit erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie, Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie, Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Bluterkrankeit erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie, Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit, Seltene St\u00f6rung der Gerinnung, ", "UMLS": "C0005779\u00a0 C0019087", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie, Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Bluterkrankeit erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie, Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Bluterkrankeit erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie, Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch erworbene Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionellen Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "ICD-10": "D69.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie, Seltene Bluterkrankeit durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch Thrombopathie und/oder Thrombozytopenie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "ICD-10": "D69.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "ICD-10": "D69.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Brustfehlbildung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0266008", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene chirurgisch korrigierbar Formen des prim\u00e4ren Hyperaldosteronismus", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Surgically correctable forms of primary aldosteronism (also known as primary hyperaldosteronism; see this term) are characterized by unilateral aldosterone hypersecretion and renin suppression, associated with varying degrees of hypertension and hypokalemia.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of primary aldosteronism in the general population is not known. Its prevalence in referred hypertensive populations is estimated to be between 6 and 13%, of which 1.5 to 5% have an aldosterone-producing adenoma or primary unilateral adrenal hyperplasia. Taking into account referral biases, the prevalence of surgically correctable primary aldosteronism is probably less than 1.5% in the hypertensive population and less than 0.3% in the general adult population.", "etiology": "nilateral aldosterone hypersecretion is caused by an aldosterone-producing adenoma (also known as Conn's adenoma and aldosteronoma), primary unilateral adrenal hyperplasia and rare cases of aldosterone-producing adrenocortical carcinoma (see these terms). In these forms, unilateral adrenalectomy can cure aldosterone excess and hypokalemia, but not necessarily hypertension.", "diagnostic_methods": "Surgically correctable primary aldosteronism is sought in patients with hypokalemic, severe or resistant forms of hypertension. Recent recommendations suggest screening for primary aldosteronism using the aldosterone to renin ratio. Patients with a raised ratio then undergo confirmatory suppression tests. Once the diagnosis is confirmed, adrenal computed tomography is performed for all patients.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis of hypokalemic hypertension with low renin includes mineralocorticoid excess, with the mineralocorticoid being cortisol or 11-deoxycorticosterone, exposure to glycyrrhizic acid and apparent mineralocorticoid excess caused by mutations in the HSD11B2 gene and pseudo-hypermineralocorticoidism in Liddle syndrome (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "If surgery is considered, taking into consideration the clinical context and the desire of the patient, adrenal vein sampling is performed to detect whether or not aldosterone hypersecretion is unilateral.", "prognosis": "Laparoscopic surgery for unilateral aldosterone hypersecretion is associated with a morbidity of about 8%, with most complications being minor. It generally results in the normalization of aldosterone secretion and kalemia, and in a large decrease in blood pressure, but normotension without treatment is only achieved in half of all cases. Normotension following adrenalectomy is more frequent in young patients with recent hypertension than in patients with long-standing hypertension or a family history of hypertension."}, {"name": "Seltene chirurgisch nicht korrigierbar Formen des prim\u00e4ren Hyperaldosteronismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Chromosomenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0008625\u00a0 C0008626", "MeSH": "D002869", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung des Knochen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung des Skeletts, ", "UMLS": "C0005941", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung des Skeletts", "sub_name": "Seltene Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung des Knochen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung des Skeletts, ", "UMLS": "C0005941", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene entz\u00fcndliche/autoimmune Krankheit der Kornea", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erbkrankheit mit peripherer Neuropathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0392553", "GARD": "12733", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene erbliche neurologische Krankheit mit peripherer Neuropathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung der okularen Adnexe", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung durch toxische Effekte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung mit Ektropium", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung mit Entropium", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung mit Fehlbildung der Sehnervenpapille", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung zur potentiellen Darm-Transplantation indiziert", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung zur potentiellen h\u00e4matopoetischen Stammzell-Transplantation indiziert", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung zur potentiellen Herz-Transplantation indiziert", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung zur potentiellen Leber-Transplantation indiziert", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung zur potentiellen Lungen-Transplantation indiziert", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung zur potentiellen Nieren-Transplantation indiziert", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung zur potentiellen Transplantation indiziert", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A group of rare disorders with irreversible organ and/or system dysfunction(s), or the effects of dysfunction after alternative medical and surgical treatments have been utilized, for which the benefits of transplantation outweigh the risk of continuing alternative modalities."}, {"name": "Seltene Erkrankung zur potentiellen Transplantation nach Komplikation infolge Transplantation indiziert", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene erworbene Mangel-An\u00e4mie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher Kardiomyopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher Subaortenstenose, Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher obstruktiver Kardiomyopathie, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "UMLS": "C0949658", "MeSH": "D024741", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher obstruktiver Kardiomyopathie", "sub_name": "Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher Kardiomyopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher Subaortenstenose, Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher obstruktiver Kardiomyopathie, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "UMLS": "C0949658", "MeSH": "D024741", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher Subaortenstenose", "sub_name": "Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher Kardiomyopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher Subaortenstenose, Seltene famili\u00e4re St\u00f6rung mit hypertropher obstruktiver Kardiomyopathie, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "UMLS": "C0949658", "MeSH": "D024741", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Fehlbildung der Vagina", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Fehlbildung des Lymphatischen Systems", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der hyperkinetischen Bewegungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der Konjunktivitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch endokrine testikul\u00e4re St\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetisch bedingter Nebennierenst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse", "sub_name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Testes Achse, Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Testes Achse, Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Testes Achse", "sub_name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Testes Achse, Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch Nebennierenst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse", "sub_name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Testes Achse, Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Testes Achse, Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Testes Achse", "sub_name": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Testes Achse, Seltene Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N46", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der Salmonellose", "german_description": "Die Salmonellen sind bewegliche, gei\u00dfeltragende, Gram-negative Bakterien aus der Familie der Enterobakterien. Zwei nosologische Gruppen werden unterschieden: (i) Der Typhus durch S.typhi undS. paratyphi A, B und C und (ii) die restlichen Salmonellosen. Das Typhus-Fieber ist eine Infektion und Intoxikation, die meist indirekt durch verseuchtes Wasser oder verschmutzte Nahrung (frisches Gem\u00fcse, Muscheln) \u00fcbertragen wird. Die Erreger dringen \u00fcber die Darmschleimhaut in den K\u00f6rper ein, besetzen die mesenterischen Lymphknoten und gelangen schlie\u00dflich in den Blutkreislauf. Die ersten Symptome sind meist Bauchschmerzen, Appetitlosigkeit, Bl\u00e4hungen, Schlafst\u00f6rungen und Fieber, das innerhalb von 4-7 Tagen auf 40\u00b0C steigt. Sekund\u00e4re Symptome (Ersch\u00f6pfung, niedriger Blutdruck) sind die Folge der Freisetzung von Toxinen. 60% der F\u00e4lle haben eine Diarrhoe. Komplikationen der Krankheit sind Darmperforationen, Blutungen im Magen-Darm-Trakt und auch Myokarditis und Enzephalitis. Die Diagnose wird durch den serologischen Erregernachweis best\u00e4tigt. Die antibiotische Therapie setzt die Isolierung der Erreger voraus. Impfungen gegen S.typhi und S. paratyphi A und B sch\u00fctzen 50-75% der immunisierten Personen. Kleinere, aliment\u00e4re Nicht-Typhus-Salmonella-Infektionen k\u00f6nnen durch hygienische Ma\u00dfnahmen vermieden werden. Bei geschw\u00e4chten Patienten k\u00f6nnen Salmonella-Infektionen zu Pneumonie, eitriger Meningitis, Endokarditis, infizierten arteriellen Aneurysmen und Pyelonephritis f\u00fchren. F\u00fcr diese Infektionen gibt es keine Impfung. Die Patienten werden antibiotisch behandelt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Rare form of salmonellosis is a group of rare invasive salmonellosis that includes infection with Salmonella enterica typhoidal species (S. typhi and S. paratyphi) that results in enteric fever, and infection by invasive non-typhoidal species (typically strains of S. typhimurium and S. enteritidis) which have a high burden amongst immunocompromised or malnourished individuals, and results in bacteriemia, systemic febrile disease, and variable manifestations including lower respiratory tract infection and splenomegaly.", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A01.0\u00a0 A01.1\u00a0 A01.2\u00a0 A01.3\u00a0 A01.4\u00a0 A02.0\u00a0 A02.1\u00a0 A02.2\u00a0 A02.8\u00a0 A02.9", "umls": "C0036114\u00a0 C0036117", "meddra": "10039447"}, {"name": "Seltene Form der syndromalen Intelligenzminderung ohne multiple kongenitale Anomalien/Dysmorphien", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der vorzeitigen Pubert\u00e4t", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E22.8\u00a0 E30.1", "UMLS": "C0034013", "MeSH": "D011629", "GARD": "7446", "MedDRA": "10044701\u00a0 10058084", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Funktionsanomalie des Ovars", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetisch bedingte Funktionsst\u00f6rung der Ovarien", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetisch bedingter Nebennierenst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse", "sub_name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Ovarien-Achse, Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Ovarien-Achse, Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Ovarien-Achse", "sub_name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Ovarien-Achse, Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch genetische St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch kongenitalen hypogonadotropen Hypogonadismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Nebennierenst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse", "sub_name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Ovarien-Achse, Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Ovarien-Achse, Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Ovarien-Achse", "sub_name": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Gonaden-Achse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Hypothalamus-Hypophysen-Ovarien-Achse, Seltene Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der gonadotropen Achse, ", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte Dystonie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene genetisch dystonische St\u00f6rung, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte entz\u00fcndliche/autoimmune Krankheit der Kornea", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte Form der m\u00e4nnlichen Infertilit\u00e4t", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte Form der weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte Krankheit des respiratorischen Systems", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte Krankheit mit Myoklonus als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte retinale Vaskulopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte St\u00f6rung der Knochenentwicklung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene genetisch bedingte St\u00f6rung der Skelettentwicklung, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte St\u00f6rung der Skelettentwicklung", "sub_name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte St\u00f6rung der Knochenentwicklung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene genetisch bedingte St\u00f6rung der Skelettentwicklung, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte systemische oder rheumatologische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetisch dystonische St\u00f6rung", "sub_name": "Seltene genetisch bedingte Dystonie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene genetisch dystonische St\u00f6rung, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Augenkrankheit mit Hirnnervenbeteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Augenkrankheit mit kortikaler Beteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Erkrankung der Chorioidea", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Erkrankung der Kornea", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische hyperkinetische Bewegungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische hypokinetische Bewegungsst\u00f6rung", "sub_name": "Seltenes genetisches Parkinson-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene genetische hypokinetische Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische kapill\u00e4re Fehlbildung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit der Makula", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit der okularen Adnexe", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit der Pupille", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit der Retina", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit des Augenlids", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit des autonomen Nervensystems", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit des hinteren Augensegments", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit des Hirnstamms oder Kleinhirns mit Augenbeteiligung als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit des Sehnerven", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit des Sehorgans", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit des Tr\u00e4nenapparats", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit des vorderen Augensegments", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit mit Beteiligung der Konjunktiva als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit mit Beteiligung der Kornea als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit mit Beteiligung multipler Strukturen des Auges", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit mit Entropion", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit mit Opakifikation der Linse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Krankheit mit Strabismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische Lid-Fehlstellungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische neuromuskul\u00e4re St\u00f6rung der okul\u00e4ren Ausrichtung und Beweglichkeit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische St\u00f6rung der okul\u00e4ren Ausrichtung und Beweglichkeit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische St\u00f6rung durch Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Spermientransportes", "sub_name": "Seltene genetische St\u00f6rung mit obstruktiver Azoospermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene genetische St\u00f6rung durch Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Spermientransportes, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene genetische St\u00f6rung mit obstruktiver Azoospermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene genetische St\u00f6rung durch Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Spermientransportes, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0005779", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene heredit\u00e4re Krankheit mit avaskul\u00e4rer Nekrose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene heredit\u00e4re Stoffwechelkrankheit nit peripherer Neuropathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene heredit\u00e4re systemische Krankheit mit peripherer Neuropathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene hypokinetische Bewegungsst\u00f6rung", "sub_name": "Parkinson-Syndrom, seltenes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene hypokinetische Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, ", "UMLS": "C0242422", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Hypolipid\u00e4mie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E78.6", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene idiopathische makul\u00e4re Teleangiektasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene kapill\u00e4re Fehlbildung mit assoziierten Anomalien", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Kardiomyopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "UMLS": "C0878544", "MeSH": "D009202", "MedDRA": "10007636", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Knochenkrankheit bei h\u00e4ufigem Gen- oder Stoffwechseldefekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "ICD-10": "D69.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Koagulopathie durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombopathie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch qualitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "ICD-10": "D69.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Koagulopathie durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Blutungsst\u00f6rung durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, Seltene Koagulopathie durch konstitutionelle Thrombozytopenie, Seltene Koagulopathie durch quantitativen Pl\u00e4ttchen-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene kongenitale Anomalie des Ventrikelseptums", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Kongenitale Anomalie der interventrikul\u00e4ren Kommunikation, Ventrikelseptum-Anomalie, kongenitale, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene konstitutionelle h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie durch Membrananomalie der roten Blutk\u00f6rperchen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Brust, nicht-malformativ", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Chorioidea", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Cornea", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der externen oder inneren Genitalorgane, nicht-malformativ", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Herzchirurgie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Makula", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Maxillo-fazialen Chirurgie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Pupille", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Retina", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Sklera", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Thoraxchirurgie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit der Tr\u00e4nenwege", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0022904", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit des hinteren Augensegmentes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit des Hirnstamms oder Kleinhirns mit Augenbeteiligung als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit des Nervus trochlearis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit des Sehnerven", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit des Sehorgans", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit des Uterus und der Adnexen, nicht-malformativ", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit des vorderen Augensegmentes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit durch Vergiftung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheiten der Abdominalchirurgie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit in Kombination mit Autismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Beteiligung multipler Strukturen des Auges", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Cushing-Syndrom als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Dentinogenesis imperfecta", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0011436", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit fokaler palmoplantarer Hyperkeratose als Hauptmerkmal", "sub_name": "Krankheit mit fokaler Palmoplantarkeratose als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Krankheit mit fokaler palmoplantarer Hyperkeratose als Hauptmerkmal, ", "ICD-10": "Q82.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Hirschsprung-Krankheit als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Hypertrichose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0020555", "MeSH": "D006983", "MedDRA": "10020864", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Korneabeteiligung als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit maligner Hyperthermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Moyamoya-Angiopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Myoklonie als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit Pierre Robin-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Pierre-Robin-Syndrom, syndromales, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "UMLS": "C0031900", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit pigmentierter Sklera", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit punktierter palmoplantarer Hyperkeratose als Hauptmerkmal", "sub_name": "Seltene Krankheit mit punktierter Palmoplantarkeratose als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Krankheit mit punktierter palmoplantarer Hyperkeratose als Hauptmerkmal, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit punktierter Palmoplantarkeratose als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Krankheit mit punktierter palmoplantarer Hyperkeratose als Hauptmerkmal, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Krankheit mit thorakalem Aortenaneurysma und Aortendissektion", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "I71.1\u00a0 I71.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene lymphatische Fehlbildung", "english": 0, "synonyms": "LM, Lymphangiom, Lymphatische Malformation, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D18.1", "UMLS": "C0024221\u00a0 C0398368", "GARD": "9789"}, {"name": "Seltene Mangel-An\u00e4mie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0041782", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene neoplastische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Tumorkrankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene neurodegenerative Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0524851", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene neuroinflammatorische oder neuroimmunologische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene neuromuskul\u00e4re Krankheit mit Anomalie der okul\u00e4ren Ausrichtung und Beweglichkeit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene nicht-syndromale Intelligenzminderung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Seltene nicht-syndromalen Intelligenzminderung ist eine seltene, erbliche, neurologische Erkrankung, die als einziges Merkmal eine fr\u00fch einsetzende kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung aufweist. Die Krankheit kann mit Autismus, Epilepsie und neuromuskul\u00e4ren Defiziten einhergehen.", "synonyms": "Seltene NSID, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "F70\u00a0 F71\u00a0 F72\u00a0 F73"}, {"name": "Seltene NSID", "sub_name": "Seltene nicht-syndromale Intelligenzminderung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Seltene nicht-syndromalen Intelligenzminderung ist eine seltene, erbliche, neurologische Erkrankung, die als einziges Merkmal eine fr\u00fch einsetzende kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung aufweist. Die Krankheit kann mit Autismus, Epilepsie und neuromuskul\u00e4ren Defiziten einhergehen.", "synonyms": "Seltene NSID, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "F70\u00a0 F71\u00a0 F72\u00a0 F73"}, {"name": "Seltene odontale oder periodontale Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene odontale oder periodontale Krankheit, genetisch bedingt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene p\u00e4diatrische rheumatologische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Adnextumor des Uterus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Tumor des Ovars und der Tuba Fallopia, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener benigner Ovarialtumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0004997", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener benigner Tumor der Brust", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "D24", "UMLS": "C0346156", "GARD": "12775", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Brustkrebs", "sub_name": "Seltener maligner Tumor der Brust", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Brustkrebs, ", "UMLS": "C0006142\u00a0 C0678222", "GARD": "12772", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Diabetes mellitus Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Insulinabh\u00e4ngiger Diabetes mellitus, seltene Form, ", "UMLS": "C0011854", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Diabetes mellitus Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Insulin-unabh\u00e4ngiger Diabetes mellitus, seltene Form, ", "UMLS": "C0011860", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene renal-tubul\u00e4re Funktionsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0151747", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Entwicklungsdefekt mit Bindegewebsbeteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Entwicklungsdefekt w\u00e4hrend der Embryogenese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor der Bauchspeicheldr\u00fcse", "sub_name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Pankreas", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor der Bauchspeicheldr\u00fcse, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des D\u00fcnndarms", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Kolons", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Magens", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "UMLS": "C0024623", "MedDRA": "10017758", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Mastdarms", "sub_name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Rektums", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Mastdarms, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Pankreas", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor der Bauchspeicheldr\u00fcse, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Rektums", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener epithelialer Tumor des Mastdarms, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene respiratorische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene retinale Vaskulopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Gallengang- und Lebertumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener genetischer Entwicklungsdefekt w\u00e4hrend der Embryogenese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener gyn\u00e4kologischer Tumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0017416\u00a0 C0699889", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Herztumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0018809", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene rheumatologische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener intestinaler Tumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Tumor des Darms, Seltener Tumor des Intestinums, ", "UMLS": "C0021841", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Kopf-Hals-Tumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "UMLS": "C0018671", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Krebs der Cervix uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Krebs des Geb\u00e4rmutterhalses, Seltener maligner Zervixtumor, ", "UMLS": "C0007847\u00a0 C0302592", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Krebs der Geb\u00e4rmutter", "sub_name": "Seltener Uteruskrebs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Krebs der Geb\u00e4rmutter, Seltener maligner Tumor des Uterus, Uteruskarzinom, ", "UMLS": "C0153567", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Krebs des Corpus uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener maligner Tumor des Corpus uteri, ", "UMLS": "C0153574", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Krebs des D\u00fcnndarms", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltenes D\u00fcnndarmkarzinom, ", "UMLS": "C0238196", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Krebs des Geb\u00e4rmutterhalses", "sub_name": "Seltener Krebs der Cervix uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Krebs des Geb\u00e4rmutterhalses, Seltener maligner Zervixtumor, ", "UMLS": "C0007847\u00a0 C0302592", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Krebs des Magens", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltenes Magenkarzinom, ", "UMLS": "C0699791", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener maligner epithelialer Tumor der Leber und intrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener maligner Tumor der Brust", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Brustkrebs, ", "UMLS": "C0006142\u00a0 C0678222", "GARD": "12772", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener maligner Tumor des Corpus uteri", "sub_name": "Seltener Krebs des Corpus uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener maligner Tumor des Corpus uteri, ", "UMLS": "C0153574", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener maligner Tumor des Uterus", "sub_name": "Seltener Uteruskrebs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Krebs der Geb\u00e4rmutter, Seltener maligner Tumor des Uterus, Uteruskarzinom, ", "UMLS": "C0153567", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener maligner Zervixtumor", "sub_name": "Seltener Krebs der Cervix uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Krebs des Geb\u00e4rmutterhalses, Seltener maligner Zervixtumor, ", "UMLS": "C0007847\u00a0 C0302592", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Naevus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "N\u00e4vus, seltener, ", "UMLS": "C0027960", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener odontogener Tumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Speicheldr\u00fcsentumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "UMLS": "C0036095", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor der Brust", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C1458155", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor der Gallenblase und extrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0750952", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor der Leber und intrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0023903", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor der Nebenschilddr\u00fcse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "C75.0\u00a0 D35.1\u00a0 D44.2", "UMLS": "C0030521", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor des Darms", "sub_name": "Seltener intestinaler Tumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Tumor des Darms, Seltener Tumor des Intestinums, ", "UMLS": "C0021841", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor des D\u00fcnndarms", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor des Intestinums", "sub_name": "Seltener intestinaler Tumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Tumor des Darms, Seltener Tumor des Intestinums, ", "UMLS": "C0021841", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor des Nervensystems", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "UMLS": "C0027766", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor des neuroepithelialen Gewebes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "UMLS": "C0206715", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor des Ovars und der Tuba Fallopia", "sub_name": "Seltener Adnextumor des Uterus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Tumor des Ovars und der Tuba Fallopia, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor des Pankreas", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Pankreastumor, seltener, ", "UMLS": "C0030297", "MedDRA": "10061902", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Tumor des respiratorischen Systems", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0035244\u00a0 C0154131", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Uteruskrebs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltener Krebs der Geb\u00e4rmutter, Seltener maligner Tumor des Uterus, Uteruskarzinom, ", "UMLS": "C0153567", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener vaskul\u00e4rer Tumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "UMLS": "C0282607", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener vaskul\u00e4rer Tumor, genetisch bedingter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener Vorhofdefekt und interatriale Kommunikation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Vorhofdefekt und interaurikul\u00e4re Kommunikation, ", "ICD-10": "Q21.1", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltener vulvovaginaler Tumor", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Adenokarzinom der Brust", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare malignant breast tumor disease encompassing special rare types of adenocarcinoma of the breast, i.e. tubular adenocarcinoma, mucinous carcinoma, medullary carcinoma NOS, papillary adenocarcinoma NOS, cribriform carcinoma, apocrine adenocarcinoma, secretory carcinoma, glycogen-rich clear cell carcinoma, lipid-rich carcinoma, and oncocytic carcinoma.", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C50.0\u00a0 C50.1\u00a0 C50.2\u00a0 C50.3\u00a0 C50.4\u00a0 C50.5\u00a0 C50.6\u00a0 C50.8", "umls": "C0858252", "gard": "12773"}, {"name": "Seltene Schlafst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0851578", "MeSH": "D012893", "MedDRA": "10040984", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes D\u00fcnndarmkarzinom", "sub_name": "Seltener Krebs des D\u00fcnndarms", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltenes D\u00fcnndarmkarzinom, ", "UMLS": "C0238196", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes genetisches Parkinson-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene genetische hypokinetische Bewegungsst\u00f6rung, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Insulinresistenz-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C3714619", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Magenkarzinom", "sub_name": "Seltener Krebs des Magens", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltenes Magenkarzinom, ", "UMLS": "C0699791", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Pankreaskarzinom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Bauchspeicheldr\u00fcsenkrebs, seltener, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "UMLS": "C0235974\u00a0 C0346647", "MeSH": "D010190", "MedDRA": "10033604\u00a0 10033609", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Parkinson-Syndrom bei neurodegenerativer St\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Parkinson-Syndrom durch neurodegenerative St\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Parkinson-Syndrom durch Vergiftung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Syndrom mit assoziierter dilatativer Kardiomyopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltenes Syndrom mit assoziierter hypertropher Kardiomyopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Stoffwechselkrankheit", "sub_name": "Seltene angeborene Stoffwechselkrankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Stoffwechselkrankheit, ", "UMLS": "C0025517\u00a0 C0025521", "MeSH": "D008659\u00a0 D008661", "MedDRA": "10058097\u00a0 10062018", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung der Gerinnung", "sub_name": "Seltene Blutgerinnungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Bluterkrankeit, Seltene St\u00f6rung der Gerinnung, ", "UMLS": "C0005779\u00a0 C0019087", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung der okul\u00e4ren Ausrichtung und Beweglichkeit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung des autonomen Nervensystems", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C1145628", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung durch Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Spermientransportes", "sub_name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit obstruktiver Azoospermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene St\u00f6rung durch Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Spermientransportes, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit Dystonie und weiteren neurologischen oder systemischen Manifestationen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit multisystemischer Beteiligung und kongenitalen hypogonadotropen Hypogonadismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit sekund\u00e4rem Hypogonadismus, ", "UMLS": "C0271623", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit obstruktiver Azoospermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene St\u00f6rung durch Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Spermientransportes, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit prim\u00e4rem Hypogonadismus", "sub_name": "Seltene Syndrome mit hypergonadotropen Hypogonadismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit prim\u00e4rem Hypogonadismus, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit Ptosis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0005745\u00a0 C0033377", "MeSH": "D001763", "MedDRA": "10015995\u00a0 10037272", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit sekund\u00e4rem Hypogonadismus", "sub_name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit multisystemischer Beteiligung und kongenitalen hypogonadotropen Hypogonadismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit sekund\u00e4rem Hypogonadismus, ", "UMLS": "C0271623", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit weiblicher Infertilit\u00e4t durch kongenitalen hypogonadotropen Hypogonadismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene St\u00f6rung ohne eindeutige Diagnose nach vollst\u00e4ndiger Untersuchung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene St\u00f6rung, f\u00fcr die alle angemessenen Anstrengungen unternommen wurden, um eine Diagnose nach dem Stand der Technik und den verf\u00fcgbaren diagnostischen M\u00f6glichkeiten zu stellen, die jedoch zu keinem klinisch bekannten Konzept gef\u00fchrt haben. Es wird empfohlen, die Kodierung dieser Entit\u00e4t ausschlie\u00dflich den Experten f\u00fcr seltene Krankheiten vorzubehalten.", "synonyms": "Vollst\u00e4ndig untersuchte seltene Erkrankung ohne eindeutige Diagnose, "}, {"name": "Seltene syndromale Intelligenzminderung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene syndromale Intelligenzminderung, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Syndrome mit Herzfehlbildungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Syndrome mit hypergonadotropen Hypogonadismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene St\u00f6rung mit prim\u00e4rem Hypogonadismus, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene systemische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene systemische Krankheit des Kindes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene systemische oder rheumatologische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene systemische oder rheumatologische Krankheit der Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene thrombotische St\u00f6rung durch Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene thrombotische St\u00f6rung durch erworbene Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene thrombotische St\u00f6rung durch erworbenen Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene thrombotische St\u00f6rung durch Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene thrombotische St\u00f6rung durch konstitutionelle Blutpl\u00e4ttchenanomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene thrombotische St\u00f6rung durch konstitutionellen Gerinnungsfaktoren-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene tiefgreifende Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Autismusspektrumst\u00f6rung, ", "ICD-10": "F84.0\u00a0 F84.1\u00a0 F84.2\u00a0 F84.3\u00a0 F84.4\u00a0 F84.5\u00a0 F84.8\u00a0 F84.9", "UMLS": "C0524528", "MeSH": "D002659", "MedDRA": "10061345", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Tumoren der kranialen und spinalen Nerven", "sub_name": "Tumoren der kranialen und spinalen Nerven", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Tumoren der kranialen und spinalen Nerven, ", "GARD": "12697", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Tumorkrankheit", "sub_name": "Seltene neoplastische Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene Tumorkrankheit, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Ursache der Hypertension", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene uterovaginale oder vulvovaginale Krankheit, nicht-malformativ", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Varianten des Adenokarzinoms des Corpus uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "C54.1", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Seltene vaskul\u00e4re Fehlbildung der grossen Gef\u00e4sse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Vaskul\u00e4re Fehlbildung, kombinierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Vaskulitis des Kindes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene ven\u00f6se Fehlbildung, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene Virus-induzierte Tumoren", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Gonadendysgenesie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Ovarialdysgenesie, Weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Ovarialdysgenesie, ", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Implantationsdefekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "N97.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Ovarialdysgenesie", "sub_name": "Seltene weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Gonadendysgenesie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seltene weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Ovarialdysgenesie, Weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch Ovarialdysgenesie, ", "ICD-10": "N97.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene weibliche Infertilit\u00e4t durch St\u00f6rung der Oozytenreifung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "N97.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Seltene zerebrovaskul\u00e4re Demenz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Semantische Demenz", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Semantic dementia (SD) is a form of frontotemporal dementia (FTD; see this term), characterized by the progressive, amodal and profound loss of semantic knowledge (combination of visual associative agnosia, anomia, surface dyslexia or dysgraphia and disrupted comprehension of word meaning) and behavioral abnormalities, attributable to the degeneration of the anterior temporal lobes.", "synonyms": "Semantic primary progressive aphasia, Semantic variant PPA, ", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G31.0", "omim": "172700\u00a0 600274", "umls": "C0338462", "gard": "10792"}, {"name": "SEMD, Aggrecan-Typ", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, Typ Aggrecan", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia, aggrecan type is a new form of skeletal dysplasia characterized by severe short stature, facial dysmorphism and characteristic radiographic findings.", "synonyms": "SEMD, aggrecan type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "612813", "umls": "C2748544", "gard": "10513", "epidemiology": "To date, three cases have been described, all originating from the same family.", "clinical_description": "Facial features include midface hypoplasia with almost absent nasal cartilage, and relative prognathism and macrocephaly. Radiographic findings include irregular epiphyses of long bones with widened metaphyses, platyspondyly, multiple cervical-vertebral clefts and brachydactyly.", "etiology": "The disease results from a missense mutation affecting the C-type lectin domain of aggrecan (AGC1 gene; chromosome 15) which regulates endochondral ossification. Transmission is autosomal-recessive."}, {"name": "SEMDG", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, Typ Genevi\u00e8ve", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia, Genevi\u00e8ve type is a rare primary bone dysplasia characterized by severe developmental delay and skeletal dysplasia (including short stature, premature carpal ossification, platyspondyly, longitudinal metaphyseal striations, and small epiphyses), as well as moderate to severe intellectual disability and facial dysmorphism, including prominent forehead, mild synophrys, depressed nasal bridge, prominent bulbous nasal tip and full lips.", "synonyms": "SEMD, Genevi\u00e8ve type, SEMDG, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "610442", "umls": "C1864872", "mesh": "C535785", "gard": "10057"}, {"name": "SEMD, Genevi\u00e8ve Typ", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, Typ Genevi\u00e8ve", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia, Genevi\u00e8ve type is a rare primary bone dysplasia characterized by severe developmental delay and skeletal dysplasia (including short stature, premature carpal ossification, platyspondyly, longitudinal metaphyseal striations, and small epiphyses), as well as moderate to severe intellectual disability and facial dysmorphism, including prominent forehead, mild synophrys, depressed nasal bridge, prominent bulbous nasal tip and full lips.", "synonyms": "SEMD, Genevi\u00e8ve type, SEMDG, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "610442", "umls": "C1864872", "mesh": "C535785", "gard": "10057"}, {"name": "SEMD-JL", "sub_name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary bone dysplasia characterized by short stature, joint laxity, vertebral anomalies, severe progressive spinal malalignment leading to spinal cord compression, progressive kyphoscoliosis, thoracic asymmetry, and elbow and foot deformities. Additional features include mild skin hyperelasticity, spatulate terminal phalanges, cleft palate and lip, structural cardiac malformations, and mild facial dysmorphism (oval face, prominent eyes with blue sclerae, and a long upper lip).", "synonyms": "SEMD-JL, SEMDJL1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, Beighton type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "271640\u00a0 618395", "umls": "C0432243", "gard": "4982"}, {"name": "SEMDJL1", "sub_name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary bone dysplasia characterized by short stature, joint laxity, vertebral anomalies, severe progressive spinal malalignment leading to spinal cord compression, progressive kyphoscoliosis, thoracic asymmetry, and elbow and foot deformities. Additional features include mild skin hyperelasticity, spatulate terminal phalanges, cleft palate and lip, structural cardiac malformations, and mild facial dysmorphism (oval face, prominent eyes with blue sclerae, and a long upper lip).", "synonyms": "SEMD-JL, SEMDJL1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, Beighton type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "271640\u00a0 618395", "umls": "C0432243", "gard": "4982"}, {"name": "SEMDJL2", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, mit multiplen Luxationen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations is a rare genetic primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by midface hypoplasia, short stature, generalized joint laxity, multiple joint dislocations (most frequently of knees and hips), limb malalignment (genu valgum/varum) and progressive spinal deformity (e.g. kyphosis/scoliosis). Radiography reveals distinctive slender metacarpals and metatarsals, as well as small, irregular epiphyses, metaphyseal irregularities with vertical striations, constricted femoral necks and mild platyspondyly, among others.", "synonyms": "SEMD-MD, SEMDJL2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxicity, Hall type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, leptodactylic type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations, Hall type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "603546", "umls": "C1863732", "mesh": "C535784", "gard": "9866"}, {"name": "SEMD-MD", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, mit multiplen Luxationen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations is a rare genetic primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by midface hypoplasia, short stature, generalized joint laxity, multiple joint dislocations (most frequently of knees and hips), limb malalignment (genu valgum/varum) and progressive spinal deformity (e.g. kyphosis/scoliosis). Radiography reveals distinctive slender metacarpals and metatarsals, as well as small, irregular epiphyses, metaphyseal irregularities with vertical striations, constricted femoral necks and mild platyspondyly, among others.", "synonyms": "SEMD-MD, SEMDJL2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxicity, Hall type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, leptodactylic type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations, Hall type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "603546", "umls": "C1863732", "mesh": "C535784", "gard": "9866"}, {"name": "SEMD Typ Irapa", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, Typ Irapa", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SEMD Typ Irapa, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "271650", "UMLS": "C0432213", "summary": "Die Spondylo-epi-metaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie Typ Irapa ist gekennzeichnet durch dysproportionierten Kleinwuchs, verk\u00fcrzten Rumpf, Pectus carinatum (Kielbrust), kurze Arme, kurze und breite H\u00e4nde, kurze Metatarsalia, flache und breite F\u00fc\u00dfe, Coxa vara, Genu valgum, Osteoarthritis, Arthrose und moderate bis schwere Gangst\u00f6rung. Das Syndrom wurde bei venezolanischen Indianern des Volkes der Yukpa (Irapa) und bei 3 Geschwistern einer mexikanischen Mestizen-Familie beschrieben. Autosomal-rezessive Vererbung wurde angenommen, das urs\u00e4chliche Gen ist nicht bekannt. "}, {"name": "Seminomat\u00f6ser Keimzelltumor des Hodens", "sub_name": "Testikul\u00e4rer Keimzelltumor, seminomat\u00f6ser", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Testicular seminomatous germ cell tumor is a rare testicular germ cell tumor (see this term), most commonly presenting with a painless mass in the scrotum, with a very high cure rate if caught in the early stages.", "synonyms": "Seminoma of testis, Seminomatous germ cell tumor of testis, Testicular seminoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C62.9", "omim": "273300", "umls": "C0036631", "gard": "4792", "epidemiology": "Annual incidence in Europe is 1/62,000 people. It accounts for 40% of testicular cancer cases.", "clinical_description": "Seminoma usually presents in males between the ages of 30-40. A painless mass in the scrotum is indicative of disease. A long-standing hydrocele may be noted causing a feeling of heaviness in the testicle. Gynecomastia and back and flank pain are symptoms that are seen in some patients. Relapse after surgery can occur, usually (in 97% of cases) in the high iliac or retroperitoneal lymph nodes. Metastasis, although rare, can occur in some cases, affecting the lungs, liver, bones and central nervous system.", "etiology": "Etiology is unknown but tumors are thought to arise from an embryonic germ cell leading to testicular intraepithelial neoplasia (the precursor to classical seminoma). Cryptorchidism is a risk factor for the development of testicular seminomatous germ cell tumors.", "diagnostic_methods": "Ultrasound usually confirms the presence of a testicular mass. Measurement of tumor markers in blood such as alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), beta human chorionic gonadotropin (BHC) and lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) is needed as it can be useful in cases where the tumor is still very small. Classical seminoma does not secrete AFP and patients with raised levels of this tumor marker are given a diagnosis of non-seminoma. After surgical removal of testicle, histopathological characteristics are analyzed and a stage can be assigned. In stage 1 disease the primary tumor is limited to the testis and epididymus with possible invasion of the tunica albuginea, tunica vaginalis, spermatic cord and scrotum but no lymph node or distant metastasis. Stage 2 (2A, 2B and 2C) disease features regional lymph node metastasis and stage 3 has distant metastasis of varying degrees.", "differential_diagnosis": "Testicular non seminomatous germ cell tumors (see this term) must be excluded.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment for stage 1 seminoma involves an orchiectomy or partial orchiectomy in some cases. Most patients (88%) do not require any further treatment and only surveillance is necessary. In those cases where follow up is difficult, adjuvant carboplatin or radiotherapy can be applied. Para-aortic and ipsilateral iliac radiotherapy (30 Gy in 2 Gy fractions) is the standard treatment of stage 2A seminoma. Cisplatin, etoposide and bleomycin (PEB) chemotherapy (three cycles) or cisplatin and etoposide (PE) chemotherapy (4 cycles) is an alternative to radiotherapy (but has more acute toxicity). Those with stage 2B, 2C and stage 3 seminomas are given PEB chemotherapy (three or four cycles depending on prognosis). In those with a reduced lung capacity or with emphysema or in severe smokers, 4 cycles of PE is preferred over PEB. Ifosfamide is given instead of bleomycin in certain cases (i.e. patients with existing lung damage). Follow up and sometimes a PET scan is recommended to monitor for residual lesions. Due to cosmetic and psychological reasons, patients may be offered testicular prostheses after an orchidectomy.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good but depends on the stage of disease with 5- year survival rates as high as 99% in stage 1 disease. Relapse rates at 5 years depend on risk factors (ex. invasion of the rete testis, tumor size >4cm) present, but is only 12% in those with no risk factors."}, {"name": "Seminom des Hodens", "sub_name": "Testikul\u00e4rer Keimzelltumor, seminomat\u00f6ser", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Testicular seminomatous germ cell tumor is a rare testicular germ cell tumor (see this term), most commonly presenting with a painless mass in the scrotum, with a very high cure rate if caught in the early stages.", "synonyms": "Seminoma of testis, Seminomatous germ cell tumor of testis, Testicular seminoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C62.9", "omim": "273300", "umls": "C0036631", "gard": "4792", "epidemiology": "Annual incidence in Europe is 1/62,000 people. It accounts for 40% of testicular cancer cases.", "clinical_description": "Seminoma usually presents in males between the ages of 30-40. A painless mass in the scrotum is indicative of disease. A long-standing hydrocele may be noted causing a feeling of heaviness in the testicle. Gynecomastia and back and flank pain are symptoms that are seen in some patients. Relapse after surgery can occur, usually (in 97% of cases) in the high iliac or retroperitoneal lymph nodes. Metastasis, although rare, can occur in some cases, affecting the lungs, liver, bones and central nervous system.", "etiology": "Etiology is unknown but tumors are thought to arise from an embryonic germ cell leading to testicular intraepithelial neoplasia (the precursor to classical seminoma). Cryptorchidism is a risk factor for the development of testicular seminomatous germ cell tumors.", "diagnostic_methods": "Ultrasound usually confirms the presence of a testicular mass. Measurement of tumor markers in blood such as alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), beta human chorionic gonadotropin (BHC) and lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) is needed as it can be useful in cases where the tumor is still very small. Classical seminoma does not secrete AFP and patients with raised levels of this tumor marker are given a diagnosis of non-seminoma. After surgical removal of testicle, histopathological characteristics are analyzed and a stage can be assigned. In stage 1 disease the primary tumor is limited to the testis and epididymus with possible invasion of the tunica albuginea, tunica vaginalis, spermatic cord and scrotum but no lymph node or distant metastasis. Stage 2 (2A, 2B and 2C) disease features regional lymph node metastasis and stage 3 has distant metastasis of varying degrees.", "differential_diagnosis": "Testicular non seminomatous germ cell tumors (see this term) must be excluded.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment for stage 1 seminoma involves an orchiectomy or partial orchiectomy in some cases. Most patients (88%) do not require any further treatment and only surveillance is necessary. In those cases where follow up is difficult, adjuvant carboplatin or radiotherapy can be applied. Para-aortic and ipsilateral iliac radiotherapy (30 Gy in 2 Gy fractions) is the standard treatment of stage 2A seminoma. Cisplatin, etoposide and bleomycin (PEB) chemotherapy (three cycles) or cisplatin and etoposide (PE) chemotherapy (4 cycles) is an alternative to radiotherapy (but has more acute toxicity). Those with stage 2B, 2C and stage 3 seminomas are given PEB chemotherapy (three or four cycles depending on prognosis). In those with a reduced lung capacity or with emphysema or in severe smokers, 4 cycles of PE is preferred over PEB. Ifosfamide is given instead of bleomycin in certain cases (i.e. patients with existing lung damage). Follow up and sometimes a PET scan is recommended to monitor for residual lesions. Due to cosmetic and psychological reasons, patients may be offered testicular prostheses after an orchidectomy.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good but depends on the stage of disease with 5- year survival rates as high as 99% in stage 1 disease. Relapse rates at 5 years depend on risk factors (ex. invasion of the rete testis, tumor size >4cm) present, but is only 12% in those with no risk factors."}, {"name": "Seminom, spermatozytisches", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spermatocytic seminoma (SS) is an extremely rare form of testicular cancer distinguished from testicular seminomatous germ cell tumors (see this term) by a very low rate of metastasis and lack of an ovarian equivalent.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "C62.9", "omim": "273300", "umls": "C0334517", "epidemiology": "SS accounts for around 1- 2% of all cases of testicular germ cell tumors (see this term). Annual incidence in Europe is 1/3,300,000.", "clinical_description": "SS presents in males in their fifth to sixth decade of life. A painless mass in the scrotum or an interscrotal mass are indicative of disease. A long-standing hydrocele may be noted causing a feeling of heaviness in the testicle. Gynecomastia and back and flank pain are symptoms that are seen in some patients. The invasion of seminoma into the blood vessels, tunica albuginea and epididymus is rarely seen. In extremely rare instances a sarcomatous transformation can occur which causes the tumor size to rapidly increase along with its propensity for metastasis. In the very few cases that metastasis occurs, this aggressive form of tumor is referred to as metastatic spermatocytic seminoma.", "etiology": "The etiology of SS is unknown. It is thought to originate from a premeiotic germ cell.", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical findings orientate the diagnosis and measurement of tumor marker levels (alpha-fetoprotein) help in the precision of SS diagnosis. Testicular sonogram is also performed while bone scan and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) of the central nervous system is only needed when symptoms of involvement in those areas are seen. Histopathological examination of the testicular mass biopsy confirms SS with the presence of three characteristic cell types: small cells (7-8 \u00b5m) with dark nuclei, medium sized cells (15 \u00b5m) with granular chromatin and eosinophilic cytoplasm in round nuclei and large multinucleated cells (up to 100 \u00b5m).", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include testicular seminomatous germ cell tumors and all types of lymphoma (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment of SS is similar to that of testicular seminomatous germ cell tumors which involves an orchidectomy. As this form of seminoma rarely metastasizes there is usually no further treatment needed but surveillance following surgery is necessary. Patients with the rare metastatic form are given additional chemotherapy (carboplatin) and radiotherapy but no specific treatment regimen has yet been established. Due to cosmetic and psychological reasons, patients may be offered testicular prostheses after an orchidectomy.", "prognosis": "The prognosis for SS is very good as once an orchidectomy is performed most patients are cured."}, {"name": "Seminom, testikul\u00e4res", "sub_name": "Testikul\u00e4rer Keimzelltumor, seminomat\u00f6ser", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Testicular seminomatous germ cell tumor is a rare testicular germ cell tumor (see this term), most commonly presenting with a painless mass in the scrotum, with a very high cure rate if caught in the early stages.", "synonyms": "Seminoma of testis, Seminomatous germ cell tumor of testis, Testicular seminoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C62.9", "omim": "273300", "umls": "C0036631", "gard": "4792", "epidemiology": "Annual incidence in Europe is 1/62,000 people. It accounts for 40% of testicular cancer cases.", "clinical_description": "Seminoma usually presents in males between the ages of 30-40. A painless mass in the scrotum is indicative of disease. A long-standing hydrocele may be noted causing a feeling of heaviness in the testicle. Gynecomastia and back and flank pain are symptoms that are seen in some patients. Relapse after surgery can occur, usually (in 97% of cases) in the high iliac or retroperitoneal lymph nodes. Metastasis, although rare, can occur in some cases, affecting the lungs, liver, bones and central nervous system.", "etiology": "Etiology is unknown but tumors are thought to arise from an embryonic germ cell leading to testicular intraepithelial neoplasia (the precursor to classical seminoma). Cryptorchidism is a risk factor for the development of testicular seminomatous germ cell tumors.", "diagnostic_methods": "Ultrasound usually confirms the presence of a testicular mass. Measurement of tumor markers in blood such as alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), beta human chorionic gonadotropin (BHC) and lactate dehydrogenase (LDH) is needed as it can be useful in cases where the tumor is still very small. Classical seminoma does not secrete AFP and patients with raised levels of this tumor marker are given a diagnosis of non-seminoma. After surgical removal of testicle, histopathological characteristics are analyzed and a stage can be assigned. In stage 1 disease the primary tumor is limited to the testis and epididymus with possible invasion of the tunica albuginea, tunica vaginalis, spermatic cord and scrotum but no lymph node or distant metastasis. Stage 2 (2A, 2B and 2C) disease features regional lymph node metastasis and stage 3 has distant metastasis of varying degrees.", "differential_diagnosis": "Testicular non seminomatous germ cell tumors (see this term) must be excluded.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment for stage 1 seminoma involves an orchiectomy or partial orchiectomy in some cases. Most patients (88%) do not require any further treatment and only surveillance is necessary. In those cases where follow up is difficult, adjuvant carboplatin or radiotherapy can be applied. Para-aortic and ipsilateral iliac radiotherapy (30 Gy in 2 Gy fractions) is the standard treatment of stage 2A seminoma. Cisplatin, etoposide and bleomycin (PEB) chemotherapy (three cycles) or cisplatin and etoposide (PE) chemotherapy (4 cycles) is an alternative to radiotherapy (but has more acute toxicity). Those with stage 2B, 2C and stage 3 seminomas are given PEB chemotherapy (three or four cycles depending on prognosis). In those with a reduced lung capacity or with emphysema or in severe smokers, 4 cycles of PE is preferred over PEB. Ifosfamide is given instead of bleomycin in certain cases (i.e. patients with existing lung damage). Follow up and sometimes a PET scan is recommended to monitor for residual lesions. Due to cosmetic and psychological reasons, patients may be offered testicular prostheses after an orchidectomy.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good but depends on the stage of disease with 5- year survival rates as high as 99% in stage 1 disease. Relapse rates at 5 years depend on risk factors (ex. invasion of the rete testis, tumor size >4cm) present, but is only 12% in those with no risk factors."}, {"name": "SENDA", "sub_name": "Beta-propeller-Protein-assoziierte Neurodegeneration", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Beta-propeller protein-associated neurodegeneration (BPAN), also known as static encephalopathy of childhood with neurodegeneration in adulthood, is a rare form of neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation (NBIA) characterized by early-onset developmental delay and further neurological deterioration in early adulthood.", "synonyms": "BPAN, NBIA5, Neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation type 5, SENDA, Static encephalopathy of childhood with neurodegeneration in adulthood, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G23.0", "omim": "300894", "gard": "12570"}, {"name": "Senear-Usher-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Pemphigus erythematosus", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare superficial pemphigus disease characterized clinically by well-demarcated, localized, erythematous, scaly, hyperkeratotic, crusted plaques, with frequent butterfly distribution over the malar area of the face (but also commonly involving trunk and scalp, and less frequently the extremities, with a photoexposed distribution). Histologically, granular deposits along the dermal-epidermal junction, in addition to intercellular deposition in the upper epidermis, are observed.", "synonyms": "Seborrheic pemphigus, Senear-Usher syndrome, ", "icd_10": "L10.4", "umls": "C0263312", "meddra": "10058917"}, {"name": "Seneszierende T-Zellen, Lymphadenopathie und Immundefizienz durch p110delta-aktivierende Mutationen", "sub_name": "Aktivierendes PIK3-delta-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, primary immunodeficiency disease characterized by increased susceptibility to recurrent and/or severe bacterial and viral infections (in particular, sinopulmonary bacterial and herpesvirus infections), chronic benign lymphoproliferation (manifesting as lymphadenopathy, hepatosplenomegaly and focal nodular lymphoid hyperplasia), and/or autoimmune disease (including immune cytopenias, juvenile arthritis, glomerulonephritis and sclerosing cholangitis). Immunophenotypically, variable degrees of agammaglobulinemia with increased IgM levels, increased circulating transitional B cells, decreased na\u00efve CD4 and CD8 T-cells with increased CD8 effector/memory T cells are observed.", "synonyms": "APDS, Senescent T-cells-lymphadenopathy-immunodeficiency syndrome due to p110delta-activating mutation, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adult", "icd_10": "D81.8", "omim": "615513\u00a0 616005", "umls": "C3714976", "gard": "11983"}, {"name": "Sengers-Hamel-Otten-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hydrozephalus - Adipositas - Hypogonadismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sengers-Hamel-Otten-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "GARD": "2775", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von angeborenem Hydrozephalus, zentripetaler Adipositas, Hypogonadismus, intellektuellem Defizit und Kleinwuchs. Es wurde bei 2 m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten aus 1 Familie beschrieben. X-chromosomal-rezessive Vererbung ist m\u00f6glich. "}, {"name": "Sengers-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kongenitale Katarakt-hypertrophe Kardiomyopathie-mitochondriale Myopathie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Katarakt-Kardiomyopathie-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale Katarakt, hypertrophische Kardiomyopathie, mitochondriale Myopathie und Laktatazidose. Seit 1975 wurden aus den Niederlanden, Schweiz, Kanada und Island etwa 30 betroffene Kinder in 15 Geschwisterreihen beschrieben. Das klinische Bild wird durch die hypertrophische Kardiomyopathie dominiert. Die Patienten entwickeln schon bei sub-maximaler k\u00f6rperlicher Belastung eine Laktatazidose. Histologisch zeigen Skelett- und Herzmuskulatur mitochondriale Anomalien und Lipid- und Glykogenspeicherung. In den ersten Lebenswochen entwickelt sich eine beidseitige totale Katarakt, schreitet rasch fort und erfordert eine Operation. Sp\u00e4ter treten Nystagmus und Strabismus auf. Die Intelligenz ist normal. Die Kardiomyopathie ist progredient und kann zu vorzeitigem Tod f\u00fchren, entweder in der Neugeborenenzeit oder im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter. Der \u00e4lteste lebende Patient war 37 Jahre alt. Bei vielen Patienten wird \u00fcber rasche Erm\u00fcdbarkeit berichtet, und es wird empfohlen, starke k\u00f6rperliche Belastungen zu vermeiden. Weitere hervorstechende Symptome sind Muskelhypotonie und verz\u00f6gerte motorische Entwicklung. Schon bei leichten Belastungen kommt es zu ausgepr\u00e4gter Laktatvermehrung im Blut. Die Symptome des Sengers-Syndroms lassen an eine mitochondriale Krankheit denken. Erstmals 1997 wurde dar\u00fcber berichtet, dass an der \u00c4tiologie der Kardiomyopathie mit Katarakten freie Sauerstoff-Radikale beteiligt sind. Die Autoren zeigten, dass der Komplex I-Mangel mit massiver \u00dcberproduktion von Hydroxyl-Radikalen einhergeht und zu starker Lipid-Peroxidation f\u00fchrt. Die Aktivit\u00e4t der Pyruvat-Oxidation und anderer mitochondrialer Enzyme wurde normal gefunden. Da mehrfach \u00fcber betroffene Geschwister mit blutsverwandten Eltern berichtet wurde, ist anzunehmen, dass das Katarakt-Kardiomyopathie-Syndrom autosomal-rezessiv vererbt wird. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Congenital cataract - hypertrophic cardiomyopathy - mitochrondrial myopathy (CCM) is a mitochondrial disease (see this term) characterized by cataracts, hypertrophic cardiomyopathy, muscle weakness and lactic acidosis after exercise.", "synonyms": "Sengers syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "212350\u00a0 615418", "umls": "C1859317", "mesh": "C538280", "gard": "1142", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of CCM is unknown; approximately 40 cases have been reported to date in disparate locations throughout the world.", "clinical_description": "Clinical features include congenital cataract (total or rapidly progressive), hypertrophic cardiomyopathy, muscle weakness and lactic acidosis after exercise. CCM may present in two forms, a neonatal lethal form or a chronic form. Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy is diagnosed at birth in half of the patients in both forms. Approximately half of the patients die within the first year of life due to cardiac failure. Nystagmus, strabismus, hypotonia, hyporeflexia and delayed motor development are occasional features. Marked lactic acidemia occurs with even limited muscular exertion. Patients who survive neonatal period and infancy, manifest the chronic form with stable cardiomyopathy and myopathy and have a normal intellect. Physical mobility is impaired due to muscular weakness in most patients.", "etiology": "In the majority of CCM patients mutations (nonsense, frame-shift, start codon or splice site) in the AGK gene have been identified. The AGK gene encodes the mitochondrial acylglycerol kinase which plays a role in the assembly of adenine nucleotide translocator (ANT), an essential component of the oxidative phosphorylation in mitochondria. Two patients with distinct autosomal recessive SLC25A4 mutations have been reported (one of whom had cardiomyopathy but not cataract). The SLC25A4 gene encodes the heart and muscle specific isoform 1 of the mitochondrial ANT. The etiology remains genetically unsolved in the rest of cases of CCM. The milder affected individuals carried either splice site or start codon mutations.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostic procedures include serum and urine analysis for lactic acid, radiology and echocardiogram for findings of cardiomyopathy. Muscle biopsy from cardiac and skeletal muscle reveals storage of lipid and glycogen, mitochondrial abnormalities, ANT deficiency and mild decrease of respiratory chain complexes I and IV. Genetic testing may reveal autosomal recessive mutations in AGK  and SLC25A4 and it should be considered early in diagnostic workup.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include mitochondrial encephalo-cardio-myopathy due to TMEM70 deficiency, isolated ATP synthase deficiency and Barth syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal genetic testing may be possible for families with affected children.", "genetic_counseling": "The reported mutations are transmitted in an autosomal recessive manner.", "management_and_treatment": "CCM patients require cataract surgery during infancy and medical management of cardiomyopathy with standard therapy. Patients may require palliative care and a wheelchair for locomotion.", "prognosis": "Approximately half of the reported patients die in the first year of life due to cardiac failure. The longest surviving patients are in their fifth decade of life."}, {"name": "Senile systemische Amyloidose", "sub_name": "Wildtyp-ATTR-Amyloidose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A common form of systemic amyloidosis characterized by deposition of wild type transthyretin predominantly in the heart and the soft tissues (mainly the carpal tunnel region, lumbar canal and tendons).", "synonyms": "ATTRwt amyloidosis, ATTRwt-related amyloidosis, Senile systemic amyloidosis, Wild type ATTR-related amyloidosis, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "E85.8", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of wild type ATTR amyloidosis (ATTRwt amyloidosis) is estimated, on average, at 1/5,800 worldwide. In autopsy studies, fibrillar deposits of transthyretin were found in the heart of 25% of elderly people. Many recent reports evaluated the incidence of this disease in patients with heart failure and preserved ejection fraction. In this subset, the incidence could rise to 13% of cases. The disease is more frequent in males.", "clinical_description": "The disease onset is generally after the age of 60. The clinical picture is dominated by manifestations of cardiac failure as shortness of breath, leg swelling, fatigue, nausea and an irregular heartbeat or palpitations. Progressive renal failure may also occur during the disease history. In some cases, history of carpal tunnel syndrome or lumbar canal stenosis may precede the cardiac failure symptoms by 8-10 years.", "etiology": "ATTRwt amyloidosis is caused by the dissociation of transthyretin (TTR) from tetramers to monomers, which leads to misfolding and aggregation as amyloid fibrils in the heart. Amyloid deposits can infiltrate any cardiac tissue including the conduction system, the myocardium and the vessels and it can translate in severe diastolic or systolic dysfunction.", "diagnostic_methods": "Suspicion of ATTRwt amyloidosis is generally raised by echocardiogram or cardiac magnetic resonance (CMR). Confirmation of diagnosis requires scintigraphy with bone radiotracers, that show increased myocardial and decreased bone uptake of the radiolabeled drug. DNA analysis is also required in order to exclude inherited forms of cardiac ATTR. In patients with a concomitant monoclonal gammopathy or an abnormal serum free light chain ratio, demonstration and typing of amyloid deposits is mandatory. Abdominal fat pad aspirate is non-invasive but has relatively low diagnostic sensitivity in ATTRwt. Endomyocardial biopsy can be considered in selected cases. The severity of the disease should be graded. The combination of cardiac biomarkers, N-terminal pro natriuretic peptide type B (NT-proBNP) and troponin, or NT-proBNP and the estimated glomerular filtration rate (eGFR), accurately predict the prognosis of this disease at the time of diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other forms of cardiac amyloidosis (light chain, AL and mutated forms of ATTRv) and other types of cardiomyopathy.", "management_and_treatment": "Currently, the goal of treatment is to manage cardiac dysfunction in order to reduce the burden of symptoms. Treatment of heart failure based on diuretics, has a central role. The only specific approved drug for the treatment of ATTRwt is tafamidis which stabilizes TTR proteins, reduces the misfolding and accumulation of amyloid deposits in tissue, and thereby slows progression of heart failure. Many other disease specific therapeutic agents (other TTR stabilizers, TTR gene silencers and amyloid fibrils degraders) are under investigation in clinical trials.", "prognosis": "Natural history of the disease is characterized by a slow but inevitable progression of heart failure. The severity of cardiac dysfunction, as assessed by cardiac biomarkers and estimated glomerular filtration rate, is the major prognostic determinant. The impact of the use of specific disease modifier drugs in the real-world setting is still under investigation but it will probably change the course of the disease in the upcoming future."}, {"name": "Senior-Boichis-Syndrom", "german_description": "Als Boichis-Syndrom wird das gemeinsame Auftreten einer zum Nierenversagen f\u00fchrenden kongenitalen Nephronophthise und Leberfibrose bezeichnet. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei 5 Mitgliedern beschrieben, zwei von ihnen starben im Nierenversagen. Bei zus\u00e4tzlicher Manifestation einer tapeto-retinalen Degeneration und geistiger Behinderung spricht man vom sog. Senior-Boichis-Syndrom. Es wurde in 1 Familie und sp\u00e4ter noch bei einem 12 Jahre alten Kind beschrieben. Evtl. handelt es sich bei beiden Syndromen um die gleiche Entit\u00e4t. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ciliopathy characterized by the association of nephronophthisis and liver fibrosis. Renal manifestations include chronic renal failure, polyuria, polydipsia, anemia, as well as increased echogenicity on renal ultrasound and interstitial fibrosis and tubular dilation on biopsy. Hepatic involvement manifests as hepatosplenomegaly with extensive fibrosis, destruction of the bile ducts, and cholestasis. Mild psychomotor retardation and ocular symptoms, such as strabismus, nystagmus, retinal degeneration, and anisocoria, have been reported in some patients.", "synonyms": "Boichis disease, Nephronophthisis-hepatic fibrosis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q61.8", "omim": "613550\u00a0 616217"}, {"name": "Senior-Loken-Syndrom", "german_description": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der weltweiten Pr\u00e4valenz liegen bei etwa 1:1,000,000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive oculo-renal ciliopathy characterized by the association of nephronophthisis (NPHP), a chronic kidney disease, with retinal dystrophy.", "synonyms": "Nephronophthisis with retinal dystrophy, Renal dysplasia-retinal aplasia syndrome, SLSN, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q61.5", "omim": "266900\u00a0 606995\u00a0 606996\u00a0 609254\u00a0 610189\u00a0 613615\u00a0 614845\u00a0 616307\u00a0 616629", "umls": "C0403553", "mesh": "C537580", "gard": "322", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence is estimated at around 1/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "The disease typically presents in the first two decades of life as a combination of nephronophthisis (NPH) with retinal degeneration. Depending on the genetic background either the visual disorder or chronic kidney disease determine the clinical picture. NPH typically presents with symptoms such as polyuria, polydipsia, secondary enuresis and anemia. Chronic kidney disease usually slowly progresses to end-stage kidney disease (ESKD). Ocular features include congenital or early-onset severe visual loss due to retinal dystrophy (Leber congenital amaurosis) or a milder phenotype determined by a slowly progressing tube-like restriction of visual fields and night blindness (tapeto-retinal degeneration). Funduscopy reveals various degrees of atrophic and pigmentary retinal alterations. In rare occasions, other additional clinical signs may be observed like liver fibrosis, obesity and neurologic disorders.", "etiology": "Senior-Loken syndrome (SLS) is a genetically heterogeneous ciliopathy. Mutations in 10 different genes (NPHP1, INVS, NPHP3, NPHP4, IQCB1, CEP290, SDCCAG8, WDR19, CEP164 and TRAF3IP1) have been described. These genes encode for proteins of the primary cilia playing key roles in the development and function of several cell types, including retinal photoreceptor and renal tubular epithelial cells. Epistatic interactions, oligogenic inheritance or modifying alleles have been also suggested to influence the expressivity of the different extrarenal phenotypes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Complete renal (kidney function, urinary analysis and abdominal ultrasound) and ophthalmologic (funduscopy, visual acuity test, refraction defects, color vision test, ocular motility and electroretinogram) evaluations are recommended. Hepatic evaluation to exclude liver fibrosis (liver function and abdominal ultrasounds) and neurological examination for infant patients are also highly recommended. Genetic diagnosis of SLS requires the mutational screening of the implicated genes; deletion of the NPHP1 gene is the most common anomaly.", "differential_diagnosis": "SLS presents genetic and clinical overlap with other ciliopathies, in particular with isolated NPH and Joubert syndrome related diseases (JSRD) such as Joubert syndrome with oculorenal defect, Bardet-Biedl syndrome (BBS) and Alstr\u00f6m syndrome. Physical examination should consider the presence of the main clinical signs of JSRD (hypotonia, ataxia and breathing abnormalities in infants) and BBS (polydactyly and obesity). The phenotypic hallmark of JSRD is the presence of a 'molar tooth sign' (a midbrain-hindbrain malformation) on MRI. Other extrarenal signs to consider are nystagmus, psychomotor and learning delay, diabetes mellitus, deafness, hypogonadism, and/or scoliosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is feasible only when the genetic mutation has been previously identified in another member of the family.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission of SLS is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. Where both parents are unaffected carriers, the risk of disease transmission to offspring is 25%. Offspring of an affected individual are obligate carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "Regular follow up by a pediatric nephrologist is recommended with the monitoring of growth, blood pressure, renal function (including urinary concentration and sodium excretion). In order to delay the progression of renal failure and minimize possible complications, early management of NPH is necessary. So far, there is no specific therapy correcting the genetic or functional defects in NPH. Thus, in the early stage of renal disease the main goal is the correction of water and electrolyte imbalances by replacing the ongoing loss of water and salt. Once end-stage renal disease is reached, dialysis and renal transplantation are the therapies of choice. Disease does not recur after kidney transplantation. No treatment is currently available to prevent the progression of visual loss.", "prognosis": "Prognosis mostly depends on the progression of the disease in the two affected organs (kidney and eye)."}, {"name": "Senior-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Brachymorphie-Onychodysplasie-Dysphalangie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Brachymorphie-Onychodysplasie-Dysphalangie-Syndrom (BOD) ist ein sehr seltenes Fehlbildungs-Syndrom und gekennzeichnet durch Kleinwuchs, hypoplastische Kleinfinger mit kleinen dysplastischen N\u00e4geln, faziale Dysmorphien (grobe Gesichtsz\u00fcge, breiter Mund, breite Nase) und leichte intellektuelle Behinderung. Es wird vermutet, dass das Coffin-Siris-Syndrom (s. dort) und das BOD -Syndrom evtl. allelische Varianten sind.", "synonyms": "BOD-Syndrom, Senior-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "113477", "UMLS": "C1862082", "MeSH": "C536242", "GARD": "918"}, {"name": "Sensenbrenner-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, kranioektodermale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Kranioektodermale Dysplasie (CED) ist eine seltene Entwicklungst\u00f6rung mit angeborenen Defekten des Skeletts und Ektoderms, Dysmorphien, Nephronophthise, Leberfibrose und Augenanomalien (haupts\u00e4chlich Retinitis pigmentosa).", "synonyms": "CED, Sensenbrenner-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "OMIM": "218330\u00a0 613610\u00a0 614099\u00a0 614378\u00a0 617102", "UMLS": "C0432235", "GARD": "359", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die CED ist prim\u00e4r gekennzeichnet durch eine abnorme Entwicklung der Knochen (Kraniosynostose/Dolichozephalie, enger Thorax, Pectus excavatum, rhizomele Mikromelie, Brachydaktylie, Syndaktylie, Klinodaktylie, \u00fcberstreckbare Gelenke) und ektodermale Defekte wie Zahnanomalien (d\u00fcnner Zahnschmelz, Hypodontie, Mikrodontie, Taurodontie, fehlgebildete Zahnkronen), sp\u00e4rliches Haar und abnorme Finger- und Zehenn\u00e4gel. Beschriebene Dysmorphien sind: Epikanthus, Hypotelorismus, antevertierte Nares und evertierte Unterlippe. Verursacht durch Nephronophthise kommt es bei den Patienten h\u00e4ufig zur chronischen Niereninsuffizienz, in der Regel im Alter zwischen 2 und 6 Jahren. Auch eine Leberbeteiligung (Leberfibrose) ist m\u00f6glich. Im Verlauf der Krankheit k\u00f6nnen sich rezidivierende Lungeninfekte, Herzfehler und Augenanomalien (Nystagmus, Myopie, Netzhautdystrophie und besonders Retinitis pigmentosa) entwickeln.", "etiology": "Die CED ist eine genetisch heterogene Krankheit aus der Gruppe der Ziliopathien. Ursache sind Mutationen in den Genen IFT122 (3q21), IFT43 (14q24.3), WDR19 (4p14-p11) und WDR35 (2p14.1), die am Transport innerhalb der Flagellen (IFT) beteiligt sind. Dieser genetische Hintergrund erkl\u00e4rt den pleiotropen Ph\u00e4notyp der CED, der Symptome verschiedener Ziliopathien vereinigt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf der klinischen Untersuchung. Bildgebung (Ultraschall), Laboruntersuchungen (Urinanalyse, Serumelektrolyte und Lipidprofil), histologische Untersuchungen und Leberfunktionstests erm\u00f6glichen die Erkennung von Funktionsst\u00f6rungen der Nieren und der Leber. Untersuchungen des Augenhintergrundes und Elektroretinographie erweitern das diagnostische Spektrum.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen der CED sind Jeune-Syndrom (s. dort), von dem es durch das Vorhandensein von Kraniosynostose und Haut- und Zahndysplasie unterschieden wird. Die Symptome der CED \u00fcberschneiden sich auch mit dem Ellis van Creveld-Syndrom (s. dort), bei dem ebenfalls ektodermale Defekte und ein schmaler Thorax bestehen.", "genetic_counseling": "In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist die Vererbung autosomal-rezessiv.", "management_and_treatment": "In vielen F\u00e4llen verschlechtert sich die Nierenfunktion schnell und erfordert die Behandlung der metabolischen Azidose, orale Kochsalz-Supplementierung und sp\u00e4ter, im Fall des terminalen Nierenversagen, Dialyse und Nierentransplantation.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch eventuelle lebensbedrohliche St\u00f6rungen der Nieren-, Herz- und Lungenfunktion bestimmt", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Sensorimotorische Neuropathie mit hyperelastischer Haut, heredit\u00e4re Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hereditary sensorimotor neuropathy with hyperelastic skin is a rare, genetic, demyelinating hereditary motor and sensory neuropathy disorder characterized by slowly progressive, mild to moderate, distal muscle weakness and atrophy of the upper and lower limbs and variable distal sensory impairment, associated with variable hyperextensible skin and age-related macular degeneration. Hypermobility of distal joints, high palate, and minor skeletal abnormalities (e.g. pectus excavatum, dolichocephaly) may also be associated.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G60.0", "omim": "608895", "gard": "11010"}, {"name": "Sensorineuraler H\u00f6rverlust-Katarakt-Skelettanomalien-Kardiomyopathie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Nathalie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic developmental defect during embryogenesis disorder characterized by sensorineural hearing impairment, childhood-onset cataract, underdeveloped secondary sexual characteristics, spinal muscular atrophy, growth retardation, and cardiac and skeletal anomalies. Sudden death, as well as fatal cardiomyopathy and heart failure, have been described in some cases.", "synonyms": "Deafness-cataract-skeletal anomalies syndrome, Sensorineural hearing loss-cataract-skeletal anomalies-cardiomyopathy syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "255990", "umls": "C1850626", "mesh": "C538342", "gard": "3929"}, {"name": "Sensorineuraler H\u00f6rverlust-Thrombozytopenie-Syndrom, DIAPH1-assoziiertes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by progressive and severe sensorineural hearing loss with onset in the first decade of life, associated with mild thrombocytopenia, often with enlarged platelets. Most patients do not show significant bleeding tendency.", "synonyms": "DIAPH1-related sensorineural deafness-thrombocytopenia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "H90.3", "omim": "124900"}, {"name": "Sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - fr\u00fches Ergrauen - essentieller Tremor", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch die Kombination von sensorisch-neuraler Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, fr\u00fchem Ergrauen der Kopfhaare und im Erwachsenenalter beginnendem essentiellen Tremor. Es wurde bei drei nicht verwandten Individuen beschrieben. Andere Mitglieder der Familien manifestierten diese drei Zeichen in unterschiedlicher Auspr\u00e4gung. Es scheint, das Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant mit variabler Expressivit\u00e4t vererbt. Ein urs\u00e4chliches Gen wurde noch nicht gefunden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by the triad of adult-onset moderate to severe bilateral sensorineural hearing loss, premature graying of scalp hair, and essential tremor manifesting as involuntary shaking of the head. Additional pigmentation abnormalities have not been reported in this syndrome.", "synonyms": "Sensorineural deafness-early graying-essential tremor syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "H90.3"}, {"name": "Sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit mit Anus imperforatus und hypoplastischen Daumen", "sub_name": "Townes-Brocks-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Townes-Brocks-Syndrom ist eine autosomal-dominant vererbte Krankheit mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz aber sehr variabler Expressivit\u00e4t. Die 4 haupts\u00e4chlichen Zeichen sind: (i) anale Fehlbildungen (von einfacher Vorverlagerung bis zu Anus imperforatus mit rektovaginaler Fistel), (ii) Fehlbildungen des \u00e4u\u00dferen Ohrs (pr\u00e4aurikul\u00e4re Anh\u00e4ngsel, malformierte Ohrmuschel, Stenose des \u00e4u\u00dferen Geh\u00f6rganges), (iii) Anomalien der Finger (dreigliedriger Daumen, gespaltener Daumen, Hexadaktylie) und (iv) alle Arten und Auspr\u00e4gungen von Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit. Auch Fehlbildungen der F\u00fc\u00dfe, der Nieren und des Herzens werden gesehen. Das Syndrom wird sehr wahrscheinlich zu selten diagnostiziert, seine Pr\u00e4valenz ist daher schwer zu bestimmen. Etwa 100 Patienten wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben. Eine eingeschr\u00e4nkte Lebenserwartung haben nur die Patienten mit schweren Herzfehlern und Nierenfehlbildungen. Nach der Operation schwerer analer Fehlbildungen kann sich eine Enkopresis entwickeln. Fehlbildungen des Radius und der Ohren k\u00f6nnen chirurgisch korrigiert werden. Die Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit mu\u00df von einem multidisziplin\u00e4ren Team versorgt werden. Ursache des Syndroms sind Mutationen des SALL1-Gens in der Chromosomenregion 16q12.1. Es kodiert f\u00fcr einen Transkriptionsfaktor. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disorder characterized by the triad of imperforate anus, dysplastic ears often associated with sensorineural and/or conductive hearing impairment, and thumb malformations. These features are often associated with other signs mainly affecting the kidneys and heart.", "synonyms": "Imperforate anus-hand, foot and ear anomalies syndrome, REAR syndrome, Renal-ear-anal-radial syndrome, Sensorineural deafness with imperforate anus and hypoplastic thumbs, Sensorineural hearing loss with imperforate anus and hypoplastic thumbs, TBS, Townes syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "107480\u00a0 617466", "umls": "C0265246", "mesh": "C536974", "gard": "7784", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of TBS is unknown. An estimate of 1/250,000 has been reported. More than 100 cases have been reported to date. Exact prevalence is difficult to determine because of overlap with other similar syndromes.", "clinical_description": "The clinical presentation is variable, even within the same family. Most patients present with imperforate anus (82%), dysplastic ears manifesting as overfolded superior helices and preauricular tags with hearing impairment (65%), and thumb malformations (89%), including triphalangeal thumbs, preaxial polydactyly, and rarely hypoplasia. Other common associated manifestations are renal dysfunction (27%), including end-stage renal disease (ESRD) (42%), with or without structural abnormalities, congenital heart disease (25%), foot malformations (52%) involving flat feet or overlapping toes, and genitourinary malformations such as hypospadias, vaginal aplasia with bifid uterus, bifid scrotum, and cryptorchidism (36%). Rare manifestations are ophthalmological (iris coloboma, microphthalmia, lamellar cataract, and chorioretinal coloboma with loss of vision), renal (kidney agenesis/hypoplasia, polycystic kidneys), and cardiac (atrial or ventricular septal defect, tetralogy of Fallot, lethal truncus arteriosus, pulmonary valve atresia, and persistent ductus arteriosus). Additional rare features are gastrointestinal (anal stenosis, chronic constipation, gastroesophageal reflux) and CNS-related including Duane anomaly (see this term), Type I Arnold-Chiari malformation, intellectual deficit (10%), behavioral disorders, cranial nerve palsy, and hypoplasia of the dorsal part of corpus callosum. Rib and mild vertebral anomalies, growth retardation, and congenital hypothyroidism have been reported in rare cases.", "etiology": "TBS is caused by mutations in the SALL1 gene (16q12.1). Over 70 nonsense, frameshift, and splice mutations have been identified. Large or full deletions have also been described. Some patients with clinical TBS carry a causative mutation in SALL4 rather than SALL1.", "diagnostic_methods": "The clinical diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings. However, some patients carry SALL1 mutations but present only with a subset of these anomalies. Identification of a mutation confirms the clinical diagnosis. Corresponding sequencing and qRT-PCR/MLPA techniques are clinically available to detect gene mutations. Array CGH/SNP array is recommended to determine the extent and gene content of larger deletions.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include VACTERL/VATER association, Okihiro syndrome, and Goldenhar syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis for pregnancies at increased risk is available and usually requires identification of the disease-causing mutation in the family. However, if typical malformations are seen on prenatal ultrasound, complete analysis of the SALL1 gene is also possible from prenatal samples.", "genetic_counseling": "TBS follows an autosomal dominant pattern of inheritance and about 50% of cases are de novo. Genetic counseling should be provided.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment involves immediate surgery to correct imperforate anus, with subsequent surgery for severe malformations of the hands and feet. Routine management of congenital heart defects is recommended. Hemodialysis and possible kidney transplantation may be required. Early treatment of hearing loss is essential.", "prognosis": "The physical prognosis depends on the severity of the associated renal and cardiac signs. A prognosis with respect to intellectual development is not possible."}, {"name": "Sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit mit dilatativer Kardiomyopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit mit dilatativer Kardiomyopathie , ein extem seltenes, autosomal-dominant vererbtes Syndrom, wurde bisher in nur 2 Familien beschrieben. Kennzeichnend sind: Moderate bis schwere, im Kindesalter beginnende Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit und sp\u00e4t beginnende dilatative Kardiomyopathie, die in der Regel bis zur Herzinsuffizienz fortschreitet.", "synonyms": "Innenohrschwerh\u00f6rigkeit mit dilatativer Kardiomyopathie, Neurosensorischer H\u00f6rverlust mit dilatativer Kardiomyopathie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "I42.0", "OMIM": "605362"}, {"name": "Sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale, mitochondriale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Isolierte mitochondriale neurosensorische Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Isolierter neurosensorischer H\u00f6rverlust, mitochondrial bedingt, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Mitochondriale Vererbung\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "H90.3", "OMIM": "221745\u00a0 304400\u00a0 500008\u00a0 580000", "UMLS": "C1857332", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nicht-syndromale, genetisch-bedingte"}, {"name": "Sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Thrombozytopenie-Syndrom, DIAPH1-assoziiertes", "sub_name": "Sensorineuraler H\u00f6rverlust-Thrombozytopenie-Syndrom, DIAPH1-assoziiertes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by progressive and severe sensorineural hearing loss with onset in the first decade of life, associated with mild thrombocytopenia, often with enlarged platelets. Most patients do not show significant bleeding tendency.", "synonyms": "DIAPH1-related sensorineural deafness-thrombocytopenia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "H90.3", "omim": "124900"}, {"name": "Senter-Syndrom", "sub_name": "KID-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Hystrixartige Ichthyosis Typ Rheydt, KID/HID-Syndrom, Keratitis-(hystrix-\u00e4hnliche) Ichthyose-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Syndrom\u00a0, Senter-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.8", "OMIM": "148210\u00a0 242150\u00a0 602540", "UMLS": "C0265336\u00a0 C3665333", "GARD": "3113", "MedDRA": "10048786", "summary": "Das Keratitis-(hystrix-\u00e4hnliche) Ichthyose-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit (deafness)-Syndrom (KID/HID) ist eine seltene kongenitale ektodermale Krankheit mit vaskularisierender Keratitis, hyperkeratotischen Hautl\u00e4sionen und H\u00f6rverlust. Weniger als 100 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Die Patienten fallen meist schon bei der Geburt mit generalisiertem Erythem und ichthyosiformer Schuppung auf. Die Hautver\u00e4nderungen (Erythrokeratodermie mit scharf begrenzten erythemat\u00f6sen und keratotischen Plaques mit verruk\u00f6sem Aussehen vor allem im Gesicht, an Kopfhaut, Ohren, Ellenbogen und Knien) sind progredient. Andere Hautver\u00e4nderungen bei einigen F\u00e4llen sind: Tiefe Furchen um den Mund; palmo-plantare Hyperkeratose (PPHK) mit ledriger, k\u00f6rniger Keratodermie; follikul\u00e4re HK am Stamm und stachelige HK (hystrix-\u00e4hnliche Ichthyose). Die Hautver\u00e4nderungen sind infektionsanf\u00e4llig, \u00fcber seltene F\u00e4lle mit schweren, rezidivierenden Infektionen und Sepsis wurde berichtet. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind auch Nageldystrophie, Alopezie, sp\u00e4rliche oder fehlende Augenbrauen und Wimpern. Patienten mit KID/HID haben ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko f\u00fcr Plattenepithel- und Zungenkarzinome. Die Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit ist angeboren, meist sensorisch-neural und oft hochgradig. Augensymptome k\u00f6nnen bei einigen Patienten fehlen, wenn sie aber bestehen, liegt der Beginn meist in der Kindheit oder der Adoleszenz, mit Photophobie, punktf\u00f6rmiger Keratitis und progredienter Vaskularisierung der Kornea mit Verlust der Sehf\u00e4higkeit. Der gleichzeitige Verlust des H\u00f6r- und Sehverm\u00f6gens kann eine schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung zur Folge haben. Bei einigen F\u00e4llen wurden auch zerebell\u00e4re und neuromuskul\u00e4re Defekte beschrieben. Ursache des KID/HID-Syndroms sind Mutationen im GJB2-Gens (13q11-q12) des Genproduktes Connexin-26. Ein Patient mit KID und Atrichie hatte eine Mutation im GJB6-Gen (13q12), das f\u00fcr Connexin-30 kodiert. Die meisten publizierten F\u00e4lle waren sporadisch, famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle folgten autosomal-dominanter Vererbung. Beschrieben wurden auch einige F\u00e4lle von KID-Syndrom mit elterlichem Keimzellmosaik des GJB2-Gens. Die Verdachtsdiagnose folgt aus den dermatologischen, ophthalmologischen und audiologischen Befunden. Die histologischen Befunde (Akanthose und orthokeratotische HK) sind unspezifisch. Zum Nachweis von Kleinhirnanomalien kann MRI erforderlich sein. Die Diagnose wird durch molekulare Analyse best\u00e4tigt. Differentialdiagnostisch abzugrenzen sind Krankheiten aus der Gruppe der Erythrokeratodermien, sowie das Clouston-Syndrom und die Keratosis follicularis spinulosa decalvans. Den Familien muss eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden. Das Wiederholungsrisiko f\u00fcr Kinder betroffener Eltern betr\u00e4gt 50%. Segmentale Hautver\u00e4nderungen k\u00f6nnen Ausdruck eines somatischen Mosaiks sein. Wegen der gleichzeitigen M\u00f6glichkeit eines Keimzellmosaiks haben Kinder ein Risiko, die generalisierte Form zu erben. Wenn bei einem Indexfall (mit generalisierter oder segmentaler Form) die urs\u00e4chliche Mutation bekannt ist, kann der Familie eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose angeboten werden. Nur eine symptomatische Behandlung ist m\u00f6glich. Die systemische Anwendung von Retinoiden bei Patienten mit KID/HID ist umstritten. Eine Reihe von Autoren empfiehlt, stattdessen die Hautmanifestationen ausschlie\u00dflich topisch (milde Emollientia und Keratolytika) zu behandeln. KID/HID-Patienten sollten regelm\u00e4\u00dfig in Hinblick auf ein m\u00f6gliches Schleimhautkarzinom untersucht werden. Empfohlen werden sorgf\u00e4ltige Augen- und HNO-Verlaufskontrollen und die Aufnahme der Patienten in Entwicklungsprogramme f\u00fcr kombinierten H\u00f6r- und Sehverlust. In einigen F\u00e4llen waren Cochlea-Implantate hilfreich. Die Prognose der Patienten mit KID/HID-Syndrom ist unterschiedlich. Zwar sind F\u00e4lle mit letalem Ausgang selten, aber die Hautver\u00e4nderungen bleiben bestehen, sind oft schwerwiegend und durch rezidivierende Infektionen kompliziert, und es besteht ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko f\u00fcr Schleimhautkarzinome."}, {"name": "SEOAN durch MFN2-Mangel", "sub_name": "Schwere fr\u00fch-beginnende axonale Neuropathie durch MFN2-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene axonale heredit\u00e4re motorische und sensorische Neuropathie, die durch fr\u00fch einsetzende (<10 Jahre) progressive distale Muskelschw\u00e4che und Muskelschwund der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und sp\u00e4ter (in geringerem Ausma\u00df) auch der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen gekennzeichnet ist. Die Krankheit manifestiert sich durch Fallhand und H\u00e4ngefu\u00df, Areflexie, Skelettdeformit\u00e4ten (Kyphoskoliose, Pes cavus, Gelenkkontrakturen), leichten sensorischen Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen, bei denen der Vibrationssinn st\u00e4rker eingeschr\u00e4nkt ist als der Schmerzsinn, Optikusatrophie und H\u00f6rverlust. In der Regel werden die Patienten bis zum Jugendalter rollstuhlabh\u00e4ngig und m\u00f6glicherweise entwickeln sich Atemprobleme mit L\u00e4hmungen des Zwerchfells.", "synonyms": "AR-CMT2, Typ Ouvrier, Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit, autosomal-rezessive, Typ Ouvrier, SEOAN durch MFN2-Mangel, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G60.0"}, {"name": "SEOAN durch NEFL-Mangel", "sub_name": "Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 2B5", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare axonal hereditary motor and sensory neuropathy characterized by infantile onset of slowly progressive distal motor weakness and atrophy (more severe in legs and moderate in arms) with mildly delayed motor development, hypotonia, and distal sensory impairment of all sensory modalities.", "synonyms": "AR-CMT2B5, Autosomal recessive Charcot-Marie-Tooth disease type 2B5, SEOAN due to NEFL deficiency, Severe early-onset axonal neuropathy due to NEFL deficiency, Severe early-onset axonal neuropathy due to light neurofilament subunit deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy", "icd_10": "G60.0", "omim": "607734"}, {"name": "Sepiapterin-Reduktase-defiziente DRD, autosomal-rezessiv", "sub_name": "Dopa-responsive Dystonie durch Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Dopa-responsive Dystonie (DRD; siehe dort) durch Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Mangel (SRD) ist eine sehr seltene neurometabolische Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch tageszeitlich fluktuierende Dystonie, Stammhypotonie, okulogyre Krisen und verz\u00f6gerte motorische und kognitive Entwicklung.", "synonyms": "DRD durch SRD, SPR-Mangel, Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Defizienz, Sepiapterin-Reduktase-defiziente DRD, autosomal-rezessiv, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G24.1", "OMIM": "612716", "UMLS": "C0268468", "GARD": "10365", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden etwa 43 F\u00e4lle beschrieben", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit beginnt in der Regel im 1. Lebensjahr mit Symptomen von Dystonie, mit motorischer und sprachlicher Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Schw\u00e4che, Stammhypotonie, Hypotonie der Gliedmassen in tetraplegischem Muster und okulogyren Krisen mit diurnalen Fluktuationen (st\u00e4rker in der Nacht und besser am Morgen nach dem Schlaf). \u00c4ltere Kinder haben h\u00e4ufig Schlafst\u00f6rungen und psychologische Symptome (Angst, Irritabilit\u00e4t). H\u00e4ufig werden intellektuelle Defizite bemerkt, bei einigen Patienten besteht aber eventuell nur eine leichte bis moderate Lernst\u00f6rung. Weniger h\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Parkinsonismus (Tremor, Bradykinesie, Rigidit\u00e4t, Maskengesicht), Dysarthrie, Hyperreflexie, Hypertonie der Gliedmassen und vegetative Symptome. H\u00e4ufig entwickeln sich die Dystonie und die auff\u00e4lligen tageszeitlichen Schwankungen erst im Verlauf der Erkrankung, w\u00e4hrend im Kleinkindalter unspezifische Symptome wie Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und Hypotonie h\u00e4ufig sind.", "etiology": "Ursache der DRD durch SRD sind Mutationen im SPR-Gen (2p14-p12). Es kodiert f\u00fcr das Enzym Sepiapterin-Reduktase (SR). Verschiedene Mutationen in diesem Gen f\u00fchren zu verminderter SR-Aktivit\u00e4t mit der Folge einer verminderten Produktion von Monoamin-Neurotransmittenr.", "diagnostic_methods": "Charakteristische Befunde in der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (CSF) sind niedrige Spiegel der 5-Hydroxyindolessigs\u00e4ure (5-HIAA) und Homovanillins\u00e4ure (HVA) und erh\u00f6hte Spiegel der Gesamt-Biopterine und des Dihydrobiopterins (BH2). Die SR-Aktivit\u00e4t in Fibroblasten ist in der Regel vermindert oder fehlt ganz. Durch den Nachweis von Mutationen im SPR-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differenzialdiagnosen sind andere Formen der DRD, wie die autosomal-rezessive DRD und die autosomal-dominante DRD (siehe diese Termini), im Kleinkindalter beginnender Parkinsonismus, im Kleinkindalter beginnende spastische Paraplegie, einige Formen von Epilepsie und Zerebralparese.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannten SPR-Mutationen ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Den Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Wie andere Formen der DRD spricht auch die DRD durch SR-Mangel dramatisch auf die Levodopa (L-Dopa)-Therapie an. L-Dopa wird oft mit peripheren Dekarboxylase-Inhibitoren wie Carbidopa oder Benserazid kombiniert. Um irreversible neurologische Sch\u00e4den zu vermeiden, sollte fr\u00fchestm\u00f6glich mit der Behandlung begonnen werden. Die Dosis von L-Dopa kann von 0,1-16,0 mg/kg/Tag reichen. H\u00e4ufig treten nach Beginn der Behandlung transiente Dyskinesien auf, die in der Regel nach Reduzierung der Dosis sistieren. Bei Patienten mit ungen\u00fcgender Besserung der Symptome unter L-Dopa-Therapie soll 5-Hydroxytrytophan (5-HTP) in einer Dosierung von 0,15-6 mg/kg/Tag zusammen mit Carbidopa (zur Reduzierung von Nebenwirkungen) gegeben werden, da die Kombinationstherapie zu einer weiteren Besserung der motorischen Symptome und der Schlafst\u00f6rungen f\u00fchren kann. Die Behandlung erfolgt lebenslang.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch den Zeitpunkt des Behandlungsbeginns und durch die Schwere der Erkrankung bestimmt. Behandelte Patienten erleben eine signifikante Besserung, w\u00e4hrend bei versp\u00e4tet begonnener Behandlung die meisten Patienten leichte motorische und manchmal schwere kognitive Symptome zeigen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden etwa 43 F\u00e4lle beschrieben"}, {"name": "Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Defizienz", "sub_name": "Dopa-responsive Dystonie durch Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Dopa-responsive Dystonie (DRD; siehe dort) durch Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Mangel (SRD) ist eine sehr seltene neurometabolische Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch tageszeitlich fluktuierende Dystonie, Stammhypotonie, okulogyre Krisen und verz\u00f6gerte motorische und kognitive Entwicklung.", "synonyms": "DRD durch SRD, SPR-Mangel, Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Defizienz, Sepiapterin-Reduktase-defiziente DRD, autosomal-rezessiv, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G24.1", "OMIM": "612716", "UMLS": "C0268468", "GARD": "10365", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden etwa 43 F\u00e4lle beschrieben", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit beginnt in der Regel im 1. Lebensjahr mit Symptomen von Dystonie, mit motorischer und sprachlicher Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Schw\u00e4che, Stammhypotonie, Hypotonie der Gliedmassen in tetraplegischem Muster und okulogyren Krisen mit diurnalen Fluktuationen (st\u00e4rker in der Nacht und besser am Morgen nach dem Schlaf). \u00c4ltere Kinder haben h\u00e4ufig Schlafst\u00f6rungen und psychologische Symptome (Angst, Irritabilit\u00e4t). H\u00e4ufig werden intellektuelle Defizite bemerkt, bei einigen Patienten besteht aber eventuell nur eine leichte bis moderate Lernst\u00f6rung. Weniger h\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Parkinsonismus (Tremor, Bradykinesie, Rigidit\u00e4t, Maskengesicht), Dysarthrie, Hyperreflexie, Hypertonie der Gliedmassen und vegetative Symptome. H\u00e4ufig entwickeln sich die Dystonie und die auff\u00e4lligen tageszeitlichen Schwankungen erst im Verlauf der Erkrankung, w\u00e4hrend im Kleinkindalter unspezifische Symptome wie Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und Hypotonie h\u00e4ufig sind.", "etiology": "Ursache der DRD durch SRD sind Mutationen im SPR-Gen (2p14-p12). Es kodiert f\u00fcr das Enzym Sepiapterin-Reduktase (SR). Verschiedene Mutationen in diesem Gen f\u00fchren zu verminderter SR-Aktivit\u00e4t mit der Folge einer verminderten Produktion von Monoamin-Neurotransmittenr.", "diagnostic_methods": "Charakteristische Befunde in der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (CSF) sind niedrige Spiegel der 5-Hydroxyindolessigs\u00e4ure (5-HIAA) und Homovanillins\u00e4ure (HVA) und erh\u00f6hte Spiegel der Gesamt-Biopterine und des Dihydrobiopterins (BH2). Die SR-Aktivit\u00e4t in Fibroblasten ist in der Regel vermindert oder fehlt ganz. Durch den Nachweis von Mutationen im SPR-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differenzialdiagnosen sind andere Formen der DRD, wie die autosomal-rezessive DRD und die autosomal-dominante DRD (siehe diese Termini), im Kleinkindalter beginnender Parkinsonismus, im Kleinkindalter beginnende spastische Paraplegie, einige Formen von Epilepsie und Zerebralparese.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannten SPR-Mutationen ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Den Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Wie andere Formen der DRD spricht auch die DRD durch SR-Mangel dramatisch auf die Levodopa (L-Dopa)-Therapie an. L-Dopa wird oft mit peripheren Dekarboxylase-Inhibitoren wie Carbidopa oder Benserazid kombiniert. Um irreversible neurologische Sch\u00e4den zu vermeiden, sollte fr\u00fchestm\u00f6glich mit der Behandlung begonnen werden. Die Dosis von L-Dopa kann von 0,1-16,0 mg/kg/Tag reichen. H\u00e4ufig treten nach Beginn der Behandlung transiente Dyskinesien auf, die in der Regel nach Reduzierung der Dosis sistieren. Bei Patienten mit ungen\u00fcgender Besserung der Symptome unter L-Dopa-Therapie soll 5-Hydroxytrytophan (5-HTP) in einer Dosierung von 0,15-6 mg/kg/Tag zusammen mit Carbidopa (zur Reduzierung von Nebenwirkungen) gegeben werden, da die Kombinationstherapie zu einer weiteren Besserung der motorischen Symptome und der Schlafst\u00f6rungen f\u00fchren kann. Die Behandlung erfolgt lebenslang.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch den Zeitpunkt des Behandlungsbeginns und durch die Schwere der Erkrankung bestimmt. Behandelte Patienten erleben eine signifikante Besserung, w\u00e4hrend bei versp\u00e4tet begonnener Behandlung die meisten Patienten leichte motorische und manchmal schwere kognitive Symptome zeigen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden etwa 43 F\u00e4lle beschrieben"}, {"name": "Sepsis bei Fr\u00fchgeborenen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "P36.0\u00a0 P36.1\u00a0 P36.2\u00a0 P36.3\u00a0 P36.4\u00a0 P36.5\u00a0 P36.8\u00a0 P36.9", "summary": "Es handelt sich bei diesem Eintrag um eine seltene Kondition, f\u00fcr dessen Behandlung ein Medikament mit europ\u00e4ischer und/oder amerikanischer Orphan-Drug-Designation existiert."}, {"name": "Septierte Zysten der Niere", "sub_name": "Nierenzysten, septierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare benign renal tumor characterized by a typically unilateral, solitary, multiloculated cystic mass consisting of small, non-communicating cysts with flat, cuboidal, or hobnail epithelial lining, separated by fibrous septa which may have an ovarian stroma-like appearance or be paucicellular. The tumor is surrounded by a thick fibrous capsule and does not contain solid areas or necrosis. Patients may be asymptomatic or present with a palpable abdominal mass and/or abdominal or flank pain. Age distribution is bimodal, the typical age of onset being either below five or between 40 and 70 years of age.", "synonyms": "Multilocular cyst of the kidney, Multilocular renal cyst, "}, {"name": "Septische Phlebitis der internen Jugularvene", "sub_name": "Lemierre-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Lemierre syndrome is a rare, potentially lethal, oropharyngeal infectious disease occurring in immunocompetent adolescents and young adults that is mainly due to Fusobacterium necrophorum and that is characterized by septic thrombophlebitis of the internal jugular vein that leads to septic, usually pulmonary, embolism, associated with ENT (ear, nose, and throat) infection that manifests with fever, neck pain, and tonsillopharyngitis.", "synonyms": "Lemierre postanginal sepsis, Postanginal sepsis secondary to orophyngeal infection, Septic phlebitis of the internal jugular vein, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent", "icd_10": "J03.8", "umls": "C0343525", "mesh": "D057831", "gard": "6882", "meddra": "10065552"}, {"name": "Septo-optische Dysplasie-Spektrum", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die septo-optische Dysplasie (SOD) ist eine klinisch heterogene Krankheit und gekennzeichnet durch die klassische Trias Hypoplasie der Sehnerven, Anomalien der Hypophysenhormone und Mittelliniendefekte des Hirns.", "synonyms": "De-Morsier-Syndrom, Dysplasie, septo-optische, SOD, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q04.4", "OMIM": "182230", "UMLS": "C0162809\u00a0 C0338503", "MeSH": "D025962", "GARD": "7627", "MedDRA": "10067159", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen ist 1:10.000.", "clinical_description": "Der Schweregrad ist unterschiedlich, nur 30% der Patienten haben die vollst\u00e4ndige Trias, viele Patienten haben zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome. Einige Patienten zeigen bei Geburt zus\u00e4tzliche multiple Fehlbildungen, andere haben im Kindesalter ein verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum und/oder Sehst\u00f6rungen (am h\u00e4ufigsten Strabismus oder Nystagmus).  Die Hypoplasie des Sehnervem kann einseitig (57% der F\u00e4lle) oder beidseitig (32% der F\u00e4lle) sein, 23% der Patienten haben signifikante Sehst\u00f6rungen. Hypophysenvorderlappen (HVL)-Insuffizienz wird bei 62-80% der Patienten gefunden, am h\u00e4ufigsten ist der Mangel an Wachstumshormon mit Kleinwuchs im Kindesalter. Zus\u00e4tzlicher Hormonmangel betrifftt TSH, ACTH und GnRH. Mittelliniendefekte des Gehirns sind: Agenesie des  Septum pellucidum (60% der F\u00e4lle) und/oder des Corpus callosum. Auch assoziierte Fehlbildungen der Hirnrinde wurden beschrieben und gelegentlich SOD-plus-Syndrom genannt. M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind intellektuelles Defizit und neurologische Manifestationen (verz\u00f6gerte Entwicklung, Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Zerebralparese). Weiterhin k\u00f6nnen dazukommen: Diabetes insipidus, Schlafst\u00f6rungen, Autismus, Pubertas praecox, Adipositas, gest\u00f6rte Temperaturregulation, Anosmie, Innenohrschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Herzfehler und Fingerfehlbildungen.", "etiology": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle von SOD sind sporadisch, es wurden aber auch famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle bekannt. Bei diesen wurden homozygote (autosomal-rezessive Vererbung) und heterozygote (autosomal-dominante Vererbung) Mutationen im HESX1-Gen (3p21.2-p21.1) beschrieben. Bei assoziierten Ph\u00e4notypen, die als Teil des SOD-Spektrums angesehen werden k\u00f6nnen, wurden drei weitere Gene mutiert gefunden: Mutationen im SOX2-Gen (3q26.3-q27) bei Anophthalmie/Mikrophthalmie und Merkmalen der SOD; Mutationen im SOX3-Gen (Xq26.3) bei Mittelliniendefekten des Gehirns und HVL-Insuffizienz (ohne dass aber Augenfehlbildungen beschrieben wurden); und OTX2-Mutationen (14q21-q22) bei HVL-Insuffizienz und -Hypoplasie mit oder ohne Augenanomalien. Mutationen in diesen Genen werden bei weniger als 1% der Patienten gefunden, deshalb ist auch eine Beteiligung externer Faktoren (Medikamente, Alkohol, junges m\u00fctterliches Alter) anzunehmen.", "diagnostic_methods": "F\u00fcr die klinische Diagnose m\u00fcssen mindestens zwei Symptome aus der klassischen Trias vorhanden sein. Best\u00e4tigt wird die Diagnose durch ophthalmologische Untersuchung, Bildgebung (MRI) und HVL-Funktionstests. An SOD ist zu denken bei Neugeborenen mit Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Ikterus, Mikropenis (mit oder ohne Maldeszensus) und Nystagmus mit oder ohne assoziierte Mittelliniendefekte (wie z.B. Gaumenspalte).", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind  kongenitale HVL-Insuffizienz und Holoprosenzephalie (s. diese Termini). Die SOD kann schon vor Geburt mittels Sonographie und nachfolgende MRI vermutet werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Im Rahmen einer genetischen Beratung kann eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik angeboten werden, wenn in der Familie urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen bekannt sind. Bei autosomal-dominanter Vererbung ist jedoch wegen des erheblich variablen Ph\u00e4notyps und unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz Vorsicht geboten.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch und soll durch ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team mit regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Kontrollen begleitet werden. Die Hormonersatz-Therapie bei hormonellen Mangelzust\u00e4nden muss eng \u00fcberwacht werden, da der Hormonmangel altersabh\u00e4ngig variiert. Kinder ziehen Nutzen aus Entwicklungsprogrammen f\u00fcr Sehbehinderte und aus Physiotherapie und Besch\u00e4ftigungstherapie.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird vom Schweregrad der Symptomatik und den Zeitpunkt der Diagnose bestimmt: Bei fr\u00fcher Diagnose k\u00f6nnen hormonelle Mangelzust\u00e4nde rechtzeitig behandelt werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen ist 1:10.000."}, {"name": "Septumaneurysma, interventrikul\u00e4res", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Interventrikelseptumaneurysma ist eine seltene, nicht-syndromale, angeborene Herzfehlbildung, die durch das Vorhandensein eines angeborenen Aneurysmas des membran\u00f6sen Teils des Interventrikelseptums gekennzeichnet ist. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen asymptomatisch sein oder ventrikul\u00e4re oder supraventrikul\u00e4re Tachykardien, M\u00fcdigkeit, Anstrengungsdyspnoe, Herzklopfen und Herzger\u00e4usche zeigen. Weitere Manifestationen sind Ventrikelseptumdefekte und \u00dcberleitungsst\u00f6rungen, wie z. B. ein atrio-ventrikul\u00e4rer Block ersten Grades oder ein inkompletter Rechtsschenkelblock.", "ICD-10": "Q21.0", "OMIM": "105805", "UMLS": "C1387721"}, {"name": "Septumdefekt, aorto-pulmonaler kongenitaler", "sub_name": "Aorto-pulmonale Fenster, kongenitales", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital non-syndromic heart malformation characterized by a communication between the ascending aorta and the pulmonary trunk in the presence of two normally formed semilunar valves. It may be an isolated finding or occur in association with other anomalies. Severe clinical manifestations, such as congestive heart failure or pulmonary hypertension, typically develop in early life.", "synonyms": "Congenital aortopulmonary artery fistula, Congenital aortopulmonary septal defect, ", "icd_10": "Q21.4", "umls": "C2931610", "mesh": "C537782", "gard": "738"}, {"name": "Septum-primum-Defekt", "sub_name": "Atriumseptumdefekt, Ostium primum Typ", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "ASD vom Ostium-Primum-Typ, Ostium-primum-Defekt, Septum-primum-Defekt, Vorhofseptumdefekt vom Ostium-primum-Typ, ", "ICD-10": "Q21.2", "UMLS": "C0741296", "MeSH": "C548006", "GARD": "10695", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Interatriale Kommunikation"}, {"name": "Septum-secundum-Defekt", "sub_name": "Atriumseptumdefekt, Sekundum-Typ", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "ASD vom Secundum-Typ, Atrioseptaldefekt vom Septum-secundum-Typ, Septum-secundum-Defekt, Vorhofseptumdefekt vom Sekundumtyp, ", "ICD-10": "Q21.1", "OMIM": "611363\u00a0 614089\u00a0 614430", "UMLS": "C0344724", "GARD": "5865", "MedDRA": "10031302\u00a0 10031303", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Interatriale Kommunikation"}, {"name": "SERCA1-Protein, qualitative oder quantitative Defekte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Serinbiosynthese-Signalweg-Defizienz, infantile/juvenile Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E72.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Serin/Glycin-Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Serin-Mangelsyndrom", "sub_name": "Neurometabolische St\u00f6rung durch Serin-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Serin-Mangel-Syndrom ist eine sehr seltene, im S\u00e4uglingsalter einsetzende, potenziell behandelbare neuro-metabolische Erkrankung, die klinisch durch Mikrozephalie, gest\u00f6rte Entwicklung des Nervensystems und Krampfanf\u00e4lle gekennzeichnet ist. Drei Serin-Mangel-Syndrome wurden beschrieben: 3-Phosphoglyzerat-Dehydrogenase- (3-PGDH-)Mangel, 3-Phosphoserin-Phosphatase- (3-PSP) Mangel und Phosphoserin-Aminotransferase-Mangel (siehe jeweils dort).", "synonyms": "Serin-Mangelsyndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E72.8"}, {"name": "SERKAL-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Geschlechtsumkehr - Nieren-, Nebennieren- und Lungendysgenesie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "611812", "UMLS": "C2678492", "GARD": "10302", "summary": "Das SERKAL (sex reversion, kidneys, adrenal and lung dysgenesis)-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Weiblich-zu-M\u00e4nnlich-Geschlechtsumkehr und Entwicklungsanomalien der Nieren. Nebennieren und Lungen. Das Syndrom ist letal und wurde bei 3 Feten beschrieben. Es wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind homozygote Missense-Mutationen im WNT4-Gen (1p35), das f\u00fcr einen extrazellul\u00e4ren Signalfaktor kodiert. "}, {"name": "Seromuzin\u00f6ses Zystadenom der Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seromuzin\u00f6ses Zystadenom des Ovars im Kindsalter, ", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D27", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Zystadenom im Kindesalter"}, {"name": "Seromuzin\u00f6ses Zystadenom des Ovars im Kindsalter", "sub_name": "Seromuzin\u00f6ses Zystadenom der Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Seromuzin\u00f6ses Zystadenom des Ovars im Kindsalter, ", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D27", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Zystadenom im Kindesalter"}, {"name": "Ser\u00f6ses Zystadenokarzinom des Pankreas", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare, malignant, epithelial tumor of the pancreas composed of cystic structures lined by glycogen-rich clear cells, associated with local invasiveness often involving the spleen, duodenum and/or stomach and metastatic spread to the liver, peritoneum and/or lymph nodes. Presenting symptoms are variable and usually non-specific and include abdominal and/or flank pain, palpable abdominal mass, upper gastrointestinal bleeding, jaundice or abnormal serum liver enzymes, vomiting, anorexia and/or weight loss.", "synonyms": "Pancreatic serous cystadenocarcinoma, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C25.0\u00a0 C25.1\u00a0 C25.2\u00a0 C25.7\u00a0 C25.8", "umls": "C1335315"}, {"name": "Ser\u00f6ses Zystadenom der Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Ser\u00f6ses Zystadenom des Ovars im Kindsalter, ", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D27", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Zystadenom im Kindesalter"}, {"name": "Ser\u00f6ses Zystadenom des Ovars im Kindsalter", "sub_name": "Ser\u00f6ses Zystadenom der Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Ser\u00f6ses Zystadenom des Ovars im Kindsalter, ", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D27", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Zystadenom im Kindesalter"}, {"name": "Serotonin-produzierender NET des Pankreas", "sub_name": "Serotonin-produzierender neuroendokriner Tumor des Pankreas", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare functioning neuroendocrine tumor of pancreas characterized by a typically well-differentiated neoplasm composed of cells expressing serotonin. Patients may present with atypical carcinoid syndrome with abdominal pain, diarrhea, weight loss, and/or flushing. Carcinoid syndrome is usually present only when there are liver metastases. The tumors tend to be larger than non-functioning tumors and are associated with a poorer prognosis because they are almost always metastatic.", "synonyms": "Serotonin-producing PNET, Serotonin-producing pancreatic NET, Serotonin-producing pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor, ", "icd_10": "C25.9"}, {"name": "Serotonin-produzierender neuroendokriner Tumor des Pankreas", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare functioning neuroendocrine tumor of pancreas characterized by a typically well-differentiated neoplasm composed of cells expressing serotonin. Patients may present with atypical carcinoid syndrome with abdominal pain, diarrhea, weight loss, and/or flushing. Carcinoid syndrome is usually present only when there are liver metastases. The tumors tend to be larger than non-functioning tumors and are associated with a poorer prognosis because they are almost always metastatic.", "synonyms": "Serotonin-producing PNET, Serotonin-producing pancreatic NET, Serotonin-producing pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor, ", "icd_10": "C25.9"}, {"name": "Serotonin-produzierender PNET", "sub_name": "Serotonin-produzierender neuroendokriner Tumor des Pankreas", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare functioning neuroendocrine tumor of pancreas characterized by a typically well-differentiated neoplasm composed of cells expressing serotonin. Patients may present with atypical carcinoid syndrome with abdominal pain, diarrhea, weight loss, and/or flushing. Carcinoid syndrome is usually present only when there are liver metastases. The tumors tend to be larger than non-functioning tumors and are associated with a poorer prognosis because they are almost always metastatic.", "synonyms": "Serotonin-producing PNET, Serotonin-producing pancreatic NET, Serotonin-producing pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor, ", "icd_10": "C25.9"}, {"name": "Serotonin-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G90.8", "UMLS": "C0699828", "MeSH": "D020230", "MedDRA": "10040108", "summary": "Als Serotonin-Syndrom wird das Auftreten eines \u00dcberschusses von Serotonin im Zentralnervensystem nach Einnahme verschiedener Substanzen, z.B. auch der Selektiven Serotonin-Re-Uptake-Inhibitoren (Inhibitoren der Wiederaufnahme von Serotonin, SSRIs) bezeichnet. F\u00fcr Europa gibt es keine Daten \u00fcber die Pr\u00e4valenz. Symptome des Serotonin-Syndroms sind Muskel-Rigidit\u00e4t, Myoklonus, Agitiertheit, Verwirrung, Hyperthermie, Hyperreflexie und Dysautonomie-Symptome. Es besteht das Risiko f\u00fcr einen Schock mit niedrigem peripherem Gef\u00e4\u00dfwiderstand, f\u00fcr Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Koma, Rhabdomyolyse und/oder disseminierte intravaskul\u00e4re Blutgerinnung (DIC). SSRIs und Monoaminoxidase-Inhibitoren (MAOIs) sind f\u00fcr dieses Syndrom evtl. nicht nur bei toxischen, sondern auch bei therapeutischen Konzentrationen verantwortlich. Die Symptome treten auf: (i) wenige Stunden bis wenige Tage nach Beginn der Behandlung; (ii) nach (kontraindizierter!) gleichzeitiger Gabe von MAO-A-Inhibitoren (Toloxaton, Moclobemid) und SSRIs, oder sukzessive Gabe dieser Substanzen mit zu kurzem medikamentenfreien Intervall; (iii) als Folge von Medikamenten-Wechselwirkungen, oder (iv) in F\u00e4llen akuter Intoxikation. Interindividuelle Unterschiede der Suszeptibilit\u00e4t und des Schweregrades der Symptome k\u00f6nnen evtl. durch pharmakokinetische und pharmakodynamische Besonderheiten erkl\u00e4rt werden. Die Diagnose basiert auf klinische Untersuchung und richtungsweisender Anamnese. Zus\u00e4tzliche Untersuchungen (EKG, Laboruntersuchungen, toxikologische Analysen) sind bei unspezifischen klinischen Symptomen unerl\u00e4sslich. Zuerst m\u00fcssen Infektionen, neurologische Krankheiten und Stoffwechselst\u00f6rungen ausgeschlossen werden. Toxikologische Differentialdiagnosen sind das Maligne Neuroleptika-Syndrom (sh. dort), adrenerge und anti-cholinerge Syndrome und das Alkoholentzugs-Syndrom. Die Behandlung ist haupts\u00e4chlich unterst\u00fctzend, mit Sedierung (Benzodiazepine), mechanischer Beatmung und, wenn notwenig, auch mit neuromuskul\u00e4rer Blockade. Bei maligner Hyperthermie muss der K\u00f6rper gek\u00fchlt werden. Dantrolen erwies sich als unwirksam. Cyproheptadin ist ein spezifisches Antidot des Serotonin-Syndroms. Bei ad\u00e4quater st\u00fctzender Therapie ist die Prognose im allgemeinen gut. Es wurde aber auch \u00fcber Todesf\u00e4lle durch Multiorganversagen und Hirnanoxie berichtet."}, {"name": "Serpinopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Serpinopathie mit toxischer Serpin-Polymerisation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Serpinopathie mit Verlust der Serpin-Funktion", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Serratiertes Polyposissyndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das hyperplastische Polyposis-Syndrom ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte Darmerkrankung, die durch das Vorhandensein von multiplen (in der Regel gro\u00dfen) hyperplastischen/gezackten kolorektalen Polypen gekennzeichnet ist, meist mit pankolonischer Verteilung. Die Histologie zeigt hyperplastische Polypen, sessile serrierte Adenome (am h\u00e4ufigsten), traditionelle serrierte Adenome oder gemischte Polypen. Es ist mit einem erh\u00f6hten pers\u00f6nlichen und famili\u00e4ren (Verwandte ersten Grades) Risiko f\u00fcr kolorektales Karzinom verbunden.", "synonyms": "Polyposis-Syndrom, hyperplastisches, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "D12.6", "OMIM": "617108"}, {"name": "Sertoli-Leydig-Zell-Tumor, maligner ovarieller", "sub_name": "Maligner Sertoli-Leydig-Zell-Tumor des Ovars", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Malignant Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor of ovary is a rare malignant sex cord stromal tumor of ovary (see this term) occuring typically in young women and characterized by manifestations of androgen excess (hirsutism, hair loss, amenorrhea, or oligomenorrhea), when functional.", "synonyms": "Androblastoma, Arrhenoblastoma, Ovarian Sertoli-Leydig cell cancer, Ovarian malignant Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor, Virilizing ovarian tumor, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "C56", "umls": "C0003810\u00a0 C0036769\u00a0 C0206723", "gard": "5495"}, {"name": "Sertoli-Leydig Zell-Tumor, ovarieller", "sub_name": "Maligner Sertoli-Leydig-Zell-Tumor des Ovars", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Malignant Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor of ovary is a rare malignant sex cord stromal tumor of ovary (see this term) occuring typically in young women and characterized by manifestations of androgen excess (hirsutism, hair loss, amenorrhea, or oligomenorrhea), when functional.", "synonyms": "Androblastoma, Arrhenoblastoma, Ovarian Sertoli-Leydig cell cancer, Ovarian malignant Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor, Virilizing ovarian tumor, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "C56", "umls": "C0003810\u00a0 C0036769\u00a0 C0206723", "gard": "5495"}, {"name": "Sertoli-Zell-Karzinom des Ovars", "sub_name": "Maligner Sertoli-Leydig-Zell-Tumor des Ovars", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Malignant Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor of ovary is a rare malignant sex cord stromal tumor of ovary (see this term) occuring typically in young women and characterized by manifestations of androgen excess (hirsutism, hair loss, amenorrhea, or oligomenorrhea), when functional.", "synonyms": "Androblastoma, Arrhenoblastoma, Ovarian Sertoli-Leydig cell cancer, Ovarian malignant Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor, Virilizing ovarian tumor, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly, Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "C56", "umls": "C0003810\u00a0 C0036769\u00a0 C0206723", "gard": "5495"}, {"name": "Servelle-Martorell-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Angio-osteo-hypotrophisches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, angeborenes Syndrom mit Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien, das durch ven\u00f6se oder gelegentlich auch arterielle Fehlbildungen gekennzeichnet ist, die zu einer Weichteilhypertrophie und Knochenhypoplasie f\u00fchren. Die betroffenen Gliedma\u00dfen sind in der Regel verk\u00fcrzt, stark deformiert, schmerzhaft und \u00f6demat\u00f6s und gehen mit einer Knochen- und Muskelhypotrophie einher. Typischerweise sind einzelne oder mehrere kleine Teile der Gliedma\u00dfen betroffen, aber es wurde auch \u00fcber eine umfangreichere Beteiligung berichtet, einschlie\u00dflich der gesamten Extremit\u00e4t, des Schulterg\u00fcrtels und der Achselh\u00f6hle.", "synonyms": "Angiodysplasie, osteohypoplastische phlebektatische, Servelle-Martorell-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter"}, {"name": "SeSAME-Syndrom", "sub_name": "EAST-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das SeSAME-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch zerebrale Kr\u00e4mpfe, Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Ataxie, intellektuelles Defizit und Elektrolytst\u00f6rungen (Hypokali\u00e4mie, metabolische Alkalose, Hypomagnesi\u00e4mie). Es wurde bei 5 Patienten aus 4 Familien beschrieben. Ursache der Krankheit sind homozygote oder compound-heterozygote Mutationen im KCNJ10-Gen (1q23.2), das f\u00fcr einen in Gehirn, R\u00fcckenmark, Innenohr und Nieren exprimierten Kaliumkanal kodiert. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by the association of epilepsy, ataxia, sensorineural hearing impairment, and renal tubulopathy. Patients present in infancy with generalized seizures, cerebellar dysfunction (including gait ataxia, intention tremor, and dysdiadochokinesis), and variable developmental delay and sensorineural hearing loss. Laboratory studies show persistent hypokalemic metabolic acidosis with hypomagnesemia. Additional reported neurologic features include brisk deep tendon reflexes, ankle clonus, extensor plantar responses, or nystagmus.", "synonyms": "Epilepsy-ataxia-sensorineural deafness-tubulopathy syndrome, Epilepsy-ataxia-sensorineural hearing loss-tubulopathy syndrome, SeSAME syndrome, Seizures-sensorineural deafness-ataxia-intellectual disability-electrolyte imbalance syndrome, Seizures-sensorineural hearing loss-ataxia-intellectual disability-electrolyte imbalance syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G40.4", "omim": "612780", "umls": "C2748572", "gard": "10514"}, {"name": "SETD2-assoziierte Mikrozephalie-schwere Intelligenzminderung-multiple kongenitale Anomalien-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SETD2-assoziiertes Gro\u00dfwuchs-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Luscan-Lumish-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "LLS, SETD2-assoziiertes Gro\u00dfwuchs-Syndrom, ", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Setleis-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, dermale faziale fokale, Typ III", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Focal facial dermal dysplasia type III (FFDD3) is a rare focal facial dermal dysplasia (FFDD; see this term), characterized primarily by congenital bitemporal scar-like depressions and a typical, but variable facial dysmorphism, which may include distichiasis (upper lids) or lacking eyelashes, slanted eyebrows and a flattened and/or bulbous nasal tip and other features such as a low frontal hairline, sparse hair, redundant skin, epicanthal folds, low-set dysplastic ears, blepharitis and conjunctivitis.", "synonyms": "FFDD type III, FFDD3, Focal facial dermal dysplasia 3, Setleis type, Setleis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "227260", "umls": "C1744559", "mesh": "C536385", "gard": "121", "epidemiology": "FFDD3 is reported in over 20 patients from more than 15 families, but only 4 consanguineous families have had TWIST2 mutations.", "clinical_description": "FFDD3 is characterized by congenital bitemporal hypoplastic scar-like lesions resembling forceps marks with typical facial dysmorphic features. In addition, they may have periorbital puffiness (leonine facies), sparse lateral and upward lifting eyebrows, distichiasis (upper lashes), a lack of lower lashes and a prominent upper lip (with an inverted ''V'' contour). Nose abnormalities are very frequent and comprise a flattened and/or bulbous nasal tip with septum extended below the alae nasi. Additional frequent features describe a low frontal hairline, sparse hair, epicanthal folds, blepharitis, conjunctivitis, low-set dysplastic ears, and redundant skin. Other eye abnormalities less often reported include short and/or slanting palpebral fissures, as well as impaired vision, nystagmus, exotropia, hypertelorism and absent meibomian glands. Skin dimples lateral to lips, vertical chin clefts, horizontal chin furrows and linear grooves on forehead occur occasionally. Other features such as a pectum deformities and cardiac and genitorurinary abnormalities are rare. Patients generally have normal growth and development. Heterozygous family members may present with minor manifestations, such as partial absence of lower eyelashes and distichiasis of upper lashes. Developmental delay, severe intellectual disability, behavioral problems, and learning difficulties may be observed.", "etiology": "FFDD3 is caused by homozygous mutations in the TWIST2 gene, which encodes a bHLH transcription factor involved in dermal facial development in mammals. To date two nonsense mutations, c.324C>T (p. Q65X) and c.486C>T (p.Q119X), and two small deletions that caused frameshift mutations, c.168delC (p.S57AfsX45) and c.91delC (p.R31GfsX71), have been reported. However, the majority of unrelated FFDD3 patients evaluated have had normal TWIST2 sequences, indicating the molecular genetic heterogeneity of the disorder. Studies are under way to interrogate whole exome or genome sequencing in these patients and their parents to determine the causative defects.", "diagnostic_methods": "FFDD3 is diagnosed in patients bearing autosomal recessive bitemporal scar-like lesions and typical FFDD3 facial features, and is confirmed by genetic testing of TWIST2. However, many patients with typical FFDD3 features have normal TWIST2 sequences (~80%). Thus, diagnosis is clinically based for most patients on the characteristic bitemporal lesions and facial dysmorphism regardless of inheritance. Also, the facial phenotype may be milder in patients without TWIST2 mutations.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes FFDD1 and FFDD2 (see these terms).", "genetic_counseling": "Many cases are sporadic. Inheritance is autosomal recessive for patients with TWIST2 mutations. Heterozygous parents will have a 1 in 4 risk of an affected child with each pregnancy. For other patients, the inheritance is unclear.", "management_and_treatment": "Pursed lips and eye abnormalities may be surgically corrected, but there is limited experience with plastic surgery.", "prognosis": "In patients with normal intelligence, normal life span is expected. Patients with developmental delay may have other organ system involvement which may affect health and longevity."}, {"name": "S\u00e9zary-Lymphom", "sub_name": "S\u00e9zary-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das S\u00e9zary-Syndrom (SS) ist die aggressive Form eines kutanen T-Zell-Lymphoms und gekennzeichnet durch die Trias Erythrodermie, Lymphadenopathie und zirkulierende atypische Lymphozyten (S\u00e9zary -Zellen).", "synonyms": "S\u00e9zary-Lymphom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0oder\u00a0Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C84.1", "UMLS": "C0036920", "MeSH": "D012751", "GARD": "7629", "MedDRA": "10040493", "epidemiology": "SS hat eine Jahresinzidenz von 1:10.000.000 und tritt h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht auf. SS repr\u00e4sentiert 3% aller kutanen Lymphome.", "clinical_description": "Das SS tritt am h\u00e4ufigsten bei M\u00e4nnern im 5. Lebensjahrzehnt auf und schreitet rasch fort. SS entspricht den Stadien IVA2 und IVB des kutanen T-Zell-Lymphoms (siehe dort). Die Patienten haben eine schuppende Erythrodermie, die stark juckende Haut ist infiltriert (oft besteht eine Facies leontina). Weitere Symptome sind Lymphadenopathie, Hepatosplenomegalie, Alopezie, Ektropion, leichte palmoplantare Keratose und Nageldystrophie. Oft zittern die Patienten und klagen \u00fcber K\u00e4ltegef\u00fchl und allgemeine Ermattung.", "etiology": "Das SS steht in Verbindung mit einer gro\u00dfen Zahl von Chromosomenanomalien, besonders Umlagerungen in der Region 6q23-q27 mit daraus resultierenden Ver\u00e4nderungen im Protoonkogen-Gen MYB und im Gen f\u00fcr die Alpha 2-Untereinheit des Interleukin-22 (IL22RA2), die \u00c4tiologie ist jedoch weiterhin unklar.", "diagnostic_methods": "Gegenw\u00e4rtig wird das SS durch die folgenden Kriterien definiert: Zahl der S\u00e9zary-Zellen gleich oder gr\u00f6\u00dfer 1000/mm3 (Stadium B2); erh\u00f6hte Zahl CD3- oder CD4-positive Zellen mit einem CD4/CD8-Verh\u00e4ltnis gleich oder gr\u00f6\u00dfer 10; aberrante Expression von Pan-T-Zell-Markern (d. h. defiziente CD7-Expression auf den T-Zellen); vermehrte relative oder absolute Lymphozytenzahl mit Hinweis auf identische T-Zellklone im Blut und in der Haut durch Southern-Blot- und PCR-Analyse. Die histologische Untersuchung der Haut erlaubt nicht immer diagnostische Schlussfolgerungen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Arzneimittel-Nebenwirkungen, klassische Mycosis fungoides, andere Formen eines prim\u00e4ren kutanen T-Zell-Lymphoms (siehe diese Termini) und andere Ursachen von Erythrodermie wie Psoriasis, atopische Dermatitis und Pityriasis rubra pilaris (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Zu den diagnostischen Untersuchungen geh\u00f6ren Thorax-R\u00f6ntgen, Computertomografie, Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung, PET und eine Lymphknotenbiopsie. Die Behandlung mit zweimonatiger extrakorporaler Photopherese kann kombiniert werden mit niedrig dosiertem Methotrexat, Bexaroten oder Interferon-Alpha. In fortgeschrittenen oder therapieresistenten F\u00e4llen kann Chemotherapie mit liposomalem Doxorubicin, Gemcitabin oder Alemtuzumab erwogen werden. Behandlungsoptionen bei einem R\u00fcckfall sind Ganzhaut-Elektronenstrahl-Therapie und allogene Stammzelltransplantation.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig. Die mediane \u00dcberlebenszeit betr\u00e4gt 5 Jahre und wird durch die initiale Symptomatik und den Verlauf bestimmt.", "summary": "SS hat eine Jahresinzidenz von 1:10.000.000 und tritt h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht auf. SS repr\u00e4sentiert 3% aller kutanen Lymphome."}, {"name": "S\u00e9zary-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das S\u00e9zary-Syndrom (SS) ist die aggressive Form eines kutanen T-Zell-Lymphoms und gekennzeichnet durch die Trias Erythrodermie, Lymphadenopathie und zirkulierende atypische Lymphozyten (S\u00e9zary -Zellen).", "synonyms": "S\u00e9zary-Lymphom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0oder\u00a0Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C84.1", "UMLS": "C0036920", "MeSH": "D012751", "GARD": "7629", "MedDRA": "10040493", "epidemiology": "SS hat eine Jahresinzidenz von 1:10.000.000 und tritt h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht auf. SS repr\u00e4sentiert 3% aller kutanen Lymphome.", "clinical_description": "Das SS tritt am h\u00e4ufigsten bei M\u00e4nnern im 5. Lebensjahrzehnt auf und schreitet rasch fort. SS entspricht den Stadien IVA2 und IVB des kutanen T-Zell-Lymphoms (siehe dort). Die Patienten haben eine schuppende Erythrodermie, die stark juckende Haut ist infiltriert (oft besteht eine Facies leontina). Weitere Symptome sind Lymphadenopathie, Hepatosplenomegalie, Alopezie, Ektropion, leichte palmoplantare Keratose und Nageldystrophie. Oft zittern die Patienten und klagen \u00fcber K\u00e4ltegef\u00fchl und allgemeine Ermattung.", "etiology": "Das SS steht in Verbindung mit einer gro\u00dfen Zahl von Chromosomenanomalien, besonders Umlagerungen in der Region 6q23-q27 mit daraus resultierenden Ver\u00e4nderungen im Protoonkogen-Gen MYB und im Gen f\u00fcr die Alpha 2-Untereinheit des Interleukin-22 (IL22RA2), die \u00c4tiologie ist jedoch weiterhin unklar.", "diagnostic_methods": "Gegenw\u00e4rtig wird das SS durch die folgenden Kriterien definiert: Zahl der S\u00e9zary-Zellen gleich oder gr\u00f6\u00dfer 1000/mm3 (Stadium B2); erh\u00f6hte Zahl CD3- oder CD4-positive Zellen mit einem CD4/CD8-Verh\u00e4ltnis gleich oder gr\u00f6\u00dfer 10; aberrante Expression von Pan-T-Zell-Markern (d. h. defiziente CD7-Expression auf den T-Zellen); vermehrte relative oder absolute Lymphozytenzahl mit Hinweis auf identische T-Zellklone im Blut und in der Haut durch Southern-Blot- und PCR-Analyse. Die histologische Untersuchung der Haut erlaubt nicht immer diagnostische Schlussfolgerungen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Arzneimittel-Nebenwirkungen, klassische Mycosis fungoides, andere Formen eines prim\u00e4ren kutanen T-Zell-Lymphoms (siehe diese Termini) und andere Ursachen von Erythrodermie wie Psoriasis, atopische Dermatitis und Pityriasis rubra pilaris (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Zu den diagnostischen Untersuchungen geh\u00f6ren Thorax-R\u00f6ntgen, Computertomografie, Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung, PET und eine Lymphknotenbiopsie. Die Behandlung mit zweimonatiger extrakorporaler Photopherese kann kombiniert werden mit niedrig dosiertem Methotrexat, Bexaroten oder Interferon-Alpha. In fortgeschrittenen oder therapieresistenten F\u00e4llen kann Chemotherapie mit liposomalem Doxorubicin, Gemcitabin oder Alemtuzumab erwogen werden. Behandlungsoptionen bei einem R\u00fcckfall sind Ganzhaut-Elektronenstrahl-Therapie und allogene Stammzelltransplantation.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig. Die mediane \u00dcberlebenszeit betr\u00e4gt 5 Jahre und wird durch die initiale Symptomatik und den Verlauf bestimmt.", "summary": "SS hat eine Jahresinzidenz von 1:10.000.000 und tritt h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht auf. SS repr\u00e4sentiert 3% aller kutanen Lymphome."}, {"name": "SFI", "sub_name": "Insomnie, fatale sporadische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare sporadic human prion disease characterized by adult onset of progredient neurodegeneration presenting as a combination of psychiatric, sleep, and oculomotor disturbances, with development of progressive cognitive impairment (the predominantly affected cognitive domains being memory, temporal and/or spatial orientation, language, executive functions, and attention), postural instability, and sometimes additional motor abnormalities and autonomic hyperactivity, in the course of the disease. Bilateral thalamic hypometabolism on FDG-PET imaging and positive prion seeding activity in the cerebrospinal fluid are present in many cases. The disease is fatal within typically two to three years.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "A81.9"}, {"name": "SFID-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kongenitale sideroblastische An\u00e4mie-B-Zell-Immundefekt-periodisches Fieber-Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Congenital sideroblastic anemia -B cell immunodeficiency- periodic fever-developmental delay syndrome is a form of constitutional sideroblastic anemia (see this term), characterized by severe microcytic anemia, B-cell lymphopenia , panhypogammaglobulinemia and variable neurodegeneration. The disease presents in infancy with recurrent febrile illnesses, gastrointestinal disturbances, developmental delay, seizures, ataxia and sensorineural deafness. Most patients require regular blood transfusion, iron chelation, and intravenous immunoglobulin (IVIG) replacement. Stem cell transplantation has been reported to be successful.", "synonyms": "SIFD syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D64.0", "omim": "616084"}, {"name": "SFMMP-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spaltfu\u00df-Fehlbildung-mesoaxiale Polydaktylie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic syndrome with limb malformations as a major feature characterized by unilateral or bilateral split-foot malformation, nail abnormalities of the hand, and bilateral sensorineural hearing impairment. Mesoaxial polydactyly of the foot has also been described.", "synonyms": "SFMMP, Split-foot malformation-mesoaxial polydactyly-nail abnormalities-sensorineural hearing loss syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "omim": "616890"}, {"name": "SFT/HPC", "sub_name": "Solit\u00e4rer fibr\u00f6ser Tumor/H\u00e4mangioperizytom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Solitary fibrous tumor (SFT) represents a diverse group of ubiquitous rare spindle cell neoplasms that may be benign or malignant and that most frequently arises from the pleura and peritoneum and rarely from other sites such as head and neck, liver and skeletal muscle. SFT may be clinically asymptomatic or may present with enlarging mass, compressive effects depending on the site involved and rarely with paraneoplastic manifestations (osteoarthropathy or hypoglycemia).", "synonyms": "SFT/HPC, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D21.9", "omim": "234820", "umls": "C0018922\u00a0 C1266119", "mesh": "D006393", "meddra": "10018825"}, {"name": "SGBS", "sub_name": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom (SGBS) ist gekennzeichnet durch pr\u00e4- und postnatalen Gro\u00dfwuchs, faziale Dysmorphien und eine Reihe von nicht-obligaten viszeralen und skeletalen Manifestationen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden mehr als 100 F\u00e4lle mit SGBS beschrieben. Charakteristische Dysmorphien sind Makrozephalie mit vergr\u00f6bertem, typischem Gesicht (das im Erwachsenenalter nicht mehr so auff\u00e4llig ist) mit gro\u00dfem, ausladendem Kiefer, breiter Nasenwurzel und Gaumenspalte. H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe sind breit und kurz. \u00dcberz\u00e4hlige Mamillen, Rippenanomalien, Pectus excavatum, Hepatosplenomegalie, Nabel- oder Leistenhernie und Kryptorchismus sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Herzfehler kommen bei etwa einem Drittel der Patienten vor. Minderbegabung ist selten und dann auch nur leichtgradig. H\u00e4ufig sind aber Sprachprobleme, auch psychosoziale Probleme wurden beschrieben. F\u00fcr embryonale Neoplasien, z.B. Wilms-Tumor, Neuroblastom und Hepatoblastom, besteht ein auf etwa 10% erh\u00f6htes Risiko. Das SGBS folgt einem X-chromosomal-rezessiven Erbgang. H\u00e4ufigste Ursache sind Mutationen GPC3-Gen in der Chromosomenregion Xq26. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr Glypican-3, ein extrazellul\u00e4res Heparansulfat-Proteoglykan, das sich haupts\u00e4chlich in Geweben mesodermalen Ursprungs findet, mit IGF2 (insulin-like growth factor 2) interagiert und dadurch dessen Signalkette beeinflusst. Nicht alle Patienten mit SGBS haben eine GPC3-Mutation, ein Hinweis, dass bei einigen Patienten die Ursache in anderen Genen liegen kann (genetische Heterogenit\u00e4t): Eine schwerere Variante des Syndroms (SGBS Typ 2) wurde in 1 Familie mit multiplen kraniofazialen, skeletalen und viszeralen Fehlbildungen (aber keine Herzfehler), Hydrops fetalis und fr\u00fcher Letalit\u00e4t beschrieben. In dieser Familie bestand Kopplung an die Chromosomenregion Xp22. F\u00fcr die Diagnose des SGBS gibt es keinen Labortest. Verlauf und klinische Symptome, manchmal auch die Familienanamnese, lassen an die Diagnose denken. Der Nachweis einer GPC3-Mutation best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose, fehlender Nachweis einer Mutation schlie\u00dft die Diagnose aber nicht aus. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom (BWS), Weaver-Syndrom, Perlman-Syndrom und Sotos-Syndrom ausgeschlossen werden. Die T\u00f6chter von betroffenen M\u00e4nnern sind alle heterozygot, S\u00f6hne erben die Mutation nicht. Die H\u00e4fte der S\u00f6hne einer heterozygoten Frau haben ein SGBS, die H\u00e4lfte der T\u00f6chter ist heterozygot. Heterozygote Frauen k\u00f6nnen leichte k\u00f6rperliche Ver\u00e4nderungen im Sinne eines SGBS aufweisen. Wenn bei einem m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten die Mutation gefunden wurde, erm\u00f6glicht molekulare Analyse die Erkennung der heterozygoten Frauen in der Familie. Bei bekannter Mutation des Index-Patienten ist mit molekularer Analyse auch eine fr\u00fche vorgeburtliche Diagnose m\u00f6glich. Bei fehlender Familienanamnese kann die Diagnose vor der Geburt mit Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall nur vermutet werden. Die angeborenen Fehlbildungen erfordern z.T. eine chirurgische Intervention. Die Mortalit\u00e4t in der Perinatal- und S\u00e4uglingszeit ist, offenbar als Folge der Herzbeteiligung (z.B. Reizleitungsst\u00f6rungen), hoch. Kardiale Kontrollen sind daher wichtig. Zum Tumor-Screening beim SGBS geh\u00f6ren Ultraschall-Untersuchung des Abdomens, Harnanalyse und Suche nach biochemischen Markern embryonaler Tumoren. Sprachprobleme und Lernbehinderungen erfordern p\u00e4dagogische Begleitung.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare X-linked multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by pre- and postnatal overgrowth, distinctive craniofacial features, variable congenital malformations, organomegaly and an increased tumor risk.", "synonyms": "DGSX, Golabi-Rosen syndrome, SDYS, SGBS, SGBS1, Simpson dysmorphia syndrome, Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome type 1, X-linked dysplasia gigantism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.3", "omim": "312870", "umls": "C0796154", "mesh": "C537340", "gard": "7649", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence is unknown. Approximately 250 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome (SGBS) manifests a broad clinical picture with varying degrees of severity. It is characterized by pre- and postnatal overgrowth with macrosomia, distinctive craniofacial features (macrocephaly with coarse face, macroglossia, hypertelorism, dental malocclusion, palatal abnormalities), supernumerary nipples, congenital heart defects and arrhythmias, vertebral segmental defects, abdominal visceromegaly (renal dysplasia/nephromegaly, splenomegaly and hepatomegaly), diaphragmatic hernia, diastasis recti/umbilical hernia, limb anomalies (polydactyly/brachydactyly of the hands, cutaneous syndactyly, nail hypoplasia), and genital involvement (cryptorchidism, hypospadias). Involvement of central nervous system presents with variable degrees of intellectual disability, motor delay and speech delay. Patients with SGBS are at increased risk for embryonal tumors (Wilms tumor), hepatoblastoma, adrenal neuroblastoma, gonadoblastoma, hepatocellular carcinoma.", "etiology": "SGBS is due to loss-of-function mutations in the GPC3 gene (Xq26), encoding Glypican-3 (GPC3), a cell surface heparin sulfate proteoglycan which acts as a negative regulator of Hedgehog (Hh) signaling during development. Mutations in GPC3 result in the hyperactivation of Hh signaling, that ultimately leads to overgrowth and cancer.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical findings, family history, genetic testing for GPC3 mutations, and array comparative genomic hybridization (aCGH) analysis of genomic imbalance in Xq26. Imaging techniques help to detect skeletal anomalies and central nervous system involvement. Screening for embryonic tumors is performed by imaging (serial abdominal ultrasonogram and chest X rays), serial measurement of tumor markers and catecholamine metabolites in urine. Kidney function is monitored in cases of kidney involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include overgrowth syndromes such as Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome and Sotos syndrome, and additional disorders such as fragile X syndrome, Bannayan-Zonana syndrome, PTEN hamartoma tumor syndrome, Marshall syndrome, Nevo syndrome, mosaic trisomy 8 and Pallister-Killian syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis and/or pre-implantation genetic testing are possible for at-risk pregnancies when a mutation has previously been identified in the family. Prenatal ultrasound examination can detect disproportionate fetal overgrowth, while elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels may also be useful to suspect SGBS.", "genetic_counseling": "SGBS follows an X-linked recessive pattern of transmission. In the offspring of an affected male, daughters are heterozygous and sons are unaffected. For each pregnancy, a heterozygous female has a 25% risk of having an affected son and a 25% risk of having a carrier daughter (usually not affected or showing minimal clinical findings due to lyonization). SGBS may also result from de novo mutations (20-30% of cases).", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach with pediatric cardiologists, neurologists, orthopedics, and speech therapists. Congenital malformations may require surgery. Special attention should be paid to cardiac abnormalities that are responsible for the increased perinatal and infant mortality. Tumor management and follow-up should be performed.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the severity of the disease; in the most severe cases, SGBS is life-threatening before birth or in infancy, whereas in milder cases patients often live into adulthood."}, {"name": "SGF", "sub_name": "Splenogonadale Fusion, isolierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, nicht-syndromale viszerale Fehlbildung, die durch eine abnorme, kontinuierliche oder diskontinuierliche Anheftung der Milz an die Gonade, den Nebenhoden oder des Vas deferens gekennzeichnet ist. Beim kontinuierlichen Typ besteht eine direkte Verbindung zwischen Milz und Gonade, w\u00e4hrend beim diskontinuierlichen Typ Gonadengewebe mit einer akzessorischen Milz oder ektopem Milzgewebe ohne Verbindung zur Hauptmilz verschmolzen ist. M\u00e4nner pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise mit einer skrotalen Masse oder als Zufallsbefund bei der Behandlung von Kryptorchismus, Hodentumoren oder Leistenbr\u00fcchen. Bei Frauen ist dies meist ein Zufallsbefund bei der Laparotomie.", "synonyms": "SGF, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Keine Daten verf\u00fcgbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q89.0"}, {"name": "SGFLD-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Splenogonadale Fusion-Extremit\u00e4tenfehlbildung-Mikrognathie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Dysostose-Syndrom, das durch eine abnorme Fusion der Milz mit der Gonade (oder seltener mit Resten des Mesonephros), Gliedma\u00dfenanomalien (bestehend aus Amelie oder schweren Reduktionsdefekten, die zu rudiment\u00e4ren oberen und/oder unteren Gliedma\u00dfen f\u00fchren) und orofaziale Anomalien wie Gaumenspalte, bifides Z\u00e4pfchen, Mikroglossie und Unterkieferhypoplasie gekennzeichnet ist. Es kann auch mit anderen Fehlbildungen wie Kryptorchismus, Analstenose/atresie, hypoplastischen Lungen und kardialen Fehlbildungen einhergehen.", "synonyms": "SGFLD-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "183300", "UMLS": "C1866745", "GARD": "4963"}, {"name": "SGLT2-Defizienz", "sub_name": "Renale Glukosurie, famili\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, glucose transport disorder characterized by the presence of persistent isolated glucosuria in the absence of both proximal tubular dysfunction and hyperglycemia. The disorder is benign in the majority of cases although it may occasionally manifest with polyuria, enuresis, a mild growth and pubertal maturation delay, hypercalciuria, aminoaciduria and, in severe cases, increased incidence of urinary infections and episodic dehydration and ketosis during pregnancy and starvation.", "synonyms": "Familial renal glycosuria, SGLT2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "E74.8", "omim": "233100", "umls": "C0017980\u00a0 C3245525", "gard": "7548"}, {"name": "SGLT2-Mangel", "sub_name": "Renale Glukosurie, famili\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, glucose transport disorder characterized by the presence of persistent isolated glucosuria in the absence of both proximal tubular dysfunction and hyperglycemia. The disorder is benign in the majority of cases although it may occasionally manifest with polyuria, enuresis, a mild growth and pubertal maturation delay, hypercalciuria, aminoaciduria and, in severe cases, increased incidence of urinary infections and episodic dehydration and ketosis during pregnancy and starvation.", "synonyms": "Familial renal glycosuria, SGLT2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "E74.8", "omim": "233100", "umls": "C0017980\u00a0 C3245525", "gard": "7548"}, {"name": "SGS", "sub_name": "Schinzel-Giedion-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Schinzel-Giedion-Syndrom (SGS) ist eine ektodermale Dysplasie, die haupts\u00e4chlich durch eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Gesichtsdysmorphie, Hydronephrose, schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, typische Skelettfehlbildungen und genitale sowie kardiale Fehlbildungen charakterisiert ist.", "synonyms": "SGS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "269150", "UMLS": "C0265227", "GARD": "117", "MedDRA": "10063540", "epidemiology": "Die Geburtsh\u00e4ufigkeit des SGS ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit sind bisher \u00fcber 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Bei der Geburt ist das SGS sehr leicht an dem deutlichen Gesichtsdysmorphismus aus vorgew\u00f6lbter Stirn, Mittelgesichtsretraktion (in ausgepr\u00e4gten F\u00e4llen einer verbreiterten Acht \u00e4hnelnd) und einer kurzen nach oben gezogenen Nase sowie Weichteilanomalien und Hypertrichose zu erkennen. Eine Hydronephrose ist in fast allen F\u00e4llen vorhanden (91 %). Herzfehler, wie z. B. Septumdefekte, Herzklappendysplasien, hypoplastische Ventrikel und ein offener Ductus arteriosus sind verbreitet (43 %), sowie weitere Anomalien des Urogenitaltraktes (76 %), so wie Kryptorchismus, Mikropenis, Hypospadie, hypoplastischer Uterus, hypoplastische gro\u00dfe und kleine Schamlippen, tiefer Schamlippensulcus und nach vorne fehlplatzierter Anus. Neugeborene zeigen oft kurze Extremit\u00e4ten sowie die folgenden Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildungen: Pes valgus oder varus. mesomele Brachymelie mit hypoplastischen und hyperkonvexen N\u00e4geln und einer einzelnen palmaren Handlinie. Betroffene Neugeborene leiden an Hypotonie und zeigen typischerweise Atemversagen und eine schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, die von (oft hartn\u00e4ckigen) Anf\u00e4llen sowie Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Seh- und H\u00f6rverm\u00f6gens begleitet sind.", "etiology": "Das SGS wird durch de novo-Mutationen im SETBP1-Gen (18q21.1) verursacht, welche wahrscheinlich einen Funktionsgewinn oder einen dominant-negativen Effekt haben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose beruht auf klinischen Merkmalen (einschlie\u00dflich der unverwechselbaren Gesichtsdysmorphien), dem Nachweis der Hydronephrose im Ultraschall und dem radiographischen Nachweis von multiplen charakteristischen Skelettfehlbildungen (z. B. sklerotische Sch\u00e4delbasis, ausgepr\u00e4gte okzipitale Synchondrose, erh\u00f6hten Dicke der Nierenrinde und breiten Rippen). Innerhalb des ersten Lebensjahres zeigt die Sch\u00e4delradiographie eine L\u00fccke zwischen den beiden Teil des Os occipitale, und auch verdichtete Nierenpyramiden sind h\u00e4ufig. Eine molekulargenetische Analyse des SETBP1-Gens ist m\u00f6glich.", "differential_diagnosis": "Weitere Erkrankungen mit einer charakteristischen Mittelgesichtsretraktion, die als Differenzialdiagnosen in Betracht gezogen werden k\u00f6nnen, umfassen das fetale Hydantoin- bzw. Warfarin-Syndrom, das Zellweger-Syndrom, Mukopolysaccharidosen, Gangliosidosen und die rhizomele Chondrodysplasie punctata sowie der kongenitale Hypothyroidismus (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die Hydronephrose ist durch eine Ultraschalluntersuchung zwischen der 18. und 37. Schwangerschaftswoche in etwa 40 % der Krankheitsf\u00e4lle nachweisbar. Eine DNA-Untersuchung ist m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Das SGS ist eine autosomal-dominant vererbte Krankheit. So gut wie alle Krankheitsf\u00e4lle entstehen sporadisch, und die Identifizierung der Patienten sollte mit einer genetischen Beratung der Eltern einhergehen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und beinhaltet eine palliative Versorgung. Die wichtigsten Komplikationen sind Atemversagen, Nahrungsmittelunvertr\u00e4glichkeit, hartn\u00e4ckigen Anf\u00e4llen und wiederholten Infektionen wie z. B. Pneumonie.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig. Die meisten betroffenen Patienten \u00fcberleben die Kindheit aufgrund progressiver Neurodegeneration, erh\u00f6htem Tumorrisiko, rezidivierenden Infektionen und Atemversagen nicht, obwohl ein \u00dcberleben bis zum Erwachsenenalter beschrieben ist.", "summary": "Die Geburtsh\u00e4ufigkeit des SGS ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit sind bisher \u00fcber 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "SGS", "sub_name": "Shprintzen-Goldberg-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Shprintzen-Goldberg-Syndrom ist eine extrem seltene Krankheit, in 25 Jahren wurden weltweit weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Charakteristische Symptome sind marfanoider Habitus, kraniofaziale Anomalien (Kraniosynostose, charakteristische faziale Dysmorphien), Anomalien des Skeletts und des Herzkreislaufsystems und eine Lernbehinderungen. Die Krankheit ist sporadisch, bei einigen Patienten wurde eine Mutation im Fibrillin-1(FBN1)-Gen beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Shprintzen-Goldberg syndrome (SGS) is a very rare genetic disorder characterized by craniosynostosis, craniofacial and skeletal abnormalities, marfanoid habitus, cardiac anomalies, neurological abnormalities, and intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "Marfanoid craniosynostosis syndrome, SGS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "182212", "umls": "C1321551", "mesh": "C537328", "gard": "4861"}, {"name": "SH2D1A/SLAM-assoziierter Proteinmangel", "sub_name": "X-chromosomales lymphoproliferatives Syndrom durch SH2D1A-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltener, genetisch bedingter, prim\u00e4rer Immundefekt, der durch eine gest\u00f6rte Immunantwort auf eine Infektion mit dem Epstein-Barr-Virus (EBV) gekennzeichnet ist. Urs\u00e4chlich sind hemizygote Mutationen im X-chromosomalen SH2D1A-Gen, die zu einer Lymphoproliferation der B-Zellen f\u00fchren und variable Ph\u00e4notypen verursachen. Das Syndrom kann sich mit einer EBV-bedingten schweren oder fulminanten Mononukleose, h\u00e4mophagozytischer Lymphohistiozytose (mit fulminanter Hepatitis, Lebernekrose, Knochenmarkshypoplasie und neurologischer Beteiligung), Hypogammaglobulin\u00e4mie und B-Zell-Lymphom manifestieren. Weitere variable Merkmale sind Vaskulitis, lymphomatoide Granulomatose, aplastische An\u00e4mie und chronische Gastritis. Gelegentlich kann ein T-Zell-Lymphom beobachtet werden. Zu den Laborbefunden geh\u00f6ren normale oder erh\u00f6hte aktivierte T-Zellen und reduzierte Anzahl an B-Ged\u00e4chtniszellen.", "synonyms": "SAP-Defizienz, SAP-Mangel, SH2D1A/SLAM-assoziierter Proteinmangel, X-chromosomales lymphoproliferatives Syndrom Typ 1, XLP1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D82.3", "OMIM": "308240"}, {"name": "Shabbir-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Laryngo-onycho-kutanes Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das LOC-Syndrom ist ein Subtyp der Junktionalen Epidermolysis bullosa (JEB; siehe dort) und gekennzeichnet durch auff\u00e4lliges Schreien in der Neugeborenenperiode und durch abnorme Produktion von Granulationsgewebe, besonders in den oberen Luftwegen, auf den Konjunktiven und im peri- und subungualen Bereich.", "synonyms": "LOGIC-Syndrom, Shabbir-Syndrom, Syndrom des laryngealen und okul\u00e4ren Granulationsgewebes bei Kindern des Indischen Subkontinents, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q81.8", "OMIM": "245660", "UMLS": "C1328355", "GARD": "368", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, meist in konsanguinen Familien aus der Punjab-Region Pakistans und Indiens.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit besteht seit Geburt. Charakteristische Hautbefunde sind verg\u00e4ngliche Blasen, die nur langsam heilende Erosionen mit Bildung \u00fcbersch\u00fcssigen Granulationsgewebes hinterlassen. Betroffen sind vor allem Kopf und Hals, H\u00e4nde, F\u00fc\u00dfe, Ellenbogen und Knie. Immer bestehen auch extrakutane Symptome: Die fortschreitende Beteiligung des Kehlkopfes f\u00fchrt h\u00e4ufig im Kleinkindalter zu schwerer Obstruktion der Atemwege; Folgen der chronischen L\u00e4sionen der Konjunktiva sind Bildung eines Symblepharons, auch Verschluss der Lider und Erblindung. Immer besteht eine Zahnschmelzhypoplasie, Nageldystrophien sind h\u00e4ufig.", "etiology": "Mit der Krankheit assoziiert sind Mutationen im Gen f\u00fcr die Alpha-3-Kette des Laminin-332 (LAMA3).", "genetic_counseling": "Das LOC-Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, meist in konsanguinen Familien aus der Punjab-Region Pakistans und Indiens."}, {"name": "Shaheen-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hypohidrose-Schmelzhypoplasie-Palmoplantarkeratose-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hypohidrosis-enamel hypoplasia-palmoplantar keratoderma-intellectual disability syndrome is a rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by severe intellectual disability with significant speech and language impairment, hypohydrosis (often resulting in hyperthermia) with normal sweat gland appearance, tooth enamel hypoplasia, palmoplantar hyperkeratosis and a high frequency of acquired microcephaly. Mild facial dysmorphism, including lateral flaring of the eyebrows, broad nasal tip, and thick vermilion border, may also be observed.", "synonyms": "Shaheen syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "615328"}, {"name": "Shapiro-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spontane periodische Hypothermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spontane periodische Hypothermie (SPH) ist eine neurologische Erkrankung mit spontaner periodischer Hypothermie und Hyperhidrose ohne hypothalamische L\u00e4sionen.", "synonyms": "Hypothermie, episodische spontane, Shapiro-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G90.8", "UMLS": "C2931542", "GARD": "4815", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weltweit mehr als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die SPH kann in jedem Alter auftreten (6 Monate bis 62 Jahre). Das klinische Bild ist gepr\u00e4gt durch rezidivierende Episoden von Hypothermie (Kerntemperatur <35 \u00b0C) mit profusem Schwitzen, \u00dcbelkeit und Erbrechen bei Fehlen einer erkennbaren infekti\u00f6sen oder endokrinen Ursache. Die Periodizit\u00e4t dieser Episoden reicht von Stunden bis zu Jahren, und die Episoden selbst k\u00f6nnen Stunden bis Wochen andauern. Die Patienten haben ein 'komisches Gef\u00fchl' im Kopf, das als m\u00e4chtig und vernichtend beschrieben wird, zusammen mit Schw\u00e4chegef\u00fchl, gest\u00f6rter Koordination und unsicherem Gang. Zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome sind Benommenheit, tiefer Schlaf, hypotherme Synkope, leichte Bradykardie und blasse k\u00fchle Haut. Meist bestehen keine zus\u00e4tzlichen Klagen \u00fcber Diarrh\u00f6e, Konfusion, Keuchen der Atmung, Ausschlag, Krampfaktivit\u00e4t, Sch\u00fcttelfrost oder Wackeligkeit. In nur einem Fall wurden Polyurie und Polydipsie w\u00e4hrend der Attacken beschrieben. Isolierte rezidivierende Hypothermie-Attacken wurden bei 2 Geschwistern beschrieben.", "etiology": "Die genauen pathophysiologische Mechanismen f\u00fcr dieses Syndrom sind bisher nicht gesichert. Vermutet werden: Hypothalamische Dysfunktion, neurochemische Anomalien, entz\u00fcndliche Prozesse und epileptische Aktivit\u00e4t.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die k\u00f6rperliche Untersuchung und systemische Befunde mit blasser kalter Haut, normaler H\u00e4matologie und unauff\u00e4lligen Elektrolytspiegeln. Durch Bildgebung werden bei einigen Patienten konfluierende L\u00e4sionen im Corpus callosum und eine umschriebenen L\u00e4sion im rechten hinteren Thalamus nachgewiesen. Im Liquor k\u00f6nnen die Spiegel von5-Hydroxyindolessigs\u00e4ure (5-HIAA) und Homovanillins\u00e4ure (HVA) erniedrigt sein.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differenzialdiagnosen der SPH sind: schwere Hypothyreose, Hypoglyk\u00e4mie oder Attacken von diabetischen Ketoazidose.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine kurative Behandlung der SPH gibt es nicht. Die Behandlung ist haupts\u00e4chlich supportiv, mit Erw\u00e4rmung unter warmen Decken. Carbamazepin, Clonidin, Cyproheptadin, Glycopyrrolat, Bromocriptin, Chlorpromazin, Beta1-Blocker oder Sympathektomie werden mit unterschiedlichem Erfolg angewendet.", "prognosis": "Die SPH ist eine benigne Erkrankung und kann spontan sistieren. Bei einigen Patienten wurden hypertherme Attacken im Verlauf der Krankheit beschrieben.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weltweit mehr als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Sharma-Kapoor-Ramji-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Rippen, d\u00fcnne - tubul\u00e4re Knochen - Dysmorphien", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An extremely rare, lethal, primary bone dysplasia characterized by thin ribs, thin long bones, high-arched palate and facial features of frontal bossing and low-set, posteriorly rotated ears. Bilateral cryptorchidism may be also observed. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1990.", "synonyms": "Sharma-Kapoor-Ramji syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "umls": "C2931543"}, {"name": "Sharp-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Mischkollagenose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MCTD, Sharp-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "M35.1", "UMLS": "C0026272", "MeSH": "D008947", "GARD": "7051", "MedDRA": "10027754", "summary": "Die Mischkollagenose (MCTD) ist eine seltene Kollagenose mit Kombination der klinischen Symptome des Systemischen Lupus erythematodes (SLE), der Systemischen Sklerose (SSc), der Polymyositis (PM) (s. diese Termini) und/oder der Rheumatoiden Arthritis (RA). Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht genau bekannt, nur in Japan wurde sie zu 1:37.000 bestimmt. Die MCTD kommt in allen ethnischen Populationen vor, das Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis ist w.:m.=10:1. Die Krankheit beginnt in der Regel in einem Alter zwischen 15 und 35 Jahren. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Raynaud-Syndrom (s. dort), Arthralgie/Arthritis, angeschwollene H\u00e4nde/dicke Finger, Sklerodaktylie und Myositis. Einige Patienten klagen \u00fcber verminderte Motilit\u00e4t ihrer Speiser\u00f6hre, \u00fcber lupus- oder dermatomyositis-\u00e4hnliche Hautausschl\u00e4ge und Trigeminus-Neuralgie und haben eine Pleuritis, Perikarditis und/oder Lungenhochdruck. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige, aber unspezifische Symptome, die auch w\u00e4hrend akuter Phasen auftreten, sind Ersch\u00f6pfung, allgemeines Unwohlsein und subfebrile Temperaturen. Sie erfordern immer eine sorgf\u00e4ltige Suche nach infekti\u00f6sen Ursachen. Die genaue Ursache der MCTD ist noch nicht bekannt, bei den Patienten werden aber abnorme B- und T-Zell-Immunantworten gegen apoptotisch modifizierte Selbst-Antigene gefunden. Die meisten Patienten haben hohe Titer (oft >1:1.000) von Anti-U1-Ribonukleoprotein (RNP)- und Anti-U1-70kD-Autoantik\u00f6rpern. Die Diagnose der MCTD basiert (i) auf dem Vorhandensein sich \u00fcberschneidender Symptome von SLE, SSc, PM und RA, oder dem Auftreten \u00fcberlappender Symptome anderer Kollagenosen bei Patienten mit gut definierter Kollagenose und (ii) auf Blutuntersuchungen mit dem Nachweis hoher Anti-U1-RNP-Antik\u00f6rpertiter und normalen Titern anderer bei Kollagenosen gefundener Antik\u00f6rper (au\u00dfer Anti-SSA- und/oder Anti-SSB-Antik\u00f6rpern bei F\u00e4llen mit sekund\u00e4rem Sj\u00f6gren-Syndrom; s. dort). Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Kollagenosen, wie SLE, SSc, PM und/oder RA, und andere systemische Krankheiten, wie Sarkoidose, Periarteriitis nodosa oder Still-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Die MCTD wird \u00e4hnlich wie die einzelnen Kollagenosen behandelt, deren \u00fcberlappende Symptome das klinische Bild der MCTD bestimmen. NSAIDs, Anti-Malaria-Medikamente oder niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide sind bei Minor-Formen und mildem Verlauf wirksam. Moderate bis schwere Formen erfordern eine h\u00f6here Dosierung von Kortikosteroiden (~0.5-1mg/kg/Tag). Noch h\u00f6hrere Kortikosteroid-Dosierungen k\u00f6nnen zusammen mit Immunsuppressiva in F\u00e4llen mit schwerer intestinaler Beteiligung gegeben werden. Sehr wichtig ist auch eine symptomatische Behandlung z.B. des Raynaud-Syndroms. Die MCTD verl\u00e4uft chronisch mit R\u00fcckf\u00e4llen und Rezidiven. Die 10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate ist insgesamt etwa 80%. Im allgemeinen ist die Prognose g\u00fcnstig, h\u00e4ngt aber weitgehend davon ab, welche viszeralen Symptome das Krankheitsbild dominieren. Vermutlich haben Patienten mit Symptomen der SSC oder PM die ung\u00fcnstigste Prognose. Lungenhochdruck ist bei MCTD die h\u00e4ufigste Todesursache."}, {"name": "SHCB", "sub_name": "Selbstheilendes Kollodium-Baby", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Selbstheilende Kollodium-Baby (SHCB) ist eine leichte Variante der autosomal-rezessiven kongenitalen Ichthyose (ARCI) und gekennzeichnet durch eine Kollodiummembran bei Geburt, die in den ersten Lebenswochen abheilt.", "synonyms": "SHCB, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.2", "OMIM": "242100\u00a0 242300\u00a0 606545", "UMLS": "C1855789", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 25 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die betroffenen Babies werden in einer Kollodium-Membran geboren. Weitere Symptome sind Ektropion, Eklabium und eine eingeschr\u00e4nkte Gelenksbeweglichkeit. Nachdem die Membran abgeworfen wurde, zeigen die Patienten nur eine leichte Schuppung.", "etiology": "Die SCHB wird verursacht durch Mutationen in den Genen: TGM1, ALOXE3 oder ALOX12B, die f\u00fcr Transglutaminase 1 (beteiligt an der Verhornung des Stratum corneum) und die Arachidonat-3- und 12(R)-Lipoxygenasen (beteiligt am Lipidstoffwechsel) kodieren. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 25 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "SHCB, akrales", "sub_name": "Selbstheilendes Kollodiumbaby, akrales", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A variant of self-healing collodion baby (SHCB) characterized by the presence at birth of a collodion membrane only at the extremities.", "synonyms": "Acral SHCB, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q80.2", "epidemiology": "Only 2 cases were described in the literature.", "clinical_description": "In both cases, the babies healed soon after birth.", "etiology": "In one case, molecular analysis was performed that revealed mutations in the TGM1 gene encoding transglutaminase 1, an enzyme involved in the cornification of the stratum corneum."}, {"name": "Sheehan-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sheehan syndrome is a rare, acquired, pituitary hormone deficiency disorder resulting from pituitary necrosis following peri- or postpartum hemorrhage characterized by various symptoms depending on resulting hormone decrease (e.g. failure or difficulty with lactation, oligo- or amenorrhea, hot flashes, decreased libido, weakness, fatigue, anorexia, nausea, vomiting, hypoglycemia, hyponatremia, dizziness, decreased muscle mass, adrenal crisis). Secondary hypothyroidism and secondary adrenal insufficiency may also be presenting signs.", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "E23.0", "umls": "C0242342", "gard": "7630", "meddra": "10036297"}, {"name": "Sheldon-Hall-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sheldon-Hall syndrome (SHS) is a rare multiple congenital contracture syndrome characterized by contractures of the distal joints of the limbs, triangular face, downslanting palpebral fissures, small mouth, and high arched palate.", "synonyms": "Distal arthrogryposis type 2B, Freeman-Sheldon syndrome variant, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q68.8", "omim": "601680\u00a0 616266\u00a0 618435", "umls": "C1834523", "epidemiology": "Epidemiological data for the prevalence of SHS are not available, but less than 100 cases have been reported in the literature.", "clinical_description": "Other common clinical features of SHS include prominent nasolabial folds, high arched palate, attached earlobes, mild cervical webbing, short stature, severe camptodactyly, ulnar deviation, and vertical talus and/or talipes equinovarus. Typically, the contractures are most severe at birth and non-progressive.", "etiology": "Mutations in either MYH3, TNNI2, or TNNT3 have been found in about 50% of cases. These genes encode proteins of the contractile apparatus of fast twitch skeletal muscle fibers.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of SHS is based on clinical criteria.", "differential_diagnosis": "Mutation analysis is useful to distinguish SHS from arthrogryposis syndromes with similar features (e.g. distal arthrogryposis 1 and Freeman-Sheldon syndrome; see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis by ultrasonography is feasible at 18-24 weeks of gestation. If the family history is positive and the mutation is known in the family, prenatal molecular genetic diagnosis is possible.", "genetic_counseling": "SHS is inherited in an autosomal dominant pattern but about half the cases are sporadic.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific therapy for SHS. However, patients benefit from early intervention with occupational and physical therapy, serial casting, and/or surgery.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy and cognitive abilities are normal."}, {"name": "SHFM", "sub_name": "Isolierte Spalthand-Spaltfu\u00df-Fehlbildung", "german_description": "Die Spalthand-Spaltfu\u00df-Malformation (SHFM) ist eine seltene Fehlbildung. Sie betrifft die mittleren Strahlen der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, mal an einer, mal an mehreren oder an allen 4 Gliedma\u00dfen. Syndaktylie mit Oligodaktylie, eine mediane Spalte von H\u00e4nden und F\u00fc\u00dfen mit opponierbaren Fingern f\u00fchren zum sog. 'Krebsscheren'-Aspekt. Manchmal ergibt sich ein etwas anderer Aspekt mit Monodaktylie und dem Fehlen der radialen Strahlen. Hierbei ist es meist der 5. Finger, der bestehen bleibt. Die Patienten haben entweder nur eine dieser beiden Auspr\u00e4gungen oder beide. Bei den nicht-syndromalen Formen fehlen weitere Anomalien. Gesicherte Assoziationen bestehen mit Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit (OMIM 605617), Aniridie (OMIM 106200) und Alport-Syndrom (OMIM 104200). Die Hand- und Fu\u00dffehlbildungen k\u00f6nnen chirurgisch und prothetisch gebessert werden. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit bei der Geburt wird auf 1/90.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Bisher wurden 5 Loci kartiert: SHFM1 in der Chromosomenregion 7q21.2-q21, SHFM2 auf Chromosom Xq26, SHFM3 auf Chromosom 10, SHFM4 mit Mutationen im TP63-Gen auf Chromosom 3 und SHFM5 auf Chromosom 2q31. SHFM3 und SHFM4 werden autosomal-dominant mit inkompletter Penetranz vererbt, SHFM2 X-chromosomal-rezessiv. Die Vererbung von SHFM 5 ist noch unklar, sowohl rezessive Vererbung, als auch dominante Vererbung mit unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz werden diskutiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, congenital, bone development disorder characterized by a spectrum of terminal limb malformations including hypoplasia/absence of central rays of the hands and feet (that can occur in one to all four digits), variable degrees of median clefts of the hands and/or feet, aplasia and syndactyly, with a wide range of severity ranging from malformed central finger/toe to a lobster claw-like appearance of the hands and feet. It can occur as an isolated malformation or it can be a feature in various syndromes.", "synonyms": "Ectrodactyly, SHFM, Split hand foot malformation, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q74.8", "omim": "183600\u00a0 225300\u00a0 246560\u00a0 313350\u00a0 605289\u00a0 606708", "umls": "C0265554", "gard": "6319"}, {"name": "Shiga-\u00e4hnliches Toxin-assoziierte HUS", "sub_name": "Shiga-\u00e4hnliches Toxin-assoziiertes H\u00e4molytisch-ur\u00e4misches Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Typical hemolytic-uremic syndrome (typical HUS) is a thrombotic microangiopathy characterized by mechanical hemolytic anemia, thrombocytopenia, and renal dysfunction that is usually associated with prodromal enteritis caused by Shigella dysentriae type 1 or E. Coli.", "synonyms": "D+ HUS, EHEC-HUS, Hemolytic uremic syndrome associated with Shiga toxin-producing Escherichia coli, Hemolytic uremic syndrome with diarrhea, STEC-HUS, Shiga-like toxin-associated HUS, Stx-HUS, Typical HUS, Typical hemolytic uremic syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D58.8", "omim": "235400"}, {"name": "Shiga-\u00e4hnliches Toxin-assoziiertes H\u00e4molytisch-ur\u00e4misches Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Typical hemolytic-uremic syndrome (typical HUS) is a thrombotic microangiopathy characterized by mechanical hemolytic anemia, thrombocytopenia, and renal dysfunction that is usually associated with prodromal enteritis caused by Shigella dysentriae type 1 or E. Coli.", "synonyms": "D+ HUS, EHEC-HUS, Hemolytic uremic syndrome associated with Shiga toxin-producing Escherichia coli, Hemolytic uremic syndrome with diarrhea, STEC-HUS, Shiga-like toxin-associated HUS, Stx-HUS, Typical HUS, Typical hemolytic uremic syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D58.8", "omim": "235400"}, {"name": "Shigellose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A03.0\u00a0 A03.1\u00a0 A03.2\u00a0 A03.3\u00a0 A03.8\u00a0 A03.9", "UMLS": "C0013371", "GARD": "4818", "MedDRA": "10017915\u00a0 10054178", "summary": "Die Shigellose ist eine Durchfallerkrankung und verursacht durch Shigella, ein kleines ubiquit\u00e4res gramnegatives Bakterium aus der Familie der Enterobakterien. Es gibt vier Arten, S. dysenteriae, S. flexneri, S. boydii und S. sonnei, die alle eine bakterielle Dysenterie verursachen und streng auf den Menschen als Wirt beschr\u00e4nkt sind. In Westeuropa sind F\u00e4lle von Shigellose entweder importiert oder auf kleine, durch Nahrung bedingte Epidemien in Familien beschr\u00e4nkt. Am h\u00e4ufigsten ist S. sonnei der Erreger. Nach einer Inkubationszeit von 2-3 Tagen tritt ein dysenterisches Syndrom mit t\u00e4glich 10-30 eiwei\u00dfartigen, blutig-w\u00e4ssrigen St\u00fchlen, hohem Fieber bis 40\u00b0C und Leibschmerzen auf. Endoskopisch sind multiple Ulzerationen der Darmschleimhaut nachweisbar. Die Virulenz der Shigellen beruht auf ihrer F\u00e4higkeit, zwischen den zusammenh\u00e4ngenden Epithelzellen in das Darmepithel einzudringen und dadurch die Mukosa zu zerst\u00f6ren. Die Diagnose st\u00fctzt sich auf den Erregernachweis im Stuhl. Die Therapie besteht in der Gabe von Antibiotika, Chinolonen und Cotrimoxazol und in der Rehydratation zur Abschw\u00e4chung der Symptome. F\u00fcr die Eingrenzung von Epidemien ist eine strikte Isolierung der Patienten unerl\u00e4sslich. Die Krankheit ist meldepflichtig. "}, {"name": "SHILCA-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie-sensorineuraler H\u00f6rverlust-Intelligenzminderung-Lebersche kongenitale Amaurose-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SHILCA-Syndrom, ", "OMIM": "619260", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SHML", "sub_name": "Rosa\u00ef-Dorfman-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Rosa\u00ef-Dorfman-Krankheit ist eine seltene benigne Nicht-Langerhanszell-Histiozytose mit der Entwicklung gro\u00dfer schmerzloser histiozyt\u00e4rer Tumoren in den Lymphknoten vor allem der Halsregion. Au\u00dfer den Lymphknoten k\u00f6nnen auch andere Bereiche beteiligt sein: Haut, Atemwege, Knochen, Urogenitalsystem, Weichteile, Mundh\u00f6hle und Zentralnervensystem. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Fieber, Mattigkeit, Nasenbluten, Nachtschwei\u00df, Gewichtsverlust, Leukozytose, erh\u00f6hte Blutsenkung und Hyper-Gammaglobulin\u00e4mie.", "synonyms": "Destombes-Rosa\u00ef-Dorfman-Krankheit, Rosa\u00ef-Dorfman-Destombes-Krankheit, SHML, Sinushistiozytose mit massiver Lymphadenopathie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D76.3", "GARD": "7588", "MedDRA": "10063397"}, {"name": "Shokeir-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Alopezie-Epilepsie-Pyorrhoe-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Alopezie-Epilepsie-Pyorrhoe-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom ist durch kongenitale permanente Alopezia universalis, Intelligenzminderung, psychomotorische Epilepsie und Paradontitis (Pyorrhoe) gekennzeichnet. Eine vollst\u00e4ndige, permanente Alopezie und Pyorrhoe treten bei allen Patienten auf, wohingegen Intelligenzminderung und psychomotorische Epilepsie bei den meisten Patienten beobachtet werden. Abgesehen vom Fehlen der Haare sind keine weiteren Auff\u00e4lligkeiten der N\u00e4gel oder Haut beschrieben. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant.", "synonyms": "Shokeir-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "104130", "UMLS": "C1863090", "MeSH": "C537057", "GARD": "607"}, {"name": "Shone-Komplex", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Shone complex is a rare congenital cardiac malformation characterized by a complex of four obstructive lesions of the left heart: supravalvular mitral membrane, parachute mitral valve, muscular or membranous subvalvular aortic stenosis and coarctation of aorta. Clinical manifestations include heart murmur, shortness of breath and increased load intolerance, left ventricular hypertrophy and dilatation of the left atrium. Partial forms, involving only two or three out of the four specific anomalies, are also described and occasionally other cardiovascular anomalies (e.g. bicuspid aortic valve, patent ductus arteriosus, ventricular septal defect) may be associated.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q23.8", "umls": "C1868705", "meddra": "10066802"}, {"name": "Short-QT-Syndrom, famili\u00e4res", "german_description": "Das Famili\u00e4re Short-QT-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch ein kurzes QT-Intervall (QT und QTc 300 ms) im EKG, verbunden mit einem hohen Risiko f\u00fcr Synkopen oder pl\u00f6tzlichen Herztod durch maligne Kammerarrhythmien. Dieses au\u00dferordentlich seltene Syndrom betrifft haupts\u00e4chlich Kleinkinder und junge Erwachsene. Das sehr weite klinische Spektrum reicht von symptomlosen Tr\u00e4gern bis zur Synkope oder pl\u00f6tzlichem Herztod. H\u00e4ufig tritt auch Vorhofflimmern auf. Bei den Patienten wurden Mutationen in drei verschienen Genen (KCNQ1, KCNH2, und KCNJ2) gefunden, die alle f\u00fcr Kalium-Kan\u00e4le kodieren. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Expressionsstudien belegen eine \u00dcberfunktion der mutierten Kan\u00e4le mit verk\u00fcrzter Dauer des Aktionspotentials. Dies erkl\u00e4rt die Verk\u00fcrzung des QT-Intervalls. Bei elektrophysiologischen Untersuchungen wurde eine verk\u00fcrzte atriale und ventrikul\u00e4re Refrakt\u00e4rzeit gefunden. Bei den meisten Patienten kann ein Kammerflimmern induziert werden. Gegenw\u00e4rtig ist die Implantation von automatischen Defibrillatoren die einzig wirksame Behandlung, um beim Short-QT-Syndrom einem pl\u00f6tzlichen Herztod vorzubeugen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic cardiac rhythm disease characterized by a short QTc interval on the surface electrocardiogram (ECG) with a high risk of syncope or sudden death due to malignant ventricular arrhythmia.", "synonyms": "SQTS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I49.8", "omim": "609620\u00a0 609621\u00a0 609622", "epidemiology": "This extremely rare syndrome affects mainly young adults or infants and has been reported in nearly 80 families. The disease has been predominantly reported in males.", "clinical_description": "Whilst the disease may remain asymptomatic, the most common clinical presentation is a cardiac arrest (CA), with approximately 40% of patients suffering an episode of CA between birth and 40 years of age. Other symptoms include syncope and arrhythmias including atrial fibrillation, ventricular fibrillation (VF), supraventricular tachycardia (SVT), and polymorphic ventricular tachycardia. There is a high risk of recurrent arrhythmic events in symptomatic patients. The risk of sudden cardiac death (SDC) is highest in the first year of life and between 20 to 40 years.", "etiology": "Mutations in the genes KCNQ1 (11p15.5), KCNH2 (7q36.1), and KCNJ2 (17q24.3), encoding cardiac ionic potassium channels, and the gene encoding the calcium channel, CACNA2D1 (7q21.11), have been identified in affected patients. 40% of patients do not have a genetic cause identified.", "diagnostic_methods": "According to the European Society of Cardiology Guidelines, SQTS is diagnosed by the presence of a corrected QT (QTc) interval less than or equal to 340 ms on resting 12-lead ECG or should be considered in the presence of a QTc less than or equal 360 ms and one or more of the following: a confirmed pathogenic mutation, a family history of SQTS, a family history of sudden death at young age (less than 40 years of age), or history of ventricular tachyarrhythmia/ventricular fibrillation (VT/VF) in the absence of heart disease. When a patient is diagnosed, clinical assessment is recommended in all family members, including an ECG in newborns.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other repolarizing disorders such as Brugada syndrome and early repolarization syndrome. Of note, a few rare patients with Brugada syndrome have been reported to have a short QTc.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal dominant. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. First-degree relatives of an affected individual have a 50% risk of being affected. Sporadic cases have also been reported.", "management_and_treatment": "Currently, an automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator (ICD) is recommended for patients who have experienced a sustained VT/VF episode or have survived an aborted cardiac arrest. However, ICD is complicated by a high probability of inappropriate ICD shocks, particularly in pediatric patients, and requires appropriate programming to prevent T-wave oversensing. Quinidine prophylaxis may be considered in patients where ICD is contraindicated/refused or in asymptomatic SQTS patients with a family history of SDC. Patients on quinidine should be carefully monitored for QT prolongation and possible pro-arrhythmic events.", "prognosis": "The risk of sudden cardiac death is high, and a history of survived cardiac arrest at the initial presentation is a strong predictor of recurrent ventricular arrhythmias over the course of time."}, {"name": "SHORT-Syndrom", "german_description": "'SHORT' ist ein Akronym und steht f\u00fcr 'short stature' (Minderwuchs), hyperextensible (\u00fcberstreckbare) Gelenke oder Leistenhernien oder beides, 'ocular depression' (tiefliegende Augen), Rieger-Anomalie, und versp\u00e4tetes 'teething' (Zahndurchbruch). Diese Assoziation wurde weltweit bisher bei weniger als 20 Patienten beschrieben. Die Rieger-Anomalie ist charakterisiert durch eine Hypoplasie der Iris und durch Str\u00e4nge von der Iris zur peripheren Hornhaut. Die H\u00e4lfte der Patienten entwickelt ein Glaukom. Einige Patienten haben auch eine abnorm gelagerte Pupille (Korektopie), schlitzf\u00f6rmige Pupillen oder sogar multiple Pupillen (Polykorie). Dazu haben die Patienten ein charakteristisches dreieckiges Gesicht mit kleinen Gesichtsknochen, tiefliegenden Augen, Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, d\u00fcnnen Nasenfl\u00fcgeln und Mikrogenie. Bei einigen Patienten wurde eine Lipatrophie oder Lipodystrophie des Gesichtes beschrieben sowie insulin-resistenter Diabetes und polyzystische Ovarien. Der Minderwuchs geht mit verz\u00f6gerter Knochenreifung und Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung einher. D\u00fcnne, trockene und gef\u00e4ltelte Haut erzeugt einen progeroiden Eindruck. Die Beobachtung von famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4llen \u00fcber mehrere Generationen, Berichte \u00fcber die gleichartige Auspr\u00e4gung im m\u00e4nnlichen und weiblichen Geschlecht und die beobachtete Vererbung vom Vater auf den Sohn legen autosomal-dominante Vererbung nahe. Bei betroffenen Geschwistern mit nicht betroffenen Eltern k\u00f6nnte es sich um Keimzellmosaike handeln. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare disorder characterized by multiple congenital anomalies. The name is a mneumonic for the common features observed in SHORT syndrome that include; short stature, hyperextensibility of joints, ocular depression, Rieger anomaly and teething delay. Other common manifestations of SHORT syndrome are mild intrauterine growth restriction, partial lipodystrophy, delayed bone age, hernias and a recognizable facial gestalt.", "synonyms": "Lipodystrophy-Rieger anomaly-diabetes syndrome, Rieger anomaly-partial lipodystrophy syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.1", "omim": "269880", "umls": "C0878684", "mesh": "C537327", "gard": "7633", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of SHORT syndrome is unknown. Less than 50 cases have been reported in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Individuals with SHORT syndrome often display mild intrauterine growth restriction. Feeding difficulties and/or failure to thrive present in early childhood and final adult height is shorter than average (155-163 cm in males and 143-160 cm in females). Most patients have a characteristic facial gestalt, often described as progeroid, with triangular face shape, prominent forehead, ocular depression, hypoplastic alae nasi, low-hanging columella, downturned corners of the mouth, micrognathia and prominent (but not typically low-set or posteriorly located) ears. Partial lipodystrophy may be evident in the face at birth and later in the chest and upper extremities (including the hands), but it is usually not reported in the buttocks and legs. Delayed dentition, hypodontia, enamel hypoplasia, malocclusion and multiple dental caries are frequently reported. Ophthalmic anomalies (e.g. Rieger anomaly, Axenfeld anomaly (see these terms), glaucoma) are also characteristic of the disease. Diabetes is seen in approximately 2/3 of individuals with SHORT syndrome after the age of 15 years. Other less common manifestations include hyperextensibility of joints and/or hernias, sensorineural hearing loss and ovarian cysts in females. Intellectual development and cognition are usually unaffected although mild impairment with speech delay has been reported.", "etiology": "SHORT syndrome is due to mutations in the PIK3R1 gene (5q13.1), encoding phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase regulatory subunit alpha. Mutations are thought to impair the PI3K/AKT/mTOR pathway, which plays an important role in cellular proliferation and growth.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the presence of the characteristic features and confirmed by molecular genetic testing identifying a PIK3R1 mutation. The presence of all 5 features of the acronym is not necessary for a positive diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Silver-Russell syndrome, Alagille syndrome, Floating-Harbor syndrome, growth delay due to insulin-like growth factor I resistance, Berardinelli-Seip congenital lipodystrophy and Hutchinson-Gilford progeria syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known disease-causing mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "SHORT syndrome is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner. Genetic counseling is recommended for at-risk families. De novo cases have also been described. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is symptomatic and requires a multidisciplinary team. Screening for insulin resistance is recommended starting in mid-late childhood. Glucose intolerance and diabetes mellitus can be treated with diet, lifestyle, oral medication and insulin, while growth hormone therapy is contraindicated. Ophthalmological management and follow-up (i.e. regular eye examinations) are necessary to reduce and stabilize ocular pressures and to preserve vision. Dental anomalies can be treated using standard methods (e.g. crowns and dental prostheses).", "prognosis": "Individuals with SHORT syndrome are considered to have a normal life-expectancy."}, {"name": "SHPK-Mangel, isolierter", "sub_name": "Sedoheptulose Kinase-Mangel, isolierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, hereditary disorder of pentose phosphate metabolism characterized by increased urine levels of sedoheptulose and erythritol, and low-to-normal excretion of sedoheptulose-7P. Clinical presentation of this disorder is currently unclear.", "synonyms": "Isolated SHPK deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "617213"}, {"name": "Shprintzen-Goldberg-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Shprintzen-Goldberg-Syndrom ist eine extrem seltene Krankheit, in 25 Jahren wurden weltweit weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Charakteristische Symptome sind marfanoider Habitus, kraniofaziale Anomalien (Kraniosynostose, charakteristische faziale Dysmorphien), Anomalien des Skeletts und des Herzkreislaufsystems und eine Lernbehinderungen. Die Krankheit ist sporadisch, bei einigen Patienten wurde eine Mutation im Fibrillin-1(FBN1)-Gen beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Shprintzen-Goldberg syndrome (SGS) is a very rare genetic disorder characterized by craniosynostosis, craniofacial and skeletal abnormalities, marfanoid habitus, cardiac anomalies, neurological abnormalities, and intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "Marfanoid craniosynostosis syndrome, SGS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "182212", "umls": "C1321551", "mesh": "C537328", "gard": "4861"}, {"name": "Shulman-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Fasziitis, eosinophile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Eosinophile Fasziitis ist eine seltene Bindegewebserkrankung. Charakteristisch ist eine Entz\u00fcndung und Verdickung der Faszien, in der Regel in Verbindung mit peripherer Eosinophilie. Die Krankheit beginnt im Erwachsenenalter mit symmetrischer schmerzhafter Schwellung vor allem der Extremit\u00e4ten, die zunehmend verh\u00e4rten. Ersch\u00f6pfung, beeintr\u00e4chtigende Hautfibrose, Myositis und Arthritis sind weitere Symptome.", "synonyms": "Shulman-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M35.4", "OMIM": "226350", "UMLS": "C0264005", "GARD": "6351", "MedDRA": "10014954"}, {"name": "Shwachman-Bodian-Diamond-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Shwachman-Diamond-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Shwachman-Diamond-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch das Zusammentreffen eines h\u00e4matologischen Defektes, eines Dysmorphie-Syndroms und einer Pankreas-Lipomatose mit ekkriner Pankreasinsuffizienz. Die Krankheit ist sehr selten, in Frankreich wurden nicht mehr als 100 Patienten beschrieben. Weitere Symptome sind Ichthyose, Knochenanomalien (metaphys\u00e4re Dysostose, Pectus carinatum) und psychomotorische Retardierung. Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt typisch verringerte Intensit\u00e4t in T2. Zu den h\u00e4matologischen St\u00f6rungen geh\u00f6ren Neutropenie mit defekter Chemotaxis, moderate Thrombopenie und An\u00e4mie sowie eine erh\u00f6hte Konzentration des foetalen H\u00e4moglobins. Diese St\u00f6rungen nehmen an Schwere zu und m\u00fcnden in 25% der F\u00e4lle in der Aplasie. Trotz einiger \u00c4hnlichkeiten mit dem Pearson-Syndrom liegt kein mitochondrialer Defekt vor. Die meisten Patienten haben eine Mutation im ubiquit\u00e4r exprimierten SBDS-Gen auf Chromosom 7. Die Funktionen dieses Gens sind sehr vielf\u00e4ltig. Deshalb ist es schwierig, die Pathogenese des komplexen klinischen Bildes zu erkl\u00e4ren. Solange die Neutropenie moderat ist und keine symptome verursacht, beschr\u00e4nkt sich die Betreuung auf die Ern\u00e4hrung (Pankreasenzyme, N\u00e4hrstoffe, Vitamine). Manchmal ist eine Therapie mit dem h\u00e4matopoetischen Wachstumsfaktor G-CSF (granulocyte colony-stimulating factor) hilfreich. Die Patienten haben ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko, eine sekund\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mie zu entwickeln (in der Regel eine Akute Myeloblastenleuk\u00e4mie Typ FAB 5 oder 6) oder ein Myelodysplastisches Syndrom mit zytologischen Anomalien (klonale zytogenetische Anomalien, h\u00e4ufig unter Einbeziehung des Chromosoms 7). Wenn die Krankheit bis zur Markaplasie oder zu maligner Ver\u00e4nderun fortgeschritten ist, wird eine Knochenmarktransplantation erforderlich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Shwachman-Diamond syndrome (SDS) is a rare multisystemic syndrome characterized by chronic and usually mild neutropenia, pancreatic exocrine insufficiency associated with steatorrhea and growth failure, skeletal dysplasia with short stature, and an increased risk of bone marrow aplasia or leukemic transformation.", "synonyms": "Pancreatic insufficiency and bone marrow dysfunction, SDS, Shwachman syndrome, Shwachman-Bodian-Diamond syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "D61.0", "omim": "260400\u00a0 617941", "umls": "C0272170", "gard": "4863", "meddra": "10067940", "epidemiology": "Worldwide prevalence is estimated at about 1/350,000 and birth-prevalence at around 1/200,000 live births.", "clinical_description": "SDS shows a variable clinical picture, even within families. It generally manifests during infancy or early childhood. The most common anomaly is usually intermittent and moderate neutropenia that is associated with recurrent infections. Mild anemia and thrombocytopenia may also occur. Exocrine pancreatic insufficiency results in failure to thrive, growth retardation, and chronic steatorrhea. Bone involvement is characterized by delayed bone age and maturation with metaphyseal dysplasia resulting in short stature, pectus carinatum, and generalized osteopenia. Other features include cutaneous (e.g. eczema or ichthyosis) and dental anomalies, and psychomotor retardation. Mild or severe intellectual disability (50% of patients) causes learning difficulties. Hematologic manifestations may be complicated by bone marrow aplasia, acute myeloid leukemia or a myelodysplastic syndrome (see these terms). In the neonatal period there are generally no symptoms observed but some cases were reported with pancytopenia, respiratory distress, and severe spondylometaphyseal dysplasia (see this term).", "etiology": "SDS is caused in 95% of cases by mutations in the SBDS gene (7q11.22) encoding a ribosomal protein involved in ribosomal biogenesis and other cellular processes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical, laboratory, and radiologic findings. Blood analysis shows neutropenia (absolute neutrophil count <1500/mL) that can be associated with mild to moderate thrombocytopenia, moderate anemia, and a rise in fetal hemoglobin. Exocrine pancreatic insufficiency can be detected by serum analysis showing low levels of pancreatic isoamylase and/or trypsinogen, stool analysis showing low fecal elastase, and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) revealing a characteristic pancreatic aspect with fat degeneration (MRI could be normal until the age of 5). Imagery also allows detection, usually after the age of 5, of metaphyseal anomalies and abnormal growth plate development. Bone marrow smears usually reveal varying degrees of hypocellularity with dysgranulopoieisis or dyserythropoieisis. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include cystic fibrosis, Pearson syndrome, Fanconi anemia, Johanson-Blizzard syndrome, Blackfan-Diamond anemia, celiac disease, and autosomal recessive severe congenital neutropenia due to G6PC3 deficiency (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is feasible in families in which the disease-causing mutation has already been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Recurrence risk is of 25%.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is multidisciplinary, associating usually a hematologist, a gastroenterologist and other specialists such as a nutritionist, endocrinologist, or orthopedist. Pancreatic insufficiency requires pancreatic enzyme supplementation, adapted to the diet. Antibiotic therapy prophylaxis may be sufficient to avoid infections; otherwise, granulocyte colony-stimulating factor can be proposed. Severe hematological complications require hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. Surgery may be proposed for skeletal anomalies. Patients with learning difficulties require specific educational support.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable. Life-threatening complications include bone marrow aplasia and leukemic transformation, and occasionally viral infections. About 1/3 of patients present such complications, and some can be treated successfully by bone marrow transplant."}, {"name": "Shwachman-Diamond-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Shwachman-Diamond-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch das Zusammentreffen eines h\u00e4matologischen Defektes, eines Dysmorphie-Syndroms und einer Pankreas-Lipomatose mit ekkriner Pankreasinsuffizienz. Die Krankheit ist sehr selten, in Frankreich wurden nicht mehr als 100 Patienten beschrieben. Weitere Symptome sind Ichthyose, Knochenanomalien (metaphys\u00e4re Dysostose, Pectus carinatum) und psychomotorische Retardierung. Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt typisch verringerte Intensit\u00e4t in T2. Zu den h\u00e4matologischen St\u00f6rungen geh\u00f6ren Neutropenie mit defekter Chemotaxis, moderate Thrombopenie und An\u00e4mie sowie eine erh\u00f6hte Konzentration des foetalen H\u00e4moglobins. Diese St\u00f6rungen nehmen an Schwere zu und m\u00fcnden in 25% der F\u00e4lle in der Aplasie. Trotz einiger \u00c4hnlichkeiten mit dem Pearson-Syndrom liegt kein mitochondrialer Defekt vor. Die meisten Patienten haben eine Mutation im ubiquit\u00e4r exprimierten SBDS-Gen auf Chromosom 7. Die Funktionen dieses Gens sind sehr vielf\u00e4ltig. Deshalb ist es schwierig, die Pathogenese des komplexen klinischen Bildes zu erkl\u00e4ren. Solange die Neutropenie moderat ist und keine symptome verursacht, beschr\u00e4nkt sich die Betreuung auf die Ern\u00e4hrung (Pankreasenzyme, N\u00e4hrstoffe, Vitamine). Manchmal ist eine Therapie mit dem h\u00e4matopoetischen Wachstumsfaktor G-CSF (granulocyte colony-stimulating factor) hilfreich. Die Patienten haben ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko, eine sekund\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mie zu entwickeln (in der Regel eine Akute Myeloblastenleuk\u00e4mie Typ FAB 5 oder 6) oder ein Myelodysplastisches Syndrom mit zytologischen Anomalien (klonale zytogenetische Anomalien, h\u00e4ufig unter Einbeziehung des Chromosoms 7). Wenn die Krankheit bis zur Markaplasie oder zu maligner Ver\u00e4nderun fortgeschritten ist, wird eine Knochenmarktransplantation erforderlich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Shwachman-Diamond syndrome (SDS) is a rare multisystemic syndrome characterized by chronic and usually mild neutropenia, pancreatic exocrine insufficiency associated with steatorrhea and growth failure, skeletal dysplasia with short stature, and an increased risk of bone marrow aplasia or leukemic transformation.", "synonyms": "Pancreatic insufficiency and bone marrow dysfunction, SDS, Shwachman syndrome, Shwachman-Bodian-Diamond syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "D61.0", "omim": "260400\u00a0 617941", "umls": "C0272170", "gard": "4863", "meddra": "10067940", "epidemiology": "Worldwide prevalence is estimated at about 1/350,000 and birth-prevalence at around 1/200,000 live births.", "clinical_description": "SDS shows a variable clinical picture, even within families. It generally manifests during infancy or early childhood. The most common anomaly is usually intermittent and moderate neutropenia that is associated with recurrent infections. Mild anemia and thrombocytopenia may also occur. Exocrine pancreatic insufficiency results in failure to thrive, growth retardation, and chronic steatorrhea. Bone involvement is characterized by delayed bone age and maturation with metaphyseal dysplasia resulting in short stature, pectus carinatum, and generalized osteopenia. Other features include cutaneous (e.g. eczema or ichthyosis) and dental anomalies, and psychomotor retardation. Mild or severe intellectual disability (50% of patients) causes learning difficulties. Hematologic manifestations may be complicated by bone marrow aplasia, acute myeloid leukemia or a myelodysplastic syndrome (see these terms). In the neonatal period there are generally no symptoms observed but some cases were reported with pancytopenia, respiratory distress, and severe spondylometaphyseal dysplasia (see this term).", "etiology": "SDS is caused in 95% of cases by mutations in the SBDS gene (7q11.22) encoding a ribosomal protein involved in ribosomal biogenesis and other cellular processes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical, laboratory, and radiologic findings. Blood analysis shows neutropenia (absolute neutrophil count <1500/mL) that can be associated with mild to moderate thrombocytopenia, moderate anemia, and a rise in fetal hemoglobin. Exocrine pancreatic insufficiency can be detected by serum analysis showing low levels of pancreatic isoamylase and/or trypsinogen, stool analysis showing low fecal elastase, and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) revealing a characteristic pancreatic aspect with fat degeneration (MRI could be normal until the age of 5). Imagery also allows detection, usually after the age of 5, of metaphyseal anomalies and abnormal growth plate development. Bone marrow smears usually reveal varying degrees of hypocellularity with dysgranulopoieisis or dyserythropoieisis. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include cystic fibrosis, Pearson syndrome, Fanconi anemia, Johanson-Blizzard syndrome, Blackfan-Diamond anemia, celiac disease, and autosomal recessive severe congenital neutropenia due to G6PC3 deficiency (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is feasible in families in which the disease-causing mutation has already been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Recurrence risk is of 25%.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is multidisciplinary, associating usually a hematologist, a gastroenterologist and other specialists such as a nutritionist, endocrinologist, or orthopedist. Pancreatic insufficiency requires pancreatic enzyme supplementation, adapted to the diet. Antibiotic therapy prophylaxis may be sufficient to avoid infections; otherwise, granulocyte colony-stimulating factor can be proposed. Severe hematological complications require hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. Surgery may be proposed for skeletal anomalies. Patients with learning difficulties require specific educational support.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable. Life-threatening complications include bone marrow aplasia and leukemic transformation, and occasionally viral infections. About 1/3 of patients present such complications, and some can be treated successfully by bone marrow transplant."}, {"name": "Shwachman-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Shwachman-Diamond-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Shwachman-Diamond-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch das Zusammentreffen eines h\u00e4matologischen Defektes, eines Dysmorphie-Syndroms und einer Pankreas-Lipomatose mit ekkriner Pankreasinsuffizienz. Die Krankheit ist sehr selten, in Frankreich wurden nicht mehr als 100 Patienten beschrieben. Weitere Symptome sind Ichthyose, Knochenanomalien (metaphys\u00e4re Dysostose, Pectus carinatum) und psychomotorische Retardierung. Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt typisch verringerte Intensit\u00e4t in T2. Zu den h\u00e4matologischen St\u00f6rungen geh\u00f6ren Neutropenie mit defekter Chemotaxis, moderate Thrombopenie und An\u00e4mie sowie eine erh\u00f6hte Konzentration des foetalen H\u00e4moglobins. Diese St\u00f6rungen nehmen an Schwere zu und m\u00fcnden in 25% der F\u00e4lle in der Aplasie. Trotz einiger \u00c4hnlichkeiten mit dem Pearson-Syndrom liegt kein mitochondrialer Defekt vor. Die meisten Patienten haben eine Mutation im ubiquit\u00e4r exprimierten SBDS-Gen auf Chromosom 7. Die Funktionen dieses Gens sind sehr vielf\u00e4ltig. Deshalb ist es schwierig, die Pathogenese des komplexen klinischen Bildes zu erkl\u00e4ren. Solange die Neutropenie moderat ist und keine symptome verursacht, beschr\u00e4nkt sich die Betreuung auf die Ern\u00e4hrung (Pankreasenzyme, N\u00e4hrstoffe, Vitamine). Manchmal ist eine Therapie mit dem h\u00e4matopoetischen Wachstumsfaktor G-CSF (granulocyte colony-stimulating factor) hilfreich. Die Patienten haben ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko, eine sekund\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mie zu entwickeln (in der Regel eine Akute Myeloblastenleuk\u00e4mie Typ FAB 5 oder 6) oder ein Myelodysplastisches Syndrom mit zytologischen Anomalien (klonale zytogenetische Anomalien, h\u00e4ufig unter Einbeziehung des Chromosoms 7). Wenn die Krankheit bis zur Markaplasie oder zu maligner Ver\u00e4nderun fortgeschritten ist, wird eine Knochenmarktransplantation erforderlich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Shwachman-Diamond syndrome (SDS) is a rare multisystemic syndrome characterized by chronic and usually mild neutropenia, pancreatic exocrine insufficiency associated with steatorrhea and growth failure, skeletal dysplasia with short stature, and an increased risk of bone marrow aplasia or leukemic transformation.", "synonyms": "Pancreatic insufficiency and bone marrow dysfunction, SDS, Shwachman syndrome, Shwachman-Bodian-Diamond syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "D61.0", "omim": "260400\u00a0 617941", "umls": "C0272170", "gard": "4863", "meddra": "10067940", "epidemiology": "Worldwide prevalence is estimated at about 1/350,000 and birth-prevalence at around 1/200,000 live births.", "clinical_description": "SDS shows a variable clinical picture, even within families. It generally manifests during infancy or early childhood. The most common anomaly is usually intermittent and moderate neutropenia that is associated with recurrent infections. Mild anemia and thrombocytopenia may also occur. Exocrine pancreatic insufficiency results in failure to thrive, growth retardation, and chronic steatorrhea. Bone involvement is characterized by delayed bone age and maturation with metaphyseal dysplasia resulting in short stature, pectus carinatum, and generalized osteopenia. Other features include cutaneous (e.g. eczema or ichthyosis) and dental anomalies, and psychomotor retardation. Mild or severe intellectual disability (50% of patients) causes learning difficulties. Hematologic manifestations may be complicated by bone marrow aplasia, acute myeloid leukemia or a myelodysplastic syndrome (see these terms). In the neonatal period there are generally no symptoms observed but some cases were reported with pancytopenia, respiratory distress, and severe spondylometaphyseal dysplasia (see this term).", "etiology": "SDS is caused in 95% of cases by mutations in the SBDS gene (7q11.22) encoding a ribosomal protein involved in ribosomal biogenesis and other cellular processes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical, laboratory, and radiologic findings. Blood analysis shows neutropenia (absolute neutrophil count <1500/mL) that can be associated with mild to moderate thrombocytopenia, moderate anemia, and a rise in fetal hemoglobin. Exocrine pancreatic insufficiency can be detected by serum analysis showing low levels of pancreatic isoamylase and/or trypsinogen, stool analysis showing low fecal elastase, and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) revealing a characteristic pancreatic aspect with fat degeneration (MRI could be normal until the age of 5). Imagery also allows detection, usually after the age of 5, of metaphyseal anomalies and abnormal growth plate development. Bone marrow smears usually reveal varying degrees of hypocellularity with dysgranulopoieisis or dyserythropoieisis. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include cystic fibrosis, Pearson syndrome, Fanconi anemia, Johanson-Blizzard syndrome, Blackfan-Diamond anemia, celiac disease, and autosomal recessive severe congenital neutropenia due to G6PC3 deficiency (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is feasible in families in which the disease-causing mutation has already been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Recurrence risk is of 25%.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is multidisciplinary, associating usually a hematologist, a gastroenterologist and other specialists such as a nutritionist, endocrinologist, or orthopedist. Pancreatic insufficiency requires pancreatic enzyme supplementation, adapted to the diet. Antibiotic therapy prophylaxis may be sufficient to avoid infections; otherwise, granulocyte colony-stimulating factor can be proposed. Severe hematological complications require hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. Surgery may be proposed for skeletal anomalies. Patients with learning difficulties require specific educational support.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable. Life-threatening complications include bone marrow aplasia and leukemic transformation, and occasionally viral infections. About 1/3 of patients present such complications, and some can be treated successfully by bone marrow transplant."}, {"name": "Sialidose", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sialidosis is a lysosomal storage disease, belonging to the group of oligosaccharidoses or glycoproteinoses, with a wide clinical spectrum that is divided into two main clinical subtypes: sialidosis type I (see this term), the milder, non dysmorphic form of the disease characterized by gait abnormalities, progressive visual loss, bilateral macular cherry red spots and myoclonus, that presents in adolescence or adulthood (second or third decade of life); and sialidosis type II (see this term) the more severe, early onset form, characterized by a progressive and severe mucopolysaccharidosis-like phenotype with coarse facies, visceromegaly, dysostosis multiplex, and developmental delay. Bilateral macular cherry red spots are also present. Sialidosis type II has been further divided into congenital (with hydrops fetalis), infantile and juvenile presentations.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "E77.1", "meddra": "10058800"}, {"name": "Sialidose, dysmorphe infantile", "sub_name": "Sialidose Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Sialidose ist eine lysosomale Speicherkrankheit aus der Gruppe der Oligosaccharidosen oder Glykoproteinosen. Zwei Sialidose-Typen wurden definiert, der Typ 2 (auch als infantile, dysmorphe Form der Sialidose bezeichnet) und der Typ 1 (eine Form mit sp\u00e4terem Beginn und ohne wesentliche Dysmorphien). Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Lebendgeborenen wurde f\u00fcr beide Typen zusammen auf 1:4.200.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Zwei Formen des Typs 2 wurden beschrieben, eine kongenitale oder Neugeborenen-Form und eine infantile Form. Die kongenitale Form kann sich schon intra-uterin mit fetalem Hydrops und fetalem Ascites manifestieren. Die Neugeborenen-Form ist gekennzeichnet durch \u00d6dem, Hepatosplenomegalie, Aszites und noch andere Symptome, die mit unterschiedlich starker Auspr\u00e4gung denen des Hurler-Syndroms (Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 1, s. dort) \u00e4hneln: Faziale Dysmorphien, Dysostosis multiplex, kurzer Stamm mit prominentem Sternum, Kyphose und Umbilical- und Inguinalhernien. Sp\u00e4tere Symptome der Kinder sind Minderwuchs (bis zum 18. Lebensmonat nimmt die Wachstumsrate ab), Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, ein kirschroter Fleck auf der Retina (nach dem 3. Lebensjahr ein konstantes Merkmal), Hornhauttr\u00fcbungen, myoklone Krampfanf\u00e4lle und verlangsamte Entwicklung (versp\u00e4tetes Sprechen und Laufen) gefolgt von psychomotorischer Regression. Bei einigen Patienten ist auch die Niere betroffen (Nephrosialidose). Es wurden auch Patienten mit progressiven juvenilen Formen mit leichteren Dysmorphien, Angiokeratomen und kirschrotem Fleck beschrieben, bei denen es sich aber wohl um Formen der Galaktosialidose handelte. Kleinhirnst\u00f6rungen treten in der Adoleszenz auf und sind begleitet von Pyramidenbahn-Zeichen und peripherer Neuropathie. Ursache der Sialidose Typ 2 sind Mutationen im NEU1-Gen (Chromosomenregion 6p21), die zu verminderter Aktivit\u00e4t der N-Acetyl-Alpha-Neuraminidase (Sialidase 1) und zur Speicherung von Sialyl-Oligosacchariden f\u00fchren. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Die Ausscheidung von Sialyl-Oligosaccharid im Urin ist ein Hinweis auf die Sialidose, aber die Diagnose soll durch Messung der Alpha-D-Neuraminidase-Aktivit\u00e4t in Leukozyten oder, am besten, in kultivierten Fibroblasten bei gleichzeitigem Nachweis einer normalen Aktivit\u00e4t der Beta-Galaktosidase gesichert werden. Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen sind die Galaktosialidose (mit gemeinsamem Defekt der Beta-Galaktosidase und Neuraminidase) und die Mukoplysaccharidosen Typ 1 und Typ 2 (s. dort). In Risikofamilien k\u00f6nnen Heterozygote durch molekulare Analyse erkannt werden, wenn beim Indexpatienten beide Mutationen bekannt sind. Wichtig ist die korrekte Diagnose der intra-uterinen Manifestation, um intra-uterinen Fruchttod oder sp\u00e4te Abbr\u00fcche in nachfolgenden Schwangerschaften zu vermeiden. Da es keine wirksame Behandlung gibt, soll den Eltern betroffener Kinder in den folgenden Schwangerschaften eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik (Messung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t oder molekulare Analyse, wenn beide Mutationen bekannt sind) angeboten werden. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen von einem multidisziplin\u00e4ren Team betreut und wirksam symptomatisch behandelt werden, um ihre Lebensqualit\u00e4t zu verbessern. Die myoklonischen Kr\u00e4mpfe sprechen oft nur schlecht auf die Therape an. In seltenen F\u00e4llen wurde eine allogene Knochenmarktransplantation durchgef\u00fchrt, ein Fortschreiten der Niereninsuffizienz und eine Verschlechterung der Knochensymptome wurde dadurch aber nicht verhindert. Die kongenitale Form verursacht eine Totgeburt oder f\u00fchrt innerhalb der ersten beiden Lebensjahre zum Tod. Patienten mit den anderen Formen werden selten \u00e4lter als 20 Jahre.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sialidosis type 2 (ST-2) is a rare lysosomal storage disease, and the severe, early onset form of sialidosis (see this term) characterized by a progressively severe mucopolysaccharidosis-like phenotype (coarse facies, dysostosis multiplex, hepatosplenomegaly), macular cherry-red spots as well as psychomotor and developmental delay. ST-2 displays a broad spectrum of clinical severity with antenatal/congenital, infantile and juvenile presentations.", "synonyms": "Infantile dysmorphic sialidosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "E77.1", "omim": "256150\u00a0 256550", "umls": "C0268228\u00a0 C3888317", "gard": "7183", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of ST-2 is unknown. The prevalence of sialidosis (types 1 and 2 combined) has been estimated at approximately 1/5,000,000-1/1,500,000 live births.", "clinical_description": "ST-2 has a wide range of clinical manifestations and is usually divided into congenital/antenatal, infantile and juvenile forms. The congenital/antenatal form is characterized by non-immune hydrops fetalis, or ascites, presenting in utero or at birth and by the development of a mucopolysaccharidosis (see this term)-like phenotype including coarse facial features, dysostosis multiplex, hepatosplenomegaly, and umbilical and inguinal hernias. Surviving children and patients with the infantile onset form (before 12 months of age) are characterized by a mucopolysaccharidosis-like phenotype that includes coarse facies, dysosotosis multiplex, kyphosis, short stature (with a slowing of growth towards 18 months of age), hepatosplenomegaly, hearing impairment, cherry-red spot on the retina (a constant feature after 3 years of age), corneal opacities (rarely) and speech and developmental delay, followed by psychomotor regression and myoclonus and ataxia in some cases. Renal disease (nephrosialidosis) has been reported in some patients. The juvenile form usually presents after the age of 2 with less pronounced coarse facies, angiokeratoma, myoclonic seizures, macular cherry red spots, and psychomotor regression.", "etiology": "ST-2 is due to a mutation of the N-acetyl-alpha-neuraminidase-1 (NEU1) gene (6p21) encoding the lysosomal enzyme neuraminidase, that initiates the degradation of sialoglycoconjugates in lysosomes. Mutations lead to a deficiency in enzyme activity and consequently to an accumulation of sialyloligosaccharides in tissues. In general, a higher residual neuraminidase activity is associated with milder symptoms and a longer lifespan.", "diagnostic_methods": "An ophthalmological examination (fundoscopy) can visualize the bilateral macular cherry-red spots. Neuroimaging shows varying degrees of brain and cerebellar atrophy. The diagnosis is suspected by detection of urinary sialyloligosaccharide excretion and must be confirmed by demonstration of the neuraminidase enzyme deficiency (in the presence of normal beta-galactosidase activity) in leukocytes or, preferably, in cultured fibroblasts. Molecular genetic testing revealing causal mutation(s) can also confirm the diagnosis. The presence of echographic signs (such as hydrops, edema, ascites) may aid in diagnosing antenatal forms during pregnancy.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnoses include galactosialidosis (characterized by deficiencies in both beta galactosidase and neuraminidase) and mucopolysaccharidosis type 1, 2 or 6 (see these terms). Many patients of the juvenile sub-group, in particular, may appear to have a form of galactosialidosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can be performed by measurement of enzyme activity or by molecular genetic analysis if the underlying molecular defect in the family is well established", "genetic_counseling": "ST-2 is inherited in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling is possible.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for ST-2 and management is multidisciplinary involving mainly palliative care. Anti-convulsants may be used to treat myoclonic seizures, but are only rarely effective. Hematopoietic stem cell transplantation has not been successful in preventing psychomotor regression, bone changes or nephrosialidosis.", "prognosis": "The prognosis depends on the form of ST-2. The congenital form leads to still-birth or death within the first two years of life. For the other forms, life expectancy does not generally exceed two decades."}, {"name": "Sialidose, normomorphe", "sub_name": "Sialidose Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Sialidose ist eine lysosomale Speicherkrankheit aus der Gruppe der Oligosaccharidosen oder Glykoproteinosen. Zwei Sialidose-Typen wurden definiert, Typ 1 und Typ 2. Die Sialidose Typ 1 wird auch `normomorph' oder 'Kirschroter Fleck-Myoklonus-Syndrom' genannt. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Lebendgeborenen wurde f\u00fcr beide Typen zusammen auf 1:4.200.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit beginnt im Alter von 8 bis 25 Jahren mit Gangst\u00f6rungen und/oder verminderter Sehkraft. Fast alle Patienten haben auf der Retina einen kirschroten Fleck. Sie k\u00f6nnen auch einen generalisierten Myoklonus, manchmal verbunden mit Krampfanf\u00e4llen, entwickeln. Das Farbensehen wird schlechter, die Patienten werden nachtblind, es entwickelt sich eine Hornhauttr\u00fcbung und manchmal ein Nystagmus. Im Gegensatz zum Typ 2 der Sialidose (sh. dort) fehlen beim Typ 1 faziale Dysmorphien, Knochendysplasie und psychomotorische Retardierung. Ursache der Sialidose ist ein Mangel der Alpha-D-Neuraminidase (oder Sialidase 1). Er f\u00fchrt in den Geweben zur Speicherung von Sialyl-Oligosaccharid. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Das urs\u00e4chliche Gen NEU1 (Chromosomenregion 6p21) wurde kloniert und Mutationen identifiziert. Die Ausscheidung von Sialyl-Oligosaccharid im Urin ist ein Hinweis auf die Sialidose. Da die ausgeschiedenen Mengen aber recht gering sein k\u00f6nnen, muss die Diagnose durch Messung der Alpha-D-Neuraminidase-Aktivit\u00e4t in Leukozyten oder, am besten, in kultivierten Fibroblasten gesichert werden. Die wichtigste Differentialdiagnose ist die Galaktosialidose (s. dort), bei der die Neuraminidase und die Beta-Galaktosidase defekt sind. In Risikofamilien k\u00f6nnen Heterozygote durch molekulare Analyse erkannt werden, wenn beim Indexpatienten beide Mutationen bekannt sind. Die vorgeburtliche Diagnostik erfolgt durch Bestimmung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t oder durch molekulare Analyse, wenn die Mutationen in der Familie bekannt sind. Da es keine spezifische Therapie gibt, m\u00fcssen die Patienten von einem multidisziplin\u00e4ren Teambetreut und wirksam symptomatisch behandelt werden, um ihre Lebensqualit\u00e4t zu verbessern. Die myoklonischen Kr\u00e4mpfe sprechen oft nur schlecht auf die Therape an. Die Lebenserwartung ist wahrscheinlich nicht eingeschr\u00e4nkt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sialidosis type 1 (ST-1) is a very rare lysosomal storage disease, and is the normosomatic form of sialidosis (see this term), characterized by gait abnormalities, progressive visual loss, bilateral macular cherry red spots and myoclonic epilepsy and ataxia, that usually presents in the second to third decade of life.", "synonyms": "Cherry-red spot-myoclonus syndrome, Lipomucopolysaccharidosis, Normomorphic sialidosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "E77.1", "omim": "256550", "umls": "C0023806\u00a0 C0268226\u00a0 C1850510", "gard": "7639", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of ST-1 is unknown but it is less frequent than sialidosis type 2 (ST-2, see this term). The prevalence of sialidosis (types 1 and 2 combined) has been estimated at approximately 1/5,000,000-1/1,500,000 live births.", "clinical_description": "The disease usually presents in adolescence (onset usually between 12 and 25 years) with gait disturbance, walking difficulties and/or a loss of visual acuity. Almost all patients display a cherry-red spot on the retina. They may also have generalized myoclonus, in some cases associated with seizures and ataxia. Color vision progressively diminishes while night blindness appears and, in some cases, corneal opacities and nystagmus are present. Intellectual capacity is normal. In contrast to ST-2, patients do not show facial dysmorphism, bone dysplasia or psychomotor retardation.", "etiology": "ST-1 is due to a mutation of the N-acetyl-alpha-neuraminidase-1 (NEU1) gene (6p21) encoding the lysosomal enzyme neuraminidase, that initiates the degradation of sialoglycoconjugates in lysosomes. Mutations lead to a decrease in enzyme activity and consequently to an accumulation of sialyloligosaccharides in tissues. Disease severity is linked to level of residual neuraminidase activity in vivo and varies between patients.", "diagnostic_methods": "An ophthalmological examination (fundoscopy) can visualize bilateral cherry-red spots. Magnetic resonance imaging of the brain can reveal diffuse brain atrophy in advanced cases, but is usually normal on first examination. Detection of urinary sialyloligosaccharides can be suggestive of a diagnosis, but excretion levels may be quite low. The diagnosis must be confirmed by the demonstration of deficient neuraminidase activity (in the presence of normal beta-galactosidase activity) in leukocytes or, preferably, in cultured fibroblasts. Diagnosis can be confirmed by molecular genetic testing revealing mutations in the NEU1 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnosis is galactosialidosis (see this term), which is characterized by deficiencies in both neuraminidase and beta-galactosidase.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can be performed by enzyme activity measurement or by molecular genetic analysis if the underlying molecular defect in the family is well established.", "genetic_counseling": "ST-1 is inherited in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling is possible.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for ST-1 and management should be multidisciplinary to allow for adapted symptomatic treatment, which is essential for improving the quality of life of affected patients. In severe cases, patients may require the use of a wheelchair.", "prognosis": "There appears to be no major effect on life expectancy but quality of life can be affected due to myoclonus and resulting mobility issues."}, {"name": "Sialidose Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Sialidose ist eine lysosomale Speicherkrankheit aus der Gruppe der Oligosaccharidosen oder Glykoproteinosen. Zwei Sialidose-Typen wurden definiert, Typ 1 und Typ 2. Die Sialidose Typ 1 wird auch `normomorph' oder 'Kirschroter Fleck-Myoklonus-Syndrom' genannt. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Lebendgeborenen wurde f\u00fcr beide Typen zusammen auf 1:4.200.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit beginnt im Alter von 8 bis 25 Jahren mit Gangst\u00f6rungen und/oder verminderter Sehkraft. Fast alle Patienten haben auf der Retina einen kirschroten Fleck. Sie k\u00f6nnen auch einen generalisierten Myoklonus, manchmal verbunden mit Krampfanf\u00e4llen, entwickeln. Das Farbensehen wird schlechter, die Patienten werden nachtblind, es entwickelt sich eine Hornhauttr\u00fcbung und manchmal ein Nystagmus. Im Gegensatz zum Typ 2 der Sialidose (sh. dort) fehlen beim Typ 1 faziale Dysmorphien, Knochendysplasie und psychomotorische Retardierung. Ursache der Sialidose ist ein Mangel der Alpha-D-Neuraminidase (oder Sialidase 1). Er f\u00fchrt in den Geweben zur Speicherung von Sialyl-Oligosaccharid. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Das urs\u00e4chliche Gen NEU1 (Chromosomenregion 6p21) wurde kloniert und Mutationen identifiziert. Die Ausscheidung von Sialyl-Oligosaccharid im Urin ist ein Hinweis auf die Sialidose. Da die ausgeschiedenen Mengen aber recht gering sein k\u00f6nnen, muss die Diagnose durch Messung der Alpha-D-Neuraminidase-Aktivit\u00e4t in Leukozyten oder, am besten, in kultivierten Fibroblasten gesichert werden. Die wichtigste Differentialdiagnose ist die Galaktosialidose (s. dort), bei der die Neuraminidase und die Beta-Galaktosidase defekt sind. In Risikofamilien k\u00f6nnen Heterozygote durch molekulare Analyse erkannt werden, wenn beim Indexpatienten beide Mutationen bekannt sind. Die vorgeburtliche Diagnostik erfolgt durch Bestimmung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t oder durch molekulare Analyse, wenn die Mutationen in der Familie bekannt sind. Da es keine spezifische Therapie gibt, m\u00fcssen die Patienten von einem multidisziplin\u00e4ren Teambetreut und wirksam symptomatisch behandelt werden, um ihre Lebensqualit\u00e4t zu verbessern. Die myoklonischen Kr\u00e4mpfe sprechen oft nur schlecht auf die Therape an. Die Lebenserwartung ist wahrscheinlich nicht eingeschr\u00e4nkt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sialidosis type 1 (ST-1) is a very rare lysosomal storage disease, and is the normosomatic form of sialidosis (see this term), characterized by gait abnormalities, progressive visual loss, bilateral macular cherry red spots and myoclonic epilepsy and ataxia, that usually presents in the second to third decade of life.", "synonyms": "Cherry-red spot-myoclonus syndrome, Lipomucopolysaccharidosis, Normomorphic sialidosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "E77.1", "omim": "256550", "umls": "C0023806\u00a0 C0268226\u00a0 C1850510", "gard": "7639", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of ST-1 is unknown but it is less frequent than sialidosis type 2 (ST-2, see this term). The prevalence of sialidosis (types 1 and 2 combined) has been estimated at approximately 1/5,000,000-1/1,500,000 live births.", "clinical_description": "The disease usually presents in adolescence (onset usually between 12 and 25 years) with gait disturbance, walking difficulties and/or a loss of visual acuity. Almost all patients display a cherry-red spot on the retina. They may also have generalized myoclonus, in some cases associated with seizures and ataxia. Color vision progressively diminishes while night blindness appears and, in some cases, corneal opacities and nystagmus are present. Intellectual capacity is normal. In contrast to ST-2, patients do not show facial dysmorphism, bone dysplasia or psychomotor retardation.", "etiology": "ST-1 is due to a mutation of the N-acetyl-alpha-neuraminidase-1 (NEU1) gene (6p21) encoding the lysosomal enzyme neuraminidase, that initiates the degradation of sialoglycoconjugates in lysosomes. Mutations lead to a decrease in enzyme activity and consequently to an accumulation of sialyloligosaccharides in tissues. Disease severity is linked to level of residual neuraminidase activity in vivo and varies between patients.", "diagnostic_methods": "An ophthalmological examination (fundoscopy) can visualize bilateral cherry-red spots. Magnetic resonance imaging of the brain can reveal diffuse brain atrophy in advanced cases, but is usually normal on first examination. Detection of urinary sialyloligosaccharides can be suggestive of a diagnosis, but excretion levels may be quite low. The diagnosis must be confirmed by the demonstration of deficient neuraminidase activity (in the presence of normal beta-galactosidase activity) in leukocytes or, preferably, in cultured fibroblasts. Diagnosis can be confirmed by molecular genetic testing revealing mutations in the NEU1 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnosis is galactosialidosis (see this term), which is characterized by deficiencies in both neuraminidase and beta-galactosidase.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can be performed by enzyme activity measurement or by molecular genetic analysis if the underlying molecular defect in the family is well established.", "genetic_counseling": "ST-1 is inherited in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling is possible.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for ST-1 and management should be multidisciplinary to allow for adapted symptomatic treatment, which is essential for improving the quality of life of affected patients. In severe cases, patients may require the use of a wheelchair.", "prognosis": "There appears to be no major effect on life expectancy but quality of life can be affected due to myoclonus and resulting mobility issues."}, {"name": "Sialidose Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Sialidose ist eine lysosomale Speicherkrankheit aus der Gruppe der Oligosaccharidosen oder Glykoproteinosen. Zwei Sialidose-Typen wurden definiert, der Typ 2 (auch als infantile, dysmorphe Form der Sialidose bezeichnet) und der Typ 1 (eine Form mit sp\u00e4terem Beginn und ohne wesentliche Dysmorphien). Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Lebendgeborenen wurde f\u00fcr beide Typen zusammen auf 1:4.200.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Zwei Formen des Typs 2 wurden beschrieben, eine kongenitale oder Neugeborenen-Form und eine infantile Form. Die kongenitale Form kann sich schon intra-uterin mit fetalem Hydrops und fetalem Ascites manifestieren. Die Neugeborenen-Form ist gekennzeichnet durch \u00d6dem, Hepatosplenomegalie, Aszites und noch andere Symptome, die mit unterschiedlich starker Auspr\u00e4gung denen des Hurler-Syndroms (Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 1, s. dort) \u00e4hneln: Faziale Dysmorphien, Dysostosis multiplex, kurzer Stamm mit prominentem Sternum, Kyphose und Umbilical- und Inguinalhernien. Sp\u00e4tere Symptome der Kinder sind Minderwuchs (bis zum 18. Lebensmonat nimmt die Wachstumsrate ab), Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, ein kirschroter Fleck auf der Retina (nach dem 3. Lebensjahr ein konstantes Merkmal), Hornhauttr\u00fcbungen, myoklone Krampfanf\u00e4lle und verlangsamte Entwicklung (versp\u00e4tetes Sprechen und Laufen) gefolgt von psychomotorischer Regression. Bei einigen Patienten ist auch die Niere betroffen (Nephrosialidose). Es wurden auch Patienten mit progressiven juvenilen Formen mit leichteren Dysmorphien, Angiokeratomen und kirschrotem Fleck beschrieben, bei denen es sich aber wohl um Formen der Galaktosialidose handelte. Kleinhirnst\u00f6rungen treten in der Adoleszenz auf und sind begleitet von Pyramidenbahn-Zeichen und peripherer Neuropathie. Ursache der Sialidose Typ 2 sind Mutationen im NEU1-Gen (Chromosomenregion 6p21), die zu verminderter Aktivit\u00e4t der N-Acetyl-Alpha-Neuraminidase (Sialidase 1) und zur Speicherung von Sialyl-Oligosacchariden f\u00fchren. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Die Ausscheidung von Sialyl-Oligosaccharid im Urin ist ein Hinweis auf die Sialidose, aber die Diagnose soll durch Messung der Alpha-D-Neuraminidase-Aktivit\u00e4t in Leukozyten oder, am besten, in kultivierten Fibroblasten bei gleichzeitigem Nachweis einer normalen Aktivit\u00e4t der Beta-Galaktosidase gesichert werden. Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen sind die Galaktosialidose (mit gemeinsamem Defekt der Beta-Galaktosidase und Neuraminidase) und die Mukoplysaccharidosen Typ 1 und Typ 2 (s. dort). In Risikofamilien k\u00f6nnen Heterozygote durch molekulare Analyse erkannt werden, wenn beim Indexpatienten beide Mutationen bekannt sind. Wichtig ist die korrekte Diagnose der intra-uterinen Manifestation, um intra-uterinen Fruchttod oder sp\u00e4te Abbr\u00fcche in nachfolgenden Schwangerschaften zu vermeiden. Da es keine wirksame Behandlung gibt, soll den Eltern betroffener Kinder in den folgenden Schwangerschaften eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik (Messung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t oder molekulare Analyse, wenn beide Mutationen bekannt sind) angeboten werden. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen von einem multidisziplin\u00e4ren Team betreut und wirksam symptomatisch behandelt werden, um ihre Lebensqualit\u00e4t zu verbessern. Die myoklonischen Kr\u00e4mpfe sprechen oft nur schlecht auf die Therape an. In seltenen F\u00e4llen wurde eine allogene Knochenmarktransplantation durchgef\u00fchrt, ein Fortschreiten der Niereninsuffizienz und eine Verschlechterung der Knochensymptome wurde dadurch aber nicht verhindert. Die kongenitale Form verursacht eine Totgeburt oder f\u00fchrt innerhalb der ersten beiden Lebensjahre zum Tod. Patienten mit den anderen Formen werden selten \u00e4lter als 20 Jahre.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sialidosis type 2 (ST-2) is a rare lysosomal storage disease, and the severe, early onset form of sialidosis (see this term) characterized by a progressively severe mucopolysaccharidosis-like phenotype (coarse facies, dysostosis multiplex, hepatosplenomegaly), macular cherry-red spots as well as psychomotor and developmental delay. ST-2 displays a broad spectrum of clinical severity with antenatal/congenital, infantile and juvenile presentations.", "synonyms": "Infantile dysmorphic sialidosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "E77.1", "omim": "256150\u00a0 256550", "umls": "C0268228\u00a0 C3888317", "gard": "7183", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of ST-2 is unknown. The prevalence of sialidosis (types 1 and 2 combined) has been estimated at approximately 1/5,000,000-1/1,500,000 live births.", "clinical_description": "ST-2 has a wide range of clinical manifestations and is usually divided into congenital/antenatal, infantile and juvenile forms. The congenital/antenatal form is characterized by non-immune hydrops fetalis, or ascites, presenting in utero or at birth and by the development of a mucopolysaccharidosis (see this term)-like phenotype including coarse facial features, dysostosis multiplex, hepatosplenomegaly, and umbilical and inguinal hernias. Surviving children and patients with the infantile onset form (before 12 months of age) are characterized by a mucopolysaccharidosis-like phenotype that includes coarse facies, dysosotosis multiplex, kyphosis, short stature (with a slowing of growth towards 18 months of age), hepatosplenomegaly, hearing impairment, cherry-red spot on the retina (a constant feature after 3 years of age), corneal opacities (rarely) and speech and developmental delay, followed by psychomotor regression and myoclonus and ataxia in some cases. Renal disease (nephrosialidosis) has been reported in some patients. The juvenile form usually presents after the age of 2 with less pronounced coarse facies, angiokeratoma, myoclonic seizures, macular cherry red spots, and psychomotor regression.", "etiology": "ST-2 is due to a mutation of the N-acetyl-alpha-neuraminidase-1 (NEU1) gene (6p21) encoding the lysosomal enzyme neuraminidase, that initiates the degradation of sialoglycoconjugates in lysosomes. Mutations lead to a deficiency in enzyme activity and consequently to an accumulation of sialyloligosaccharides in tissues. In general, a higher residual neuraminidase activity is associated with milder symptoms and a longer lifespan.", "diagnostic_methods": "An ophthalmological examination (fundoscopy) can visualize the bilateral macular cherry-red spots. Neuroimaging shows varying degrees of brain and cerebellar atrophy. The diagnosis is suspected by detection of urinary sialyloligosaccharide excretion and must be confirmed by demonstration of the neuraminidase enzyme deficiency (in the presence of normal beta-galactosidase activity) in leukocytes or, preferably, in cultured fibroblasts. Molecular genetic testing revealing causal mutation(s) can also confirm the diagnosis. The presence of echographic signs (such as hydrops, edema, ascites) may aid in diagnosing antenatal forms during pregnancy.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main differential diagnoses include galactosialidosis (characterized by deficiencies in both beta galactosidase and neuraminidase) and mucopolysaccharidosis type 1, 2 or 6 (see these terms). Many patients of the juvenile sub-group, in particular, may appear to have a form of galactosialidosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis can be performed by measurement of enzyme activity or by molecular genetic analysis if the underlying molecular defect in the family is well established", "genetic_counseling": "ST-2 is inherited in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling is possible.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for ST-2 and management is multidisciplinary involving mainly palliative care. Anti-convulsants may be used to treat myoclonic seizures, but are only rarely effective. Hematopoietic stem cell transplantation has not been successful in preventing psychomotor regression, bone changes or nephrosialidosis.", "prognosis": "The prognosis depends on the form of ST-2. The congenital form leads to still-birth or death within the first two years of life. For the other forms, life expectancy does not generally exceed two decades."}, {"name": "Sialidose Typ 2, juvenile Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "E77.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Sialidose Typ 2"}, {"name": "Sialidose Typ 2, kongenitale Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "E77.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Sialidose Typ 2"}, {"name": "Sialins\u00e4ure-Speicherkrankheit", "german_description": "Die Salla-Krankheit ist eine lysosomale Speicherkrankheit mit Speicherung von freier Sialins\u00e4ure. Ursache ist ein Defekt von Sialin, einem Membranprotein der Lysosomen, das freie Sialins\u00e4ure (N-Acetyl-Neuramins\u00e4ure) aus dem Lysosom heraustransportiert. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt und ist allgemein sehr selten, in Nord-Finnland dagegen ist etwa jeder Vierzigste ein heterozygoter Tr\u00e4ger einer Mutation f\u00fcr SSD. Die Krankheit hat verschiedene Verl\u00e4ufe. Schwere Formen (ISSD: Infantile Sialins\u00e4ure-Speicherkrankheit) manifestieren sich pr\u00e4natal mit Hydrops fetalis und Ascites, oder bei der Geburt mit Muskelhypotonie, Hepatosplenomegalie, oft verbunden mit Ascites, vergr\u00f6berten Gesichtsz\u00fcgen, Knochenfehlbildungen, schweren Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen, geistiger Retardierung und zerebralen Kr\u00e4mpfen. Diese schweren Formen f\u00fchren in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit zum Tod. Die mittelschweren Formen, das eigentliche Salla-Syndrom, wie es aus Finnland beschrieben wurde, manifestiert sich im 1. Lebensjahr mit Muskelhypotonie. Mit dem Fortschreiten der Krankheit kommen Spastik, Ataxie, psychomotorische Retardierung und manchmal auch vergr\u00f6berte Gesichtsz\u00fcge hinzu. Die meisten Patienten erreichen mit schwerer geistiger Retardierung das Erwachsenenalter. Die Labordiagnostik besteht im Nachweis einer vermehrten Ausscheidung von freier Sialins\u00e4ure im Urin und einer Speicherung in Fibroblasten, im Trophoblasten oder in Amnionzellen. Das urs\u00e4chlich beteiligte SLC17A5-Gen liegt auf Chromosom 6q14-q15, und mehrere Mutationen sind beschrieben worden. Nur eine symptomatische Behandlung ist m\u00f6glich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Free sialic acid storage disease (free SASD), is a group of lysosomal storage diseases characterized by a spectrum of clinical manifestations including neurological and developmental disorders with severity ranging from the milder phenotype, Salla disease (SD), to the most severe phenotype, infantile free sialic acid storage disease (ISSD).", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "269920\u00a0 604369", "umls": "C0342853\u00a0 C2931872", "mesh": "C538523", "gard": "10870", "meddra": "10067529\u00a0 10067531"}, {"name": "Sialins\u00e4ure-Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "UMLS": "C0342851", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sialurie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Sialurie, eine extrem seltene, bisher bei weniger als 10 Patienten beschriebene Stoffwechselkrankheit, ist gekennzeichnet durch unterschiedliche, meist im S\u00e4uglingsalter auftretende Zeichen und Symptome, darunter vor\u00fcbergehende Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen, leicht verl\u00e4ngerter Neugeborenen-Ikterus, fragliche oder leichte Hepatomegalie, mikrozyt\u00e4re An\u00e4mie, h\u00e4ufige Infektionen der oberen Luftwege, Gastroenteritis, Dehydratation und flaches und grobes Gesicht . Im Kindesalter k\u00f6nnen Lernschwierigkeiten und Krampfanf\u00e4lle auftreten.", "synonyms": "Sialurie, franz\u00f6sischer Typ, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "OMIM": "269921", "UMLS": "C0342853\u00a0 C2931471", "MeSH": "C537332", "GARD": "4865", "MedDRA": "10067529"}, {"name": "Sialurie, franz\u00f6sischer Typ", "sub_name": "Sialurie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Sialurie, eine extrem seltene, bisher bei weniger als 10 Patienten beschriebene Stoffwechselkrankheit, ist gekennzeichnet durch unterschiedliche, meist im S\u00e4uglingsalter auftretende Zeichen und Symptome, darunter vor\u00fcbergehende Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen, leicht verl\u00e4ngerter Neugeborenen-Ikterus, fragliche oder leichte Hepatomegalie, mikrozyt\u00e4re An\u00e4mie, h\u00e4ufige Infektionen der oberen Luftwege, Gastroenteritis, Dehydratation und flaches und grobes Gesicht . Im Kindesalter k\u00f6nnen Lernschwierigkeiten und Krampfanf\u00e4lle auftreten.", "synonyms": "Sialurie, franz\u00f6sischer Typ, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "OMIM": "269921", "UMLS": "C0342853\u00a0 C2931471", "MeSH": "C537332", "GARD": "4865", "MedDRA": "10067529"}, {"name": "SIANRF", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1 is a rare genetic motor neuron disease characterized by severe respiratory distress/respiratory failure in association with diaphragmatic eventration and palsy, as well as progressive, symmetrical, distal-to-proximal muscle weakness and atrophy (in lower limbs especially). Patients typically have a history of intrauterine growth retardation, low birth weight, feeble cry, weak suck and failure to thrive and present with inspiratory stridor, recurrent episodes of dyspnea or apnea, cyanosis and absent deep tendon reflexes. Kyphosis/scoliosis, foot deformities and joint contractures are frequently associated features.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive distal spinal muscular atrophy type 1, Autosomal recessive spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy, Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type 6, Distal-HMN type 6, SIANRF, SMARD1, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 1, dHMN6, dSMA1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "604320", "umls": "C1858517", "gard": "8592"}, {"name": "sIBM", "sub_name": "Einschlussk\u00f6rper-Myositis", "german_description": "Die IBM weist eine je nach geografischer und ethnischer Herkunft und Alter sehr variable Pr\u00e4valenz auf. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung liegt im Bereich von 1:1.000.000 bis 1:14.000, jedoch wird ein dreifacher Anstieg beobachtet, wenn man lediglich die Bev\u00f6lkerung im Alter von \u00fcber 50 Jahren betrachtet. Unterdiagnostizierung k\u00f6nnte die starken ethno-geografischen Unterschiede erkl\u00e4ren. Das Verh\u00e4ltnis m\u00e4nnlich zu weiblich betr\u00e4gt im Durchschnitt 2:1 (0,5 bis 6,5:1).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare degenerative inflammatory disorder of skeletal muscles characterized by late onset weakness, starting in either the quadriceps or finger flexors and slowly progressing to include other groups of limb muscles. Distinctive histopathological features include inflammatory and degenerative features.", "synonyms": "IBM, Sporadic inclusion body myositis, sIBM, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "M60.8", "omim": "147421", "umls": "C0238190\u00a0 C0751713", "gard": "3896", "meddra": "10066407", "epidemiology": "Inclusion body myositis (IBM) has a highly variable prevalence according to geographic, ethnic and age criteria. Prevalence in the general population ranges from 1/14,000-1,000,000 but a three-fold increase is observed when considering only a population over 50 years. Underdiagnosis may be an explanation for the high ethno-geographic variation. Male-to-female ratio is 2:1 on average (but varies between 0.5 to 6.5:1).", "clinical_description": "IBM onset is over 50 years but the disease may also occur earlier, in the 4th decade. Compared to other idiopathic inflammatory myopathies, the clinical phenotype is characteristic with distal and asymmetrical muscle involvement, amyotrophy, and no extramuscular manifestations. First signs are weakness or even atrophy of the quadriceps or of the finger flexors, leading to difficulties in rising from chairs or ground, climbing stairs, gripping, lifting and using tools, and thereby provoking falls. Flexor digitorum profundus and flexor pollicis longus are more severely involved than the forearm extensor muscles, especially during early stages of the disease. With disease progression, other groups of muscles are also involved, such as the elbow flexors, the hip, knee or neck flexors, and the ankle dorsiflexors, leading to footdrop. Patients frequently have a mild weakness of facial muscles, except for the extraocular muscles. Dysphagia may occur in approximately 66% of patients in advanced stages of the disease and can be severe in some cases.", "etiology": "Etiology of IBM is poorly understood. No causal gene has been identified but genes encoding the major histocompatibility complex (MHC), HLA-DR3 and 8.1 ancestral haplotypes (HLA-A1, B8, DRB1*0301), have been shown to correlate with IBM susceptibility. Ageing and environmental factors are also surmised to play a triggering role. Whether IBM is primarily an immuno-inflammatory disorder leading to muscle degeneration or a degenerative disorder leading to muscle inflammation is still under debate. The pathogenic role of anti-cN1A, which is detected in 30-50% of patients, is also debated as it is not specific to IBM and may be found in patients with other autoimmune diseases as well as in healthy controls.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on physical examination (especially the detection of finger flexor weakness), age of presentation and a duration of symptoms over 6 months. Muscle biopsy identifies the inflammatory (diffuse MHC class I sarcolemmal overexpression, endomysial inflammatory infiltrates including CD8+ T cells, T cell invasion of non-necrotic muscle fibers) and degenerative features (rimmed vacuoles, P62 and/or TDP43 aggregates and, occasionally, an abnormally elevated number of COX-negative fibers). Laboratory findings are not specific as serum creatine kinase is only slightly raised in some cases. Electromyography only helps in confirming the myopathic origin of the weakness or atrophy. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) helps delineating the characteristic pattern of muscle involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis may include other idiopathic inflammatory myopathies and, in early stages of the disease, arthritis or any motor neuron disease.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no curative treatment for IBM, and patients usually do not respond to anti-inflammatory or immunosuppressant therapies. The standard of care involves symptomatic treatments including exercise therapy, ergotherapy, and orthotic appliance. However, clinical trials are ongoing for new therapeutic strategies, of note for sirolimus, an inhibitor of mTOR.", "prognosis": "No change in mean life expectancy has been observed. IBM patients present a progressive and continuous loss of muscle strength between 3.5-16.8% per year. There is a major impact of the disease on the daily activity. After 5 years, most patients require a walking aid and after 10, a wheelchair."}, {"name": "Sichelzellan\u00e4mie", "sub_name": "Sichelzellkrankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A severe form of sickle cell disease (SCD) characterized by homozygosity for the sickle hemoglobin (HbS) gene and which acutely manifests with severe anemia, susceptibility to severe bacterial infections, and ischemic vasoocclusive accidents (VOA). It is a red cell disease of genetic origin which manifests with hemolytic disease and loss of red cell deformability leading to other occlusive events.", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D57.0\u00a0 D57.1\u00a0 D57.2", "omim": "603903", "umls": "C0002895", "mesh": "D000755", "gard": "8614", "meddra": "10040641", "epidemiology": "Sickle cell anemia (SCA) is the most common form of SCD. Worldwide, it is estimated that there are over 400,000 newborns with sickle cell anemia. The birth prevalence varies according to region, with prevalence greatest in regions affected by holoendemic malaria. In Europe, the pooled birth prevalence is 1/2,300, although this varies between countries.", "clinical_description": "The disease does not manifest during fetal life or up to the first three months of life due to the presence of high levels of fetal hemoglobin. Clinical manifestations evolve with age and are extremely variable between individuals and at different times. In addition to anemia and bacterial infections, VOAs cause hyperalgic focal ischemia (and sometimes infarction) when they occur in the abdomen, chest or skeleton. Over the course of time, VOAs may compromise the integrity of tissues or organs.", "etiology": "SCA is due to homozygous mutations (rs334) in the beta globin gene, HBB (11p15.4); this variant is termed HbS. There are other forms of sickle cell disease are due to compound heterozygosity for the HbS gene and other hemoglobin (Hb) variants. Under deoxygenated conditions, HbS polymerizes and thereby alters the shape and function of erythrocytes, triggering a cascade of events that leads to hemolysis, vascular occlusion, reduced bioavailability of nitric oxide, and endothelial injury.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on analysis of hemoglobin using isoelectric focusing or capillary electrophoresis combined with HPLC, solubility test (Itano test) and molecular analysis. Screening of healthy carriers, by family or by population surveys, helps prevention but requires prospective genetic counseling.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other hereditary hemolytic diseases, and those with recurrent vascular obstruction.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Following genetic counseling, prenatal genetic diagnosis is possible via chorionic villi sampling (before 14 weeks of amenorrhea) or amniotic fluid (from 17 weeks onwards).", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "From birth, management should integrate prevention of infections, pain and eventual complications, with social, psycho-educational and nutritional support, within multidisciplinary centers that are equipped with intensive care (immediate access to blood transfusion). Special attention should be paid to pregnant women with SCA. Prospective research of vasculopathies is needed. An orphan drug based on hydroxycarbamide (hydroxyurea) has obtained European marketing authorization for the severe forms of the disease. Regular or occasional transfusions remain an essential therapeutic method. Bone marrow transplantation has its main indication in severe cases, particularly in cases with cerebral vasculopathy. L-glutamine, crizanlizumab and voxelotor are currently in phase III trials.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is difficult to predict. Acute bacterial infections, malarial attacks, splenic sequestration, severe VOA or organ failure can be a cause of death."}, {"name": "Sichelzellan\u00e4mie-assoziierte pulmonale arterielle Hypertension", "sub_name": "Pulmonale arterielle Hypertonie mit assoziierter chronisch-h\u00e4molytischer An\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Pulmonary arterial hypertension associated with chronic hemolytic anemia (PAH-CHA) is a form of PAH (see this term) characterized by an elevated pulmonary arterial resistance leading to right heart failure observed as a complication of chronic hemolytic anemia.", "synonyms": "PAH associated with chronic hemolytic anemia, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I27.2"}, {"name": "Sichelzellenkrankheit, doppelte heterozygote", "sub_name": "Sichelzellkrankheit mit assoziierter weiterer H\u00e4moglobin-Anomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sichelzellenkrankheit, doppelte heterozygote, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D57.2", "GARD": "12459", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sichelzellkrankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A severe form of sickle cell disease (SCD) characterized by homozygosity for the sickle hemoglobin (HbS) gene and which acutely manifests with severe anemia, susceptibility to severe bacterial infections, and ischemic vasoocclusive accidents (VOA). It is a red cell disease of genetic origin which manifests with hemolytic disease and loss of red cell deformability leading to other occlusive events.", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D57.0\u00a0 D57.1\u00a0 D57.2", "omim": "603903", "umls": "C0002895", "mesh": "D000755", "gard": "8614", "meddra": "10040641", "epidemiology": "Sickle cell anemia (SCA) is the most common form of SCD. Worldwide, it is estimated that there are over 400,000 newborns with sickle cell anemia. The birth prevalence varies according to region, with prevalence greatest in regions affected by holoendemic malaria. In Europe, the pooled birth prevalence is 1/2,300, although this varies between countries.", "clinical_description": "The disease does not manifest during fetal life or up to the first three months of life due to the presence of high levels of fetal hemoglobin. Clinical manifestations evolve with age and are extremely variable between individuals and at different times. In addition to anemia and bacterial infections, VOAs cause hyperalgic focal ischemia (and sometimes infarction) when they occur in the abdomen, chest or skeleton. Over the course of time, VOAs may compromise the integrity of tissues or organs.", "etiology": "SCA is due to homozygous mutations (rs334) in the beta globin gene, HBB (11p15.4); this variant is termed HbS. There are other forms of sickle cell disease are due to compound heterozygosity for the HbS gene and other hemoglobin (Hb) variants. Under deoxygenated conditions, HbS polymerizes and thereby alters the shape and function of erythrocytes, triggering a cascade of events that leads to hemolysis, vascular occlusion, reduced bioavailability of nitric oxide, and endothelial injury.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on analysis of hemoglobin using isoelectric focusing or capillary electrophoresis combined with HPLC, solubility test (Itano test) and molecular analysis. Screening of healthy carriers, by family or by population surveys, helps prevention but requires prospective genetic counseling.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other hereditary hemolytic diseases, and those with recurrent vascular obstruction.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Following genetic counseling, prenatal genetic diagnosis is possible via chorionic villi sampling (before 14 weeks of amenorrhea) or amniotic fluid (from 17 weeks onwards).", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "From birth, management should integrate prevention of infections, pain and eventual complications, with social, psycho-educational and nutritional support, within multidisciplinary centers that are equipped with intensive care (immediate access to blood transfusion). Special attention should be paid to pregnant women with SCA. Prospective research of vasculopathies is needed. An orphan drug based on hydroxycarbamide (hydroxyurea) has obtained European marketing authorization for the severe forms of the disease. Regular or occasional transfusions remain an essential therapeutic method. Bone marrow transplantation has its main indication in severe cases, particularly in cases with cerebral vasculopathy. L-glutamine, crizanlizumab and voxelotor are currently in phase III trials.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is difficult to predict. Acute bacterial infections, malarial attacks, splenic sequestration, severe VOA or organ failure can be a cause of death."}, {"name": "Sichelzellkrankheit - Beta-Thalass\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic hemoglobinopathy that affects red blood cells both in the production of abnormal hemoglobin, as well as the decreased synthesis of beta globin chains. Clinical manifestations depend on the amount of residual beta globin chains production, and are similar to sickle cell disease, including anemia, vascular occlusion and its complications, acute episodes of pain, acute chest syndrome, pulmonary hypertension, sepsis, ischemic brain injury, splenic sequestration crisis and splenomegaly.", "synonyms": "HbS-beta-thalassemia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D57.2", "umls": "C0221019\u00a0 C0857812", "gard": "10333\u00a0 10819", "meddra": "10040655\u00a0 10055579"}, {"name": "Sichelzellkrankheit - H\u00e4moglobin-D-Krankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic hemoglobinopathy characterized by all the characteristics of sickle cell anemia (SCA). Clinical course is similar to SCA, including acute episodes of pain, splenic infarction and splenic sequestration crisis, vaso-occlusive crisis, acute chest syndrome, ischemic brain injury, osteomyelitis and avascular bone necrosis. The genotype is characterized by an HbS allele in combination with the HbD variant, beta121Glu>Gln.", "synonyms": "HbSD disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D57.2", "umls": "C0272084", "gard": "12458", "meddra": "10056724"}, {"name": "Sichelzellkrankheit - H\u00e4moglobin-E-Krankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic hemoglobinopathy usually characterized by mild microcytic hemolysis and, very rarely, vaso-occlusive complications. Severe manifestations have been reported, including hematuria, splenic infarction, acute chest syndrome, acute episodes of pain and reversible bone marrow necrosis. The genotype is characterized by an HbS allele in combination with an HbE variant (beta26glu>lys); symptoms are due to the low allelic expression of HbE leading to HbS predominance (65+/-5%).", "synonyms": "HbSE disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D57.2", "umls": "C0272085"}, {"name": "Sichelzellkrankheit mit assoziierter weiterer H\u00e4moglobin-Anomalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sichelzellenkrankheit, doppelte heterozygote, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D57.2", "GARD": "12459", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sichelzellkrankheit mit H\u00e4moglobin-C-Krankheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic hemoglobinopathy characterized by anemia, reticulocytosis and erythrocyte abnormalities including target cells, irreversibly sickled cells and crystal-containing cells. Clinical course is similar to sickle cell disease, but less severe and with less complications. Signs and symptoms may include acute episodes of pain, splenic infarction and splenic sequestration crisis, acute chest syndrome, focal segmental glomerulosclerosis, ischemic brain injury, peripheral retinopathy, and osteonecrosis.", "synonyms": "HbSC disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D57.2", "umls": "C0019034", "gard": "6584", "meddra": "10057072"}, {"name": "Sichelzellkrankheit und verwandte St\u00f6rungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "D57.0\u00a0 D57.1\u00a0 D57.2\u00a0 D57.3\u00a0 D57.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sick-Sinus-Syndrom, famili\u00e4res", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Famili\u00e4re Sick-Sinus-Syndrom ist eine seltene Herzrhythmusst\u00f6rung meist \u00e4lterer Menschen. Charakteristische elektrokardiographische Befunde sind Sinusbradykardie, Vorhofflimmern, Vorhoftachykardie-Sinusarrest oder sino-atrialer Block. Klinische Symptome sind Synkope, Schwindel, Palpitationen, Ersch\u00f6pfung oder sogar Herzinsuffizienz. Ursache ist eine Fehlfunktion des kardialen Reizleitungssystems, m\u00f6glicherweise als Folge degenerativer Fibrose des Knotengewebes bei \u00e4lteren oder als Folge einer Herzkrankheit bei j\u00fcngeren Patienten.", "synonyms": "Famili\u00e4re Sinusknotendysfunktion, Sinusknotensyndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "I49.5", "OMIM": "163800\u00a0 182190\u00a0 608567\u00a0 614090", "UMLS": "C0037052", "MeSH": "D012804", "MedDRA": "10040639"}, {"name": "SICRET-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Susac-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SS ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurde bisher \u00fcber mehr als 300 F\u00e4lle berichtet. Junge Frauen (20-40 Jahre) sind h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als M\u00e4nner (w:m 3,5:1).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare systemic or rheumatologic disease characterized by the triad of central nervous system (CNS) dysfunction, branch retinal artery occlusions (BRAOs) and sensorineural hearing loss (SNHL) due to autoimmune-mediated occlusions of microvessels in the brain, retina, and inner ear.", "synonyms": "Retinocochleocerebral vasculopathy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I67.7", "umls": "C2717757", "mesh": "D055955", "gard": "7713", "meddra": "10071573", "epidemiology": "Susac syndrome (SuS) prevalence is still unknown. To date more than 500 cases have been reported worldwide. Young females (20-40 years) are more affected (female: male ratio 3.5:1). The age at onset ranges from 8 to 72 years (mean age: 32 years).", "clinical_description": "Characteristic is a triad of encephalopathy (cognitive and behavioral disturbances, personality changes, psychosis, preceding headaches) and/or focal CNS dysfunction, visual dysfunction due to BRAO and SNHL. The components of the triad may not be concomitantly present and may develop successively. Three major disease courses have been suggested: monocyclic (fluctuating disease that self-limits after a maximum period of 2 years), polycyclic (relapses that continue beyond a 2 years period) and chronic-continuous.", "etiology": "The etiology and precise pathophysiology are not yet clear. According to recent data, clonally expanding autoreactive cytotoxic CD8+ T cells cause inflammation-mediated injury of the microvascular endothelium which leads to swelling of endothelial cells, vessel occlusion in the affected organ and finally micro-ischaemic damage and dysfunction.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on the demonstration of the typical triad. There is no singular ''marker'' of SuS. Beside the clinical examination, most relevant diagnostic tools are brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), retinal fluorescein angiography (FA), and audiometry. In the acute phase, T2 weighted brain MRI often shows blurry lesions in the central fibers of the corpus callosum (''snowball lesions'') which later convert into sharply defined ''punched out'' lesions. Periventricular lesions and involvement of cerebellum, brain stem and deep grey matter nuclei are also often present. FA demonstrates BRAO and fluorescein leakage, often in the retinal periphery (may then be clinically silent). Audiometry analysis reveals uni- or bilateral SNHL. Cerebrospinal fluid analysis often shows mild pleocytosis and moderate protein elevation, oligoclonal bands are uncommon. Anti endothelial cell antibodies have been reported in some cases. An early and reliable diagnosis is facilitated by application of the validated diagnostic criteria of the European Susac Consortium (EUSAC).", "differential_diagnosis": "Inflammatory demyelinating CNS disease (such as multiple sclerosis, acute disseminated encephalitis, neuromyelitis optica spectrum disorders), autoimmune encephalitis, and various other diseases involving CNS, retina, and inner ear (including infections, malignancies, psychotic disorders, cerebrovascular disease, migraine, Meniere disease, isolated BRAO) and a variety of autoimmune diseases such as Cogan syndrome, Eales disease, autoimmune inner-ear disease, polyarteritis nodosa, Wegener granulomatosis, Churg-Strauss syndrome, systemic lupus erythematosus, antiphospholipid syndrome, Sj\u00f6gren syndrome and Beh\u00e7et disease.", "management_and_treatment": "No evidence-based treatment strategies exist. Empirically, pulsed glucocorticosteroid treatment is effective in the acute phase. In severe cases treatment may be complemented by cyclophosphamide and/or intravenous immunoglobulins (ivIG), methotrexate (MTX), azathioprine (AZA) or mycophenolate mofetil (MMF). After stabilization glucocorticosteroids should be very slowly tapered. Long term immunosuppressive treatment by MTX, AZA, MMF, and/or ivIG is usually necessary. More recently, positive experiences have been reported with monoclonal antibodies such as rituximab, natalizumab, and infliximab. Patients with severe hearing loss may benefit from cochlear implants.", "prognosis": "The disease usually self-limits after 2-4 years, Late relapses after decades have been reported. The final outcome shows a large variability of disability ranging from unimpairment to dementia, deafness and blindness. The majority of patients retains variable degrees of cognitive, visual and/or hearing deficits."}, {"name": "SIDDT", "sub_name": "Pl\u00f6tzlicher Kindstod - Hodendysgenesie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom mit pl\u00f6tzlichem Kindstod und Hodendysgenesie (SIDDT) ist eine schon f\u00fcr Kleinkinder letale Erkrankung.", "synonyms": "SIDDT, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G90.8", "OMIM": "608800", "UMLS": "C1837371", "GARD": "12382", "epidemiology": "Das Syndrom wurde in der Bev\u00f6lkerungsgruppe der Old Order Amish in 9 verschiedenen Geschwisterreihen bei insgesamt 21 Kleinkindern beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten erscheinen bei Geburt normal, au\u00dfer dass oft ein ungew\u00f6hnliches stakkatoartiges Schreien auff\u00e4llt. Innerhalb der ersten Lebensmonate entwickeln die Kinder Zeichen einer Funktionsst\u00f6rung des vegetativen Nervensystems, mit Bradykardie, Hypothermie, schwerem gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux, Laryngospasmus, Bronchospasmus und abnormem kardio-respiratorischem Muster im Schlaf. Die XY-Knaben haben eine Hodendysgenesie und intersexuelles Genitale. Die weiblichen Genitalien sind normal.", "etiology": "Das SIDDT wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind homozygote Mutationen im TSPYL1-Gen (testis-specific protein Y-like-1; 6q22.1-q22.31).", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist sehr ung\u00fcnstig, die Kinder sterben innerhalb des ersten Lebensjahres mit pl\u00f6tzlichem Herz- und Atemversagen.", "summary": "Das Syndrom wurde in der Bev\u00f6lkerungsgruppe der Old Order Amish in 9 verschiedenen Geschwisterreihen bei insgesamt 21 Kleinkindern beschrieben."}, {"name": "Sideroblastische An\u00e4mie, autosomal-rezessive", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Congenital autosomal recessive sideroblastic anemia (ARSA) is a non-syndromic, microcytic/hypochromic sideroblastic anemia, present from early infancy and characterized by severe microcytic anemia, which is not pyridoxine responsive, and increased serum ferritin.", "synonyms": "ARSA, Congenital sideroblastic anemia, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "D64.0", "omim": "182170\u00a0 205950", "epidemiology": "To date, fewer than 30 unrelated genetically characterized individuals with congenital ARSA have been reported in the northern hemisphere.", "clinical_description": "Congenital ARSA presents in early infancy, within the first weeks or months after birth, and is associated with severe microcytic anemia, increased transferrin saturation and increased serum ferritin. Clinical features are those of anemia and iron overload and include pallor, fatigue, weakness, breathlessness, splenomegaly, hyperglycemia, glucose intolerance and skin hyperpigmentation. Complications of iron overload include heart arrhythmias, heart attacks and liver disease (cirrhosis, cancer). Patients need blood transfusions to survive and do not respond to treatment with pyridoxine (vitamin B6).", "etiology": "ARSA is caused by a homozygous or compound heterozygous mutation in the SLC25A38 gene located on chromosome 3p22.1.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical findings together with full blood examination including blood smear and reticulocyte count, measurement of iron stores and bone marrow aspirate showing ringed sideroblasts. Unresponsiveness to pyridoxine treatment often leads to confirming SLC25A38 gene mutation analysis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of sideroblastic anemia and particularly bears resemblance with X-linked sideroblastic anemia (XLSA, see this term).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In case of family history, prenatal diagnosis by amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling and cytogenetic analysis is possible, as early diagnosis in a child may be of great benefit for treatment of anemia and avoidance of iron overload, historically the main cause of early death.", "genetic_counseling": "The SLC25A38 gene mutation is transmitted as an autosomal recessive trait. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected individuals and their families informing them of the possibilities of carrier testing for at-risk family members and the genetic risk for transmitting it on to their children.", "management_and_treatment": "ARSA differs from X-linked sideroblastic anemias because it is usually more severe and is not responsive to treatment with pyridoxine. Treatment is supportive and involves hematological monitoring, the surveillance of iron levels and nearly always comprises chronic blood transfusions. If iron overload has already developed, iron chelation can be used to normalize iron levels. In some cases, bone marrow transplantation is considered as a successful treatment option.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable and depends on the severity of microcytic anemia. Quality of life is affected in the case chronic blood transfusions are needed. In well treated patients life expectancy is thought to be normal."}, {"name": "Sideroblastische An\u00e4mie, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Sideroblastische An\u00e4mie, autosomal-rezessive", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Congenital autosomal recessive sideroblastic anemia (ARSA) is a non-syndromic, microcytic/hypochromic sideroblastic anemia, present from early infancy and characterized by severe microcytic anemia, which is not pyridoxine responsive, and increased serum ferritin.", "synonyms": "ARSA, Congenital sideroblastic anemia, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "D64.0", "omim": "182170\u00a0 205950", "epidemiology": "To date, fewer than 30 unrelated genetically characterized individuals with congenital ARSA have been reported in the northern hemisphere.", "clinical_description": "Congenital ARSA presents in early infancy, within the first weeks or months after birth, and is associated with severe microcytic anemia, increased transferrin saturation and increased serum ferritin. Clinical features are those of anemia and iron overload and include pallor, fatigue, weakness, breathlessness, splenomegaly, hyperglycemia, glucose intolerance and skin hyperpigmentation. Complications of iron overload include heart arrhythmias, heart attacks and liver disease (cirrhosis, cancer). Patients need blood transfusions to survive and do not respond to treatment with pyridoxine (vitamin B6).", "etiology": "ARSA is caused by a homozygous or compound heterozygous mutation in the SLC25A38 gene located on chromosome 3p22.1.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical findings together with full blood examination including blood smear and reticulocyte count, measurement of iron stores and bone marrow aspirate showing ringed sideroblasts. Unresponsiveness to pyridoxine treatment often leads to confirming SLC25A38 gene mutation analysis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of sideroblastic anemia and particularly bears resemblance with X-linked sideroblastic anemia (XLSA, see this term).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In case of family history, prenatal diagnosis by amniocentesis or chorionic villus sampling and cytogenetic analysis is possible, as early diagnosis in a child may be of great benefit for treatment of anemia and avoidance of iron overload, historically the main cause of early death.", "genetic_counseling": "The SLC25A38 gene mutation is transmitted as an autosomal recessive trait. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected individuals and their families informing them of the possibilities of carrier testing for at-risk family members and the genetic risk for transmitting it on to their children.", "management_and_treatment": "ARSA differs from X-linked sideroblastic anemias because it is usually more severe and is not responsive to treatment with pyridoxine. Treatment is supportive and involves hematological monitoring, the surveillance of iron levels and nearly always comprises chronic blood transfusions. If iron overload has already developed, iron chelation can be used to normalize iron levels. In some cases, bone marrow transplantation is considered as a successful treatment option.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable and depends on the severity of microcytic anemia. Quality of life is affected in the case chronic blood transfusions are needed. In well treated patients life expectancy is thought to be normal."}, {"name": "Sideroblastische An\u00e4mie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, autosomal-rezessiv", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare non-syndromic autosomal recessive pyridoxine-refractory sideroblastic anemia due to a splice defect of glutaredoxin-5 (GLRX5) described in a single patient with adult onset microcytic hypochromic anemia with liver iron overload and type 2 diabetes.", "synonyms": "GLRX5-related sideroblastic anemia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "D64.0", "omim": "616860", "umls": "C2673914"}, {"name": "Siebentagefieber", "sub_name": "Q-Fieber", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Q-Fieber ist eine bakterielle Zoonose und wird durch Coxiella burnetii verursacht. Das klinische Spektrum ist breit und reicht von akut lebensbedrohlichen bis zu chronischen Verl\u00e4ufen.", "synonyms": "Coxiellose, Infektion durch Coxiella burnetii, Query-Fieber, Schlachthausfieber, Siebentagefieber, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A78", "UMLS": "C0034362\u00a0 C2973787", "MeSH": "D011778", "GARD": "7515", "MedDRA": "10037688\u00a0 10037731", "epidemiology": "In den letzten Jahren hat die Zahl der mitgeteilten F\u00e4lle in Europa zugenommen. Allein in den Niederlanden wurden zwischen 2007 und 2010 mehr al 4.000 F\u00e4lle aufgedeckt.", "clinical_description": "Das Q-Fieber tritt in allen Altersklassen auf, meist jedoch im Alter von 30-70 Jahren. Die Inkubationszeit betr\u00e4gt 2-3 Wochen. Etwa 60% der F\u00e4lle bleiben symptomfrei. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Symptome des akuten Q-Fiebers sind hohes Fieber, schwere Kopfschmerzen, Myalgien, Sch\u00fcttelfrost und Husten. Pneumonie und Hepatitis sind m\u00f6gliche Begleiter. Die Lungenbeteiligung ist meist moderat, Pleuraerg\u00fcsse und akutes Atemnotsyndrom k\u00f6nnen aber auftreten. Die Symptome dauern 10-90 Tage an. Selten haben die Patienten neurologische (z.B. Meningitis), kardiale (Perikarditis, Myokarditis) oder dermatologische (makulo-papul\u00f6ses Exanthem, Erythema nodosum) Symptome. Bis zu 50% der diagnostizierten Kinder leiden unter gastrointestinalen Symptomen und Hautauschl\u00e4gen. Die Infektion kann bei pr\u00e4disponierten Personen (z.B. Herzklappen- oder Gef\u00e4\u00dfst\u00f6rung) Monate oder Jahre nach der Erstinfektion in eine chronische Form \u00fcbergehen (<5% der F\u00e4lle). Chronische Manifestationen sind Endokarditis, vaskul\u00e4re Infektionen und Osteomyelitis, seltener fiebrige Hepatitis mit \u00dcbergang in Leberfibrose oder -zirrhose. Folgen einer prim\u00e4ren Infektion in der Schwangerschaft sind Spontanabort, Fr\u00fchgeburt, niedriges Geburtsgewicht, Infektion des Feten oder rezidivierende Fehlgeburten. Bei chronischem Q-Fieber ist nach der Entbindung eine Herzbeteiligung m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Coxiella burnetii ist ein intrazellul\u00e4res gramnegatives Bakterium aus der Gamma-Gruppe der Proteobacteria. Die meisten Infektionen erfolgen durch Inhalation von Aerosolen oder Staub, der mit getrockenetem Fruchtwasser oder Exkrementen infizierter Tiere kontaminiert ist. Seltenere Infektionswege sind die Aufnahme infizierter Milch, Zeckenbiss oder Kontakt mit Keimreservoiren. \u00dcbertragung zwischen Personen und von der Schwangeren zum Feten wurde beschrieben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose eines akuten Q-Fiebers wird serologisch (Immunfluoreszenztest an gepaarten, im Abstand von 3-6 Wochen gewonnenen Seren) durch vierfachen Anstieg des Phase II- Immunglobulins (Ig) G best\u00e4tigt. In den ersten 2 Wochen nach Beginn der Symptome und vor der Therapie mit Antibiotika kann die PCR-Analyse in Blut oder Serum n\u00fctzlich sein. Ein einzelner hoher Phase II-IgG-Titer im Serum w\u00e4hrend der Rekonvaleszenz kann als Hinweis auf eine wahrscheinliche Infektion gewertet werden. Ein chronisches Q-Fieber wird best\u00e4tigt durch ansteigenden Phase I-IgG-Titer (typisch \u2265 1:1024) und Nachweis eines Infektionsherdes (z.B. Endokarditis, vaskul\u00e4re Infektion, Osteomyelitis, chronische Hepatitis) best\u00e4tigt. Die Spiegel der Leberenzyme sind meist erh\u00f6ht.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind alle fieberhaften Erkrankungen mit erweiterter Symptomatik wie z.B. Brucellose (s. dort) und Influenza.", "management_and_treatment": "Prophylaktische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind Impfung (in Australien) und angemessenene Hygiene. Eine \u00dcbertragung w\u00e4hrend der Krankenpflege wird durch Einhaltung der \u00fcblichen Vorsichtsma\u00dfnahmen verhindert. Symptomatische Patienten mit akutem Q-Fieber sollen 2 Wochen mit Doxycyclin behandelt werden. Vor Beginn der Behandlung muss bei Frauen im geb\u00e4rf\u00e4higen Alter ein Schwangerschaftstest durchgef\u00fchrt werden. Kinder unter 8 Jahren mit milden Symptomen, Schwangere und Patienten mit Allergie gegen Doxycyclin k\u00f6nnen mit Trimethoprim-Sulfamethoxazol behandelt werden. Das chronische Q-Fieber wird \u00fcber den Zeitraum von 18 Monaten kombiniert mit Doxycyclin and Hydroxychloroquin behandelt.", "prognosis": "Das akute Q-Fieber ist oft eine milde, selbstlimitierte Erkrankung mit niedriger Letalit\u00e4t. Ohne Behandlung enden bei chronischem Q-Fieber Endokardititis und vaskul\u00e4re Infektion oft t\u00f6dlich. Die 10-Jahres-Mortalit\u00e4tsrate einer behandelten Endokarditis im Rahmen des chronischen Q-Fiebers betr\u00e4gt 19%.", "summary": "In den letzten Jahren hat die Zahl der mitgeteilten F\u00e4lle in Europa zugenommen. Allein in den Niederlanden wurden zwischen 2007 und 2010 mehr al 4.000 F\u00e4lle aufgedeckt."}, {"name": "Siegler-Brewer-Carey-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, syndromale, genetisch bedingte Atemwegserkrankung, die durch Katarakte, Otitis media, intestinale Malabsorption, chronische Atemwegsinfektionen und Gedeihst\u00f6rung gekennzeichnet ist. Zus\u00e4tzlich werden rezidivierende Lungenentz\u00fcndungen und eine progressive Azot\u00e4mie beobachtet, die zu einem terminalen Nierenversagen und fr\u00fchen Tod f\u00fchrt. Seit 1992 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "UMLS": "C2931473", "MeSH": "C537335", "GARD": "4867"}, {"name": "Silent Sinus-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Enophthalmus und Hypotropie durch Kieferh\u00f6hlenatelektase, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "J34.8", "UMLS": "C3698095", "summary": "Das Silent-sinus-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Enophthalmus mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter. Ursache ist der Kollaps einiger oder aller W\u00e4nde des Maxillarsinus. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Der fortschreitende Enophthalmus wird manchmal begleitet Schmerzen in den Wangen, Diplopie und verschwommener Visus. Manchmal erinnern sich die Patienten an fr\u00fcher durchgemachte Sinusitiden. Das Syndrom ist entweder idiopathisch oder es tritt nach kn\u00f6cherner Dekompression der Orbita bei Basedow-bedingter Ophthalmopathie oder Fraktur des Orbita-Bodens auf. Am Mechanismus beteiligt ist eine fehlende Bel\u00fcftung der Kieferh\u00f6hle und daraus resultierender negativer Druck. Dieser negative Druck wird evtl. durch Kaubewegungen erzeugt. Die Diagnose wird durch Computer-Tomographie des Gesichtes mit koronarer Schichtung gestellt. Sie zeigt den Kollaps einer oder mehrerer W\u00e4nde der Kieferh\u00f6hle, mit oder ohne Retention von Fl\u00fcssigkeit in der H\u00f6hle. Das Ostium der Kieferh\u00f6hle ist verschlossen, da der Processus uncinatus an den infero-medialen Anteil der Orbitawand angelagert ist. Der mittlere Meatus ist erweitert. Differentialdiagnostisch auszuschlie\u00dfen sind 'Blow-out'-Frakturen des Orbitabodens, Weichteilatrophie, prim\u00e4re oder sekund\u00e4re Malignome, Fehlbildungen der Orbitavenen, sistierendes Knochenwachstum nach Strahlentherapie, angeborene Ursachen (leicht ausgepr\u00e4gte Hemifaziale Mikrosomie, Plagiozephalie, Mikrophthalmie u.a.) und Pseudo-Enophthalmus (unilaterale Blepharoptose, Horner-Syndrom, kontralateraler Exophthalmus, kontralaterale hochgradige Myopie, kontralaterale Retraktion des Lides). Eine Behandlung ist nur chirurgisch m\u00f6glich. Endoskopisch-chirurgisch wird die Kieferh\u00f6hle durch Antrum-Meatotomie in die Nasenh\u00f6hle ge\u00f6ffnet. Der Orbitaboden wird durch autologes Material oder Implantat rekonstruiert. Nach Therapie ist die Prognose gut. "}, {"name": "Sillence-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Symphalangismus-Brachydaktylie-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q74.8", "OMIM": "113450", "UMLS": "C0342282\u00a0 C1862092", "MeSH": "C537338", "GARD": "4869", "summary": "Das Sillence-Syndrom (Brachydaktylie-Symphalangismus-Syndrom) \u00e4hnelt einem Typ A1 der Brachydaktylie (unterschiedliche Verk\u00fcrzung der Mittelphalangen aller Finger) mit gleichzeitiger Symphalangie. Die Endphalangen sind \u00e4hnlich einer Halmafigur geformt. Weitere charakteristische Symptome sind Skoliose, Klumpfu\u00df und Hochwuchs. Das Syndrom wurde in 1 Familie bei 5 Betroffenen aus 3 aufeinander folgenden Generationen beschrieben. Die Vererbung scheint autosomal-dominant zu sein. "}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "180860\u00a0 312780\u00a0 616489", "UMLS": "C0175693", "MeSH": "D056730", "GARD": "4870", "MedDRA": "10062282", "summary": "Das Silver-Russel-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch pr\u00e4natal beginnenden Minderwuchs, besondere faziale Dysmorphien und K\u00f6rperasymmetrie. Die Inzidenz wurde zu 1-30 :100.000 bestimmt, und etwa 400 F\u00e4lle wurden beschrieben. Das Gewicht ist oft st\u00e4rker reduziert als die K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe, da wenig subkutanes Fettgewebe vorhanden ist. Die Knochenreifung ist verz\u00f6gert, das Knochenalter entspricht der jeweiligen K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe. Die Fontanelle schlie\u00dft sich evtl. erst sp\u00e4t. Der Kopfumfang ist altersentsprechend normal, steht damit im Gegensatz zum restlichen K\u00f6rper und vermittelt so den irrt\u00fcmlichen Eindruck eines Hydrozephalus (Pseudo-Hydrozephalus). Die breite, vorgew\u00f6lbte Stirn kontrastiert mit dem kleinen dreieckigen Gesicht mit kleinem, spitzem Kinn. Der Mund ist breit, die Lippen schmal, die Mundwinkel herabgezogen. Die Augen sind gro\u00df und haben bl\u00e4uliche Skleren. In 60-80% besteht laterale und meist nur partielle, nicht progrediente Asymmetrie der Gliedma\u00dfen. H\u00e4ufig wird eine Verk\u00fcrzung und Klinodaktylie des Kleinfingers gesehen. Einige Patienten sind langsam beim Erwerb motorischer Geschicklichkeit, nur selten sind sie geistig leicht retardiert. Die \u00c4tiologie ist heterogen. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch. In 10% der F\u00e4lle besteht eine maternale uniparentale Disomie des Chromosoms 7. Bei etwa 30% der Patienten wird eine Hypomethylierung des H19-Gens in der Imprintregion 11p15 gefunden. Die Hypomethylierung ist in den meisten F\u00e4llen Folge eines epigenetischen Mechanismus oder eines genomischen Mikro-Rearrangements, z.B. einer maternalen Mikro-Duplikation dieser Region. Die Diagnose erfolgt \u00fcberwiegend klinisch, denn einen spezifischen Labortest gibt es nicht. Sie kann aber durch den Nachweis einer urs\u00e4chlichen molekularen Anomalie best\u00e4tigt werden. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen andere Ursachen einer intrauterinen Wachstumsretardierung ausgeschlossen werden: Gest\u00f6rte Plazentafunktion, strukturelle chromosomale Anomalien, Chromosomenmosaike, neonatale Progerie (Wiedemann-Rautenstrauch-Syndrom), 3M-Syndrom und Mulibrey-Kleinwuchs (s. diese Termini). Die genetische Beratung richtet sich nach der jeweiligen genetischen \u00c4tiologie. Bei uniparentaler Disomie des Chromosoms 7 und bei epigenetischen St\u00f6rungen der Chromosomenregion 11p15 ist das Wiederholungsrisiko extrem niedrig. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist in der Regel nicht angezeigt, da die meisten der bisher beschriebenen F\u00e4lle sporadisch waren und die Geburt eines weiteren betroffenen Kindes nicht angenommen wird. Die Behandlung ist supportiv. Eine Therapie mit Wachstumshormon kann das Wachstum beschleunigen und die Endgr\u00f6\u00dfe verbessern, der Normbereich wird aber nicht erreicht. Die Patienten bleiben klein und behalten einen mageren K\u00f6rperbau, aber die Langzeitprognose ist gut. Eine m\u00f6gliche Hemihypertrophie ist nicht mit einem erh\u00f6hten Tumorrisiko verbunden."}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch dup(7)(p11.2p13)", "sub_name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Mikrodeletion 7p11.2p13", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Trisomie 7p11.2-p13, Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch dup(7)(p11.2p13), ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Silver-Russell-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Imprintingdefekt von 11p15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0oder\u00a0Unbekannt\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Silver-Russell-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch maternale uniparental Disomie des Chromosom 7", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Silver-Russell-Syndrom aufgrund einer m\u00fctterlichen uniparentalen Disomie von Chromosom 7 ist ein genetisches Fehlbildungssyndrom mit Kleinwuchs. Das Syndrom pr\u00e4sentiert sich durch schwere pr\u00e4natale und postnatale Wachstumsretardierung, F\u00fctterungsschwierigkeiten, K\u00f6rperasymmetrie, dysmorphe kraniofaziale Merkmale (dreieckiges Gesicht, relative Makrozephalie, prominene Stirn, Mikrognathie, nach unten gebogene Mundwinkel) und weitere Anomalien (Klinodaktylie des f\u00fcnften Fingers, Caf\u00e9 au lait-Flecken, m\u00e4nnliche Genitalanomalien, leichte Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und/oder Sprachverz\u00f6gerung mit Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen).", "synonyms": "UPD(7)mat, ", "ICD-10": "Q87.1"}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch maternale uniparentale Disomie von Chromosom 11", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "UPD(11)mat, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0oder\u00a0Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Silver-Russell-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Mikrodeletion 7p11.2p13", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Trisomie 7p11.2-p13, Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch dup(7)(p11.2p13), ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Silver-Russell-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Mikroduplikation 11p15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Silver-Russell-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Punktmutation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "616489\u00a0 618907\u00a0 618908", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Silver-Russell-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Trisomie 7p11.2-p13", "sub_name": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Mikrodeletion 7p11.2p13", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch Trisomie 7p11.2-p13, Silver-Russell-Syndrom durch dup(7)(p11.2p13), ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Silver-Russell-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Silver-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 17", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia, upper and lower limb muscle atrophy, hyperreflexia, extensor plantar responses, pes cavus and occasionally impaired vibration sense. Association with hand muscles amyotrophy typical.", "synonyms": "SPG17, Silver syndrome, Spastic paraplegia-amyotrophy of hands and feet, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "270685", "umls": "C2931276", "gard": "4219"}, {"name": "Simosa-Penchaszadeh-Bustos-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Flaches Gesicht-Mikrostomie-Ohranomalie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Flat face-microstomia-ear anomaly syndrome is a rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by dysmorphic facial features, including high forehead, elongated and flattened midface, arched and sparse eyebrows, short palpebral fissures, telecanthus, long nose with hypoplastic nostrils, long philtrum, high and narrow palate and microstomia with downturned corners. Ears are characteristically malformed, large, low-set and posteriorly rotated and nasal speech is associated. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1994.", "synonyms": "Blepharophimosis-telecanthus-microstomia syndrome, Simosa craniofacial syndrome, Simosa-Penchaszadeh-Bustos syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "182150", "umls": "C1866962", "gard": "4873"}, {"name": "Simpson-Dysmorphie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom (SGBS) ist gekennzeichnet durch pr\u00e4- und postnatalen Gro\u00dfwuchs, faziale Dysmorphien und eine Reihe von nicht-obligaten viszeralen und skeletalen Manifestationen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden mehr als 100 F\u00e4lle mit SGBS beschrieben. Charakteristische Dysmorphien sind Makrozephalie mit vergr\u00f6bertem, typischem Gesicht (das im Erwachsenenalter nicht mehr so auff\u00e4llig ist) mit gro\u00dfem, ausladendem Kiefer, breiter Nasenwurzel und Gaumenspalte. H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe sind breit und kurz. \u00dcberz\u00e4hlige Mamillen, Rippenanomalien, Pectus excavatum, Hepatosplenomegalie, Nabel- oder Leistenhernie und Kryptorchismus sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Herzfehler kommen bei etwa einem Drittel der Patienten vor. Minderbegabung ist selten und dann auch nur leichtgradig. H\u00e4ufig sind aber Sprachprobleme, auch psychosoziale Probleme wurden beschrieben. F\u00fcr embryonale Neoplasien, z.B. Wilms-Tumor, Neuroblastom und Hepatoblastom, besteht ein auf etwa 10% erh\u00f6htes Risiko. Das SGBS folgt einem X-chromosomal-rezessiven Erbgang. H\u00e4ufigste Ursache sind Mutationen GPC3-Gen in der Chromosomenregion Xq26. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr Glypican-3, ein extrazellul\u00e4res Heparansulfat-Proteoglykan, das sich haupts\u00e4chlich in Geweben mesodermalen Ursprungs findet, mit IGF2 (insulin-like growth factor 2) interagiert und dadurch dessen Signalkette beeinflusst. Nicht alle Patienten mit SGBS haben eine GPC3-Mutation, ein Hinweis, dass bei einigen Patienten die Ursache in anderen Genen liegen kann (genetische Heterogenit\u00e4t): Eine schwerere Variante des Syndroms (SGBS Typ 2) wurde in 1 Familie mit multiplen kraniofazialen, skeletalen und viszeralen Fehlbildungen (aber keine Herzfehler), Hydrops fetalis und fr\u00fcher Letalit\u00e4t beschrieben. In dieser Familie bestand Kopplung an die Chromosomenregion Xp22. F\u00fcr die Diagnose des SGBS gibt es keinen Labortest. Verlauf und klinische Symptome, manchmal auch die Familienanamnese, lassen an die Diagnose denken. Der Nachweis einer GPC3-Mutation best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose, fehlender Nachweis einer Mutation schlie\u00dft die Diagnose aber nicht aus. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom (BWS), Weaver-Syndrom, Perlman-Syndrom und Sotos-Syndrom ausgeschlossen werden. Die T\u00f6chter von betroffenen M\u00e4nnern sind alle heterozygot, S\u00f6hne erben die Mutation nicht. Die H\u00e4fte der S\u00f6hne einer heterozygoten Frau haben ein SGBS, die H\u00e4lfte der T\u00f6chter ist heterozygot. Heterozygote Frauen k\u00f6nnen leichte k\u00f6rperliche Ver\u00e4nderungen im Sinne eines SGBS aufweisen. Wenn bei einem m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten die Mutation gefunden wurde, erm\u00f6glicht molekulare Analyse die Erkennung der heterozygoten Frauen in der Familie. Bei bekannter Mutation des Index-Patienten ist mit molekularer Analyse auch eine fr\u00fche vorgeburtliche Diagnose m\u00f6glich. Bei fehlender Familienanamnese kann die Diagnose vor der Geburt mit Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall nur vermutet werden. Die angeborenen Fehlbildungen erfordern z.T. eine chirurgische Intervention. Die Mortalit\u00e4t in der Perinatal- und S\u00e4uglingszeit ist, offenbar als Folge der Herzbeteiligung (z.B. Reizleitungsst\u00f6rungen), hoch. Kardiale Kontrollen sind daher wichtig. Zum Tumor-Screening beim SGBS geh\u00f6ren Ultraschall-Untersuchung des Abdomens, Harnanalyse und Suche nach biochemischen Markern embryonaler Tumoren. Sprachprobleme und Lernbehinderungen erfordern p\u00e4dagogische Begleitung.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare X-linked multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by pre- and postnatal overgrowth, distinctive craniofacial features, variable congenital malformations, organomegaly and an increased tumor risk.", "synonyms": "DGSX, Golabi-Rosen syndrome, SDYS, SGBS, SGBS1, Simpson dysmorphia syndrome, Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome type 1, X-linked dysplasia gigantism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.3", "omim": "312870", "umls": "C0796154", "mesh": "C537340", "gard": "7649", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence is unknown. Approximately 250 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome (SGBS) manifests a broad clinical picture with varying degrees of severity. It is characterized by pre- and postnatal overgrowth with macrosomia, distinctive craniofacial features (macrocephaly with coarse face, macroglossia, hypertelorism, dental malocclusion, palatal abnormalities), supernumerary nipples, congenital heart defects and arrhythmias, vertebral segmental defects, abdominal visceromegaly (renal dysplasia/nephromegaly, splenomegaly and hepatomegaly), diaphragmatic hernia, diastasis recti/umbilical hernia, limb anomalies (polydactyly/brachydactyly of the hands, cutaneous syndactyly, nail hypoplasia), and genital involvement (cryptorchidism, hypospadias). Involvement of central nervous system presents with variable degrees of intellectual disability, motor delay and speech delay. Patients with SGBS are at increased risk for embryonal tumors (Wilms tumor), hepatoblastoma, adrenal neuroblastoma, gonadoblastoma, hepatocellular carcinoma.", "etiology": "SGBS is due to loss-of-function mutations in the GPC3 gene (Xq26), encoding Glypican-3 (GPC3), a cell surface heparin sulfate proteoglycan which acts as a negative regulator of Hedgehog (Hh) signaling during development. Mutations in GPC3 result in the hyperactivation of Hh signaling, that ultimately leads to overgrowth and cancer.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical findings, family history, genetic testing for GPC3 mutations, and array comparative genomic hybridization (aCGH) analysis of genomic imbalance in Xq26. Imaging techniques help to detect skeletal anomalies and central nervous system involvement. Screening for embryonic tumors is performed by imaging (serial abdominal ultrasonogram and chest X rays), serial measurement of tumor markers and catecholamine metabolites in urine. Kidney function is monitored in cases of kidney involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include overgrowth syndromes such as Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome and Sotos syndrome, and additional disorders such as fragile X syndrome, Bannayan-Zonana syndrome, PTEN hamartoma tumor syndrome, Marshall syndrome, Nevo syndrome, mosaic trisomy 8 and Pallister-Killian syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis and/or pre-implantation genetic testing are possible for at-risk pregnancies when a mutation has previously been identified in the family. Prenatal ultrasound examination can detect disproportionate fetal overgrowth, while elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels may also be useful to suspect SGBS.", "genetic_counseling": "SGBS follows an X-linked recessive pattern of transmission. In the offspring of an affected male, daughters are heterozygous and sons are unaffected. For each pregnancy, a heterozygous female has a 25% risk of having an affected son and a 25% risk of having a carrier daughter (usually not affected or showing minimal clinical findings due to lyonization). SGBS may also result from de novo mutations (20-30% of cases).", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach with pediatric cardiologists, neurologists, orthopedics, and speech therapists. Congenital malformations may require surgery. Special attention should be paid to cardiac abnormalities that are responsible for the increased perinatal and infant mortality. Tumor management and follow-up should be performed.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the severity of the disease; in the most severe cases, SGBS is life-threatening before birth or in infancy, whereas in milder cases patients often live into adulthood."}, {"name": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom (SGBS) ist gekennzeichnet durch pr\u00e4- und postnatalen Gro\u00dfwuchs, faziale Dysmorphien und eine Reihe von nicht-obligaten viszeralen und skeletalen Manifestationen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden mehr als 100 F\u00e4lle mit SGBS beschrieben. Charakteristische Dysmorphien sind Makrozephalie mit vergr\u00f6bertem, typischem Gesicht (das im Erwachsenenalter nicht mehr so auff\u00e4llig ist) mit gro\u00dfem, ausladendem Kiefer, breiter Nasenwurzel und Gaumenspalte. H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe sind breit und kurz. \u00dcberz\u00e4hlige Mamillen, Rippenanomalien, Pectus excavatum, Hepatosplenomegalie, Nabel- oder Leistenhernie und Kryptorchismus sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Herzfehler kommen bei etwa einem Drittel der Patienten vor. Minderbegabung ist selten und dann auch nur leichtgradig. H\u00e4ufig sind aber Sprachprobleme, auch psychosoziale Probleme wurden beschrieben. F\u00fcr embryonale Neoplasien, z.B. Wilms-Tumor, Neuroblastom und Hepatoblastom, besteht ein auf etwa 10% erh\u00f6htes Risiko. Das SGBS folgt einem X-chromosomal-rezessiven Erbgang. H\u00e4ufigste Ursache sind Mutationen GPC3-Gen in der Chromosomenregion Xq26. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr Glypican-3, ein extrazellul\u00e4res Heparansulfat-Proteoglykan, das sich haupts\u00e4chlich in Geweben mesodermalen Ursprungs findet, mit IGF2 (insulin-like growth factor 2) interagiert und dadurch dessen Signalkette beeinflusst. Nicht alle Patienten mit SGBS haben eine GPC3-Mutation, ein Hinweis, dass bei einigen Patienten die Ursache in anderen Genen liegen kann (genetische Heterogenit\u00e4t): Eine schwerere Variante des Syndroms (SGBS Typ 2) wurde in 1 Familie mit multiplen kraniofazialen, skeletalen und viszeralen Fehlbildungen (aber keine Herzfehler), Hydrops fetalis und fr\u00fcher Letalit\u00e4t beschrieben. In dieser Familie bestand Kopplung an die Chromosomenregion Xp22. F\u00fcr die Diagnose des SGBS gibt es keinen Labortest. Verlauf und klinische Symptome, manchmal auch die Familienanamnese, lassen an die Diagnose denken. Der Nachweis einer GPC3-Mutation best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose, fehlender Nachweis einer Mutation schlie\u00dft die Diagnose aber nicht aus. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom (BWS), Weaver-Syndrom, Perlman-Syndrom und Sotos-Syndrom ausgeschlossen werden. Die T\u00f6chter von betroffenen M\u00e4nnern sind alle heterozygot, S\u00f6hne erben die Mutation nicht. Die H\u00e4fte der S\u00f6hne einer heterozygoten Frau haben ein SGBS, die H\u00e4lfte der T\u00f6chter ist heterozygot. Heterozygote Frauen k\u00f6nnen leichte k\u00f6rperliche Ver\u00e4nderungen im Sinne eines SGBS aufweisen. Wenn bei einem m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten die Mutation gefunden wurde, erm\u00f6glicht molekulare Analyse die Erkennung der heterozygoten Frauen in der Familie. Bei bekannter Mutation des Index-Patienten ist mit molekularer Analyse auch eine fr\u00fche vorgeburtliche Diagnose m\u00f6glich. Bei fehlender Familienanamnese kann die Diagnose vor der Geburt mit Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall nur vermutet werden. Die angeborenen Fehlbildungen erfordern z.T. eine chirurgische Intervention. Die Mortalit\u00e4t in der Perinatal- und S\u00e4uglingszeit ist, offenbar als Folge der Herzbeteiligung (z.B. Reizleitungsst\u00f6rungen), hoch. Kardiale Kontrollen sind daher wichtig. Zum Tumor-Screening beim SGBS geh\u00f6ren Ultraschall-Untersuchung des Abdomens, Harnanalyse und Suche nach biochemischen Markern embryonaler Tumoren. Sprachprobleme und Lernbehinderungen erfordern p\u00e4dagogische Begleitung.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare X-linked multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by pre- and postnatal overgrowth, distinctive craniofacial features, variable congenital malformations, organomegaly and an increased tumor risk.", "synonyms": "DGSX, Golabi-Rosen syndrome, SDYS, SGBS, SGBS1, Simpson dysmorphia syndrome, Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome type 1, X-linked dysplasia gigantism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.3", "omim": "312870", "umls": "C0796154", "mesh": "C537340", "gard": "7649", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence is unknown. Approximately 250 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome (SGBS) manifests a broad clinical picture with varying degrees of severity. It is characterized by pre- and postnatal overgrowth with macrosomia, distinctive craniofacial features (macrocephaly with coarse face, macroglossia, hypertelorism, dental malocclusion, palatal abnormalities), supernumerary nipples, congenital heart defects and arrhythmias, vertebral segmental defects, abdominal visceromegaly (renal dysplasia/nephromegaly, splenomegaly and hepatomegaly), diaphragmatic hernia, diastasis recti/umbilical hernia, limb anomalies (polydactyly/brachydactyly of the hands, cutaneous syndactyly, nail hypoplasia), and genital involvement (cryptorchidism, hypospadias). Involvement of central nervous system presents with variable degrees of intellectual disability, motor delay and speech delay. Patients with SGBS are at increased risk for embryonal tumors (Wilms tumor), hepatoblastoma, adrenal neuroblastoma, gonadoblastoma, hepatocellular carcinoma.", "etiology": "SGBS is due to loss-of-function mutations in the GPC3 gene (Xq26), encoding Glypican-3 (GPC3), a cell surface heparin sulfate proteoglycan which acts as a negative regulator of Hedgehog (Hh) signaling during development. Mutations in GPC3 result in the hyperactivation of Hh signaling, that ultimately leads to overgrowth and cancer.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical findings, family history, genetic testing for GPC3 mutations, and array comparative genomic hybridization (aCGH) analysis of genomic imbalance in Xq26. Imaging techniques help to detect skeletal anomalies and central nervous system involvement. Screening for embryonic tumors is performed by imaging (serial abdominal ultrasonogram and chest X rays), serial measurement of tumor markers and catecholamine metabolites in urine. Kidney function is monitored in cases of kidney involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include overgrowth syndromes such as Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome and Sotos syndrome, and additional disorders such as fragile X syndrome, Bannayan-Zonana syndrome, PTEN hamartoma tumor syndrome, Marshall syndrome, Nevo syndrome, mosaic trisomy 8 and Pallister-Killian syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis and/or pre-implantation genetic testing are possible for at-risk pregnancies when a mutation has previously been identified in the family. Prenatal ultrasound examination can detect disproportionate fetal overgrowth, while elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels may also be useful to suspect SGBS.", "genetic_counseling": "SGBS follows an X-linked recessive pattern of transmission. In the offspring of an affected male, daughters are heterozygous and sons are unaffected. For each pregnancy, a heterozygous female has a 25% risk of having an affected son and a 25% risk of having a carrier daughter (usually not affected or showing minimal clinical findings due to lyonization). SGBS may also result from de novo mutations (20-30% of cases).", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach with pediatric cardiologists, neurologists, orthopedics, and speech therapists. Congenital malformations may require surgery. Special attention should be paid to cardiac abnormalities that are responsible for the increased perinatal and infant mortality. Tumor management and follow-up should be performed.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the severity of the disease; in the most severe cases, SGBS is life-threatening before birth or in infancy, whereas in milder cases patients often live into adulthood."}, {"name": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom Typ 1 (SGBS1)", "sub_name": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom (SGBS) ist gekennzeichnet durch pr\u00e4- und postnatalen Gro\u00dfwuchs, faziale Dysmorphien und eine Reihe von nicht-obligaten viszeralen und skeletalen Manifestationen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden mehr als 100 F\u00e4lle mit SGBS beschrieben. Charakteristische Dysmorphien sind Makrozephalie mit vergr\u00f6bertem, typischem Gesicht (das im Erwachsenenalter nicht mehr so auff\u00e4llig ist) mit gro\u00dfem, ausladendem Kiefer, breiter Nasenwurzel und Gaumenspalte. H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe sind breit und kurz. \u00dcberz\u00e4hlige Mamillen, Rippenanomalien, Pectus excavatum, Hepatosplenomegalie, Nabel- oder Leistenhernie und Kryptorchismus sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome. Herzfehler kommen bei etwa einem Drittel der Patienten vor. Minderbegabung ist selten und dann auch nur leichtgradig. H\u00e4ufig sind aber Sprachprobleme, auch psychosoziale Probleme wurden beschrieben. F\u00fcr embryonale Neoplasien, z.B. Wilms-Tumor, Neuroblastom und Hepatoblastom, besteht ein auf etwa 10% erh\u00f6htes Risiko. Das SGBS folgt einem X-chromosomal-rezessiven Erbgang. H\u00e4ufigste Ursache sind Mutationen GPC3-Gen in der Chromosomenregion Xq26. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr Glypican-3, ein extrazellul\u00e4res Heparansulfat-Proteoglykan, das sich haupts\u00e4chlich in Geweben mesodermalen Ursprungs findet, mit IGF2 (insulin-like growth factor 2) interagiert und dadurch dessen Signalkette beeinflusst. Nicht alle Patienten mit SGBS haben eine GPC3-Mutation, ein Hinweis, dass bei einigen Patienten die Ursache in anderen Genen liegen kann (genetische Heterogenit\u00e4t): Eine schwerere Variante des Syndroms (SGBS Typ 2) wurde in 1 Familie mit multiplen kraniofazialen, skeletalen und viszeralen Fehlbildungen (aber keine Herzfehler), Hydrops fetalis und fr\u00fcher Letalit\u00e4t beschrieben. In dieser Familie bestand Kopplung an die Chromosomenregion Xp22. F\u00fcr die Diagnose des SGBS gibt es keinen Labortest. Verlauf und klinische Symptome, manchmal auch die Familienanamnese, lassen an die Diagnose denken. Der Nachweis einer GPC3-Mutation best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose, fehlender Nachweis einer Mutation schlie\u00dft die Diagnose aber nicht aus. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom (BWS), Weaver-Syndrom, Perlman-Syndrom und Sotos-Syndrom ausgeschlossen werden. Die T\u00f6chter von betroffenen M\u00e4nnern sind alle heterozygot, S\u00f6hne erben die Mutation nicht. Die H\u00e4fte der S\u00f6hne einer heterozygoten Frau haben ein SGBS, die H\u00e4lfte der T\u00f6chter ist heterozygot. Heterozygote Frauen k\u00f6nnen leichte k\u00f6rperliche Ver\u00e4nderungen im Sinne eines SGBS aufweisen. Wenn bei einem m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten die Mutation gefunden wurde, erm\u00f6glicht molekulare Analyse die Erkennung der heterozygoten Frauen in der Familie. Bei bekannter Mutation des Index-Patienten ist mit molekularer Analyse auch eine fr\u00fche vorgeburtliche Diagnose m\u00f6glich. Bei fehlender Familienanamnese kann die Diagnose vor der Geburt mit Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall nur vermutet werden. Die angeborenen Fehlbildungen erfordern z.T. eine chirurgische Intervention. Die Mortalit\u00e4t in der Perinatal- und S\u00e4uglingszeit ist, offenbar als Folge der Herzbeteiligung (z.B. Reizleitungsst\u00f6rungen), hoch. Kardiale Kontrollen sind daher wichtig. Zum Tumor-Screening beim SGBS geh\u00f6ren Ultraschall-Untersuchung des Abdomens, Harnanalyse und Suche nach biochemischen Markern embryonaler Tumoren. Sprachprobleme und Lernbehinderungen erfordern p\u00e4dagogische Begleitung.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare X-linked multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by pre- and postnatal overgrowth, distinctive craniofacial features, variable congenital malformations, organomegaly and an increased tumor risk.", "synonyms": "DGSX, Golabi-Rosen syndrome, SDYS, SGBS, SGBS1, Simpson dysmorphia syndrome, Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome type 1, X-linked dysplasia gigantism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.3", "omim": "312870", "umls": "C0796154", "mesh": "C537340", "gard": "7649", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence is unknown. Approximately 250 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome (SGBS) manifests a broad clinical picture with varying degrees of severity. It is characterized by pre- and postnatal overgrowth with macrosomia, distinctive craniofacial features (macrocephaly with coarse face, macroglossia, hypertelorism, dental malocclusion, palatal abnormalities), supernumerary nipples, congenital heart defects and arrhythmias, vertebral segmental defects, abdominal visceromegaly (renal dysplasia/nephromegaly, splenomegaly and hepatomegaly), diaphragmatic hernia, diastasis recti/umbilical hernia, limb anomalies (polydactyly/brachydactyly of the hands, cutaneous syndactyly, nail hypoplasia), and genital involvement (cryptorchidism, hypospadias). Involvement of central nervous system presents with variable degrees of intellectual disability, motor delay and speech delay. Patients with SGBS are at increased risk for embryonal tumors (Wilms tumor), hepatoblastoma, adrenal neuroblastoma, gonadoblastoma, hepatocellular carcinoma.", "etiology": "SGBS is due to loss-of-function mutations in the GPC3 gene (Xq26), encoding Glypican-3 (GPC3), a cell surface heparin sulfate proteoglycan which acts as a negative regulator of Hedgehog (Hh) signaling during development. Mutations in GPC3 result in the hyperactivation of Hh signaling, that ultimately leads to overgrowth and cancer.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical findings, family history, genetic testing for GPC3 mutations, and array comparative genomic hybridization (aCGH) analysis of genomic imbalance in Xq26. Imaging techniques help to detect skeletal anomalies and central nervous system involvement. Screening for embryonic tumors is performed by imaging (serial abdominal ultrasonogram and chest X rays), serial measurement of tumor markers and catecholamine metabolites in urine. Kidney function is monitored in cases of kidney involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis include overgrowth syndromes such as Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome and Sotos syndrome, and additional disorders such as fragile X syndrome, Bannayan-Zonana syndrome, PTEN hamartoma tumor syndrome, Marshall syndrome, Nevo syndrome, mosaic trisomy 8 and Pallister-Killian syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis and/or pre-implantation genetic testing are possible for at-risk pregnancies when a mutation has previously been identified in the family. Prenatal ultrasound examination can detect disproportionate fetal overgrowth, while elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) levels may also be useful to suspect SGBS.", "genetic_counseling": "SGBS follows an X-linked recessive pattern of transmission. In the offspring of an affected male, daughters are heterozygous and sons are unaffected. For each pregnancy, a heterozygous female has a 25% risk of having an affected son and a 25% risk of having a carrier daughter (usually not affected or showing minimal clinical findings due to lyonization). SGBS may also result from de novo mutations (20-30% of cases).", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach with pediatric cardiologists, neurologists, orthopedics, and speech therapists. Congenital malformations may require surgery. Special attention should be paid to cardiac abnormalities that are responsible for the increased perinatal and infant mortality. Tumor management and follow-up should be performed.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on the severity of the disease; in the most severe cases, SGBS is life-threatening before birth or in infancy, whereas in milder cases patients often live into adulthood."}, {"name": "Sinding-Larsen-Johansson-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Osteochondrosis der Patella, Patellanekrose, aseptische, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "M92.4", "UMLS": "C0264096\u00a0 C1504517", "MedDRA": "10063585", "summary": "Die Sinding-Larsen-Johansson-Krankheit ist eine Form von Osteochondrose, mit gest\u00f6rter Anheftung der Patellarsehne an die Patella. Symptom ist eine empfindliche, \u00f6rtlich begrenzte Schwellung \u00fcber der Patella. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit tritt meist bei Adoleszenten auf, vor allem bei sporttreibenden m\u00e4nnlichen Jugendlichen. Eine Fragmentierung des Knochens im unteren Anteil der Patella ist m\u00f6glich. Ursache sind Kontusion oder Traktionstendinitis am proximalen Ansatz der Patellasehne, gefolgt von frischen Verkalkungen. Der Verlauf der Krankheit ist selbstbegrenzt und benigne. "}, {"name": "S\u00edndrome de microcefalia neonatal-hipoton\u00eda infantil-diplej\u00eda esp\u00e1stica-disartria-discapacidad intelectual", "sub_name": "Postnatale Microzephalie-infantile Hypotonie-spastische Diplegie-Dysarthrie-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by postnatal microcephaly, hypotonia during infancy followed in most cases by progressive spasticity mainly affecting the lower limbs, and spastic diplegia or paraplegia, intellectual disability, delayed or absent speech, and dysarthria. Seizures and mildly dysmorphic features have been described in some patients.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "616281"}, {"name": "Singh-Williams-McAlister-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Syndrom der Osteolyse von Talus, Patella und Skaphoid", "english": 0, "defenition": "Talo-patello-scaphoide Osteolyse ist eine \u00e4u\u00dferst seltene Form der prim\u00e4ren Osteolyse (s.dort), die bisher bei 2 Schwestern beschrieben wurde. Die Patienten haben eine spezifische bilaterale Osteolyse von Talus, Patella und Scaphoid mit periartikul\u00e4ren Schwellungen und Schmerzen. Dazu kommen ein kurzes Metacarpale IV (Brachydaktylie Typ E; s.dort) und chronische Synovitis. Wahrscheinlich wird die Krankheit autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "synonyms": "Singh-Williams-McAlister-Syndrom, Syndrom der Osteolyse von Sprungbein, Kniescheibe und Kahnbein, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "OMIM": "609655", "UMLS": "C1864784", "GARD": "10061"}, {"name": "Singleton-Merten-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Die Singleton-Merten-Dysplasie ist gekennzeichnet durch dysplastische Z\u00e4hne, fortschreitende Verkalkung der thorakalen Aorta, kalzifizierte Aortenstenose, Osteoporose und Ausweitung der Markh\u00f6hlen in den Handknochen. Das Syndrom wurde bei 4 nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beiderlei Geschlechts und in 1 Familie mit mehreren m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten beschrieben. Weitere Symptome sind generalisierte Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie und eine chronische psoriasiforme Dermatose. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Singleton-Merten dysplasia is characterized by dental dysplasia, progressive calcification of the thoracic aorta with stenosis, osteoporosis and expansion of the marrow cavities in hand bones. Additional features included generalized muscle weakness and atrophy, and chronic psoriasiform skin eruptions. It has been reported in four unrelated patients (male and female) and in a family with multiple affected members (male).", "synonyms": "Singleton-Merten syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "182250\u00a0 616298", "umls": "C0432254", "gard": "122"}, {"name": "Singleton-Merten-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Singleton-Merten-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Die Singleton-Merten-Dysplasie ist gekennzeichnet durch dysplastische Z\u00e4hne, fortschreitende Verkalkung der thorakalen Aorta, kalzifizierte Aortenstenose, Osteoporose und Ausweitung der Markh\u00f6hlen in den Handknochen. Das Syndrom wurde bei 4 nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beiderlei Geschlechts und in 1 Familie mit mehreren m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten beschrieben. Weitere Symptome sind generalisierte Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie und eine chronische psoriasiforme Dermatose. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Singleton-Merten dysplasia is characterized by dental dysplasia, progressive calcification of the thoracic aorta with stenosis, osteoporosis and expansion of the marrow cavities in hand bones. Additional features included generalized muscle weakness and atrophy, and chronic psoriasiform skin eruptions. It has been reported in four unrelated patients (male and female) and in a family with multiple affected members (male).", "synonyms": "Singleton-Merten syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "182250\u00a0 616298", "umls": "C0432254", "gard": "122"}, {"name": "Singultus, chronischer", "german_description": "Chronischer Singultus (Schluckauf) ist eine seltene Erkrankung (etwa 1 / 100.000) mit wiederholten inspiratorischen Kr\u00e4mpfen. Eine einzelne Attacke dauert 48 Stunden oder l\u00e4nger. Bei einigen Patienten h\u00e4lt sie Tage oder sogar Wochen an, bis es wieder zu einer Remission kommt. Viele Ursachen sind bekannt, die h\u00e4ufigste ist eine \u00d6sophagitis mit gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux. Kausale Therapien wirken am besten. So wird der Singultus bei gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux mit Antazida behandelt und mit Protonenpumpen-Inhibitoren, die in den meisten F\u00e4llen sehr wirksam sind. Der Reflux mu\u00df evtl. operativ behandelt werden. Immer ist eine aufmerksame Kontrolle des \u00d6sophagus anzuraten. Wenn der Singultus andere Ursachen hat, vor allem zentralnerv\u00f6se, dann scheint Baclofen das Mittel der Wahl zu sein. Im Idealfall sollte die Behandlung durch ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team erfolgen, das Erfahrungen mit komplexen Thorax- und Nerven-Krankheiten hat. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Chronic hiccup is a rare movement disorder characterized by involuntary spasmodic contractions of the inspiratory muscles synchronized with larynx closure lasting for more than 48 hours.", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G25.3", "gard": "6657", "epidemiology": "The disorder is thought to affect approximately 1/100,000 individuals. Chronic hiccup affect males more often than females.", "clinical_description": "The involuntary spasmodic contractions of the inspiratory muscles followed by the rapid closure of the vocal cords known as hiccups usually last for no more than a few minutes or at most a few hours with spontaneous resolution, and can affect people of any age. In rare pathological cases, hiccups may last for more than two days (chronic /persistent hiccup). Recurrent episodes over long periods are also called chronic hiccup. Clinical repercussions of these episodes may include dehydration, weight loss and malnutrition due to difficulty eating, sleep disorders, depression and exhaustion.", "etiology": "The hiccup is poorly understood. According to experimental data it is probably a coordinated ventilatory movement mixing branchial ventilation, suction and deglutition components. Chronic hiccup is mainly an esophageal and gastric disorder. Other causes may include fever, brain lesions/tumors, cardiovascular disorders (stroke, myocardial infarction), renal failure, metabolic imbalance, peripheral nerve stimulation, or other injuries, drugs (chemotherapy, benzodiazepines, corticosteroids, barbiturates, morphine, and anesthetics), and alcohol. Other triggers include placement of medical instruments, certain foods and beverages, spices and tobacco. Cases also sometimes develop in a context of surgery (pleural, peritoneal or intracranial).", "diagnostic_methods": "Clinical diagnosis is usually straightforward given the nature of the involuntary spasms. Imaging or laboratory tests to identify the underlying cause should focus primarily on the esophagus.", "differential_diagnosis": "Hiccups are extremely specific and can rarely be mistaken for another condition.", "management_and_treatment": "Many anecdotal treatments have been described with varying success. Management should ideally focus on identifying and treating the underlying cause, especially esophageal. No specific treatments have proven efficacy in the absence of controlled studies. Pharmacological approaches that have been attempted in cases where no gastroesophageal treatment works include baclofen, chlorpromazine, carbamazepine, haloperidol, metoclopramide, gabapentin, serotoninergic agonists, prokinetics, lidocaine, nifedipine, carvedilol and marijuana. Alternative therapy includes hypnosis and acupuncture. Phrenic nerve blockade is of little benefit since it yields only partial relief at the expense of respiratory insufficiency. Long-term treatment of the frequent esophageal cause can be very useful.", "prognosis": "Persistent hiccups can reduce quality of life. Very long intractable disease may be debilitating."}, {"name": "SINO-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Intelligenzminderung-Nystagmus-Adipositas-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by the association of congenital spastic paraplegia with global developmental delay and intellectual disability, ophthalmologic abnormalities (including nystagmus, reduced visual acuity, or hypermetropia), and obesity. Additional manifestations are brachyplagiocephaly and dysmorphic facial features. Brain imaging may show dilated ventricles, abnormal myelination, and mild generalized atrophy. Homozygous loss-of-function variants of KIDINS220 associated with a fetal lethal phenotype with ventriculomegaly and limb contractures have been reported.", "synonyms": "SINO syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "617296"}, {"name": "Sinushistiozytose mit massiver Lymphadenopathie", "sub_name": "Rosa\u00ef-Dorfman-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Rosa\u00ef-Dorfman-Krankheit ist eine seltene benigne Nicht-Langerhanszell-Histiozytose mit der Entwicklung gro\u00dfer schmerzloser histiozyt\u00e4rer Tumoren in den Lymphknoten vor allem der Halsregion. Au\u00dfer den Lymphknoten k\u00f6nnen auch andere Bereiche beteiligt sein: Haut, Atemwege, Knochen, Urogenitalsystem, Weichteile, Mundh\u00f6hle und Zentralnervensystem. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Fieber, Mattigkeit, Nasenbluten, Nachtschwei\u00df, Gewichtsverlust, Leukozytose, erh\u00f6hte Blutsenkung und Hyper-Gammaglobulin\u00e4mie.", "synonyms": "Destombes-Rosa\u00ef-Dorfman-Krankheit, Rosa\u00ef-Dorfman-Destombes-Krankheit, SHML, Sinushistiozytose mit massiver Lymphadenopathie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D76.3", "GARD": "7588", "MedDRA": "10063397"}, {"name": "Sinusknoten-Dysfunktion und Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sinoatrial node dysfunction and deafness is a rare genetic disease characterized by congenital severe to profound deafness with no evidence of vestibular dysfunction, associated with sinoatrial node dysfunction with pronounced bradycardia and increased variability of heart rate at rest and episodic syncopes that may be triggered by enhanced physical activity and stress.", "synonyms": "Sinoatrial node dysfunction and hearing loss, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "H91.8", "omim": "614896"}, {"name": "Sinusknotensyndrom", "sub_name": "Sick-Sinus-Syndrom, famili\u00e4res", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Famili\u00e4re Sick-Sinus-Syndrom ist eine seltene Herzrhythmusst\u00f6rung meist \u00e4lterer Menschen. Charakteristische elektrokardiographische Befunde sind Sinusbradykardie, Vorhofflimmern, Vorhoftachykardie-Sinusarrest oder sino-atrialer Block. Klinische Symptome sind Synkope, Schwindel, Palpitationen, Ersch\u00f6pfung oder sogar Herzinsuffizienz. Ursache ist eine Fehlfunktion des kardialen Reizleitungssystems, m\u00f6glicherweise als Folge degenerativer Fibrose des Knotengewebes bei \u00e4lteren oder als Folge einer Herzkrankheit bei j\u00fcngeren Patienten.", "synonyms": "Famili\u00e4re Sinusknotendysfunktion, Sinusknotensyndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "I49.5", "OMIM": "163800\u00a0 182190\u00a0 608567\u00a0 614090", "UMLS": "C0037052", "MeSH": "D012804", "MedDRA": "10040639"}, {"name": "Sinusoidales Obstruktionssyndrom", "sub_name": "Lebervenen-Verschlusskrankheit", "german_description": "Die Lebervenen-Verschlusskrankheit (hepatische VOD) resultiert aus einer toxischen Sch\u00e4digung der Lebersinusoide mit nachfolgender Obstruktion der kleinen Lebervenen. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, die Krankheit ist selten. Es wurden aber Endemiegebiete gefunden, in denen eine Assoziation der Krankheit mit dem Konsum bestimmter Tees aus Pflanzen mit Pyrrolizidinalkaloiden besteht. Epidemien mit mehreren Hundert Erkrankten sind m\u00f6glich, wenn die Ernte mit solchen Pflanzen kontaminiert ist. In Industriel\u00e4ndern ist die hepatische VOD haupts\u00e4chlich mit der Vorbereitung zur Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen assoziiert: Abh\u00e4ngig vom Protokoll der Vorbereitung haben 10-60% der transplantierten Patienten eine hepatische VOD. Die Krankheit kann auch nach Chemo- oder Strahlentherapie auftreten. Sowohl Kinder als auch Erwachsene sind betroffen. Das klinische Bild ist gekennzeichnet durch schmerzhafte Hepatomegalie, Ikterus und Fl\u00fcssigkeitsretention, erkennbar an Gewichtszunahme, \u00d6demen und Aszites. Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen und hepatische Enzephalopathie als Zeichen einer Leberinsuffizienz sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome. H\u00e4ufig ist die Nierenfunktion eingeschr\u00e4nkt. In schweren F\u00e4llen sind Multiorganversagen und schwere bakterielle Infektionen m\u00f6glich. Die prim\u00e4re Ursache der Krankheit scheint eine L\u00e4sion der Endothelzellen in den Lebersinusoiden zu sein. Sie f\u00fchrt zu nicht-thrombotischen Verschl\u00fcssen der Lebervenen mit konzentrischen subendothelialen Wandverdickungen durch \u00d6dem und evtl. Fibrose. Die Diagnose basiert auf der Erkennung der klinischen Symptome (Hepatomegalie, Ikterus, Gewichtszunahme) und deren Assoziation mit einer m\u00f6glichen Ursache der hepatischen VOD (Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen, Chemotherapie, Exposition mit Pyrrolizidinalkaloiden) und dem gleichzeitigem Ausschluss anderer Ursachen von Leberkrankheiten. Oft ist eine Leberbiopsie indiziert. Die Diagnose kann durch bildgebende Verfahren, vor allem durch Doppler-Sonographie der Leber, best\u00e4tigtwerden. Differentialdiagnosen sind akute oder chronische Leberkrankheiten mit anderen Ursachen und im Fall einer Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen eine Graft-versus-Host-Reaktion und schwere Infektionen. Eine spezifische Therapie gibt es nicht. Auf der Basis begrenzter Studien (historische Vergleiche) und weil Nebenwirkungen selten sind, wird h\u00e4ufig Defibrotid angewendet. Oft ist eine pr\u00e4ventive Therapie mit Heparin indiziert, aber deren Wirksamkeit ist umstritten. Bei der Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen besteht die wichtigste Prophylaxe in der Anwendung von Konditionierungsverfahren mit geringerer Hepatotoxizit\u00e4t. Schweregrad und Verlauf der Krankheit sind von Patient zu Patient verschieden. In schweren F\u00e4llen ist die Prognose ung\u00fcnstig, wegen Multiorganversagen betr\u00e4gt die Mortalit\u00e4t dann bis zu 90%.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vascular liver disease characterized by toxic injury to the hepatic sinusoidal capillaries that leads to obstruction of the small hepatic veins and sinusoids. Clinical manifestations include painful hepatomegaly, jaundice, and fluid retention that manifests by weight gain, edemas, and ascites.", "synonyms": "Sinusoidal obstruction syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "K76.5", "umls": "C0019156", "mesh": "D006504", "meddra": "10047216", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is difficult to estimate as the frequency varies according to the underlying cause. The incidence due to pyrrolizidine alkaloid plant exposure is unknown, although in Ethiopia it has been estimated at 29.6/mill/year. In addition, epidemics may occur due to harvest contamination with these plants. Hepatic veno-occlusive disease (HVOD) develops in between 0. 3- 2.3% of patients who receive liver transplant; in up to 15% of those treated with gemtuzumab ozogamicin (GO); and in 2-15% of those who receive hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT), rising to 40% in patients with a history of GO treatment.", "clinical_description": "It affects children and adults. The clinical picture is characterized by painful hepatomegaly, jaundice, and fluid retention that manifests by weight gain, edemas, and ascites. Hepatic insufficiency manifesting as jaundice, and hepatic encephalopathy may occur. Functional renal insufficiency is common. In severe cases, multiple organ failure or severe bacterial infections may occur. In developed countries, the disease is mainly associated with the conditioning regimen for HSCT, with currently less than 10% of transplant patients (depending on the conditioning regimen protocol used) developing HVOD. HVOD may also occur after chemotherapy or radiation therapy.", "etiology": "Hepatic sinusoidal endothelial cell lesions appear to be the primary cause of the disease, leading to non-thrombotic occlusion of hepatic veins with concentric subendothelial thickening associated with edema and eventually fibrosis.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on recognition of the clinical manifestations (hepatomegaly, jaundice, and weight gain) and their association with a potential cause of HVOD (HSCT or chemotherapy, exposure to pyrrolizidine alkaloids), together with exclusion of other causes of liver disease. Liver biopsy is often indicated, and recent data support its indication. Imaging studies, particularly hepatic Doppler-ultrasonography, may help to confirm the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other causes of acute or chronic liver disease, and, in the case of HSCT, graft-versus-host disease and severe infections.", "management_and_treatment": "No specific treatment is available. Defibrotide is recommended for severe sinusoidal obstruction syndrome, mainly on the basis of limited studies (historic comparisons) and because side effects are uncommon. Management is with supportive care (nutritional support, intensive care unit if needed for respiratory or renal support), renal function monitoring, and avoidance of other liver drug toxicity. Preventive treatment with ursodeoxycholic acid is indicated from beginning of conditioning to 90 days post-transplantation. In case of HSCT, the risk of disease is managed prophylactically by the characterization of risk factors prior to transplantation. Liver transplantation should be discussed in patients with excellent hematologic prognosis.", "prognosis": "Severity and course of the disease varies between patients. In severe cases, the prognosis is poor with a high mortality rate (up to 90%) due to multiple organ failure."}, {"name": "Sinus-Valsalva-Aneurysma, kongenitales", "german_description": "Das angeborene Sinus-Valsalva-Aneurysma (SVA) ist eine seltene Anomalie und die seltenste Form von Aortenaneurysma. Sekund\u00e4re Ursachen sind Arteriosklerose, Lues, zystische Media-Nekrose oder infekti\u00f6se Endokarditis. Im rechten Sinus entstehen 66% der Aneurysmen, in den nicht-koronaren Sinus 25%, und im linken Koronar-Sinus die restlichen 9%. Das SVA resultiert aus einer umschriebenen Bindegewebsdystrophie in den Sinus, die zu einer Diskontinuit\u00e4t zwischen der aortalen Media und dem bindegewebigen Ring der Aortenklappe f\u00fchrt. Solange das SVA nicht rupturiert, sind die Patienten gew\u00f6hnlich symptomlos. Die Diagnose erfolgt oft erst bei einer routinem\u00e4\u00dfigen Echokardiographie. Andere best\u00e4tigende Verfahren sind MRI, CT, Aorto-Arteriographie und Herzkatheter. Komplikationen sind abh\u00e4ngig von der Gr\u00f6\u00dfe des Aneurysmas. Dieses w\u00e4chst nur langsam, weshalb es in der Kindheit kaum Symptome macht. Intakte Aneurysmen k\u00f6nnen den rechten Ausflu\u00dftrakt obstruieren, durch Verziehung der Aortenklappe zu Aorten-Regurgitation f\u00fchren, oder auch die linke Koronararterie und das Reizleitungssystem komprimieren. Eine allm\u00e4hliche Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung des Aneurysmas f\u00fchrt zur Ruptur mit \u00d6ffnung in die Herzkammern, die die Aortenwurzel umgeben. Die Ruptur erfolgt spontan und selten vor dem 20. Lebensjahr. Die rechten Sinus-Aneurysmen rupturieren in den rechten Vorhof oder den rechten Ventrikel., diejenigen der nicht-koronaren Sinus nur in den rechten Vorhof. Beide Arten von Rupturen f\u00fchren zu einem Links-Rechts-Shunt. Die seltene Ruptur von linken Sinus-Aneurysmen erfolgt in den linken Vorhof, in den linken Ventrikel oder in die Perikardh\u00f6hle. Deshalb entsteht kein Links-Rechts-Shunt. Nichtrupturierte Aneurysmen sollten mit Bedacht operiert werden. Die Klinik-Mortalit\u00e4t liegt unter 5%, und die Langzeit-Resultate sind sehr gut, wenn die Aortenklappen unbesch\u00e4digt bleiben. Bei rupturiertem Aneurysma ist eine schnelle chirurgische Korrektur dringend geraten. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sinus of Valsalva aneurysm (SVA) is a rare congenital heart malformation of one or more of the aortic sinuses, consisting of a dilation that when unruptured is usually asymptomatic but when ruptured presents with progressive exertional dyspnea, fatigue, chest pain and that can lead to congestive heart failure if left untreated.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "Q25.4", "gard": "670"}, {"name": "Sinus-venosus-Defekt", "sub_name": "Atriumseptumdefekt, Sinus venosus Typ", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "ASD vom Sinus-venosus-Typ, Sinus-venosus-Defekt, Vorhofseptumdefekt vom Sinus-venosus-Typ, ", "ICD-10": "Q21.1", "UMLS": "C0344730", "MeSH": "C548009", "GARD": "10696", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Interatriale Kommunikation"}, {"name": "Sipple-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Multiple endokrine Neoplasie Typ 2A", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der MEN2A betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:40.000 und macht 70-80 % aller MEN2-Syndrome aus.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2 (MEN2) syndrome characterized by medullary thyroid carcinoma in association with pheochromocytoma (one or both adrenal glands can be affected) and/or primary hyperparathyroidism (caused by parathyroid adenoma). Onset is typically later than in MEN2B, before 35 years of age. Diarrhea is the most frequent systemic symptom. Patients can develop Hirschsprung disease and, less frequently, cutaneous lichen amyloidosis or excessive production of adrenocorticotropic hormone.", "synonyms": "MEN2A, PTC syndrome, Sipple syndrome, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "D44.8", "omim": "171400", "umls": "C0025268", "mesh": "D018813", "gard": "4881"}, {"name": "Sirenomelie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, lethal, congenital anomaly that may represent the most severe form of caudal dysgenesia and characterized by fusion of the lower limbs (mermaid-like) always associated with severe genitourinary and gastrointestinal anomalies.Furthermore, there is wide phenotipical variability in the musculoskeletal, central nervous system, cardiopulmonary, anomalies present. Pelvic, sacral and spinal defects , internal and external genitalia defects, renal agenesis, absent bladder, rectal/anal atresia are commonly described. Most cases are stillborn or die during, or shortly after, birth. Sirenomelia can be classified on the basis of limb malformations phenotypes. Due to the similarity, the distinction between sirenomelia and caudal regression syndrome, familial caudal dysgenesis and VACTERL is debated.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "600145", "umls": "C0037205", "mesh": "C538595", "gard": "7652", "meddra": "10049216"}, {"name": "Sitosterol\u00e4mie", "german_description": "Symptome sind Xanthome, vorzeitige Koronarsklerose, h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie und/oder Leberschaden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sitosterolemia is a rare autosomal recessive sterol storage disease characterized by the accumulation of phytosterols in the blood and tissues. Clinical manifestations include xanthomas, arthralgia and premature atherosclerosis. Hematological manifestations include hemolytic anemia with stomatocytosis and macrothrombocytopenia. The disease is caused by homozygous or compound heterozygous mutations in ABCG5 (2p21) and ABCG8 (2p21) genes.", "synonyms": "Phytosterolemia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "E78.0", "omim": "210250\u00a0 618666", "umls": "C0342907", "mesh": "C537345", "gard": "7653", "meddra": "10063985"}, {"name": "Situs ambiguus", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by a partial mirror-image transposition of intra-thoracic and/or intra-abdominal organs across the left-right axis of the body. Intra-organ variations and other malformations, such as ciliary motricity anomalies (e.g. Kartagener syndrome), biliary atresia and cardiac defects, are frequently associated. Left (polysplenia syndrome) or right (asplenia syndrome) isomerism are usually observed.", "synonyms": "Incomplete situs inversus, Partial situs inversus, Situs ambiguous, ", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q89.3", "umls": "C0266642\u00a0 C1167664", "meddra": "10059119"}, {"name": "Situs inversus", "sub_name": "Situs inversus totalis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by total mirror-image transposition of both thoracic and abdominal viscera across the left-right axis of the body. Congenital abnormalities, such as primary ciliary dyskinesia, Kartagener type, polysplenia syndrome, biliary atresia, congenital heart disease, and midgut malrotation, as well as vascular anomalies (e.g. absence of retrohepatic inferior vena cava, preduodenal portal vein, aberrant hepatic arterial anatomy) and malignancy, are frequently associated.", "synonyms": "Complete situs inversus, Complete situs inversus viscerum, Situs inversus, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q89.3", "umls": "C0037221", "gard": "4883"}, {"name": "Situs inversus, inkompletter", "sub_name": "Situs ambiguus", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by a partial mirror-image transposition of intra-thoracic and/or intra-abdominal organs across the left-right axis of the body. Intra-organ variations and other malformations, such as ciliary motricity anomalies (e.g. Kartagener syndrome), biliary atresia and cardiac defects, are frequently associated. Left (polysplenia syndrome) or right (asplenia syndrome) isomerism are usually observed.", "synonyms": "Incomplete situs inversus, Partial situs inversus, Situs ambiguous, ", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q89.3", "umls": "C0266642\u00a0 C1167664", "meddra": "10059119"}, {"name": "Situs inversus, kompletter", "sub_name": "Situs inversus totalis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by total mirror-image transposition of both thoracic and abdominal viscera across the left-right axis of the body. Congenital abnormalities, such as primary ciliary dyskinesia, Kartagener type, polysplenia syndrome, biliary atresia, congenital heart disease, and midgut malrotation, as well as vascular anomalies (e.g. absence of retrohepatic inferior vena cava, preduodenal portal vein, aberrant hepatic arterial anatomy) and malignancy, are frequently associated.", "synonyms": "Complete situs inversus, Complete situs inversus viscerum, Situs inversus, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q89.3", "umls": "C0037221", "gard": "4883"}, {"name": "Situs inversus, partieller", "sub_name": "Situs ambiguus", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by a partial mirror-image transposition of intra-thoracic and/or intra-abdominal organs across the left-right axis of the body. Intra-organ variations and other malformations, such as ciliary motricity anomalies (e.g. Kartagener syndrome), biliary atresia and cardiac defects, are frequently associated. Left (polysplenia syndrome) or right (asplenia syndrome) isomerism are usually observed.", "synonyms": "Incomplete situs inversus, Partial situs inversus, Situs ambiguous, ", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q89.3", "umls": "C0266642\u00a0 C1167664", "meddra": "10059119"}, {"name": "Situs inversus totalis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by total mirror-image transposition of both thoracic and abdominal viscera across the left-right axis of the body. Congenital abnormalities, such as primary ciliary dyskinesia, Kartagener type, polysplenia syndrome, biliary atresia, congenital heart disease, and midgut malrotation, as well as vascular anomalies (e.g. absence of retrohepatic inferior vena cava, preduodenal portal vein, aberrant hepatic arterial anatomy) and malignancy, are frequently associated.", "synonyms": "Complete situs inversus, Complete situs inversus viscerum, Situs inversus, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q89.3", "umls": "C0037221", "gard": "4883"}, {"name": "Situs inversus viscerum, kompletter", "sub_name": "Situs inversus totalis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by total mirror-image transposition of both thoracic and abdominal viscera across the left-right axis of the body. Congenital abnormalities, such as primary ciliary dyskinesia, Kartagener type, polysplenia syndrome, biliary atresia, congenital heart disease, and midgut malrotation, as well as vascular anomalies (e.g. absence of retrohepatic inferior vena cava, preduodenal portal vein, aberrant hepatic arterial anatomy) and malignancy, are frequently associated.", "synonyms": "Complete situs inversus, Complete situs inversus viscerum, Situs inversus, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q89.3", "umls": "C0037221", "gard": "4883"}, {"name": "SIX2-assoziierte FND", "sub_name": "SIX2-assoziierte frontonasale Dysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare frontonasal dysplasia characterized by a craniofacial phenotype comprising frontal bossing with high anterior hairline, ptosis, hypertelorism, epicanthus inversus, flat nasal bridge, and broad nasal tip. Large anterior fontanelle, sagittal synostosis, and cranial base anomalies have also been described.", "synonyms": "SIX2-related FND, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal"}, {"name": "SIX2-assoziierte frontonasale Dysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare frontonasal dysplasia characterized by a craniofacial phenotype comprising frontal bossing with high anterior hairline, ptosis, hypertelorism, epicanthus inversus, flat nasal bridge, and broad nasal tip. Large anterior fontanelle, sagittal synostosis, and cranial base anomalies have also been described.", "synonyms": "SIX2-related FND, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal"}, {"name": "sJIA\u00a0", "sub_name": "Arthritis, idiopathische juvenile, systemische", "german_description": "Die juvenile idiopathische Arthritis mit systemischem Beginn ist gekennzeichnet durch schwere Begleitsymptome (Fieber, kutane Effloreszenzen) und ein Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis um 1. Sie macht 10-11% der F\u00e4lle von juveniler idiopathischer Arthritis (JIA) aus. Die Pr\u00e4valenz wurde auf 1-10/30.000 Kinder gesch\u00e4tzt, die Jahres-Inzidenz auf 1-20/900.000 Kinder. Die Krankheit beginnt in der Regel in einem Alter zwischen 3 und 5 Jahren. Zu den Symptomen geh\u00f6rt Fieber, das \u00fcber den gesamten Tages- und Nachtverlauf oszilliert, mit Spitzentemperaturen um und \u00fcber 39\u00b0C. Diese Fieberspitzen sind assoziiert mit passageren kutanen Effloreszenzen und und diffusen erythemat\u00f6sen oder urtikariaartigen L\u00e4sionen. Eine Arthritis ist Voraussetzung f\u00fcr die Diagnose, obwohl sie auch erst sp\u00e4ter im Verlauf der Krankheit auftreten kann. Die Zahl der betroffenen Gelenke ist unterschiedlich (Mono-, Oligo- oder Polyarthritis). In fast symmetrischer Anordnung sind sowohl kleine als auch gro\u00dfe Gelenke betroffen. Diese charakteristische diagnostische Trias kann mit vergr\u00f6\u00dferten Lymphknoten und Hepatosplenomegalie erweitert sein. M\u00f6glich sind auch innere Komplikationen (Perikarditis, Pleuraerguss, oder ser\u00f6se Peritonitis mit Leibschmerzen). Spezifische Laborparameter sind nicht bekannt, aber die Entz\u00fcndung ist schwer, mit starkem Anstieg des Ferritinspiegels bei erniedrigtem Anteil des glykosylierten Ferritins. Pathogenetische Mechanismen und ausl\u00f6sende Faktoren sind noch nicht bekannt, aber die Krankheit kann deutlich von anderen Formen der JIA unterschieden werden. Wahrscheinlich handelt es sich eher um eine Autoimmun-Krankheit als um ein autoentz\u00fcndliches Geschehen (wie periodisches Fieber und CINCA/NOMID). Die diagnostischen Kriterien wurden auf dem internationalen Meeting von 2001 in Edmonton erarbeitet. Danach ist die klinische Trias von t\u00e4glichem Fieber (\u00fcber mehr als 2 Wochen), Arthritis und passageren kutanen Effloreszenzen das wichtigste diagnostische Kriterium. Wenn aber Hauteffloreszenzen fehlen, k\u00f6nnen auch Lymphadenopathie, Hepatosplenomegalie oder ser\u00f6se Erg\u00fcsse die Diagnose sichern. Ausschlusskriterien sind: Patient mit systemischer Arthritis oder Psoriasis, Psoriasis bei einem Elternteil oder Geschwister, ein HLA-B27-positiver m\u00e4nnlicher Patient mit Beginn der Arthritis nach dem 6. Lebensjahr, sowie der Nachweis von IgM-Rheumafaktoren in zwei Proben mit dreimonatigem Abstand. Weitere Ausschlusskriterien sind: Ankylosierende Spondylitis, Arthritis mit Enthesitis, Sakroiliitis mit entz\u00fcndlicher Enteropathie, akute anteriore Uveitis beim Patienten oder eines dieser Zeichen bei einem Elternteil oder Geschwister. Differentialdiagnostisch zu erw\u00e4gen sind Fieber in Verbindung mit Infektionen, Bindegewebskrankheiten (besonders Lupus), akute Leuk\u00e4mie und andere autoinflammatorische Erkrankungen. Die Behandlung sollte in einem spezialisierten Zentrum erfolgen. Therapie der ersten Wahl sind hochdosiertes Aspirin oder nichtsteroidale Antirheumatika (NSAIDs). Bei Therapieresistenz \u00fcber 2-6 Wochen sollten hochdosiert Kortikoide gegeben werden. Krankheitsmodifizierende antirheumatische Medikamente (Methotrexat, Biotherapeutika) k\u00f6nnen bei Kortikoidresistenz empfohlen werden, obwohl deren Wirksamkeit von Fall zu Fall verschieden ist. Andere Medikamente f\u00fcr kortikoidresistente Patienten (Thalidomid, Interleukin-1-Rezeptor-Antagonisten (Anakinra) und monoklonale Anti-Interleukin-6-Antik\u00f6rper (MRA)) sind verf\u00fcgbar oder werden z.Zt. f\u00fcr diese Anwendung evaluiert. In einigen F\u00e4llen k\u00f6nnen intraartikul\u00e4re Injektionen empfohlen werden. In etwa der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle bilden sich die Symptome vor Erreichen des Erwachsenenalters zur\u00fcck. In den \u00fcbrigen F\u00e4llen besteht die Arthritis, mit oder ohne Fieber und Hautsymptome, weiter. Schwere Folgest\u00f6rungen bestehen in 20% der F\u00e4lle: Verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum, Knochen- und Knorpelerosionen mit funktionellen Einschr\u00e4nkungen und das Risiko einer Osteopenie.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare pediatric rheumatological disease characterized by the variable occurrence of chronic arthritis, intermittently high spiking fever, maculopapular rash during fever episodes, hepatomegaly and/or splenomegaly, lymphadenopathy, and serositis.", "synonyms": "Still disease, Systemic-onset JIA, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "M08.2", "omim": "604302\u00a0 618795", "umls": "C0087031\u00a0 C1384600", "gard": "10966", "epidemiology": "Juvenile idiopathic arthritis (JIA) is one of the most common pediatric chronic diseases, with a yearly incidence between 1.6 and 23 new cases per 100,000 children. Systemic-onset JIA accounts for roughly 10-20% of all JIA patients, with incidence estimated at 1/166,000 and prevalence at 1/32,000 in the prediatric population. Frequency is higher in some countries; for example in parts of Asia, sytemic-onset JIA may account for up to 30-40% of all JIA cases.", "clinical_description": "Onset usually occurs between 3 and 5 years of age. The clinical signs include fever with oscillating temperatures over a 24-hour period and peaks of over 39\u00b0C or more. The fever peaks are associated with the transient occurrence of an evanescent macular rash. Any joint, small or large, may be affected at disease onset, and involvement is nearly symmetrical and may be oligo- or polyarticular. Arthritis tends to increase in severity over time, and thus may not appear until later in the disease course. The course of the disease varies between individuals, ranging from a monocyclic disease course, to recurrent predominantly systemic disease course, to a progressive polyarthritis that could lead to severe and destructive joint disease.", "etiology": "Whilst the underlying mechanisms and triggering factors are not fully understood, IL-1 and IL-6 play a major role in the pathogenesis of the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and biological findings in a child under the age of 16 presenting with fever for at least 3 consecutive days and 2 major criteria (arthritis and evanescent rash) or 1 major and 2 minor criteria ((1) generalized lymph node enlargement and or hepatomegaly or splenomegaly (2) serositis (3) arthralgias lasting 2 weeks or longer (4) leukocytosis > 15.000/mm3 with neutrophilia) A confirmed diagnosis requires exclusion of other causes of the symptoms.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses is extensive and includes bacterial infections (including occult bacterial infection, brucellosis, Lyme disease, cat scratch disease, tuberculosis, and infectious mononucleosis), malaria, malignancies (such as leukemia, lymphoma, and neuroblastoma), viral infections, hereditary recurrent fever syndromes, other inflammatory diseases (such as systemic lupus erythematosus, systemic vasculitis, Kawasaki disease, Beh\u00e7et disease, inflammatory bowel disease, Sweet syndrome, PFAPA, Takayasu syndrome, Castleman syndrome, rheumatic fever, and polyarteritis nodosa), connective tissue diseases, and periodic fever syndromes.", "management_and_treatment": "Management by a specialized multidisciplinary team is required. Treatment is typically first with non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) and, if the inflammation is not controlled, followed by high dose corticosteroids. Treatment with cytokine inhibitors (anakinra, canakinumab, and tocilizumab) has shown to be highly effective. Furthermore, these drugs can help mitigate damage caused by the inflammatory process. Generally, complications such as macrophage activation syndrome, limitations in functional outcome by arthritis and long-term damage from chronic inflammation continue to be a major issue in patients' care, but have decreased since the use of biological treatment.", "prognosis": "The disease course is long with major impact on quality of life. The risk of complications due to the illness or medication has been significantly reduced by the early use of biological treatment. Currently, osteopenia and osteoporosis, growth impairment, erosive arthritis, and secondary or reactive amyloidosis have almost disappeared. Macrophage activation syndrome is little influenced by recent therapeutic strategies and requires rapid care in the intensive care unit."}, {"name": "Sj\u00f6gren-Gougerot-Syndrom, prim\u00e4res", "sub_name": "Sj\u00f6gren-Syndrom, prim\u00e4res", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare systemic autoimmune disease characterized by exocrine gland dysfunction, resulting predominately in keratoconjunctivitis sicca and xerostomia, but also affecting exocrine glands of the skin, as well as respiratory, urogenital, and digestive tract. Extraglandular manifestations include arthritis, interstitial lung disease, renal disease, and peripheral neuropathy. The disease is accompanied by a substantially increased risk to develop B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma, especially MALT (mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue) lymphoma.", "synonyms": "Primary Sj\u00f6gren-Gougerot syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "M35.0", "omim": "270150"}, {"name": "Sj\u00f6gren-Larsson-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Sj\u00f6gren-Larsson-Syndrom (SLS) ist eine neurokutane Erkrankung. Ihre Ursache ist ein angeborener Defekt im Fettstoffwechsel. Charakteristische Symptome sind kongenitale Ichthyose, intellektuelles Defizit und spastische Parese. Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird weltweit auf 1:250.000 gesch\u00e4tzt, durch einen Gr\u00fcndereffekt ist das Syndrom in Nordschweden h\u00e4ufiger. Die Symptome entwickeln sich pr\u00e4natal und im Neugeborenenalter. Bei Geburt besteht in der Regel eine leichte Hyperkeratose, die sich zu einer generalisierten Ichthyose fortentwickelt, besonders ausgepr\u00e4gt in den Beugen, im Nacken, sowie an Stamm und Extremit\u00e4ten. Anders als bei anderen Ichthyosen besteht ausgepr\u00e4gter Juckreiz. Oft haben die Patienten bei Geburt eine leichte erythemat\u00f6se Dermatitis, die mit zunehmendem Alter zur\u00fcckgeht. Neurologische Symptome treten im ersten und zweiten Lebensjahr auf: Wegen spastischer Diplegie, seltener wegen spastischer Tetraplegie werden die motorischen Meilensteine nicht in normaler Zeit erreicht. Etwa die H\u00e4lfte der Patienten sind nicht gehf\u00e4hig, etwa 40% haben zerebrale Krampfanf\u00e4lle. Das intellektuelle Defizit ist leicht bis schwer ausgepr\u00e4gt, selten sind die Patienten sogar normal intelligent. Verz\u00f6gerte Sprachentwicklung und Dysarthrie sind h\u00e4ufig. Oft bestehen Symptome an den Augen: Kristalleinschl\u00fcsse in der Netzhaut (sog. glitzernde wei\u00dfe Punkte) um die Fovea herum, oft auch Photophobie und Myopie. Berichtet wurde \u00fcber auff\u00e4llige Dermatoglyphen. H\u00e4ufig werden die Patienten vor Termin geboren. Ursache des SLS sind Mutationen im ALDH3A2-Gen (17p11.2), das f\u00fcr die Fettaldehyd-Dehydrogenase (FALDH) kodiert. Dieses Enzym katalysiert die Oxidation von langkettigen Aldehyden zu Fetts\u00e4uren. Im ALDH3A2-Gen wurden bisher mehr als 70 verschiedene Mutationen gefunden, darunter Aminos\u00e4ureaustausche, Deletionen, Insertionen und Splicemutanten. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Das SLS wird durch Messung der FALDH in kultivierten Hautfibroblasten diagnostiziert. Die Diagnose wird durch Screening auf bekannte Mutationen mittels allel-spezifischer PCR oder direkter Sequenzierung des ALDH3A2-Gens best\u00e4tigt. Im fr\u00fchen Kleinkindalter, vor Auftreten der Spastik, betrifft die Differentialdiagnose andere Formen von kongenitaler Ichthyose, darunter der Lamell\u00e4ren Ichthyose und der Kongenitalen ichthyosiformen Erythrodermie (s. diese Termini). Mit den neurologischen Symptomen der sp\u00e4teren Kindheit ist differentialdiagnostisch an verschiedene andere Neuro-Ichthyose-Syndrome zu denken, z.B. die Neutralfett-Speicherkrankheit (Chanarin-Dorfman-Syndrom), den multiplen Sulfatasemangel und das Refsum-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose ist mit biochemischer oder molekularer Analyse aus kultivierten Amnion- und Chorionzottenzellen m\u00f6glich. Die Betreuung erfordert ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team aus Neurologen, Dermatologen, Ophthalmologen, orthop\u00e4dischen Chirurgen und Physiotherapeuten. Die Ichthyose wird topisch mit keratolytischen Zubereitungen oder systemisch mit Retinoiden behandelt. Die Krampfanf\u00e4lle sprechen meist auf Antikonvulsiva an, die Spastik wird mit chirurgischen Verfahren kontrolliert. Spezielle Di\u00e4ten mit zus\u00e4tzlicher Gabe mittelkettiger Fetts\u00e4uren kann die Ichthyose beeinflussen, aber die Wirkung ist begrenzt. Die Patienten erreichen in der Regel das Erwachsenenalter, sind aber lebenslang pflegebed\u00fcrftig. Nach Ende der Pubert\u00e4t bleiben die neurologischen Befunde und das Ausma\u00df des intellektuellen Defizits stabil. Patienten mit fr\u00fch auftretenden Symptomen sind sehr schwer betroffen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurocutaneous disorder caused by an inborn error of lipid metabolism and characterized by congenital ichthyosis, intellectual deficit, and spasticity.", "synonyms": "Fatty acid alcohol oxidoreductase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.1", "omim": "270200", "umls": "C0037231", "mesh": "D016111", "gard": "7654", "meddra": "10048676", "epidemiology": "Prevalence is estimated at 1/250,000 worldwide, but the syndrome is more common in Sweden due to a founder effect.", "clinical_description": "Clinical features develop perinatally and during infancy. Patients tend to be born preterm. Hyperkeratosis is usually present at birth and progresses to a generalized ichthyosis, particularly prominent on flexural areas, the nape of the neck, the trunk and the extremities. Pruritus is a prominent feature. Erythematous dermatitis is often present at birth, and then tends to fade with increasing age. Neurological signs appear during the first two years of life and consist of delay in reaching motor milestones due to spastic diplegia or, much less commonly, spastic tetraplegia. Approximately one-half of patients are non-ambulatory. Seizures occur in about 40% of cases. Intellectual deficit varies from mild to severe, although rare patients with normal intellect have been reported. Delayed speech and dysarthria are common. Ophthalmologic involvement is often present and is characterized by retinal crystalline inclusions (so-called glistening white dots) surrounding the fovea. Photophobia and myopia are common.", "etiology": "SLS is caused by mutations in the ALDH3A2 gene (17p11.2) encoding fatty aldehyde dehydrogenase (FALDH), an enzyme that catalyzes the oxidation of fatty aldehydes to fatty acids. More than 90 mutations in ALDH3A2 have been identified, including amino acid substitutions, deletions, insertions, splicing errors and contiguous gene deletions.", "diagnostic_methods": "SLS is diagnosed based on the clinical features, and by measuring FALDH or fatty alcohol oxidoreductase (FAO) activity in cultured fibroblasts from skin biopsies. DNA-based diagnosis is possible by directly sequencing the ALDH3A2 gene and identifying pathogenic mutations.", "differential_diagnosis": "In early infancy, before the onset of spasticity, the differential diagnosis includes other forms of congenital ichthyosis including lamellar ichthyosis and congenital ichthyosiform erythroderma. Once neurologic symptoms appear, the differential diagnosis includes other neuro-ichthyotic syndromes such as neutral lipid storage disease (Chanarin-Dorfman syndrome), ELOVL4 deficiency, multiple sulfatase deficiency and Refsum disease.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through biochemical or molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus cells.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be multidisciplinary including neurologists, dermatologists, ophthalmologists, orthopedic surgeons, and physiotherapists. The treatment of ichthyosis consists of topical application of moisturizing creams and keratolytic agents, or use of systemic retinoids. Seizures usually respond to anti-convulsant medications and spasticity is alleviated by botulinum toxin injections or surgical procedures. Special diets with medium-chain fatty acid supplements may help the ichthyosis, but effects are limited.", "prognosis": "Patients usually survive until adulthood but require life-long care. Minimal progression of the neurologic findings or intellectual deficit occurs after puberty. Patients with early symptoms tend to be more severely affected."}, {"name": "Sj\u00f6gren-Syndrom, prim\u00e4res", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare systemic autoimmune disease characterized by exocrine gland dysfunction, resulting predominately in keratoconjunctivitis sicca and xerostomia, but also affecting exocrine glands of the skin, as well as respiratory, urogenital, and digestive tract. Extraglandular manifestations include arthritis, interstitial lung disease, renal disease, and peripheral neuropathy. The disease is accompanied by a substantially increased risk to develop B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma, especially MALT (mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue) lymphoma.", "synonyms": "Primary Sj\u00f6gren-Gougerot syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "M35.0", "omim": "270150"}, {"name": "SJS", "sub_name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom (SJS) ist gekennzeichnet durch Myotonie und Knochen- und Gelenkanomalien. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die klinischen Symptome treten bald nach der Geburt auf. Die Myotonie f\u00fchrt zu einem charakteristischen Gesicht mit Blepharophimose und einem runzligen Gesichtsausdruck. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber tiefsitzende, malformierte Ohren und Mikrogenie. Wegen eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit der Gelenke haben die Patienten einen unsicheren Gang. Die Steifheit der Gelenke nimmt im Verlauf zu und erreicht in der Adoleszenz den H\u00f6hepunkt. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind abgeflachte Wirbelk\u00f6rper, H\u00fcftdysplasie, gekr\u00fcmmte Diaphysen und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfige Epiphysen. Dazu kommen Kleinwuchs, Hirsutismus, Myopie und kleine Testes. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache des SJS sind Mutationen im HSPG2-Gen (1p36), das f\u00fcr Perlecan, eine Basalmembran- und Stromakomponente, kodiert. Die Myotonie wird elektromyographisch diagnostiziert, die Knochen-Knorpelanomalien radiologisch. Der Perlecan-Mangel wird immunzytochemisch in Haut- und Muskelbiopsien nachgewiesen. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an das St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom (s. dort) zu denken, das sich vom SJS durch die Art der Skelettanomalien und durch die schwerere fr\u00fche Prognose unterscheidet. Auch an schwere Formen der kongenitalen Myotonie mit Chloridkanal-Mutationen und an die Myotonie mit Natriumkanal-Mutationen soll hierbei gedacht werden. Die Behandlung der Myotonie ist schwierig, in einigen Studien erwies sich Carbamazepin als hilfreich. Die Krankheit scheint nach der Adoleszenz einen stabilen Zustand zu erreichen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic neuromuscular disease characterized by permanent myotonia, mask-like facies (with blepharospasm, narrow palpebral fissures, small mouth with pursed lips and puckered chin) , and chondrodysplasia (variably manifesting with short stature, pectus carinatum, kyphoscoliosis, bowing of long bones, epiphyseal, metaphyseal, and hip dysplasia).", "synonyms": "Aberfeld syndrome, Burton skeletal dysplasia, Burton syndrome, Catel-Hempel syndrome, Dysostosis enchondralis metaepiphysaria, Catel-Hempel type, Myotonic chondrodystrophy, Myotonic myopathy, dwarfism, chondrodystrophy, ocular and facial anomalies, Osteochondromuscular dystrophy, SJS, SJS1, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 1, Schwartz-Jampel-Aberfeld syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.1\u00a0 Q78.8", "omim": "255800", "umls": "C0036391", "gard": "250", "epidemiology": "Approximately, 130 cases have been described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically by 1 year to 2 years of age, but may occur earlier, with myotonia, maske-like facies, short stature, non-progressive muscle weakness, muscle hypertrophy, progressive restriction of range of motion and paucity of subcutaneous tissue. Facial features consist of blepharospasm, progressive blepharophimosis, pursed lips and a puckered chin. Micrognathia, low-set ears with folded helices and dystopia canthorum have also been reported. The myotonia is characterized by continuous muscle activity recorded on electroneuromyography. Limited joint mobility leads to an unsteady gait. Joint stiffness is progressive, reaching its peak during adolescence The severity of chondrodysplasia is variable and may consist of flattening of the vertebral bodies, hip dysplasia, metaphyseal widening, slender diaphyses, kypho-scoliosis, multiple joint contractures and bowing of long bones. Rarely, myopia, inguinal and umbilical hernias and micro-orchidism have been reported.", "etiology": "Loss of function mutations in HSPG2 (1p36) are causative. HSPG2  encodes perlecan, a major component of the cellular matrix that plays an important role in maintaining cartilaginous tissue integrity and regulating muscle excitability. The exact pathogenesis is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is established by demonstration of both myotonia via electromyography and chondrodysplasia via radiographs. Genetic testing may confirm diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Schwartz-Jampel syndrome (SJS) is non-allelic with Stuve-Wiedemann syndrome, a severe skeletal dysplasia that is typically fatal during the neonatal period and was formerly described as SJS type 2. Other differential diagnosis should include Freeman Sheldon and Marden Walker syndrome and, in cases with minimal skeletal abnormalities, myotonic disorders ( including myotonia congenita, myotonia permamens, and myotonic dystrophy).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families, informing them that the risk of disease transmission is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "The management of patients with SJS is primarily supportive and best offered by a team comprising a neurologist, a geneticist, a physical therapist, an orthopedic surgeon, an ophthalmologist and a psychologist. Medical treatment with muscle relaxants and antiepileptic drugs, such as carbamazepine, phenytoin, or procainamide, aimed to alleviate myotonia has limited usage, although early initiation of treatment may limit the extent of disability. Physical therapy is important to prevent contracture formation and fixed skeletal deformity. Botulinum toxin A injections for blepharospasm has been reported with limited and variable results Rarely, surgical intervention is considered for blepharospasm including orbicularis oculi myectomy or levator aponeurosis resection improve functional and cosmetic outcome. Malignant hyperthermia is a potentially lethal complication of anesthesia.", "prognosis": "Progressively worsening blepharospasm is an important morbidity that can interfere with vision. The disease appears to stabilize after adolescence and does not affect life span."}, {"name": "SJS1", "sub_name": "Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom (SJS) ist gekennzeichnet durch Myotonie und Knochen- und Gelenkanomalien. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die klinischen Symptome treten bald nach der Geburt auf. Die Myotonie f\u00fchrt zu einem charakteristischen Gesicht mit Blepharophimose und einem runzligen Gesichtsausdruck. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber tiefsitzende, malformierte Ohren und Mikrogenie. Wegen eingeschr\u00e4nkter Beweglichkeit der Gelenke haben die Patienten einen unsicheren Gang. Die Steifheit der Gelenke nimmt im Verlauf zu und erreicht in der Adoleszenz den H\u00f6hepunkt. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind abgeflachte Wirbelk\u00f6rper, H\u00fcftdysplasie, gekr\u00fcmmte Diaphysen und unregelm\u00e4\u00dfige Epiphysen. Dazu kommen Kleinwuchs, Hirsutismus, Myopie und kleine Testes. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache des SJS sind Mutationen im HSPG2-Gen (1p36), das f\u00fcr Perlecan, eine Basalmembran- und Stromakomponente, kodiert. Die Myotonie wird elektromyographisch diagnostiziert, die Knochen-Knorpelanomalien radiologisch. Der Perlecan-Mangel wird immunzytochemisch in Haut- und Muskelbiopsien nachgewiesen. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an das St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom (s. dort) zu denken, das sich vom SJS durch die Art der Skelettanomalien und durch die schwerere fr\u00fche Prognose unterscheidet. Auch an schwere Formen der kongenitalen Myotonie mit Chloridkanal-Mutationen und an die Myotonie mit Natriumkanal-Mutationen soll hierbei gedacht werden. Die Behandlung der Myotonie ist schwierig, in einigen Studien erwies sich Carbamazepin als hilfreich. Die Krankheit scheint nach der Adoleszenz einen stabilen Zustand zu erreichen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic neuromuscular disease characterized by permanent myotonia, mask-like facies (with blepharospasm, narrow palpebral fissures, small mouth with pursed lips and puckered chin) , and chondrodysplasia (variably manifesting with short stature, pectus carinatum, kyphoscoliosis, bowing of long bones, epiphyseal, metaphyseal, and hip dysplasia).", "synonyms": "Aberfeld syndrome, Burton skeletal dysplasia, Burton syndrome, Catel-Hempel syndrome, Dysostosis enchondralis metaepiphysaria, Catel-Hempel type, Myotonic chondrodystrophy, Myotonic myopathy, dwarfism, chondrodystrophy, ocular and facial anomalies, Osteochondromuscular dystrophy, SJS, SJS1, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 1, Schwartz-Jampel-Aberfeld syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.1\u00a0 Q78.8", "omim": "255800", "umls": "C0036391", "gard": "250", "epidemiology": "Approximately, 130 cases have been described in the literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically by 1 year to 2 years of age, but may occur earlier, with myotonia, maske-like facies, short stature, non-progressive muscle weakness, muscle hypertrophy, progressive restriction of range of motion and paucity of subcutaneous tissue. Facial features consist of blepharospasm, progressive blepharophimosis, pursed lips and a puckered chin. Micrognathia, low-set ears with folded helices and dystopia canthorum have also been reported. The myotonia is characterized by continuous muscle activity recorded on electroneuromyography. Limited joint mobility leads to an unsteady gait. Joint stiffness is progressive, reaching its peak during adolescence The severity of chondrodysplasia is variable and may consist of flattening of the vertebral bodies, hip dysplasia, metaphyseal widening, slender diaphyses, kypho-scoliosis, multiple joint contractures and bowing of long bones. Rarely, myopia, inguinal and umbilical hernias and micro-orchidism have been reported.", "etiology": "Loss of function mutations in HSPG2 (1p36) are causative. HSPG2  encodes perlecan, a major component of the cellular matrix that plays an important role in maintaining cartilaginous tissue integrity and regulating muscle excitability. The exact pathogenesis is unknown.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is established by demonstration of both myotonia via electromyography and chondrodysplasia via radiographs. Genetic testing may confirm diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Schwartz-Jampel syndrome (SJS) is non-allelic with Stuve-Wiedemann syndrome, a severe skeletal dysplasia that is typically fatal during the neonatal period and was formerly described as SJS type 2. Other differential diagnosis should include Freeman Sheldon and Marden Walker syndrome and, in cases with minimal skeletal abnormalities, myotonic disorders ( including myotonia congenita, myotonia permamens, and myotonic dystrophy).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families, informing them that the risk of disease transmission is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "The management of patients with SJS is primarily supportive and best offered by a team comprising a neurologist, a geneticist, a physical therapist, an orthopedic surgeon, an ophthalmologist and a psychologist. Medical treatment with muscle relaxants and antiepileptic drugs, such as carbamazepine, phenytoin, or procainamide, aimed to alleviate myotonia has limited usage, although early initiation of treatment may limit the extent of disability. Physical therapy is important to prevent contracture formation and fixed skeletal deformity. Botulinum toxin A injections for blepharospasm has been reported with limited and variable results Rarely, surgical intervention is considered for blepharospasm including orbicularis oculi myectomy or levator aponeurosis resection improve functional and cosmetic outcome. Malignant hyperthermia is a potentially lethal complication of anesthesia.", "prognosis": "Progressively worsening blepharospasm is an important morbidity that can interfere with vision. The disease appears to stabilize after adolescence and does not affect life span."}, {"name": "SJS2", "sub_name": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom", "german_description": "SWS ist ein seltenes Syndrom und nur wenige Patienten wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben, aber die Krankheit ist in den Vereinigten Arabischen Emiraten relativ h\u00e4ufig, offenbar aufgrund einer hohen Anzahl von konsanguinen Verbindungen, mit einer berichteten Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 0,5/10.000 Geburten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann syndrome (SWS) is a rare autosomal recessive congenital primary skeletal dysplasia, characterized by small stature, bowing of the long bones, camptodactyly, hyperthermic episodes, respiratory distress/apneic episodes and feeding difficulties that usually lead to early mortality.", "synonyms": "Neonatal Schwartz-Jampel syndrome, SJS2, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 2, St\u00fcve-Wiedemann dysplasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "601559", "umls": "C0432240\u00a0 C0796176", "mesh": "C537502", "gard": "5045", "epidemiology": "SWS is a rare syndrome with few cases reported to date, but the disease is relatively common in the United Arab Emirates, apparently due to a high number of consanguineous unions, with a reported prevalence of approximately 0,5/10,000 births.", "clinical_description": "SWS is characterized by short stature, bowing of extremities that affect the lower limbs more than the upper limbs, camptodactyly, respiratory distress/apneic spells and hyperthermic episodes frequently associated with feeding/swallowing difficulties. Other clinical findings are mask-like face, pursed mouth, hypoplastic midface, osteopenia, congenital contractures and muscular hypotonia. The condition is fatal in most cases as a result of respiratory distress or hyperthermia. However, survival beyond one year have been reported in few cases, and patients develop severe spinal deformities, along with streaky osteoporosis and spontaneous fractures, bowing of the lower limbs (with prominent joints) and dysautonomia (including temperature instability, absent corneal and patellar reflexes, and smooth tongue). Motor development is generally delayed but no intellectual deficit has been reported.", "etiology": "SWS is due to missense or nonsense mutations in the leukemia inhibitory factor receptor (LIFR) gene (5p13.1). These null mutations lead to modifications in the stability of the LIFR transcripts, inhibiting synthesis of the LIFR protein and resulting in alterations in the JAK/STAT3 signaling pathway. In some patients diagnosed for SWS, LIFR mutations were not identified, suggesting that other genes may be involved in the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of SWS is mainly postnatal, based on clinical and radiological findings. Radiographic examination reveals bowed long bones with cortical thickening and rarefaction, wide metaphysis with decreased density and blurred margins, and abnormal trabecular pattern. Other features include flared iliac wings, hypoplasia of the lower ilia. Genetic molecular testing for LIFR mutation may be useful to confirm SWS diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Crisponi syndrome (cold-induced sweating syndrome) and other skeletal dysplasias, such as Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type IX, Campomelic dysplasia and autosomal dominant Larsen syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In some cases, ultrasound examination may be useful to predict the presence of SWS before birth. Prenatal symptoms can sometimes be seen in the late second- or third trimester and include oligohydramnios, intrauterine growth restriction despite normal Doppler findings about the umbilical artery, camptodactyly, bowing of the lower bones affecting the tibia more than the femur, and micromelia.", "genetic_counseling": "SWS is a congenital condition inherited as an autosomal recessive disorder.", "management_and_treatment": "To date, SWS management is only symptomatic and should include prevention of lung aspirations and chocking while eating (intubation, nasogastric tube feeding and/or gastrostomy often required during the first year of life), physiotherapy and/or surgery for bone malformations, eyes protection from damage to prevent visual loss, and osteopenia or osteoporosis treatment. Predisposition to hyperthermia necessitates caution during procedures requiring anesthesia.", "prognosis": "SWS is a life-threatening disease which is usually fatal during the neonatal period, due to respiratory distress or hyperthermic episode. However, more patients are surviving for longer (into and, in some cases, beyond adolescence), if diagnosed and monitored appropriately."}, {"name": "SJS mit \u00dcbergang in toxisch-epidermale Nekrolyse", "sub_name": "SJS/TEN-\u00dcbergangsform", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "SJS mit \u00dcbergang in toxisch-epidermale Nekrolyse, SJS/TEN-Overlap-Syndrom, Stevens-Johnson/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse-\u00dcberlappungs-Syndrom, \u00dcbergangsform Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse, ", "ICD-10": "L51.2", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SJS-TEN", "sub_name": "Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse-Spektrum", "german_description": "Die Epidermale Nekrolyse (Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom, Toxische epidermale Nekrolyse) ist eine akute, schwere Hautkrankheit im Rahmen einer Medikamentenallergie. Merkmal ist eine Destruktion des Epithels der Haut und der Schleimh\u00e4ute. Die Krankheit ist ganz au\u00dferordentlich selten, etwa 2 F\u00e4lle pro 1 Million Menschen und Jahr. Es handelt sich um einen lebensbedrohlichen Notfall. Blasenbildung und Abl\u00f6sung der Haut k\u00f6nnen einen hohen Anteil der K\u00f6rperoberfl\u00e4che und mehrere Schleimh\u00e4ute betreffen. Viszerale Komplikationen sind h\u00e4ufig. Die klinische Diagnose sollte durch eine Hautbiopsie mit dem Nachweis einer durch alle Hautschichten gehenden Nekrose best\u00e4tigt werden. Ein Dutzend 'Hochrisiko'-Medikamente verursachen die H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle. Unerl\u00e4sslich ist ist eine symptomatische Behandlung in Spezialzentren. Die Mortalit\u00e4tsrate ist hoch (20-25%), und etwa die H\u00e4lfte der \u00dcberlebenden behalten Restsch\u00e4den, besonders an den Augen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Toxic epidermal necrolysis (TEN) is an acute and severe skin disease with clinical and histological features characterized by the destruction and detachment of the skin epithelium and mucous membranes.", "synonyms": "SJS-TEN, Toxic epidermolysis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L51.2", "omim": "608579", "umls": "C0014518", "mesh": "D004816", "gard": "7743", "meddra": "10044223", "epidemiology": "Annual incidence is around 1/500,000. Females are more often affected than males.", "clinical_description": "Onset may occur at any age, but the risk increases after 40 years. Three subforms have been described according to the percentage of the body surface area affected: Stevens-Johnson syndrome (<10%; see this term), Lyell syndrome (>=30%; see this term) and an intermediate form (10-29%). The initial manifestations are nonspecific: a seemingly banal rash, fever, and a burning sensation involving the eyes, mouth and genitalia. The rash rapidly progresses to become vesicular and bullous on the face and body. The cutaneous vesicles aggregate and rupture under mild friction, revealing denuded red skin with seeping and pain. Mucous membrane lesions are present in 85 to 95% of patients with involvement, in order of frequency, of the oropharynx, eyes, genitalia and anus. Lesions are painful and lead to hypersalivation, feeding problems, photophobia, and burns following urination. High fever is a constant feature. Visceral manifestations are also frequent with hematological, respiratory and digestive involvement.", "etiology": "In two thirds of cases, TEN is triggered by a clearly identifiable drug allergy. A dozen high risk drugs have been identified: allopurinol, anti-infective sulphonamide agents, lamotrigine, nevirapine, carbamazepine, phenobarbital, phenytoin, and oxicam-derived nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs. In rare cases, the disease is associated with infections (in particular, Mycoplasma pneumonia) or bone marrow transplantation. The remaining 25-30% of cases are classed as idiopathic, but some of these cases may be associated with failure to identify the causative drug. The clinical diagnosis should be confirmed by skin biopsy, which will reveal epidermal necrosis and the absence of antibody deposits.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis should include chicken pox during the early stages of the disease, staphylococcal epidermolysis, staphylococcal scalded skin syndrome (associated with superficial skin peeling caused by a specific staphylococcal toxin and usually occurring in neonates), and, more rarely, autoimmune bullous diseases (excluded by examination of skin biopsies). In addition, the more limited forms of TEN are still often misdiagnosed as erythema multiforme major.", "management_and_treatment": "Patients should be admitted to an intensive care or burns unit as soon as the diagnosis is suspected. The causative drug, together with any related compounds should be contraindicated for the patient and their close relatives (in case a genetic predisposition). No disease-modifying drugs have been shown be efficient in the treatment of TEN. The benefits of general corticotherapy and cyclosporine administration are still under evaluation. High-dose intravenous immunoglobulins are costly and appear to be of limited efficacy. Intensive symptomatic management is essential: a heated environment, analgesia, daily dressing changes, prevention of infections, and symptomatic intensive care measures (hydration, nutrition, and hyperbaric oxygen therapy).", "prognosis": "Reepithelialization is rapid (2-3 weeks). However, the prognosis for patients with extensive forms of TEN is poor (mortality rate: 20-25%). Sequelae are reported in over 80% of surviving patients with ocular sequelae being the most problematic as they tend to be severe and progressive. Other sequelae (cutaneous, genital, buccal/dental or bronchial problems) are generally easier to detect and treat."}, {"name": "SJS/TEN-Overlap-Syndrom", "sub_name": "SJS/TEN-\u00dcbergangsform", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "SJS mit \u00dcbergang in toxisch-epidermale Nekrolyse, SJS/TEN-Overlap-Syndrom, Stevens-Johnson/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse-\u00dcberlappungs-Syndrom, \u00dcbergangsform Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse, ", "ICD-10": "L51.2", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SJS/TEN-\u00dcbergangsform", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "SJS mit \u00dcbergang in toxisch-epidermale Nekrolyse, SJS/TEN-Overlap-Syndrom, Stevens-Johnson/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse-\u00dcberlappungs-Syndrom, \u00dcbergangsform Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse, ", "ICD-10": "L51.2", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Skalpdefekte - postaxiale Polydaktylie", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale Skalpdefekte und postaxiale Polydaktylie Typ A. Es handelt sich um einen extrem seltenen Zustand mit bisher weniger als 5 beschriebenen F\u00e4llen. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndrome with limb malformations as a major feature characterized by congenital scalp defects and postaxial polydactyly type A. There is a wide variability of expression, with some patients showing only one of the typical manifestations. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1985.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "181250", "umls": "C1867021", "mesh": "C536622", "gard": "241"}, {"name": "Skaphokephalie - Makrozephalie - Oberkieferretrusion - Intelligenzminderung", "sub_name": "Skaphozephalie-Syndrom, famili\u00e4res, Typ McGillivray", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das famili\u00e4re Skaphozephalie-Syndrom, Typ McGillivray ist ein k\u00fcrzlich beschriebenes Kraniosynostose-Syndrom mit Skaphozephalie, Makrozephalie, schwerer maxill\u00e4rer Retrusion und leichter intellektueller Behinderung. x", "synonyms": "Skaphokephalie - Makrozephalie - Oberkieferretrusion - Intelligenzminderung, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "609579", "UMLS": "C1865070", "epidemiology": "Es wurde in einer Drei-Generationen-Familie bei 11 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten haben verschiedene dysmorphe Merkmale: Hohe Stirn, ausgepr\u00e4gte Mittelgesichtshypoplasie mit schwerer maxill\u00e4rer Retrusion, relative oder absolute Progenie und Malokklusion. Die m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten waren schwerer betroffen und hatten eine intellektuelle Behinderung.", "etiology": "Die molekulare Analyse ergab eine K526E-Mutation im Gen f\u00fcr den Fibroblastenwachstumsfaktor-Rezeptor 2 (FGFR2). In dieser Familie wurde das Syndrom autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "summary": "Es wurde in einer Drei-Generationen-Familie bei 11 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Skaphokephalie - radioulnare Synostose, famili\u00e4r", "sub_name": "Kraniosynostose - Hydrozephalus - Chiari-Fehlbildung I - radioulnare Synostose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndromic craniosynostosis characterized by sagittal craniosynostosis, hydrocephalus, Chiari I malformation and radioulnar synostosis. Other clinical findings include blepharophimosis, small low-set ears, hypoplastic philtrum, kidney malformation, and hypogenitalism.", "synonyms": "Berant syndrome, Capra-DeMarco syndrome, Familial scaphocephaly-radioulnar synostosis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "umls": "C3267187"}, {"name": "Skaphokephalie-Syndrom, famili\u00e4res", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "Q75.0", "UMLS": "C3267076", "MedDRA": "10072229", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Skaphozephalie, isolierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Dolichozephalie, isolierte, Sagittalnaht-Synostose, nicht-syndromale, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q75.0", "OMIM": "123100\u00a0 600775\u00a0 615529", "UMLS": "C0265534", "summary": "Die isolierte Skaphozephalie ist eine Form von nicht-syndromaler Kraniosynostose mit pr\u00e4maturer Fusion der Sagittalnaht. Sie macht etwa die H\u00e4lfte aller F\u00e4lle von nicht-syndromaler Kraniosynostose aus. Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen betr\u00e4gt 1:5.000. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als das weibliche (m:w = 3,5:1), und die H\u00e4ufigkeit unter Zwillingen ist unerwartet hoch. Der vorzeitige Verschluss der Sagittalnaht f\u00fchrt zu einer signifikanten kompensatorischen anterior-posteriorer Verl\u00e4ngerung des Sch\u00e4dels. Entsprechend ist auch die Sagittalnaht l\u00e4nger als normal. Abh\u00e4ngig vom Ausma\u00df der pr\u00e4maturen Fusion haben die Betroffenen eine Balkonstirn und eine Ausw\u00f6lbung des Hinterkopfes. Der Hirndruck ist selten gesteigert, und die Intelligenz ist in der Regel normal. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, 6% aller F\u00e4lle sind famili\u00e4r mit autosomal-dominanter Vererbung. Die Ursache der isolierten Skaphozephalie ist noch nicht bekannt. Bei einem einzelnen Fall wurde eine Mutation im TWIST1-Gen (7p21) beschrieben. Die Konkordanzrate bei eineiigen Zwillingen betr\u00e4gt 30%, ein Hinweis, dass genetische und nicht-genetische Faktoren an der Verursachung der Skaphozephalie beteiligt sind. Die Diagnose st\u00fctzt sich auf klinische und sonografische Befunde, auf R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen und 3D-CT- und/oder MRT-Untersuchungen des Sch\u00e4dels. Die Synostose der Pfeilnaht tritt nicht nur isoliert auf, sondern kann auch Teil eines Syndroms sein (z.B. Famili\u00e4re Skaphozephalie mit radioulnarer Synostose, Sagittalnahtsynostose mit Dandy-Walker-Malformation und Hydrozephalus; s. diese Termini). M\u00f6glich ist eine chirurgische Rekonstruktion der Form des Sch\u00e4deldaches. Das Ergebnis der Operation ist in der Regel g\u00fcnstig, mit normaler Intelligenz und normaler psychomotorischer Entwicklung. "}, {"name": "Skaphozephalie-Syndrom, famili\u00e4res, Typ McGillivray", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das famili\u00e4re Skaphozephalie-Syndrom, Typ McGillivray ist ein k\u00fcrzlich beschriebenes Kraniosynostose-Syndrom mit Skaphozephalie, Makrozephalie, schwerer maxill\u00e4rer Retrusion und leichter intellektueller Behinderung. x", "synonyms": "Skaphokephalie - Makrozephalie - Oberkieferretrusion - Intelligenzminderung, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "609579", "UMLS": "C1865070", "epidemiology": "Es wurde in einer Drei-Generationen-Familie bei 11 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten haben verschiedene dysmorphe Merkmale: Hohe Stirn, ausgepr\u00e4gte Mittelgesichtshypoplasie mit schwerer maxill\u00e4rer Retrusion, relative oder absolute Progenie und Malokklusion. Die m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten waren schwerer betroffen und hatten eine intellektuelle Behinderung.", "etiology": "Die molekulare Analyse ergab eine K526E-Mutation im Gen f\u00fcr den Fibroblastenwachstumsfaktor-Rezeptor 2 (FGFR2). In dieser Familie wurde das Syndrom autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "summary": "Es wurde in einer Drei-Generationen-Familie bei 11 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Skelettaler Gro\u00dfwuchs-kraniofaziale Dysmorphien-hyperelastische Haut-L\u00e4sionen der weissen Substanz-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kosaki-Gro\u00dfwuchs-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by postnatal tall stature with long hands and feet, scoliosis, distinctive dysmorphic facial features (prominent forehead, proptosis, downslanting palpebral fissures, broad nasal bridge, thin upper lip, and pointed chin), hyperelastic, thin, and fragile skin, lipodystrophy, and variable intellectual disability and neurological deterioration. Additional reported manifestations include craniosynostosis, camptodactyly, progressive flexion contractures, joint dislocation, and cerebrovascular complications, among others. Brain MRI may show extensive periventricular white matter lesions and other anomalies.", "synonyms": "Skeletal overgrowth-craniofacial dysmorphism-hyperelastic skin-white matter lesions syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "No data available\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "omim": "616592"}, {"name": "Skelettdysplasie-Brachydaktylie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Mononen-Karnes-Senac-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Skelettdysplasie mit Finger- und Zehenfehlbildungen (Brachydaktylie mit kurzem, abduziertem Daumen, kurzer Zeigefinger, stark verk\u00fcrzte und abduzierte Gro\u00dfzehen), unterschiedlich stark ausgepr\u00e4gten Kleinwuchs und leichte O-Beine mit verst\u00e4rktem Wachstum der Fibula. Es wurde bei 2 M\u00e4nnern, ihrer Mutter und m\u00fctterlichen Tante beschrieben. Die Frauen waren weniger stark betroffen als die M\u00e4nner. Deshalb wird X-chromosomal-dominante Vererbung angenommen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Mononen-Karnes-Senac syndrome is characterized by skeletal dysplasia associated with finger malformations (brachydactyly with short and abducted thumbs, short index fingers, and markedly short and abducted great toes), variable mild short stature, and mild bowleg with overgrowth of the fibula. It has been described in two males, their mothers, and a maternal aunt. Females are less severely affected than males. X-linked dominant inheritance is suggested.", "synonyms": "Skeletal dysplasia-brachydactyly syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "omim": "301940", "umls": "C2931060", "mesh": "C535914", "gard": "4886"}, {"name": "Skelettdysplasie - Epilepsie - Kleinwuchs", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch m\u00e4\u00dfige bis schwere geistige Retardierung, zerebrale Kr\u00e4mpfe, Minderwuchs und Skelettdysplasie. Das Syndrom wurde bei 7 Patienten beschrieben. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind: Netzhautanomalien, Brachydaktylie, Progenie, Malokklusion der Z\u00e4hne. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic dysostosis malformation syndrome characterized by skeletal dysplasia (rabbit ear-shaped iliac alae, delayed bone age, abnormalities of the vertebral bodies and schisis of the vertebral arches), seizures, short stature, cerebral atrophy and moderate to severe intellectual disability. Additional variable manifestations include corneal and retinal abnormalities, cataract, prognathism, dental malocclusion, brachydactyly, clinodactily, slight generalized hypotonia and hyper extensible joints.", "synonyms": "Gurrieri-Sammito-Bellussi syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "omim": "601187", "umls": "C0796046", "gard": "350"}, {"name": "Skelettdysplasie mit verk\u00fcrzten Extremit\u00e4ten und schwerem kombinierten Immundefekt", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An extremely rare type of severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) characterized by the classical signs of T-B- SCID (severe and recurrent infections, diarrhea, failure to thrive, absence of T and B lymphocytes), associated with skeletal anomalies like short stature, bowing of the long bones and metaphyseal abnormalities of variable degree of severity.", "synonyms": "Achondroplasia-SCID syndrome, Achondroplasia-Swiss type agammaglobulinemia syndrome, Achondroplasia-severe combined immunodeficiency syndrome, Immunodeficiency-short limb dwarfism syndrome, Short limb skeletal dysplasia with SCID, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "D82.2", "omim": "200900", "umls": "C1860168\u00a0 C2931087", "mesh": "C536020", "gard": "2988\u00a0 463"}, {"name": "Skelettdysplasie mit verk\u00fcrzten Extremit\u00e4ten und SCID", "sub_name": "Skelettdysplasie mit verk\u00fcrzten Extremit\u00e4ten und schwerem kombinierten Immundefekt", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An extremely rare type of severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) characterized by the classical signs of T-B- SCID (severe and recurrent infections, diarrhea, failure to thrive, absence of T and B lymphocytes), associated with skeletal anomalies like short stature, bowing of the long bones and metaphyseal abnormalities of variable degree of severity.", "synonyms": "Achondroplasia-SCID syndrome, Achondroplasia-Swiss type agammaglobulinemia syndrome, Achondroplasia-severe combined immunodeficiency syndrome, Immunodeficiency-short limb dwarfism syndrome, Short limb skeletal dysplasia with SCID, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "D82.2", "omim": "200900", "umls": "C1860168\u00a0 C2931087", "mesh": "C536020", "gard": "2988\u00a0 463"}, {"name": "Skelettdysplasie mit Wormschen Knochen-multiplen Frakturen-Dentinogenesis imperfecta-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Skeletal dysplasia with wormian bone-multiple fractures-dentinogenesis imperfecta is a skeletal disorder, reported in three patients to date, characterized clinically by multiple fractures, wormian bones of the skull, dentinogenesis imperfecta and facial dysmorphism (hypertelorism, periorbital fullness). Although the signs are very similar to osteogenesis imperfecta, characteristic cortical defects in the absence of osteopenia and collagen abnormalities are considered to be distinctive. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1999.", "synonyms": "Suarez-Stickler syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "604922", "umls": "C1858032", "gard": "10290"}, {"name": "Skelettdysplasie, Typ Greenberg", "sub_name": "Greenberg-Dysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "HEM-Dysplasie, Hydrops-ektopische Kalzifikation-Mottenfra\u00df-Syndrom, Skelettdysplasie, Typ Greenberg, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q77.3", "OMIM": "215140", "UMLS": "C1300226\u00a0 C2931048", "MeSH": "C537299", "GARD": "8754", "summary": "Die Greenberg-Dysplasie ist eine sehr seltene Skelettdysplasie, gekennzeichnet durch Hydrops fetalis, erheblich verk\u00fcrzte Gliedma\u00dfen, erheblich verminderte K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe und abnorme, disorganisierte chondro-oss\u00e4re Kalzifizierung. Weniger als 10 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben. Die Krankheit ist schon fr\u00fch intra-uterin lethal, die betroffenen Feten erscheinen nicht-lebensf\u00e4hig. Auff\u00e4llige Gesichtsmerkmale, zystisches Hygrom, unvollst\u00e4ndige Lungenlappung, extramedull\u00e4re Blutbildung, intestinale Malrotation und Polydaktylie wurden ebenfalls beschrieben. R\u00f6ntgenologische Befunde sind: ,,Mottenfra\u00df''-artiges Aussehen der langen Knochen, ausgepr\u00e4gte Platyspondylie mit multiplen Knochenkernen, ektopische Ossifikation von Rippen, Sternum, Becken und Epiphysen und verminderte Ossifikation der Sch\u00e4delknochen. Histologische Befunde sind: Erheblich disorganisierte Knorpelarchitektur ohne Bildung von Knorpels\u00e4ulen, nodul\u00e4re Verkalkung des Knorpels und von Knochen umgebene Knorpelinseln. Die Greenberg-Dysplasie geht mit gest\u00f6rter Cholesterin-Biosynthese einher und wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im LBR-Gen (1q42.1), das f\u00fcr den Lamin B-Rezeptor, ein Mitglied der Sterol-Reduktase-Proteinfamilie, kodiert. Heterozygote LBR-Mutationen wurden bei der autosomal-dominant vererbten Pelger-Hu\u00ebt-Anomalie (PHA) mit vermindert gelappten Granulozytenkernen und abnormer Chromatinstruktur der Granulozyten gefunden. Allelische Heterogenit\u00e4t ist die Ursache, dass homozygote LBR-Mutationen entweder einen milden Ph\u00e4notyp (homozygote PHA mit runden Granulozytenkernen) oder die schwere Greenberg-Dysplasie verursachen. In der 20. Schwangerschaftswoche sind sonographisch in der Regel Hydramnion, Hydrops fetalis, extrem verk\u00fcrzte Gliedma\u00dfen und zystisches Hygrom nachweisbar. Diagnostisch hilfreich ist ein Steroid-Profil. Es kann, ebenso wie die molekulare Analyse bei bekannten Mutationen, f\u00fcr die vorgeburtliche Diagnostik verwendet werden. Bei vorgeburtlichem sonographischem Nachweis von Hydrops fetalis (sh. dort) und Phokomelie muss immer auch an die Greenberg-Dysplasie gedacht werden."}, {"name": "Skelettdysplasie-T-Zell-Immundefekt-Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by the association of developmental delay, variable intellectual disability, skeletal dysplasia, and in many cases T-cell immunodeficiency and other immunologic abnormalities. Skeletal findings include short stature, anomalies of the long bones, hands and feet, and pelvis, platyspondyly, cervical malformation, and pectus excavatum. Dysmorphic facial features, such as coarse face, hypertelorism, and broad nasal tip, may be present. Additional reported manifestations are seizures, hyperreflexia, nystagmus, and muscular hypotonia, as well as multiple liver cysts.", "synonyms": "EXTL3-related neuro-immuno-skeletal dysplasia syndrome, Neuro-immuno-skeletal dysplasia syndrome due to EXTL3 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal"}, {"name": "Skelettmuskel-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C1533847", "MeSH": "D009135", "MedDRA": "10028641", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Skleroatrophisches Syndrom", "sub_name": "Huriez-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic skin disease characterized by the triad of congenital scleroatrophy predominantly of the hands with sclerodactyly, palmoplantar keratoderma, and nail changes (consisting of hypoplasia, ridging, clubbing, and white discoloration). Additional features include palmar hypohidrosis and a high susceptibility to early-onset squamous cell carcinoma of affected skin areas.", "synonyms": "Palmoplantar hyperkeratosis-sclerodactyly syndrome, Palmoplantar keratoderma-sclerodactyly syndrome, Scleroatrophic syndrome, Sclerotylosis, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "181600", "umls": "C0406767", "gard": "8517"}, {"name": "Skler\u00f6dem", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare acquired skin disease characterized by excessive mucin deposition and thickened collagen bundles in the dermis, resulting in woody, non-pitting induration of the skin of the neck, spreading to the shoulders and upper trunk, but sparing hands and feet. According to the association with preceding or underlying conditions, three types can be distinguished: type 1 usually follows a febrile infection, type 2 is associated with paraproteinemia, and type 3 occurs in patients with diabetes mellitus. Especially in types 2 and 3, extracutaneous involvement may be present. Other potentially associated conditions include a variety of endocrinopathies, systemic diseases, and neoplasms.", "synonyms": "Buschke scleredema, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "M34.8", "gard": "5975"}, {"name": "Skler\u00f6dem Buschke", "sub_name": "Skler\u00f6dem", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare acquired skin disease characterized by excessive mucin deposition and thickened collagen bundles in the dermis, resulting in woody, non-pitting induration of the skin of the neck, spreading to the shoulders and upper trunk, but sparing hands and feet. According to the association with preceding or underlying conditions, three types can be distinguished: type 1 usually follows a febrile infection, type 2 is associated with paraproteinemia, and type 3 occurs in patients with diabetes mellitus. Especially in types 2 and 3, extracutaneous involvement may be present. Other potentially associated conditions include a variety of endocrinopathies, systemic diseases, and neoplasms.", "synonyms": "Buschke scleredema, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "M34.8", "gard": "5975"}, {"name": "Sklerodermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Sklerodermie ist eine seltene autoimmune Bindergewebserkrankung/Kollagenose mit abnormer Verh\u00e4rtung der Haut und manchmal auch anderer Organe. Zwei Hauptformen werden unterschieden: (i) Zirkumskripte Sklerodermie und (ii) Systemische Sklerose (SSc). Letztere hat drei Untertypen: diffuse kutane SSc (dcSSc), limitierte kutane SSC (lcSSC) und limitierte SSc (s. diese Termini).", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "UMLS": "C0011644\u00a0 C0852007", "MedDRA": "10039710", "epidemiology": "Gesch\u00e4tze Pr\u00e4valenzen sind 1-9:100.000 f\u00fcr Zirkumskripte Sklerodermie und 1:6.500 f\u00fcr Erwachsene mit Systemischer Sklerose. Haupts\u00e4chlich Frauen sind betroffen (w:m=4:1).", "clinical_description": "Die Zirkumskripte Sklerodermie ist eine kutane Form der Sklerodermie mit fibrosierten Hautplaques (Morphaea) oder -streifen (lineare Sklerodermie). Die Systemische Sklerose ist eine generalisierte Erkrankung mit Fibrose und Gef\u00e4\u00dfverschl\u00fcssen in der Haut und in anderen Organen, besonders Lunge, Herz und Verdauungstrakt.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der Sklerodermie ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit geht von einer autoimmunen Reaktion aus, die zur \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen f\u00fchrt. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit mit Chemikalienexposition assoziiert. Als weitere Ursachen werden genetische und infekti\u00f6se Faktoren diskutiert.", "summary": "Gesch\u00e4tze Pr\u00e4valenzen sind 1-9:100.000 f\u00fcr Zirkumskripte Sklerodermie und 1:6.500 f\u00fcr Erwachsene mit Systemischer Sklerose. Haupts\u00e4chlich Frauen sind betroffen (w:m=4:1)."}, {"name": "Sklerodermie, diffuse kutane systemische", "sub_name": "Systemische Sklerose, diffuse kutane", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die diffuse kutane Systemische Sklerose (dcSSc) ist ein Untertyp der Systemischen Sklerodermie (SS; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Fibrose der Haut des Stammes und der Akren und durch fr\u00fch und in signifikanter H\u00e4ufigkeit diffus auftretende Organbeteiligungen (interstitielle Lungenerkrankung, oligurische Niereninsuffizienz, diffuse gastrointestinale St\u00f6rungen und Beteiligung des Myokards).", "synonyms": "Sklerodermie, diffuse kutane systemische, Sklerose, kutane progressive systemische, Systemische Sklerodermie, progressive, ", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.0", "GARD": "9751", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf etwa 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest. Beginn im Kindesalter ist m\u00f6glich, aber extrem selten.", "clinical_description": "Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist das h\u00e4ufigste und oft auch das erste Symptom der Krankheit. Die \u00fcbrigen Symptome treten meist erst einige Monate sp\u00e4ter auf. Die Haut verh\u00e4rtet zuerst an den Fingern und im Gesicht, schnell aber auch am restlichen K\u00f6rper.Teleangiektasien werden manchmal an Thorax, Gesicht, Lippen, Zunge und Fingern gesehen. Reibungsbedingte Auffaserung von Sehnen wurde gesehen. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus, mit der Folge von gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal Dysphagie. Gastrointestinale Malabsorption und Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rungen sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome und haben Gewichtsverlust, Erbrechen, Diarrhoe oder Obstipation zur Folge. Trockener Mund und Beteiligung der Z\u00e4hne sind m\u00f6glich. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Gelenkschmerzen und Akroosteolyse. Eine Beteiligung der Muskeln wird mit Muskelschmerzen, -schw\u00e4che und -kr\u00e4mpfen manifest. In etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle kommt es zu lebensbedrohlicher Nierenbeteiligung. Bei 60% der F\u00e4lle besteht eine Lungenfibrose, in 10-15% der F\u00e4lle ein Lungenhochdruck.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der diffusen kutanen SSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit mit Chemikalien-Exposition (Siliziumdioxid, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren das typische klinische Bild und Zeichen einer spezifischen Mikroangiopathie mit Megakapillaren bei der Kapillaroskopie am Nagelbett. Eine Hautbiopsie ist in der Regel nicht erforderlich. Notwendig sind Blutanalysen, die in 30-40% der F\u00e4lle zum Nachweis typischer Anti-Topoisomerase-Autoantik\u00f6rper f\u00fchren. Die Ausdehnung der Krankheit soll durch Thorax-Computertomographie, Elektrokardiographie, Echokardiographie, R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und ggf. durch endoskopische Untersuchung des \u00d6sophagus und Magens beurteilt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sharp-Syndrom, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom, Polyarteriitis nodosa, Polymyositis und rheumatoide Arthritis (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist \u00fcberwiegend symptomatisch. Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen kann mit Kalziumkanalblockern behandelt werden. Bei gastrischem Reflux werden Protonenpumpenhemmer gegeben. Bei k\u00fcrzlich aufgetretener schwerer Hautbeteiligung oder bei progredienter Lungenfibrose sind niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide mit Immunsuppressiva erforderlich. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck wird mit pulmonalen Vasodilatatoren behandelt. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden kontrolliert werden, schon fr\u00fch mit Lungenfunktionstests und Echokardiographie.", "prognosis": "Wegen des erh\u00f6hten Risikos lebensbedrohlicher Komplikationen (Nierenkrise, schwere Beteiligung des Verdauungskanals, schwere Lungenfibrose und manchmal schwere Herzbeteiligung und Lungenarterien-Hochruck) ist die Prognose schwerwiegend (10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate 60-80%).", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf etwa 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest. Beginn im Kindesalter ist m\u00f6glich, aber extrem selten."}, {"name": "Sklerodermie, fibrosierende zirkumskripte", "sub_name": "Sklerodermie, zirkumskripte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Zirkumskripte Sklerodermie ist eine auf die Haut beschr\u00e4nkte Form der Sklerodermie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Fibrosierung der Haut mit kutanen Plaques oder Streifen.", "synonyms": "Sklerodermie, fibrosierende zirkumskripte, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "L94.0", "UMLS": "C0036420", "MeSH": "D012594", "GARD": "7058", "MedDRA": "10039712", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1-9:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend ist das weibliche Geschlecht betroffen (w:m etwa 4:1), und mit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Wahrscheinlichkeit tritt die Krankheit bei Kindern als bei Erwachsenen auf.", "clinical_description": "Die zirkumskripte fibrosierende Sklerodermie wird in mehrere Typen unterteilt: Morphaea, generalisierte Morphaea und lineare Sklerodermie. Von der linearen Sklerodermie sind eher Kinder und Jugendliche betroffen, w\u00e4hrend die Morphaea h\u00e4ufiger bei Erwachsenen auftritt. Beide Formen k\u00f6nnen sich aber auch beim gleichen Patienten finden. Areale mit harter trockener Haut entstehen zuerst an H\u00e4nden, Armen, Gesicht und Beinen. Danach erscheinen die Plaques (Morphaea) oder breiten Streifen (lineare Sklerodermie). Die Plaques sind rund oder oval, oft mit wei\u00dflichem Aspekt und rotem Rand. Breite Streifen entwickeln sich vor allem im Gesicht, am Thorax und an Armen und Beinen. Wenn das Gesicht betroffen ist, k\u00f6nnen einige Streifen, die auf der Stirn entstehen, eine Furche bilden. Diese Streifen werden wegen ihres Aussehens en coup de sabre bezeichnet. Das lineare Skleroderma neigt zur Beteiligung des darunter liegenden Fettgewebes und kann auch zu Muskelatrophie f\u00fchren. Wegen ihrer Auswirkungen auf das Wachstum kann die zirkumskripte Sklerodermie zu erheblichen Asymmetrien des Gesichtes und der Gliedma\u00dfen, zu Beugekontrakturen und k\u00f6rperlichen Behinderungen f\u00fchren. Ein Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist meist nicht vorhanden.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der zirkumskripten Sklerodermie ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine lokale \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. Als weitere Ursachen werden genetische und infekti\u00f6se Mechanismen diskutiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose folgt aus dem klinischen Befund. Eine Hautbiopsie kann die Diagnose weiter best\u00e4tigen. Histologische Befunde sind hierbei eine abnorme Vermehrung von Kollagen, verdickte Gef\u00e4\u00dfw\u00e4nde und die Anwesenheit wei\u00dfer Zellen um die Gef\u00e4\u00dfe herum. Die Blutparameter sind meist normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Eine Differentialdiagnose ist die Eosinophile Fasziitis (s. dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch und beinhaltet die Anwendung von Kortikoiden f\u00fcr Morphaea-L\u00e4sionen und von Immunsuppressiva f\u00fcr das lineare Skleroderm. Physiotherapie kann hilfreich bei der Begrenzung von Indurationen und Muskelretraktionen sein.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist meist g\u00fcnstig. Die Zirkumskripte Sklerodermie ist nur selten lebensbedrohlich, kann die Lebensqualit\u00e4t aber erheblich einschr\u00e4nken, besonders bei Kindern. Die linearen L\u00e4sionen persistieren L\u00e4nger als die Plaques.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1-9:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend ist das weibliche Geschlecht betroffen (w:m etwa 4:1), und mit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Wahrscheinlichkeit tritt die Krankheit bei Kindern als bei Erwachsenen auf."}, {"name": "Sklerodermie, kutane limitierte systemische", "sub_name": "Systemische Sklerose, kutane limitierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die limitierte kutane Systemische Sklerose (lcSSc) ist ein Untertyp der Systemischen Sklerodermie (SSc; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Assoziation des Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomens mit auf H\u00e4nde, Gesicht, F\u00fc\u00dfe und Unterarme begrenzter Hautfibrose.", "synonyms": "Sklerodermie, kutane limitierte systemische, ", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.1", "OMIM": "181750", "UMLS": "C0748540", "GARD": "1053", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf 1:12.500 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest.", "clinical_description": "Ein Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist das h\u00e4ufigste und oft auch erste Symptom der Krankheit. Die \u00fcbrigen Symptome treten in der Regel erst einige Jahre sp\u00e4ter auf. Die Beteiligung der Haut ist auf H\u00e4nde, Gesicht, F\u00fc\u00dfe und Unterarme beschr\u00e4nkt. Nicht ver\u00e4ndert ist die Haut an Brust, Abdomen, R\u00fccken und Oberschenkel. Beobachtet werden Teleangiektasien und Sklerodaktylie mit dem Risiko von Ulzerationen an den Fingern. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus, mit der Folge von gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal auch Dysphagie. Computertomographisch ist in etwa 30-40% der F\u00e4lle eine Lungenfibrose nachweisbar. Etwa 10% der Patienten haben einen Lungenarterien-Hochdruck. Bei einigen F\u00e4llen ist im Fr\u00fchstadium der Krankheit die Haut noch nicht betroffen, weshalb die Krankheit limitierte SSc benannt wird. In seltenen F\u00e4llen fehlt eine Hautbeteiligung ganz, man spricht dann von SSc ohne Sklerodermie. Das CREST-Syndrom (s. dort) wird oft als Synonym der limitierten kutanen SSc benutzt. Es handelt sich aber eher um einen Untertyp mit h\u00e4ufigeren und ausgedehnteren Teleangiektasien.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der limitierten kutanen SSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die SSc mit Chemikalien-Exposition (Siliziumdioxid, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die typischen klinischen Manifestationen und Hinweise auf eine spezifische Mikroangiopathie mit Megakapillaren bei Kapillaroskopie am Nagelbett. Im Blut sind typische Anti-Zentromer-Autoantik\u00f6rper (ACA) nachweisbar. Die Ausdehnung der Krankheit soll durch Thorax-Computertomographie, Elektrokardiographie, Echokardiographie, R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und ggf. durch endoskopische Untersuchung des \u00d6sophagus und Magens beurteilt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sharp-Syndrom, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom und Polyarteriitis nodosa (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist \u00fcberwiegend symptomatisch. Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen kann mit Kalziumkanalblockern behandelt werden. Bei gastrischem Reflux werden Protonenpumpen-Hemmer gegeben. Bei progredienter Lungenfibrose sind niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide mit Immunsuppressiva erforderlich. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck wird mit pulmonalen Vasodilatatoren behandelt. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden kontrolliert werden, schon fr\u00fch mit Lungenfunktionstests und echokardiographisch.", "prognosis": "Wegen der langen Krankheitsdauer (10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate etwa 80-90%) ist die Prognose der limitierten kutanen SSc relativ g\u00fcnstig. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck ist eine bei etwa 10% auftretende Komplikation, die eine schwerere Prognose bedeutet. Bei einigen Patienten besteht eine schwere Lungenfibrose.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf 1:12.500 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest."}, {"name": "Sklerodermie, zirkumskripte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Zirkumskripte Sklerodermie ist eine auf die Haut beschr\u00e4nkte Form der Sklerodermie (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Fibrosierung der Haut mit kutanen Plaques oder Streifen.", "synonyms": "Sklerodermie, fibrosierende zirkumskripte, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "L94.0", "UMLS": "C0036420", "MeSH": "D012594", "GARD": "7058", "MedDRA": "10039712", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1-9:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend ist das weibliche Geschlecht betroffen (w:m etwa 4:1), und mit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Wahrscheinlichkeit tritt die Krankheit bei Kindern als bei Erwachsenen auf.", "clinical_description": "Die zirkumskripte fibrosierende Sklerodermie wird in mehrere Typen unterteilt: Morphaea, generalisierte Morphaea und lineare Sklerodermie. Von der linearen Sklerodermie sind eher Kinder und Jugendliche betroffen, w\u00e4hrend die Morphaea h\u00e4ufiger bei Erwachsenen auftritt. Beide Formen k\u00f6nnen sich aber auch beim gleichen Patienten finden. Areale mit harter trockener Haut entstehen zuerst an H\u00e4nden, Armen, Gesicht und Beinen. Danach erscheinen die Plaques (Morphaea) oder breiten Streifen (lineare Sklerodermie). Die Plaques sind rund oder oval, oft mit wei\u00dflichem Aspekt und rotem Rand. Breite Streifen entwickeln sich vor allem im Gesicht, am Thorax und an Armen und Beinen. Wenn das Gesicht betroffen ist, k\u00f6nnen einige Streifen, die auf der Stirn entstehen, eine Furche bilden. Diese Streifen werden wegen ihres Aussehens en coup de sabre bezeichnet. Das lineare Skleroderma neigt zur Beteiligung des darunter liegenden Fettgewebes und kann auch zu Muskelatrophie f\u00fchren. Wegen ihrer Auswirkungen auf das Wachstum kann die zirkumskripte Sklerodermie zu erheblichen Asymmetrien des Gesichtes und der Gliedma\u00dfen, zu Beugekontrakturen und k\u00f6rperlichen Behinderungen f\u00fchren. Ein Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist meist nicht vorhanden.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der zirkumskripten Sklerodermie ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine lokale \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. Als weitere Ursachen werden genetische und infekti\u00f6se Mechanismen diskutiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose folgt aus dem klinischen Befund. Eine Hautbiopsie kann die Diagnose weiter best\u00e4tigen. Histologische Befunde sind hierbei eine abnorme Vermehrung von Kollagen, verdickte Gef\u00e4\u00dfw\u00e4nde und die Anwesenheit wei\u00dfer Zellen um die Gef\u00e4\u00dfe herum. Die Blutparameter sind meist normal.", "differential_diagnosis": "Eine Differentialdiagnose ist die Eosinophile Fasziitis (s. dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch und beinhaltet die Anwendung von Kortikoiden f\u00fcr Morphaea-L\u00e4sionen und von Immunsuppressiva f\u00fcr das lineare Skleroderm. Physiotherapie kann hilfreich bei der Begrenzung von Indurationen und Muskelretraktionen sein.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist meist g\u00fcnstig. Die Zirkumskripte Sklerodermie ist nur selten lebensbedrohlich, kann die Lebensqualit\u00e4t aber erheblich einschr\u00e4nken, besonders bei Kindern. Die linearen L\u00e4sionen persistieren L\u00e4nger als die Plaques.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1-9:100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend ist das weibliche Geschlecht betroffen (w:m etwa 4:1), und mit gr\u00f6\u00dferer Wahrscheinlichkeit tritt die Krankheit bei Kindern als bei Erwachsenen auf."}, {"name": "Sklerokornea, isolierte kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare corneal disorder characterized by non-inflammatory, non-progressive, bilateral ingrowth of vascularized, opaque scleral tissue into the peripheral cornea, obliterating the corneoscleral limbus and scleral sulcus. The condition is not associated with other ocular abnormalities.", "icd_10": "Q13.3", "omim": "181700", "umls": "C1866984"}, {"name": "Skleromyx\u00f6dem", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare lichen myxedematosus characterized by a progressive, generalized, papular, sclerodermoid cutaneous eruption usually occurring in association with monoclonal gammopathy, but in the absence of thyroid disease. Histological hallmark is the triad of dermal mucin deposition, fibroblast proliferation, and fibrosis. Patients present with relatively sudden onset of numerous closely spaced, waxy, firm papules and plaques predominantly involving the head, neck, trunk, and dorsal aspects of the extremities, on the background of thickened, edematous, erythematous skin with sclerodermoid appearance. Systemic involvement with cardiovascular, gastrointestinal, pulmonary, musculoskeletal, renal, or nervous system complications is common.", "synonyms": "Arndt-Gottron disease, Generalized lichenoid papular eruption, Generalized papular and sclerodermoid lichen myxedematosus, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "L98.5", "umls": "C0263390", "mesh": "D053718", "gard": "7615", "meddra": "10055046"}, {"name": "Skleromyx\u00f6dem ohne monoklonale Gammopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Scleromyxedema without monoclonal gammopathy is a form of atypical lichen myxedematosus (see this term), characterized by a generalized sclerodermoid infiltration of skin studded with multiple, firm papules of 1-3 mm in diameter involving face (leonine appearance), trunk, and limbs, without monoclonal gammopathy. The involvement of the face can be missing and pruritus may be prominent.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "L98.5"}, {"name": "Sklerose, kutane progressive systemische", "sub_name": "Systemische Sklerose, diffuse kutane", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die diffuse kutane Systemische Sklerose (dcSSc) ist ein Untertyp der Systemischen Sklerodermie (SS; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Fibrose der Haut des Stammes und der Akren und durch fr\u00fch und in signifikanter H\u00e4ufigkeit diffus auftretende Organbeteiligungen (interstitielle Lungenerkrankung, oligurische Niereninsuffizienz, diffuse gastrointestinale St\u00f6rungen und Beteiligung des Myokards).", "synonyms": "Sklerodermie, diffuse kutane systemische, Sklerose, kutane progressive systemische, Systemische Sklerodermie, progressive, ", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.0", "GARD": "9751", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf etwa 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest. Beginn im Kindesalter ist m\u00f6glich, aber extrem selten.", "clinical_description": "Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist das h\u00e4ufigste und oft auch das erste Symptom der Krankheit. Die \u00fcbrigen Symptome treten meist erst einige Monate sp\u00e4ter auf. Die Haut verh\u00e4rtet zuerst an den Fingern und im Gesicht, schnell aber auch am restlichen K\u00f6rper.Teleangiektasien werden manchmal an Thorax, Gesicht, Lippen, Zunge und Fingern gesehen. Reibungsbedingte Auffaserung von Sehnen wurde gesehen. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus, mit der Folge von gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal Dysphagie. Gastrointestinale Malabsorption und Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rungen sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome und haben Gewichtsverlust, Erbrechen, Diarrhoe oder Obstipation zur Folge. Trockener Mund und Beteiligung der Z\u00e4hne sind m\u00f6glich. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Gelenkschmerzen und Akroosteolyse. Eine Beteiligung der Muskeln wird mit Muskelschmerzen, -schw\u00e4che und -kr\u00e4mpfen manifest. In etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle kommt es zu lebensbedrohlicher Nierenbeteiligung. Bei 60% der F\u00e4lle besteht eine Lungenfibrose, in 10-15% der F\u00e4lle ein Lungenhochdruck.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der diffusen kutanen SSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit mit Chemikalien-Exposition (Siliziumdioxid, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren das typische klinische Bild und Zeichen einer spezifischen Mikroangiopathie mit Megakapillaren bei der Kapillaroskopie am Nagelbett. Eine Hautbiopsie ist in der Regel nicht erforderlich. Notwendig sind Blutanalysen, die in 30-40% der F\u00e4lle zum Nachweis typischer Anti-Topoisomerase-Autoantik\u00f6rper f\u00fchren. Die Ausdehnung der Krankheit soll durch Thorax-Computertomographie, Elektrokardiographie, Echokardiographie, R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und ggf. durch endoskopische Untersuchung des \u00d6sophagus und Magens beurteilt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sharp-Syndrom, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom, Polyarteriitis nodosa, Polymyositis und rheumatoide Arthritis (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist \u00fcberwiegend symptomatisch. Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen kann mit Kalziumkanalblockern behandelt werden. Bei gastrischem Reflux werden Protonenpumpenhemmer gegeben. Bei k\u00fcrzlich aufgetretener schwerer Hautbeteiligung oder bei progredienter Lungenfibrose sind niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide mit Immunsuppressiva erforderlich. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck wird mit pulmonalen Vasodilatatoren behandelt. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden kontrolliert werden, schon fr\u00fch mit Lungenfunktionstests und Echokardiographie.", "prognosis": "Wegen des erh\u00f6hten Risikos lebensbedrohlicher Komplikationen (Nierenkrise, schwere Beteiligung des Verdauungskanals, schwere Lungenfibrose und manchmal schwere Herzbeteiligung und Lungenarterien-Hochruck) ist die Prognose schwerwiegend (10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate 60-80%).", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf etwa 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest. Beginn im Kindesalter ist m\u00f6glich, aber extrem selten."}, {"name": "Sklerose, systemische", "sub_name": "Systemische Sklerodermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Systemische Sklerodermie (SSc) ist eine generalisierte Erkrankung der kleinen Arterien, der Mikrogef\u00e4\u00dfe und des Bindegewebes und gekennzeichnet durch Fibrose und Gef\u00e4\u00dfobliterationen in der Haut und anderen Organen, besonders in Lunge, Herz und Verdauungstrakt. Zwei haupts\u00e4chliche Untergruppen der SSc sind die diffuse kutane SSc (dcSSc) und die limitierte kutane SSc (lcSSc) (s. diese Termini). Als dritte Untergruppe wurde die limitierte Systemische Sklerodermie (lSSc) oder Scleroderma sine scleroderma (s. diese Termini) beschrieben.", "synonyms": "Sklerose, systemische, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.0\u00a0 M34.1\u00a0 M34.2\u00a0 M34.8\u00a0 M34.9", "OMIM": "181750", "UMLS": "C0036421", "GARD": "9748", "MedDRA": "10042953", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf 1:6.500 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m etwa 4:1). Die Krankheit wird in der Regel im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest.", "clinical_description": "Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist oft das erste Zeichen der Krankheit. Die weiteren Symptome treten bei der diffus-kutanen Untergruppe wenige Monate sp\u00e4ter auf, bei der limitiert-kutanen Untergruppe einige Jahre sp\u00e4ter. Bei der limitierten kutanen Untergruppe ist die Beteiligung der Haut auf H\u00e4nde, Gesicht, F\u00fc\u00dfe und Unterarme beschr\u00e4nkt, w\u00e4hrend die Hautver\u00e4nderungen bei der diffusen kutanen Untergruppe schnell generalisieren. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus, mit der Folge von gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal Dysphagie. M\u00f6gliche lebensbedrohliche Komplikationen sind Lungenfibrose und, seltener, Lungenarterien-Hochdruck. Patienten mit limitierter SSc haben ein Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen, aber keine Hautbeteiligung. Daneben besteht das Risiko einer Organbeteiligung.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der SSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die SSc mit Chemikalien-Exposition (Siliziumdioxid, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die typischen klinischen Manifestationen und Hinweise auf eine spezifische Mikroangiopathie mit Megakapillaren bei der Kapillaroskopie am Nagelbett. Bluttests zeigen typische antinukle\u00e4re Autoantik\u00f6rper. Die Ausdehnung der Krankheit sollte durch Computertomographie (CT) des Thorax, Elektrokardiographie, Echokardiographie, R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und ggf. endoskopische Untersuchung des \u00d6sophagus und Magens beurteilt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sharp-Syndrom, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom, Polyarteriitis nodosa, Polymyositis und rheumatoide Arthritis (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist \u00fcberwiegend symptomatisch. Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen kann mit Kalziumkanalblockern behandelt werden. Bei gastrischem Reflux werden Protonenpumpen-Hemmer gegeben. Bei k\u00fcrzlich aufgetretener schwerer Hautbeteiligung oder bei progredienter Lungenfibrose sind niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide und Immunsuppressiva erforderlich. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck wird mit pulmonalen Vasodilatatoren behandelt. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden klinisch und mit Lungenfunktionstests und echokardiographisch \u00fcberwacht werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch die vorliegende SSc-Untergruppe bestimmt. Die Prognose der limitierten kutanen SSc ist relativ gut (10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate 80-90%). Eine weniger g\u00fcnstige Prognose kann mit schwerwiegendem Lungenarterien-Hochdruck, der in 10% der F\u00e4lle auftritt, und schwerer Lungenfibrose gegeben sein. Eine noch schwerere Prognose haben Patienten mit diffuser kutaner SSc wegen des h\u00f6heren Risikos f\u00fcr lebensbedrohliche Komplikationen: Nierenkrise, schwere Beteiligung der Verdauungsorgane, schwere Lungenfibrose und manchmal schwere Herzbeteiligung und Lungenarterien-Hochdruck.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf 1:6.500 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m etwa 4:1). Die Krankheit wird in der Regel im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest."}, {"name": "Sklerosierende Cholangitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0008313", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sklerosierende Cholangitis, isolierte neonatale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die isolierte neonatale sklerosierende Cholangitis ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte Erkrankung der Gallenwege, die durch eine schwere neonatale Cholangiopathie mit offenen Galleng\u00e4ngen und dem Fehlen von ichthyosiformen Hautl\u00e4sionen gekennzeichnet ist. Die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich mit Gelbsucht, acholischen St\u00fchlen, Hepatosplenomegalie und hoher Serum-Gamma-Glutamyltransferase-Aktivit\u00e4t. Die Leberhistologie zeigt eine portale Fibrose, duktul\u00e4re Proliferation, hepatozellul\u00e4re Metallothionein-Ablagerungen und intralobul\u00e4re Gallenpigment-Ansammlungen. Einige Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch eine Nierenerkrankung aufweisen.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "K83.0"}, {"name": "Sklerosierende Cholangitis, sekund\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, biliary tract disease characterized by development of sclerosing cholangitis due to a known primary insult to the biliary tree, including infections, autoimmune disease, exposure to toxic agents, obstructive and ischemic injuries. Patients may be initially asymptomatic with only elevated alkaline phosphatase and gamma glutamyltransferase levels. Later presentation includes abdominal pain, jaundice, pruritus, fever and bacterial cholangitis from ascending infection.", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "K83.0"}, {"name": "Sklerosteose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sclerosteosis is a very rare serious sclerosing hyperostosis syndrome characterized clinically by variable syndactyly and progressive skeletal overgrowth (particularly of the skull), resulting in distinctive facial features (mandibular overgrowth, frontal bossing, midfacial hypoplasia), cranial nerve entrapment causing facial palsy and deafness, and potentially lethal elevation of intracranial pressure.", "synonyms": "Cortical hyperostosis-syndactyly syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Childhood", "icd_10": "M85.2", "omim": "269500\u00a0 614305", "umls": "C0265301", "mesh": "C537525", "gard": "4771"}, {"name": "Sklerotylose", "sub_name": "Huriez-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic skin disease characterized by the triad of congenital scleroatrophy predominantly of the hands with sclerodactyly, palmoplantar keratoderma, and nail changes (consisting of hypoplasia, ridging, clubbing, and white discoloration). Additional features include palmar hypohidrosis and a high susceptibility to early-onset squamous cell carcinoma of affected skin areas.", "synonyms": "Palmoplantar hyperkeratosis-sclerodactyly syndrome, Palmoplantar keratoderma-sclerodactyly syndrome, Scleroatrophic syndrome, Sclerotylosis, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q82.8", "omim": "181600", "umls": "C0406767", "gard": "8517"}, {"name": "Skraban-Deardorff-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Intelligenzminderung-Krampfanf\u00e4lle-Ganganomalien-Gesichtsdysmorphie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by global developmental delay, intellectual disability, seizures, abnormal gait, and craniofacial dysmorphism (including coarse features, depressed nasal bridge, anteverted nares, broad nasal tip, prominent maxilla and upper lip, wide mouth, abnormal gingiva, and widely spaced teeth). Additional reported manifestations are ocular anomalies, cardiac defects, gastrointestinal problems, and autistic features. Brain imaging may show thin corpus callosum, white matter abnormalities, or dilated ventricles.", "synonyms": "Skraban-Deardorff syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "omim": "617616"}, {"name": "Skrotale Agenesie, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Skrotum, kongenitale Agenesie des", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare urogenital tract malformation characterized by the complete absence of the scrotal rugae in the perineum between the penis and anus, with bilateral testes being present in a cryptorchid or ectopic position. Hemiscrotal agenesis refers to the unilateral absence of scrotal skin with an intact midline raphe and ipsilateral cryptorchidism. Both malformations may be isolated findings, or occur in association with other anomalies.", "synonyms": "Congenital absence of the scrotum, Congenital scrotal absence, Congenital scrotal agenesis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal"}, {"name": "Skrotum, kongenitale Agenesie des", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare urogenital tract malformation characterized by the complete absence of the scrotal rugae in the perineum between the penis and anus, with bilateral testes being present in a cryptorchid or ectopic position. Hemiscrotal agenesis refers to the unilateral absence of scrotal skin with an intact midline raphe and ipsilateral cryptorchidism. Both malformations may be isolated findings, or occur in association with other anomalies.", "synonyms": "Congenital absence of the scrotum, Congenital scrotal absence, Congenital scrotal agenesis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal"}, {"name": "Skrotum, kongenitales Fehlen des", "sub_name": "Skrotum, kongenitale Agenesie des", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare urogenital tract malformation characterized by the complete absence of the scrotal rugae in the perineum between the penis and anus, with bilateral testes being present in a cryptorchid or ectopic position. Hemiscrotal agenesis refers to the unilateral absence of scrotal skin with an intact midline raphe and ipsilateral cryptorchidism. Both malformations may be isolated findings, or occur in association with other anomalies.", "synonyms": "Congenital absence of the scrotum, Congenital scrotal absence, Congenital scrotal agenesis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal"}, {"name": "SLC35A1-CDG", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Kongenitale St\u00f6rung der Gykosylierung Typ IIf (CDG-IIf) ist eine extrem seltene Form des CDG-Syndroms (s. dort) und klinisch bei dem bisher einzigen beschriebenen Patienten gekennzeichnet durch wiederholte Blutungsereignisse, einschlie\u00dflich schwerer Lungenblutungen.", "synonyms": "CDG (Congenital Disorder of Glycosylation) Typ IIf, CDG-IIf, CDG-Syndrom Typ IIf, CDG2F, CMP-Sialins\u00e4ure-Ttransporter-Mangel, Kohlenhydrat-defizientes Glykoprotein-Syndrom IIf, Kongenitaler Defekt der Glycoproteinbiosynthese Typ 2f, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Keine Daten verf\u00fcgbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "OMIM": "603585", "UMLS": "C1970344", "GARD": "12409"}, {"name": "SLC35A2-CDG", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, congenital disorder of glycosylation characterized by severe or profound global developmental delay, early epileptic encephalopathy, muscular hypotonia, dysmorphic features (coarse facies, thick eyebrows, broad nasal bridge, thick lips, inverted nipples), variable ocular defects and brain morphological abnormalities on brain MRI (cerebral atrophy, thin corpus callosum).", "synonyms": "CDG syndrome type IIm, CDG-IIm, CDG2M, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type 2m, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type IIm, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "300896", "gard": "12403"}, {"name": "SLC35A3-CDG", "sub_name": "Autismus-Spektrum-St\u00f6rung-Epilepsie-Arthrogrypose-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "SLC35A3-CDG is a form of congenital disorders of N-linked glycosylation characterized by distal arthrogryposis (mild flexion contractures of the fingers, deviation of the distal phalanges, swan-neck deformity), retromicrognathia, general muscle hypotonia, delayed psychomotor development, autism spectrum disorder (speech delay, abnormal use of speech, difficulties in initiating, understanding and maintaining social interaction, limited non-verbal communication and repetitive behavior), seizures, microcephaly and mild to moderate intellectual disability that becomes apparent with age. The disease is caused by mutations in the gene SLC35A3 (1p21).", "synonyms": "SLC35A3-CDG, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "615553"}, {"name": "SLC35C1-CDG", "sub_name": "Leukozytenadh\u00e4sionsdefekt Typ II", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "CDG IIc, CDG-Syndrom Typ IIc, CDG2C, Kongenitaler Defekt der Glycoproteinbiosynthese Typ IIc, LAD-II, Rambam-Hasharon-Syndrom, SLC35C1-CDG, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "266265", "UMLS": "C0398739", "GARD": "4634", "summary": "Der Leukozyten-Adh\u00e4sionsdefekt Typ II (LAD-II) ist eine Form von LAD (sh. dort) mit rezidivierenden bakteriellen Infektionen, starker Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung, Kleinwuchs und schwerem intellektuellen Defizit. LAD-II ist extrem selten, bisher wurden weniger als 10 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die ersten Symptome treten meist schon im S\u00e4uglings- oder fr\u00fchen Kindesalter auf. Die Patienten exprimieren nicht das H-Blutgruppenantigen (Bombay-Ph\u00e4notyp). Faziale Dysmorphien sind h\u00e4ufig, vor allem in Verbindung mit flachem Nasenr\u00fccken. Sp\u00e4ter im Leben wird eine schwere Periodontitis manifest, die zu fr\u00fchem Zahnverlust f\u00fchrt. Im Erwachsenenalter stehen klinisch nicht mehr die Infektionen, sondern intellektuelles Defizit und Kleinwuchs im Vordergrund. LAD-II ist eine carbohydrate-deficient glycoprotein-Krankheit (CDG-Syndrom; s. dort) und ist auch unter dem Namen CDG IIc bekannt. Ursache sind Mutationen im SLC35C1-Gen (11p11.2), das f\u00fcr den Guanosin-5'-diphosphat (GDP)-Fukose-Transporter im Golgi-Apparat kodiert. Dieser spezifische Fukose-Transporter transportiert GDP-Fukose f\u00fcr Fukosylierungsreaktionen vom Zytosol in den Golgi-Apparat. LAD-II wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Die Diagnose ist gest\u00fctzt auf die klinischen Befunde und das vollst\u00e4ndige quantitative Blutbild mit dem Nachweis einer neutrophilen Leukozytose. Entscheidend wichtig ist auch der Nachweis des Bombay-Ph\u00e4notyps, der in der Normalbev\u00f6lkerung extrem selten ist. Durch molekulare Analyse wird die Diagnose gesichert. Wegen der f\u00fcr LAD-II hochspezifischen Kombination von Symptomen (rezidivierende Infektionen, Leukozytose, Bombay-Ph\u00e4notyp, Kleinwuchs, schweres intellektuelles Defizit) gibt es keine Differentialdiagnosen. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist in Chorionzotten oder Amnionzellen durch biochemische Untersuchungen oder, wenn die Mutationen in einer betroffenen Familie bekannt sind, durch molekulare Analyse m\u00f6glich. Die Betreuung zielt auf eine Kontrolle der Infektionen, u.a. mit Antibiotika. In einigen F\u00e4llen wurde durch Fukose-Supplementierung die Phagozytose funktionell verbessert. Die Infektionen sind bei LAD-II selten lebensbedrohlich. Deshalb k\u00f6nnen die Patienten das Erwachsenenalter erreichen."}, {"name": "SLC35D1-CDG", "sub_name": "Schneckenbecken-Dysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Chondrodysplasie mit schnecken\u00e4hnlichem Becken, SLC35D1-CDG, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "269250", "UMLS": "C0432194", "MeSH": "C536637", "GARD": "169", "summary": "Die Schneckenbecken-Dysplasie (oder Chondrodysplasie mit schnecken\u00e4hnlichem Becken) ist eine pr\u00e4natal lethale spondylodysplastische Dysplasie. Bisher wurden weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Der typische r\u00f6ntgenologische Befund ist ein schneckenf\u00f6rmiges, hypoplastisches Becken. Weitere Merkmale sind abgeflachte, hypoplastische Wirbelk\u00f6rper, kurze Rippen, kurze und verbreiterte Fibula, verk\u00fcrzte und verbreiterte lange Knochen mit hantel\u00e4hnlichem Aussehen und vorzeitig verkn\u00f6cherter Tarsus. Ursache dieses autosomal-rezessiv vererbten Syndroms sind Funktionsverlust-Mutationen des SLC35D1-Gens (1p32-p31). "}, {"name": "SLC39A13-abh\u00e4ngiges spEDS", "sub_name": "SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener Subtyp des spondylodysplastischen Ehlers-Danlos-Syndroms (EDS), der durch das Vorhandensein klassischer kutaner Merkmale des EDS gekennzeichnet ist (d. h. hyperextensible, weiche, samtige, d\u00fcnne, durchscheinende Haut mit atrophischer Narbenbildung) in Verbindung mit Kleinwuchs (progressiv im Kindesalter), vorstehenden Augen mit bl\u00e4ulichen Skleren, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfig runzeligen Handfl\u00e4chen, hypotrophen Thenarmuskeln, spitzen Fingern und hypermobilen distalen Gelenken mit Neigung zu Kontrakturen. Charakteristische radiologische Befunde sind Platyspondylie, Osteopenie (vorwiegend an den Wirbeln), verbreiterte Metaphysen (Ellenbogen, Handgelenk, Interphalangen), flache Epiphysen (Oberschenkelhals und kurze R\u00f6hrenknochen) und ein kleines Ileum. Urs\u00e4chlich sind Mutationen im SLC39A13-Gen.", "synonyms": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylo-cheiro dysplastische Form, SCD-EDS, SLC39A13-abh\u00e4ngiges spEDS, SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches EDS, spEDS-SLC39A13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.6", "OMIM": "612350", "UMLS": "C2676510", "GARD": "12610"}, {"name": "SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches EDS", "sub_name": "SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener Subtyp des spondylodysplastischen Ehlers-Danlos-Syndroms (EDS), der durch das Vorhandensein klassischer kutaner Merkmale des EDS gekennzeichnet ist (d. h. hyperextensible, weiche, samtige, d\u00fcnne, durchscheinende Haut mit atrophischer Narbenbildung) in Verbindung mit Kleinwuchs (progressiv im Kindesalter), vorstehenden Augen mit bl\u00e4ulichen Skleren, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfig runzeligen Handfl\u00e4chen, hypotrophen Thenarmuskeln, spitzen Fingern und hypermobilen distalen Gelenken mit Neigung zu Kontrakturen. Charakteristische radiologische Befunde sind Platyspondylie, Osteopenie (vorwiegend an den Wirbeln), verbreiterte Metaphysen (Ellenbogen, Handgelenk, Interphalangen), flache Epiphysen (Oberschenkelhals und kurze R\u00f6hrenknochen) und ein kleines Ileum. Urs\u00e4chlich sind Mutationen im SLC39A13-Gen.", "synonyms": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylo-cheiro dysplastische Form, SCD-EDS, SLC39A13-abh\u00e4ngiges spEDS, SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches EDS, spEDS-SLC39A13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.6", "OMIM": "612350", "UMLS": "C2676510", "GARD": "12610"}, {"name": "SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener Subtyp des spondylodysplastischen Ehlers-Danlos-Syndroms (EDS), der durch das Vorhandensein klassischer kutaner Merkmale des EDS gekennzeichnet ist (d. h. hyperextensible, weiche, samtige, d\u00fcnne, durchscheinende Haut mit atrophischer Narbenbildung) in Verbindung mit Kleinwuchs (progressiv im Kindesalter), vorstehenden Augen mit bl\u00e4ulichen Skleren, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfig runzeligen Handfl\u00e4chen, hypotrophen Thenarmuskeln, spitzen Fingern und hypermobilen distalen Gelenken mit Neigung zu Kontrakturen. Charakteristische radiologische Befunde sind Platyspondylie, Osteopenie (vorwiegend an den Wirbeln), verbreiterte Metaphysen (Ellenbogen, Handgelenk, Interphalangen), flache Epiphysen (Oberschenkelhals und kurze R\u00f6hrenknochen) und ein kleines Ileum. Urs\u00e4chlich sind Mutationen im SLC39A13-Gen.", "synonyms": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylo-cheiro dysplastische Form, SCD-EDS, SLC39A13-abh\u00e4ngiges spEDS, SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches EDS, spEDS-SLC39A13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.6", "OMIM": "612350", "UMLS": "C2676510", "GARD": "12610"}, {"name": "SLC39A8-CDG", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital disorder of glycosylation characterized by infantile onset of global developmental delay, severe intellectual disability, hypotonia, and variable additional features including short stature, cranial asymmetry, seizures, strabismus, recurrent infections, and osteopenia, among others. Laboratory analysis reveals decreased blood levels of zinc and manganese, as well as an abnormal serum transferrin glycosylation pattern with decreased tetrasialo- and increased asialo-, monosialo-, disialo, and trisialo-transferrin, consistent with a type II congenital disorder of glycosylation. Brain imaging shows cerebellar and/or cerebral atrophy.", "synonyms": "CDG syndrome type IIn, CDG-IIn, CDG2N, Carbohydrate deficient glycoprotein syndrome type IIn, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type 2n, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type IIn, SLC39A8 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "616721"}, {"name": "SLC39A8-Mangel", "sub_name": "SLC39A8-CDG", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital disorder of glycosylation characterized by infantile onset of global developmental delay, severe intellectual disability, hypotonia, and variable additional features including short stature, cranial asymmetry, seizures, strabismus, recurrent infections, and osteopenia, among others. Laboratory analysis reveals decreased blood levels of zinc and manganese, as well as an abnormal serum transferrin glycosylation pattern with decreased tetrasialo- and increased asialo-, monosialo-, disialo, and trisialo-transferrin, consistent with a type II congenital disorder of glycosylation. Brain imaging shows cerebellar and/or cerebral atrophy.", "synonyms": "CDG syndrome type IIn, CDG-IIn, CDG2N, Carbohydrate deficient glycoprotein syndrome type IIn, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type 2n, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type IIn, SLC39A8 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "616721"}, {"name": "SLC6A8-Mangel", "sub_name": "Kreatin-Transporter-Mangel, X-chromosomaler", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der X-chromosomale Kreatin-Transporter-Mangel (CRTR-D) ist ein Kreatinmangel-Syndrom, das klinisch durch globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung/Intelligenzminderung (DD/ID) mit ausgepr\u00e4gter Sprach-/Sprachverz\u00f6gerung, autistischem Verhalten und Anf\u00e4llen gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Kreatin-Transporter-Defekt, SLC6A8-Mangel, X-chromosomale Intelligenzminderung - Kr\u00e4mpfe - Kleinwuchs - Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E72.8", "OMIM": "300352", "UMLS": "C1845862", "GARD": "1608", "epidemiology": "CRTR-D wurde bei mehr als 150 Personen weltweit dokumentiert.", "clinical_description": "Der Beginn der Symptome tritt im S\u00e4uglingsalter auf, in der Regel vor dem Alter von 2 Jahren. Es sind haupts\u00e4chlich Knaben betroffen, aber auch weibliche Patienten k\u00f6nnen verschiedene Kombinationen und Schweregrade von Krankheitsmanifestationen aufweisen. CRTR-D ist durchweg gekennzeichnet durch ein leichtes bis schweres intellektuelles Defizit sowie durch expressive Sprach- und Sprachverz\u00f6gerungen. Verhaltensst\u00f6rungen (vor allem Autismus und Hyperaktivit\u00e4t) sind bei allen betroffenen Personen vorhanden. Betroffene Personen erleben oft Anf\u00e4lle und k\u00f6nnen eine geringe Gewichtszunahme, muskul\u00e4re Hypotonie und unterentwickelte Muskelmasse aufweisen. Subtile dysmorphe Merkmale wie Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, langes Gesicht und markantes Kinn wurden bei verschiedenen betroffenen m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten berichtet. Epilepsie und extrapyramidale Symptome k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls gelegentlich beobachtet werden. Bei erwachsenen Patienten wurden Herz- und Magen-Darm-Erkrankungen berichtet. Tr\u00e4gerinnen sind typischerweise asymptomatisch, hier wurden in einigen F\u00e4llen Lernbehinderungen beschrieben.", "etiology": "CRTR-D ist haupts\u00e4chlich auf Frameshift- und Splei\u00dfmutationen im Kreatin-Transporter-Gen SLC6A8 (Xq28) zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, die zu einem zerebralen Kreatinmangel f\u00fchren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Eine CRTR-D sollte bei klinischer Untersuchung von Kinder mit DD/ID plus autistischem Verhalten in Betracht gezogen werden, da sie zur Risikogruppe geh\u00f6ren. Die Diagnose basiert auf der Bestimmung der Urin-Kreatinausscheidung (die erh\u00f6ht ist, insbesondere wenn sie als Urin-Kreatinin-Verh\u00e4ltnis gemessen wird) und dem Nachweis eines Kreatinmangels im Gehirn (wie die Magnetresonanzspektroskopie zeigt). Diese Merkmale sind bei Frauen weniger ausgepr\u00e4gt. Die Diagnose wird durch Gentests auf Mutationen im SLC6A8-Gen best\u00e4tigt. Kreatinaufnahmeuntersuchungen an kultivierten Fibroblasten werden verwendet, um die pathogenetische Relevanz von genetischen Varianten von unklarer Bedeutung zu \u00fcberpr\u00fcfen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst andere St\u00f6rungen des Kreatinmangelsyndroms wie Guanidinoacetat-Methyltransferase-Mangel und L-Arginin:Glycin-Amidinotransferase-Mangel (siehe diese Begriffe). In F\u00e4llen mit patiellen zerebralen Kreatinmangel sollten Argininbernsteins\u00e4ure-Krankheit, Citrullin\u00e4mie Typ I und Atrophia gyrata der Aderhaut und Netzhaut (siehe diese Begriffe) ber\u00fccksichtigt werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale genetische Diagnostik bei Risikopaaren ist m\u00f6glich, wenn die Mutation bei einem betroffenen Familienmitglied identifiziert wurde.", "genetic_counseling": "CRTR-D tritt de novo auf oder wird auf X-chromosomal vererbt, wobei eine Tr\u00e4gerin eine 50%ige Chance hat, die Mutation auf ihre Nachkommen zu \u00fcbertragen. In famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4llen wird ein Test f\u00fcr gef\u00e4hrdete Verwandte auf Anlagetr\u00e4gerschaft empfohlen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung mit hohen Dosen von Kreatinmonohydrat, allein oder in Kombination mit L-Arginin und Glycin, hat bei einigen Patienten zu einer klinischen Verbesserung der Anf\u00e4lle und des Verhaltens gef\u00fchrt, aber in den meisten F\u00e4llen scheint es nicht zu einer Erh\u00f6hung des zerebralen Kreatins zu f\u00fchren. In einer kleinen Kohorte wurde beobachtet, dass die Behandlung zur Erh\u00f6hung der Muskelmasse f\u00fchrte sowie motorische F\u00e4higkeiten verbesserte.", "prognosis": "CRTR-D ist keine lebensbedrohliche Krankheit; die Lebenserwartung ist jedoch begrenzt, insbesondere bei Menschen mit schweren Anf\u00e4llen und damit verbundenen k\u00f6rperlichen Behinderungen.", "summary": "CRTR-D wurde bei mehr als 150 Personen weltweit dokumentiert."}, {"name": "SLE", "sub_name": "Lupus erythematodes, systemischer", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Lupus erythematodes, disseminierter, SLE, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "ICD-10": "M32.0\u00a0 M32.1\u00a0 M32.8\u00a0 M32.9", "MeSH": "D008180", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SLE, autosomal-rezessiver", "sub_name": "Lupus erythematodes, systemischer, autosomal-rezessiver", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal systemic lupus erythematosus is a rare, genetic, multisystemic, chronic autoimmune disease characterized by the presence of systemic lupus erythematosus symptoms in two or more members of a single family. Patients present a wide spectrum of clinical manifestations, including cutaneous (malar rash, photosensitivity), ocular (keratoconjunctivitis sicca, retinopathy), gastrointestinal (oral ulceration, abdominal pain), cardiac (atherosclerosis, chest pain), pulmonary (serositis, pleurisy), musculoskeletal (arthralgia, myalgia), renal (nephritis, hematuria), obstetrical (increased spontaneous abortions, neonatal lupus), constitutional (fatigue, loss of appetite) and neuropsychiatric (mood and cognitive disorders) involvement, among others.", "synonyms": "Autosomal SLE, Familial SLE, Familial systemic lupus erythematosus, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "M32.8", "omim": "614420"}, {"name": "SLE, famili\u00e4rer", "sub_name": "Lupus erythematodes, systemischer, autosomal-rezessiver", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal systemic lupus erythematosus is a rare, genetic, multisystemic, chronic autoimmune disease characterized by the presence of systemic lupus erythematosus symptoms in two or more members of a single family. Patients present a wide spectrum of clinical manifestations, including cutaneous (malar rash, photosensitivity), ocular (keratoconjunctivitis sicca, retinopathy), gastrointestinal (oral ulceration, abdominal pain), cardiac (atherosclerosis, chest pain), pulmonary (serositis, pleurisy), musculoskeletal (arthralgia, myalgia), renal (nephritis, hematuria), obstetrical (increased spontaneous abortions, neonatal lupus), constitutional (fatigue, loss of appetite) and neuropsychiatric (mood and cognitive disorders) involvement, among others.", "synonyms": "Autosomal SLE, Familial SLE, Familial systemic lupus erythematosus, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "M32.8", "omim": "614420"}, {"name": "SLK", "sub_name": "Keratokonjunktivitis, limbische superiore", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare disorder of the anterior segment of the eye characterized by unilateral or bilateral, chronic and recurrent inflammation affecting the upper tarsal and bulbar conjunctiva, as well as the superior limbus, manifesting as a papillary reaction on the upper tarsal conjunctiva, thickening and folding of redundant superior bulbar conjunctiva, and superficial punctate epithelial keratitis with or without filament formation near the superior corneal limbus. Middle-aged women are most commonly affected and present with foreign body sensation, frequent blinking, burning sensation, and pruritus, among others.", "synonyms": "SLK, Theodore superior limbic keratoconjunctivitis, Theodore syndrome, ", "icd_10": "H16.2", "umls": "C0339229", "gard": "10940"}, {"name": "SLSJ-COX-Mangel", "sub_name": "Laktatazidose, kongenitale, Typ Saguenay-Lac-St. Jean", "german_description": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Erkrankung ist nicht bekannt. Sie wurde zuerst in der Region Saguenay-Lac Saint Jean (Quebec, Kanada) beschrieben, wo die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt auf 1: 2.000 gesch\u00e4tzt wird. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der f\u00fcr diese Krankheit urs\u00e4chlichen Genmutation wird in dieser Region auf 1: 23 Bewohner gesch\u00e4tzt. Ursache der gro\u00dfen H\u00e4ufigkeit ist wahrscheinlich ein Gr\u00fcndereffekt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Saguenay-Lac-St. Jean (SLSJ) type congenital lactic acidosis, a French Canadian form of Leigh syndrome (see this term), is a mitochondrial disease characterized by chronic metabolic acidosis, hypotonia, facial dysmorphism and delayed development.", "synonyms": "COX deficiency, French-Canadian type, Cytochrome C oxidase deficiency, French-Canadian type, Cytochrome oxidase deficiency, Saguenay-Lac-Saint-Jean type, Leigh syndrome, French-Canadian type, Leigh syndrome, Saguenay-Lac-Saint-Jean type, SLSJ-COX deficiency, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G31.8", "omim": "220111\u00a0 619065", "umls": "C1857355", "gard": "8370", "epidemiology": "The exact prevalence of this disorder is not known. It was first described in Saguenay-Lac-Saint-Jean (Quebec, Canada) where its prevalence at birth is estimated to be 1/2,000. In this region, the prevalence of the gene mutation underlying the disorder is estimated to be 1/23 inhabitants, and may be due to a founder effect.", "clinical_description": "Facial dysmorphism is characterized by a prominent forehead, wide nasal bridge, hypertelorism, broad anterior fontanelle, midfacial hypoplasia, broad midline, synophrys, and a characteristic arched form of the eyebrows, along with mild hirsutism. There are 3 forms of the disease corresponding to varying degrees of severity: a neonatal form, a classic form and a so-called \"survivor\" form. The neonatal form is characterized by fulminant acidotic states. The classic form can occur from birth with severe lactic acidosis, or manifest between 14 and 24 months by ataxic gait. This form is associated with episodes of lactic acidosis that can be triggered by physical exertion, emotional stress, infection or a heavy meal, and/or metabolic crises. Patients known as \"survivors\", i.e. those who have survived several episodes, cross a critical threshold and show less severe symptoms including hypotonia, asthenia, developmental delay (language acquisition and walking) and, in older patients, truncal ataxia, and a characteristic wide-based gait.", "etiology": "SLSJ congenital lactic acidosis is caused by two types of mutations in the LRPPRC gene (2p21). The most frequent is a single A354V mutation. Only one patient has been identified as a heterozygous carrier of the A354V mutation and the C1277Xdel8 deletion of the same gene. LRPPRC codes for the leucine-rich pentatricopeptide repeat-containing protein and appears to be involved in the transport and stability of mature mitochondrial mRNA. Biochemically, the cytochrome C oxidase enzyme (COX) involved in the respiratory chain was found to be deficient in all patients, but other proteins in the respiratory chain may also be deficient.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on determination of lactate levels in the blood and cerebrospinal fluid, determination of COX activity in fibroblasts, but is made primarily through identification of the A354V mutation, which confirms the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other forms of Leigh syndrome and other possible causes of  metabolic acidosis such as MELAS syndrome, glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase (G6PD) deficiency, pyruvate dehydrogenase deficiency, and pyruvate carboxylase deficiency (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Since the discovery of the underlying mutations in 2003, prenatal diagnosis is offered to couples that have had an affected child.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease follows a monogenic autosomal recessive pattern of inheritance. Genetic counseling can be proposed to couples at risk through identification of heterozygous carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific treatment for the disease. A diet with a balanced intake of proteins, carbohydrates and lipids, spread evenly over the day, is recommended in order to reduce the high energy demands of digestion. Rest and strictly complying with the need for sleep are also beneficial.", "prognosis": "In the neonatal form, the prognosis is very poor. In other patients, life expectancy is often less than 5 years due to severe episodes of acidosis."}, {"name": "SLSN", "sub_name": "Senior-Loken-Syndrom", "german_description": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der weltweiten Pr\u00e4valenz liegen bei etwa 1:1,000,000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive oculo-renal ciliopathy characterized by the association of nephronophthisis (NPHP), a chronic kidney disease, with retinal dystrophy.", "synonyms": "Nephronophthisis with retinal dystrophy, Renal dysplasia-retinal aplasia syndrome, SLSN, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q61.5", "omim": "266900\u00a0 606995\u00a0 606996\u00a0 609254\u00a0 610189\u00a0 613615\u00a0 614845\u00a0 616307\u00a0 616629", "umls": "C0403553", "mesh": "C537580", "gard": "322", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence is estimated at around 1/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "The disease typically presents in the first two decades of life as a combination of nephronophthisis (NPH) with retinal degeneration. Depending on the genetic background either the visual disorder or chronic kidney disease determine the clinical picture. NPH typically presents with symptoms such as polyuria, polydipsia, secondary enuresis and anemia. Chronic kidney disease usually slowly progresses to end-stage kidney disease (ESKD). Ocular features include congenital or early-onset severe visual loss due to retinal dystrophy (Leber congenital amaurosis) or a milder phenotype determined by a slowly progressing tube-like restriction of visual fields and night blindness (tapeto-retinal degeneration). Funduscopy reveals various degrees of atrophic and pigmentary retinal alterations. In rare occasions, other additional clinical signs may be observed like liver fibrosis, obesity and neurologic disorders.", "etiology": "Senior-Loken syndrome (SLS) is a genetically heterogeneous ciliopathy. Mutations in 10 different genes (NPHP1, INVS, NPHP3, NPHP4, IQCB1, CEP290, SDCCAG8, WDR19, CEP164 and TRAF3IP1) have been described. These genes encode for proteins of the primary cilia playing key roles in the development and function of several cell types, including retinal photoreceptor and renal tubular epithelial cells. Epistatic interactions, oligogenic inheritance or modifying alleles have been also suggested to influence the expressivity of the different extrarenal phenotypes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Complete renal (kidney function, urinary analysis and abdominal ultrasound) and ophthalmologic (funduscopy, visual acuity test, refraction defects, color vision test, ocular motility and electroretinogram) evaluations are recommended. Hepatic evaluation to exclude liver fibrosis (liver function and abdominal ultrasounds) and neurological examination for infant patients are also highly recommended. Genetic diagnosis of SLS requires the mutational screening of the implicated genes; deletion of the NPHP1 gene is the most common anomaly.", "differential_diagnosis": "SLS presents genetic and clinical overlap with other ciliopathies, in particular with isolated NPH and Joubert syndrome related diseases (JSRD) such as Joubert syndrome with oculorenal defect, Bardet-Biedl syndrome (BBS) and Alstr\u00f6m syndrome. Physical examination should consider the presence of the main clinical signs of JSRD (hypotonia, ataxia and breathing abnormalities in infants) and BBS (polydactyly and obesity). The phenotypic hallmark of JSRD is the presence of a 'molar tooth sign' (a midbrain-hindbrain malformation) on MRI. Other extrarenal signs to consider are nystagmus, psychomotor and learning delay, diabetes mellitus, deafness, hypogonadism, and/or scoliosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is feasible only when the genetic mutation has been previously identified in another member of the family.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission of SLS is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. Where both parents are unaffected carriers, the risk of disease transmission to offspring is 25%. Offspring of an affected individual are obligate carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "Regular follow up by a pediatric nephrologist is recommended with the monitoring of growth, blood pressure, renal function (including urinary concentration and sodium excretion). In order to delay the progression of renal failure and minimize possible complications, early management of NPH is necessary. So far, there is no specific therapy correcting the genetic or functional defects in NPH. Thus, in the early stage of renal disease the main goal is the correction of water and electrolyte imbalances by replacing the ongoing loss of water and salt. Once end-stage renal disease is reached, dialysis and renal transplantation are the therapies of choice. Disease does not recur after kidney transplantation. No treatment is currently available to prevent the progression of visual loss.", "prognosis": "Prognosis mostly depends on the progression of the disease in the two affected organs (kidney and eye)."}, {"name": "Sly-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Mukopolysaccharidose Typ 7", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte lysosomale Speicherkrankheit, die durch eine Anh\u00e4ufung von Glykosaminoglykanen im Bindegewebe gekennzeichnet ist und zu einer fortschreitenden Multisystembeteiligung f\u00fchrt, deren Schweregrad von leicht bis schwer reicht. Zu den konsistentesten Merkmalen geh\u00f6ren die Beteiligung des Bewegungsapparats (insbesondere Dysostosis multiplex, Gelenkeinschr\u00e4nkungen, Thoraxanomalien und Kleinwuchs), ein eingeschr\u00e4nkter Wortschatz, Intelligenzminderung, grobe Gesichtsz\u00fcge mit kurzem Hals, eine Lungenbeteiligung (\u00fcberwiegend verminderte Lungenfunktion), Hornhauttr\u00fcbung und eine Herzklappenerkrankung.", "synonyms": "Beta-Glucuronidasemangel, MPS7, MPSVII, Mukopolysaccharidose Typ VII, Sly-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit, Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "E76.2", "OMIM": "253220", "UMLS": "C0085132", "MeSH": "D016538", "GARD": "7096", "MedDRA": "10056893", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt wird mit 1/345.000 - 5.000.000 angegeben. Allerdings wird die H\u00e4ufigkeit m\u00f6glicherweise untersch\u00e4tzt, da die pr\u00e4natale Form als h\u00e4ufigste Pr\u00e4sentation nach wie vor unterdiagnostiziert ist.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Symptome sind extrem variabel: Es gibt pr\u00e4natale Formen mit nicht-immunem Hydrops fetalis und schwere neonatale Formen mit Dysmorphien, Hernien, Hepatosplenomegalie, Klumpf\u00fc\u00dfen, Dysostose, Kleinwuchs und schwerer Hypotonie und neurologischer Beteiligung, die bei \u00fcberlebenden Patienten schlie\u00dflich zu einem tiefgreifenden intellektuellen Defizit f\u00fchren. Am anderen Ende des Spektrums gibt es sehr milde F\u00e4lle, die in der Adoleszenz oder im Erwachsenenalter entdeckt werden, nachdem sie mit einer Thoraxkyphose vorgestellt wurden.", "etiology": "Urs\u00e4chlich f\u00fcr die Krankheit sind Mutationen im GUSB -Gen (7q11.21). Sie resultieren in einem beta-D-Glucuronidase-Mangel, der zu einer Anh\u00e4ufung verschiedener Glykosaminoglykane (Dermatansulfat (DS), Heparansulfat (HS) und Chondroitinsulfat (CS)) in Lysosomen f\u00fchrt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch den r\u00f6ntgenologischen Nachweis einer Dysostose multiplex und den Nachweis einer erh\u00f6hten Glykosaminoglykanausscheidung im Urin (entweder CS allein oder CS+HS+DS) unterst\u00fctzt, obwohl dieses Zeichen bei adulten Formen fehlen kann. Die Diagnose wird durch den Nachweis eines Beta-D-Glucuronidase-Mangels in kultivierten Leukozyten oder Fibroblasten best\u00e4tigt. Pseudodefiziente Allele machen milde Formen schwieriger zu identifizieren und die pr\u00e4natale Diagnose schwierig.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst andere Mukopolysaccharidosen und Oligosaccharidosen. Die Messung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t in Leukozyten erm\u00f6glicht bei schweren Formen den Nachweis von heterozygoten Personen. Wenn beide Mutationen beim Patienten bekannt sind, ist die Identifizierung von verwandten Heterozygoten sehr zuverl\u00e4ssig.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die Diagnose ist bei Formen mit in utero-Pr\u00e4sentation m\u00f6glich und kann das Wiederauftreten von Schwangerschaften verhindern, die zum in utero-Tod oder zum sp\u00e4ten Abbruch der Schwangerschaft f\u00fchren. Die pr\u00e4natale Diagnose (durch molekulare Analyse oder durch Messung der Enzymaktivit\u00e4t im Trophoblasten oder in den Amniozyten) kann den Eltern eines betroffenen Kindes angeboten werden. Die Eltern sollten \u00fcber die Verf\u00fcgbarkeit einer Enzymersatztherapie (ERT) informiert werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Das Vererbungsmuster ist autosomal-rezessiv.", "management_and_treatment": "Die ERT mit rekombinanter humaner Beta-Glucuronidase ist in Europa und den USA f\u00fcr MPS Typ 7 zugelassen und hat in klinischen Studien Verbesserungen beim Gehen, der Lungenfunktion und der Hepatosplenomegalie gezeigt. Nach wie vor erm\u00f6glicht ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Management eine angepasste symptomatische Behandlung, die f\u00fcr die Verbesserung der Lebensqualit\u00e4t der Patienten unerl\u00e4sslich ist. Bei Sp\u00e4tformen erfolgt die Behandlung haupts\u00e4chlich orthop\u00e4disch. Eine Knochenmarkstransplantation war bei drei von f\u00fcnf Patienten erfolgreich.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist bei den pr\u00e4natalen Formen, die oft zum Tod im Uterus f\u00fchren, generell schlecht. Neugeborene Formen und Formen im Kindesalter haben meist eine sehr begrenzte Lebenserwartung, w\u00e4hrend mildere Formen eine l\u00e4ngere \u00dcberlebenszeit aufweisen. Obwohl die ERT jetzt verf\u00fcgbar ist, liegen noch keine Langzeitdaten f\u00fcr Patienten vor, die mit dieser Therapie behandelt wurden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt wird mit 1/345.000 - 5.000.000 angegeben. Allerdings wird die H\u00e4ufigkeit m\u00f6glicherweise untersch\u00e4tzt, da die pr\u00e4natale Form als h\u00e4ufigste Pr\u00e4sentation nach wie vor unterdiagnostiziert ist."}, {"name": "SMA", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die proximalen spinalen Muskelatrophien sind eine Gruppe neuromuskul\u00e4rer Krankheiten mit fortschreitender Muskelschw\u00e4che als Folge einer Degeneration oder eines Verlustes der unteren Motorneurone im R\u00fcckenmark (Vorderhornzellen) und in den Kernen des Hirnstamms.", "synonyms": "SMA, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G12.0\u00a0 G12.1", "OMIM": "253300\u00a0 253400\u00a0 253550\u00a0 271150", "GARD": "4531", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:30.000. Nach Erkrankungsalter und Schwere der Symptome wurden vier Untertypen definiert: Typ 1 (SMA1), die schwerste Form, mit Beginn vor dem 6. Lebensmonat; Typ 2 (SMA2), mit Beginn zwischen 6 und 18 Monaten; Typ 3 (SMA3) mit Beginn zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz; und Typ 4 (SMA4), die am wenigsten schwere Verlaufsform mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter (s. diese Termini).", "clinical_description": "Alle Typen sind gekennzeichnet durch Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie unterschiedlichen Schweregrades besonders der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und der Atemmuskulatur. Die Schw\u00e4che ist fast immer symmetrisch und progredient. Skoliose, Muskelretraktion und Gelenkkontrakturen k\u00f6nnen auftreten. H\u00e4ufig bestehen Obstipation und gastro-\u00f6sophagealer Reflux.", "etiology": "Etwa 95% der F\u00e4lle von SMA sind durch homozygote Deletionen entweder des Exons 7 oder der Exons 7 und 8 des SMN1-Gens (5q12.2-q13.3) verursacht. Dieses Gen kodiert f\u00fcr das SMN (survival motor neuron)-Protein. Ein zweites SMN-Gen (SMN2; 5q13.2) ist an der Produktion von nur 10% des vollst\u00e4ndigen SMN-Proteins beteiligt. Der Schweregrad der SMA ist variabel, korreliert aber invers mit der Zahl der SMN2-Genkopien, wenn auch nicht strikt: Patienten mit 3 oder 4 Kopien manifestieren h\u00e4ufiger SMA3/4 als SMA1. Gefunden wurden auch Deletionen des NAIP-Gens (5q13.1). Evtl. spielen sie eine Rolle bei der Modifizierung des Schweregrades. Die SMN1- und NAIP-Deletionen werden autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle sind durch Neumutationen verursacht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Vorgeschichte und klinisches Bild f\u00fchren zur Diagnose, die durch genetische Analyse gesichert wird. Weitere diagnostische Verfahren sind Elektromyographie und Muskelbiopsie.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdignosen sind Amyotrophe Lateralsklerose, kongenitale Muskeldystrophien, kongenitale Myopathien, prim\u00e4re Lateralsklerose, Myasthenia gravis und St\u00f6rungen des Kohlehydrat-Stoffwechsels (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist durch DNA-Analyse in Amnionzellen oder Chorionzotten m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Den Patienten und ihren Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Gegenw\u00e4rtig laufende klinische Studien untersuchen m\u00f6gliche medikament\u00f6se Behandlungsarten der SMA, die vor allem auf h\u00f6here Spiegel des vollst\u00e4ndigen SMN-Proteins zielen. Bisher jedoch ist die Therapie lediglich symptomatisch und soll durch multidisziplin\u00e4re Betreuung die Lebensqualit\u00e4t verbessern. Notwendig sind Ergo-, Physio- und Atemtherapie. Nicht-invasive Beatmung und Gastrostomie k\u00f6nnen erforderlich werden, auch Antibiotika bei Atemwegsinfektionen. Skoliose und Gelenkver\u00e4nderungen verlangen evtl. chirurgische Korrektur. Im Verlauf k\u00f6nnen die Patienten rollstuhlpflichtig werden oder ein St\u00fctzkorsett/St\u00fctzmieder ben\u00f6tigen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch den Schweregrad der Krankheit bestimmt, der wiederum mit dem Alter bei Krankheitsbeginn korreliert: Fr\u00fch beginnende Formen sind im allgemeinen mit ung\u00fcnstiger Prognose verbunden, w\u00e4hrend die Lebenserwartung bei den Formen mit sp\u00e4tem Beginn nahezu normal ist. Todesursachen sind Ateminsuffizienz und Infektionen.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:30.000. Nach Erkrankungsalter und Schwere der Symptome wurden vier Untertypen definiert: Typ 1 (SMA1), die schwerste Form, mit Beginn vor dem 6. Lebensmonat; Typ 2 (SMA2), mit Beginn zwischen 6 und 18 Monaten; Typ 3 (SMA3) mit Beginn zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz; und Typ 4 (SMA4), die am wenigsten schwere Verlaufsform mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter (s. diese Termini)."}, {"name": "SMA1", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:80.000 und die Jahresinzidenz auf etwa 1:10.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist bei Knaben etwas h\u00e4ufiger als bei M\u00e4dchen. Die Krankheit beginnt vor dem Alter von 6 Monaten, gew\u00f6hnlich vor dem 3. Lebensmonat.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of severe and progressive muscle weakness in the first 6 months of life and presenting with severe, generalized hypotonia and weakness,. Dysphagia and respiratory impairment may also be present at presentation or appear at a later stage. Classically, before the advent of recent therapies, type 1 patients never achieved sitting without support.", "synonyms": "Infantile spinal muscular atrophy, Infantile-onset spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 1, SMA type I, SMA-I, SMA1, Werdnig-Hoffmann disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.0", "omim": "253300", "umls": "C0043116", "gard": "7883", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated at 1/12,000, of which approximately 60% account for type 1.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs before 6 months of age. The severe, symmetrical muscle weakness affects predominantly proximal limbs but often also involves the extremities. Cries are weak. Poor sucking ability and reduced swallowing are frequent, leading to feeding difficulties. Deep tendon reflexes are absent. Patients have paradoxical breathing, a bell shaped chest and develop respiratory failure. Mild contractures (of the knees and, more rarely, of the elbows), and scoliosis may be present. Classically, patients were not able to achieve sitting without support but this has changed following the availability of new treatments.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is clinically suggested by muscle weakness and hypotonia with sparing of the facial muscles, loss of reflexes, typical respiratory pattern with predominance of diaphragmatic movements compared to poor intercostal movements, and tremor. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN2 copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, other spinal muscular atrophies with infantile onset (infantile-onset X-linked spinal muscular atrophy and spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1), congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, some early-onset mitochondrial disorders, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and thus the risk of transmission to offspring is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers. However, around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. This includes respiratory support (noninvasive ventilation and airway clearance), physiotherapy, gastrostomy, and antibiotic treatment in case of pulmonary infection. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it reduces the risk of death and improves motor milestones in type 1 patients, with a number of patients achieving sitting without support. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently successfully completed clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and, for compassionate use, also in Europe. A different approach, using gene therapy, onasemnogene abeparvovec, has also been approved in US and Europe. The results of the clinical trials in young patients also indicate a very high rate of survival beyond 2 years and an improvement of motor function. Real world data are being collected in older patients but are not yet publicly available.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is generally poor with most patients dying within the first two years of life due to respiratory failure. Data on long term outcomes with nusinersen treatment and with other drugs are now becoming increasingly available, suggesting long term survival."}, {"name": "SMA2", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:70.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist etwas h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen als im weiblichen Geschlecht. Sie beginnt zwischen dem 6. und 18. Lebensmonat (meist um den 15. Monat herum).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset between 6 to 18 months of age with progressive, proximal muscle weakness, mild to moderate hypotonia and finger polymyoclonour tremor, with areflexia. Motor milestones are classically limited to independent sitting or standing.", "synonyms": "Intermediate spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 2, SMA type II, SMA-II, SMA2, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253550", "umls": "C0393538\u00a0 C2931358", "gard": "4945", "epidemiology": "In Europe the average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) type 2 is estimated at 1/50,000. Worldwide the prevalence ranges from 1/11,00-175,000.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs between the ages of 6 and 18 months. Classically, before the advent of the new therapies, affected children achieve sitting independently and may acquire standing but do not acquire independent walking. Progressive proximal muscle weakness is symmetrical and greater in the legs than the arms. Finger trembling is frequent. Scoliosis, joint contractures and ankyloses of the mandible are very common . Progressive respiratory muscle weakness can lead to restrictive lung disease. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, neuromuscular junction disease (botulism), and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus cells.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Assisted airway clearance and non-invasive ventilations are helpful. Physiotherapy and occupational therapy are recommended to prevent scoliosis, maintain joint mobility and promote function and mobility. Antibiotic therapy is required in case of pulmonary infection. The scoliosis may require a corset/back brace for support, and almost invariably needs surgical correction. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it improves motor function in type 2 patients, with a number of patients achieving walking. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently, successfully completed a clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and for compassionate use in Europe. Clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential drug treatments.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy for affected individuals is variable but, with the new standards of care, particularly for respiratory insufficiency, the majority of patients survive up to adulthood."}, {"name": "SMA3", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:375.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit wird nach dem 12. Lebensmonat manifest (gew\u00f6hnlich zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz), nach Erlernen des Laufens. Einige Autoren unterscheiden zwei Subtypen: SMA3a und SMA3b. SMA3a wird durch Beginn vor und SMA3b durch Beginn nach dem Alter von 3 Jahren definiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of progressive proximal muscle weakness (legs greater than arms) between 18 months and adulthood. Motor development is heterogeneous but walking is typically acquired.", "synonyms": "Juvenile spinal muscular atrophy, Kugelberg-Welander disease, SMA type 3, SMA type III, SMA-III, SMA3, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253400", "umls": "C0152109", "gard": "198", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000, of which more than 10% account for type 3. Prevalence worldwide ranges between 1/70,00-285,000, although studies are limited.", "clinical_description": "The disease manifests between 18 months of age and adulthood, typically presenting with frequent falls, difficulty climbing steps and proximal weakness. Patients are subdivided based on age of onset: early onset is between 18 months and 3 years of age (type 3a) and is associated with a plateau in motor development, reduced or absent reflexes, finger polymyoclonus tremor and, frequently, loss of ambulation before or around puberty. Later onset (type 3b), between 3 and 21 years of age, is associated with comparatively milder decline in gross motor function. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Abnormal gait characteristics are common in order to compensate for weakness. Typically, patients are spared scoliosis and respiratory muscle weakness but these may be a feature after loss of ambulation. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. Type 3 is associated with 3-4 copy numbers of SMN2.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in a typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other disorders of the peripheral nervous system including myopathies or muscular dystrophies (dystrophinopathies, limb girdle muscular dystrophy, metabolic myopathies, or inflammatory myopathies), inflammatory neuropathies (Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome), neuromuscular junction disorders (myasthenia gravis or congenital myasthenic syndromes), and other motor neuron disorders (non-5q form of SMA or late onset hexosaminidase A deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to patients and their families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended and include exercise programs. Clinical evaluations should include timed function tests including the six-minute walk test. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. Real world data following commercial availability of the drug suggest efficacy in type 3 children and adult patients.", "prognosis": "A wheelchair may be required during childhood for some patients (more commonly those with type 3a), whilst others retain the ability to walk into adulthood. Progression is slow and life expectancy is typically normal. Data on long-term outcomes with nusinersen treatment are not currently available."}, {"name": "SMA4", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 4", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:300.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die SMA4 beginnt in der Regel im zweiten oder dritten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with adult onset, slowly progressive, mild proximal muscle weakness.", "synonyms": "SMA type 4, SMA type IV, SMA-IV, SMA4, Spinal muscular atrophy, adult form, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "271150", "umls": "C1838230", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000 of which approximately 1% account for type 4.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset is typically in the second or third decade of life. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Waddling gait is common. Finger trembling, fasciculation and calf hypertrophy may occur. The clinical picture is similar to that seen in SMA type 3 but the motor weakness is less severe. Cognition is unaffected.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. The disease is modified by the gene SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1 (5q13.1), the copy number of which is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical history and examination. In patients with SMN1 anomalies, the diagnosis may be confirmed by genetic testing. Electromyography and muscle biopsy may be necessary.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include the amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, primary lateral sclerosis, Kennedy disease, myasthenia gravis, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible for families in which the mutations in the SMN1 gene have been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "The SMN1 gene deletions are transmitted in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling should be provided.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptomatic, involves a multidisciplinary approach, and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended. Walking aids may be required as the disease progresses. Documenting functional status in SMA is important, since all patients show limitations in daily functioning. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is now approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. There is no data currently available concerning treatment in SMA type 4; however, it is believed that nusinersen may be most effective when started as soon as possible after diagnosis. Other clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential treatments.", "prognosis": "Affected individuals have a normal life expectancy. The greatest morbidity is on quality of life, with impairment of daily activities. Some patients may lose the ability to walk."}, {"name": "SMABF", "sub_name": "Pr\u00e4natale spinale Muskelatrophie mit kongenitalen Knochenbr\u00fcchen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic motor neuron disease characterized by decreased or absent fetal movements, congenital proximal and distal joint contractures (consistent with arthrogryposis multiplex congenita), and multiple congenital fractures of the long bones. Further manifestations are neonatal respiratory distress, severe muscular hypotonia, areflexia, dysphagia, congenital heart defects, and dysmorphic facial features. Muscle biopsy shows increased fiber-size variation and grouping of larger type I fibers. The disease is usually fatal in infancy due to respiratory failure.", "synonyms": "SMABF, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "omim": "616866\u00a0 616867"}, {"name": "SMAFK", "sub_name": "Proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, autosomal-dominante", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by adulthood-onset of slowly progressive, proximal muscular weakness with fasciculations, amyotrophy, cramps, and absent/hypoactive reflexes, without bulbar or pyramidal involvement.", "synonyms": "Autosomal dominant adult-onset proximal SMA, Autosomal dominant late-onset spinal muscular atrophy, Finkel type, Finkel disease, SMAFK, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "182980", "umls": "C1854058\u00a0 C1866777"}, {"name": "SM-AHN", "sub_name": "Mastozytose, systemische, mit assoziierter h\u00e4matologischer Neoplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine fortgeschrittene Form der systemischen Mastozytose (SM), die durch eine abnorme Ansammlung von neoplastischen Mastzellen (MCs) in einem oder mehreren extrakutanen Organen, haupts\u00e4chlich im Knochenmark, gekennzeichnet ist und mit einer anderen h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie nicht MC-artiger Natur einhergeht.", "synonyms": "SM-AHN, SM-AHNMD, Systemische Mastozytose mit assoziierter klonaler h\u00e4matologischer nicht-Mastzellen-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "\u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C96.2", "UMLS": "C1301365", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf 1/7.700 bis 1/10.400 gesch\u00e4tzt. Es wird angenommen, dass die systemische Mastozytose mit einer assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie (SM-AHN) zwischen 10-40 % aller F\u00e4lle von SM ausmacht.", "clinical_description": "Die Erkrankung betrifft typischerweise Erwachsene und \u00e4ltere Menschen. Obwohl das SM-Kompartiment \u00fcberwiegend vom indolenten Typ (ISM) ist, handelt es sich in seltenen F\u00e4llen um aggressive SM (ASM) oder Mastzellleuk\u00e4mie (MCL). Die assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasien (AHN), die am h\u00e4ufigsten vorkommen, sind myeloische Neoplasien und selten lymphoide Neoplasien. Wenn das SM-Kompartiment indolent ist, werden die biologischen und klinischen Zeichen und die Prognose von der AHN dominiert. Wenn es sich bei dem SM-Kompartiment hingegen um eine ASM oder ein MCL handelt, ist es schwierig, den relativen Beitrag der Mastozytose zu den typischen B- (spiegelt hohe Mastzelllast wider) und C-Befunden (spiegelt Organfunktionsst\u00f6rung(en) wider) zu quantifizieren. Bemerkenswert ist, dass das SM-Kompartiment h\u00e4ufig an Mastzell-Mediator-bedingten Symptomen wie rezidivierenden Synkopen, Kopfschmerzen, Flush, gastrointestinalen Traktsymptomen und in schweren F\u00e4llen an einem lebensbedrohlichen anaphylaktischen Schock beteiligt ist. Eine Hautbeteiligung, haupts\u00e4chlich mit Urticaria pigmentosa (UP), wird h\u00e4ufig beobachtet.", "etiology": "In der \u00fcberwiegenden Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle findet sich eine erworbene und aktivierende Mutation im KIT-Gen (meist D816V), in den abnormen Mastzellen des SM-Kompartiments sowie in den malignen Zellen bestimmter AHN-Typen. SM-AHN ist jedoch oft eine komplexe, multigenetische Erkrankung; Mutationen f\u00fcr SM-CMML oder SM-MDS wurden unter anderem in den Genen TET2, ASXL1 und SRSF2 identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Es ist entscheidend, den jeweiligen Typ der beiden Malignome (SM und AHN) zu bestimmen. Die Diagnose des SM-Kompartiments erfolgt anhand der WHO-Konsensuskriterien. Das SM wird dann als ISM, ASM oder MCL kategorisiert, obwohl dies schwierig sein kann. Weitere Tests (Ph\u00e4notypisierung, Zytogenetik, Molekularbiologie) sind obligatorisch, um die Art des AHNs zu charakterisieren.", "differential_diagnosis": "Wenn die AHN-Komponente myeloischer Natur ist, sind die beiden wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen myelomastozyt\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mien und myeloide Neoplasien mit Expression von Mastzelllinien-Antigenen oder verwandten Gendefekten. Unter bestimmten Umst\u00e4nden kann eine Waldenstr\u00f6m-Makroglobulin\u00e4mie in Betracht gezogen werden. Diese Erkrankungen erf\u00fcllen nicht die SM-Kriterien.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit ist auf somatische Mutationen zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, eine genetische Beratung ist nicht erforderlich.", "management_and_treatment": "Jede Komponente wird gem\u00e4\u00df den Richtlinien f\u00fcr SM und AHN behandelt, unabh\u00e4ngig vom Vorhandensein der anderen Komponente. Da es schwierig ist, klar abzugrenzen, welche Komponente f\u00fcr die klinischen Probleme/Organsch\u00e4den verantwortlich ist, sollten alle Patienten mit SM-AHN als Patienten mit Hochrisikoerkrankung behandelt werden. Midostaurin ist f\u00fcr die Behandlung in Europa und den USA zugelassen, und obwohl es vielversprechend ist mit einer partiellen Remission der SM-Komponente, wurde bisher nicht \u00fcber eine komplette Remission berichtet. Patienten, die eine komplette Remission ihrer AHN erreichen oder ein signifikantes Ansprechen nach der Behandlung zeigen, sollten f\u00fcr eine allogene Stammzelltransplantation (allo-SCT) in Betracht gezogen werden, um ihr Ansprechen zu konsolidieren. Der Einsatz der allo-SCT wird jedoch h\u00e4ufig durch Alter, schlechte Leistungsf\u00e4higkeit oder andere Faktoren eingeschr\u00e4nkt. F\u00fcr diese Patienten ist eine palliative Therapie mit Hydroxyharnstoff erforderlich. MC-Mediator-bedingte Symptome erfordern oft eine unterst\u00fctzende Therapie, einschlie\u00dflich H1- und H2-Rezeptorantagonisten.", "prognosis": "Derzeit wird ein medianes Gesamt\u00fcberleben von 24 Monaten berichtet. Die Prognose von SM-AHN h\u00e4ngt jedoch sowohl von der Art (Aggressivit\u00e4t) des SM als auch von der AHN-Komponente ab, wobei eine l\u00e4ngere mediane \u00dcberlebenszeit bei SM-MPN-Patienten (31 Monate) und eine k\u00fcrzere \u00dcberlebenszeit bei SM-CMML (15 Monate), SM-MDS (13 Monate) und SM-AML (11 Monate) berichtet wird. Dar\u00fcber hinaus kann eine multimutierte Erkrankung die Krankheitsprognose negativ beeinflussen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf 1/7.700 bis 1/10.400 gesch\u00e4tzt. Es wird angenommen, dass die systemische Mastozytose mit einer assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie (SM-AHN) zwischen 10-40 % aller F\u00e4lle von SM ausmacht."}, {"name": "SM-AHNMD", "sub_name": "Mastozytose, systemische, mit assoziierter h\u00e4matologischer Neoplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine fortgeschrittene Form der systemischen Mastozytose (SM), die durch eine abnorme Ansammlung von neoplastischen Mastzellen (MCs) in einem oder mehreren extrakutanen Organen, haupts\u00e4chlich im Knochenmark, gekennzeichnet ist und mit einer anderen h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie nicht MC-artiger Natur einhergeht.", "synonyms": "SM-AHN, SM-AHNMD, Systemische Mastozytose mit assoziierter klonaler h\u00e4matologischer nicht-Mastzellen-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "\u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C96.2", "UMLS": "C1301365", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf 1/7.700 bis 1/10.400 gesch\u00e4tzt. Es wird angenommen, dass die systemische Mastozytose mit einer assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie (SM-AHN) zwischen 10-40 % aller F\u00e4lle von SM ausmacht.", "clinical_description": "Die Erkrankung betrifft typischerweise Erwachsene und \u00e4ltere Menschen. Obwohl das SM-Kompartiment \u00fcberwiegend vom indolenten Typ (ISM) ist, handelt es sich in seltenen F\u00e4llen um aggressive SM (ASM) oder Mastzellleuk\u00e4mie (MCL). Die assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasien (AHN), die am h\u00e4ufigsten vorkommen, sind myeloische Neoplasien und selten lymphoide Neoplasien. Wenn das SM-Kompartiment indolent ist, werden die biologischen und klinischen Zeichen und die Prognose von der AHN dominiert. Wenn es sich bei dem SM-Kompartiment hingegen um eine ASM oder ein MCL handelt, ist es schwierig, den relativen Beitrag der Mastozytose zu den typischen B- (spiegelt hohe Mastzelllast wider) und C-Befunden (spiegelt Organfunktionsst\u00f6rung(en) wider) zu quantifizieren. Bemerkenswert ist, dass das SM-Kompartiment h\u00e4ufig an Mastzell-Mediator-bedingten Symptomen wie rezidivierenden Synkopen, Kopfschmerzen, Flush, gastrointestinalen Traktsymptomen und in schweren F\u00e4llen an einem lebensbedrohlichen anaphylaktischen Schock beteiligt ist. Eine Hautbeteiligung, haupts\u00e4chlich mit Urticaria pigmentosa (UP), wird h\u00e4ufig beobachtet.", "etiology": "In der \u00fcberwiegenden Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle findet sich eine erworbene und aktivierende Mutation im KIT-Gen (meist D816V), in den abnormen Mastzellen des SM-Kompartiments sowie in den malignen Zellen bestimmter AHN-Typen. SM-AHN ist jedoch oft eine komplexe, multigenetische Erkrankung; Mutationen f\u00fcr SM-CMML oder SM-MDS wurden unter anderem in den Genen TET2, ASXL1 und SRSF2 identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Es ist entscheidend, den jeweiligen Typ der beiden Malignome (SM und AHN) zu bestimmen. Die Diagnose des SM-Kompartiments erfolgt anhand der WHO-Konsensuskriterien. Das SM wird dann als ISM, ASM oder MCL kategorisiert, obwohl dies schwierig sein kann. Weitere Tests (Ph\u00e4notypisierung, Zytogenetik, Molekularbiologie) sind obligatorisch, um die Art des AHNs zu charakterisieren.", "differential_diagnosis": "Wenn die AHN-Komponente myeloischer Natur ist, sind die beiden wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen myelomastozyt\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mien und myeloide Neoplasien mit Expression von Mastzelllinien-Antigenen oder verwandten Gendefekten. Unter bestimmten Umst\u00e4nden kann eine Waldenstr\u00f6m-Makroglobulin\u00e4mie in Betracht gezogen werden. Diese Erkrankungen erf\u00fcllen nicht die SM-Kriterien.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit ist auf somatische Mutationen zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, eine genetische Beratung ist nicht erforderlich.", "management_and_treatment": "Jede Komponente wird gem\u00e4\u00df den Richtlinien f\u00fcr SM und AHN behandelt, unabh\u00e4ngig vom Vorhandensein der anderen Komponente. Da es schwierig ist, klar abzugrenzen, welche Komponente f\u00fcr die klinischen Probleme/Organsch\u00e4den verantwortlich ist, sollten alle Patienten mit SM-AHN als Patienten mit Hochrisikoerkrankung behandelt werden. Midostaurin ist f\u00fcr die Behandlung in Europa und den USA zugelassen, und obwohl es vielversprechend ist mit einer partiellen Remission der SM-Komponente, wurde bisher nicht \u00fcber eine komplette Remission berichtet. Patienten, die eine komplette Remission ihrer AHN erreichen oder ein signifikantes Ansprechen nach der Behandlung zeigen, sollten f\u00fcr eine allogene Stammzelltransplantation (allo-SCT) in Betracht gezogen werden, um ihr Ansprechen zu konsolidieren. Der Einsatz der allo-SCT wird jedoch h\u00e4ufig durch Alter, schlechte Leistungsf\u00e4higkeit oder andere Faktoren eingeschr\u00e4nkt. F\u00fcr diese Patienten ist eine palliative Therapie mit Hydroxyharnstoff erforderlich. MC-Mediator-bedingte Symptome erfordern oft eine unterst\u00fctzende Therapie, einschlie\u00dflich H1- und H2-Rezeptorantagonisten.", "prognosis": "Derzeit wird ein medianes Gesamt\u00fcberleben von 24 Monaten berichtet. Die Prognose von SM-AHN h\u00e4ngt jedoch sowohl von der Art (Aggressivit\u00e4t) des SM als auch von der AHN-Komponente ab, wobei eine l\u00e4ngere mediane \u00dcberlebenszeit bei SM-MPN-Patienten (31 Monate) und eine k\u00fcrzere \u00dcberlebenszeit bei SM-CMML (15 Monate), SM-MDS (13 Monate) und SM-AML (11 Monate) berichtet wird. Dar\u00fcber hinaus kann eine multimutierte Erkrankung die Krankheitsprognose negativ beeinflussen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf 1/7.700 bis 1/10.400 gesch\u00e4tzt. Es wird angenommen, dass die systemische Mastozytose mit einer assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie (SM-AHN) zwischen 10-40 % aller F\u00e4lle von SM ausmacht."}, {"name": "SMA-I", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:80.000 und die Jahresinzidenz auf etwa 1:10.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist bei Knaben etwas h\u00e4ufiger als bei M\u00e4dchen. Die Krankheit beginnt vor dem Alter von 6 Monaten, gew\u00f6hnlich vor dem 3. Lebensmonat.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of severe and progressive muscle weakness in the first 6 months of life and presenting with severe, generalized hypotonia and weakness,. Dysphagia and respiratory impairment may also be present at presentation or appear at a later stage. Classically, before the advent of recent therapies, type 1 patients never achieved sitting without support.", "synonyms": "Infantile spinal muscular atrophy, Infantile-onset spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 1, SMA type I, SMA-I, SMA1, Werdnig-Hoffmann disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.0", "omim": "253300", "umls": "C0043116", "gard": "7883", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated at 1/12,000, of which approximately 60% account for type 1.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs before 6 months of age. The severe, symmetrical muscle weakness affects predominantly proximal limbs but often also involves the extremities. Cries are weak. Poor sucking ability and reduced swallowing are frequent, leading to feeding difficulties. Deep tendon reflexes are absent. Patients have paradoxical breathing, a bell shaped chest and develop respiratory failure. Mild contractures (of the knees and, more rarely, of the elbows), and scoliosis may be present. Classically, patients were not able to achieve sitting without support but this has changed following the availability of new treatments.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is clinically suggested by muscle weakness and hypotonia with sparing of the facial muscles, loss of reflexes, typical respiratory pattern with predominance of diaphragmatic movements compared to poor intercostal movements, and tremor. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN2 copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, other spinal muscular atrophies with infantile onset (infantile-onset X-linked spinal muscular atrophy and spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1), congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, some early-onset mitochondrial disorders, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and thus the risk of transmission to offspring is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers. However, around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. This includes respiratory support (noninvasive ventilation and airway clearance), physiotherapy, gastrostomy, and antibiotic treatment in case of pulmonary infection. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it reduces the risk of death and improves motor milestones in type 1 patients, with a number of patients achieving sitting without support. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently successfully completed clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and, for compassionate use, also in Europe. A different approach, using gene therapy, onasemnogene abeparvovec, has also been approved in US and Europe. The results of the clinical trials in young patients also indicate a very high rate of survival beyond 2 years and an improvement of motor function. Real world data are being collected in older patients but are not yet publicly available.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is generally poor with most patients dying within the first two years of life due to respiratory failure. Data on long term outcomes with nusinersen treatment and with other drugs are now becoming increasingly available, suggesting long term survival."}, {"name": "SMA-II", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:70.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist etwas h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen als im weiblichen Geschlecht. Sie beginnt zwischen dem 6. und 18. Lebensmonat (meist um den 15. Monat herum).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset between 6 to 18 months of age with progressive, proximal muscle weakness, mild to moderate hypotonia and finger polymyoclonour tremor, with areflexia. Motor milestones are classically limited to independent sitting or standing.", "synonyms": "Intermediate spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 2, SMA type II, SMA-II, SMA2, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253550", "umls": "C0393538\u00a0 C2931358", "gard": "4945", "epidemiology": "In Europe the average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) type 2 is estimated at 1/50,000. Worldwide the prevalence ranges from 1/11,00-175,000.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs between the ages of 6 and 18 months. Classically, before the advent of the new therapies, affected children achieve sitting independently and may acquire standing but do not acquire independent walking. Progressive proximal muscle weakness is symmetrical and greater in the legs than the arms. Finger trembling is frequent. Scoliosis, joint contractures and ankyloses of the mandible are very common . Progressive respiratory muscle weakness can lead to restrictive lung disease. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, neuromuscular junction disease (botulism), and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus cells.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Assisted airway clearance and non-invasive ventilations are helpful. Physiotherapy and occupational therapy are recommended to prevent scoliosis, maintain joint mobility and promote function and mobility. Antibiotic therapy is required in case of pulmonary infection. The scoliosis may require a corset/back brace for support, and almost invariably needs surgical correction. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it improves motor function in type 2 patients, with a number of patients achieving walking. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently, successfully completed a clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and for compassionate use in Europe. Clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential drug treatments.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy for affected individuals is variable but, with the new standards of care, particularly for respiratory insufficiency, the majority of patients survive up to adulthood."}, {"name": "SMA-III", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:375.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit wird nach dem 12. Lebensmonat manifest (gew\u00f6hnlich zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz), nach Erlernen des Laufens. Einige Autoren unterscheiden zwei Subtypen: SMA3a und SMA3b. SMA3a wird durch Beginn vor und SMA3b durch Beginn nach dem Alter von 3 Jahren definiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of progressive proximal muscle weakness (legs greater than arms) between 18 months and adulthood. Motor development is heterogeneous but walking is typically acquired.", "synonyms": "Juvenile spinal muscular atrophy, Kugelberg-Welander disease, SMA type 3, SMA type III, SMA-III, SMA3, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253400", "umls": "C0152109", "gard": "198", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000, of which more than 10% account for type 3. Prevalence worldwide ranges between 1/70,00-285,000, although studies are limited.", "clinical_description": "The disease manifests between 18 months of age and adulthood, typically presenting with frequent falls, difficulty climbing steps and proximal weakness. Patients are subdivided based on age of onset: early onset is between 18 months and 3 years of age (type 3a) and is associated with a plateau in motor development, reduced or absent reflexes, finger polymyoclonus tremor and, frequently, loss of ambulation before or around puberty. Later onset (type 3b), between 3 and 21 years of age, is associated with comparatively milder decline in gross motor function. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Abnormal gait characteristics are common in order to compensate for weakness. Typically, patients are spared scoliosis and respiratory muscle weakness but these may be a feature after loss of ambulation. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. Type 3 is associated with 3-4 copy numbers of SMN2.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in a typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other disorders of the peripheral nervous system including myopathies or muscular dystrophies (dystrophinopathies, limb girdle muscular dystrophy, metabolic myopathies, or inflammatory myopathies), inflammatory neuropathies (Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome), neuromuscular junction disorders (myasthenia gravis or congenital myasthenic syndromes), and other motor neuron disorders (non-5q form of SMA or late onset hexosaminidase A deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to patients and their families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended and include exercise programs. Clinical evaluations should include timed function tests including the six-minute walk test. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. Real world data following commercial availability of the drug suggest efficacy in type 3 children and adult patients.", "prognosis": "A wheelchair may be required during childhood for some patients (more commonly those with type 3a), whilst others retain the ability to walk into adulthood. Progression is slow and life expectancy is typically normal. Data on long-term outcomes with nusinersen treatment are not currently available."}, {"name": "SMA-IV", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 4", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:300.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die SMA4 beginnt in der Regel im zweiten oder dritten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with adult onset, slowly progressive, mild proximal muscle weakness.", "synonyms": "SMA type 4, SMA type IV, SMA-IV, SMA4, Spinal muscular atrophy, adult form, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "271150", "umls": "C1838230", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000 of which approximately 1% account for type 4.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset is typically in the second or third decade of life. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Waddling gait is common. Finger trembling, fasciculation and calf hypertrophy may occur. The clinical picture is similar to that seen in SMA type 3 but the motor weakness is less severe. Cognition is unaffected.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. The disease is modified by the gene SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1 (5q13.1), the copy number of which is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical history and examination. In patients with SMN1 anomalies, the diagnosis may be confirmed by genetic testing. Electromyography and muscle biopsy may be necessary.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include the amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, primary lateral sclerosis, Kennedy disease, myasthenia gravis, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible for families in which the mutations in the SMN1 gene have been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "The SMN1 gene deletions are transmitted in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling should be provided.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptomatic, involves a multidisciplinary approach, and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended. Walking aids may be required as the disease progresses. Documenting functional status in SMA is important, since all patients show limitations in daily functioning. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is now approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. There is no data currently available concerning treatment in SMA type 4; however, it is believed that nusinersen may be most effective when started as soon as possible after diagnosis. Other clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential treatments.", "prognosis": "Affected individuals have a normal life expectancy. The greatest morbidity is on quality of life, with impairment of daily activities. Some patients may lose the ability to walk."}, {"name": "SMAJ", "sub_name": "Untere Vorderhornerkrankung mit Beginn im sp\u00e4ten Erwachsenenalter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by slowly progressive, predominantly proximal, muscular weakness and atrophy which typically manifests with muscle cramps, fasciculations, decreased/absent deep tendon reflexes, hand tremor, and elevated serum creatine kinase at onset and later associates with reduced walking ability and impaired vibration sensation.", "synonyms": "LOSMoN, Late-onset spinal motor neuronopathy, SMAJ, Spinal muscular atrophy, Jokela type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "615048", "epidemiology": "More than 97 patients have been described with Lower motor neuron syndrome with late-adult onset to date, all originating from Finland, where the point prevalence estimate rises to 1/8,000 in northern Karelia.", "clinical_description": "The main early signs generally present after 30 to 40 years of age, and usually include muscle cramps, fasciculations, decreased/absent deep tendon reflexes, elevated serum creatine kinase, and hand tremor. Disease progresses slowly and leads to muscular weakness and mild to moderate atrophy (predominantly affecting the proximal lower limbs, although occasional distal upper limb and abdominal involvement has also been reported). Impaired vibration sensation in the lower limbs may occur later in life, and some patients may develop mild dysphagia. Additional signs and symptoms include myalgia, and fatty degenerative replacement predominantly in the calves and hamstrings muscles. Respiratory functions are usually normal and there are no upper motor neuron signs.", "etiology": "The disease is caused by a pathogenic mutation (p.G66V) in the CHCHD10 gene (22q11.2), encoding a mitochondrial, coiled-coil-helix-coiled-coil-helix protein of unknown function. CHCHD10 is involved in oxidative phosphorylation and possibly takes part in mitochondrial complex function (particularly complex IV), and in maintaining mitochondrial DNA. The exact pathogenic mechanism of this mutation remains poorly understood.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and electromyographic evaluation showing prominent fasciculations and chronic denervation in all limbs and possibly in the trunk, as well as evidence of neurogenic changes on muscle biopsy. Diagnosis is confirmed by identification of a causative mutation on the CHCHD10 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "The disorder must be differentiated from other neuromuscular diseases, including autosomal dominant adult-onset proximal spinal muscular atrophy and amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), due to significant genetic and/or clinical overlap.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known disease causing mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease follows an autosomal dominant pattern of inheritance. Genetic counseling should be provided to affected families, informing them of the 50% risk of transmission in future pregnancies.", "management_and_treatment": "Disease management is mainly symptomatic, as no specific treatment is available to date.", "prognosis": "The disease has a relatively mild course, as most patients remain ambulatory for several decades after disease onset and present a normal life expectancy."}, {"name": "SMALED", "sub_name": "Proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Kindesalter, autosomal-dominant", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neuromuscular disease characterized by early onset muscular weakness with predominant proximal lower limb involvement. The disorder is static or only mildly progressive. The severity of manifestations ranges from lethal, congenital muscular atrophy with arthrogryposis to asymptomatic with subclinical features.", "synonyms": "Lower extremity-predominant autosomal dominant proximal spinal muscular atrophy, SMALED, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "158600\u00a0 615290", "umls": "C1834690"}, {"name": "SMALED1", "sub_name": "DYNC1H1-assoziierte autosomal-dominante im Kindesalter beginnende proximale spinale Muskelatrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "DYNC1H1-assoziierte autosomal-dominante proximale spinale Muskelatrophie vorwiegend der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten, SMALED1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G12.1", "OMIM": "158600", "UMLS": "C1834690", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Kindesalter, autosomal-dominant"}, {"name": "SMALED2", "sub_name": "BICD2-assoziierte proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Kindesalter, autosomal-dominant", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "BICD2-assoziierte autosomal dominante spinale Muskelatrophie mit vorwiegender Beinbeteiligung Typ 2, SMALED2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Vorgeburtlich, Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G12.1", "OMIM": "615290", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Kindesalter, autosomal-dominant"}, {"name": "Small-Patella-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Coxo-podo-patellares Syndrom, Dysplasie, ischiopatellare, Scott-Taor-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q74.1", "OMIM": "147891", "UMLS": "C1840061\u00a0 C1868581", "GARD": "3030", "summary": "Das Syndrom der kleinen Patella (Small-Patella-Syndrom, SPS) ist eine sehr seltene benigne Knochendysplasie und betrifft die unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und das Becken. Weltweit wurden bisher weniger als 50 Patienten beschrieben. Das haupts\u00e4chliche klinische Symptom, eine Aplasie oder Hypoplasie der Patella, ist assoziiert mit fehlender oder verz\u00f6gerter oder unregelm\u00e4\u00dfiger Ossifikation der Scham- und Sitzbein\u00e4ste und/oder mit infra-azetabul\u00e4ren Kerben ('wie mit der Axt geschlagen'). Die meisten Patienten haben neben Anomalien des Femur auch Fu\u00dfanomalien (weiter Abstand zwischen erster und zweiter Zehe, verk\u00fcrzter 4. und 5. Strahl des Fu\u00dfskeletts, Pes planus). Gelegentlich wurde auch \u00fcber kranio-faziale Anomalien berichtet (Mikrogenie, Gaumenspalte, flache Nase, prominente Stirn). Die Patella-, Becken- und Fu\u00dfanomalien k\u00f6nnen innerhalb einer Familie unterschiedlich schwer ausgepr\u00e4gt sein. Die Zeichen und Symptome reichen von Schmerzen, die \u00e4ltere Patienten wegen einer Arthrose der Kniegelenke (Gonarthrose) haben, bis hin zu im Kindesalter erstmals auftretenden, rezidivierenden Luxationen, mit schmerzenden Knien und der Unf\u00e4higkeit schnell zu laufen und Fahrrad zu fahren. Andere Patienten wieder sind symptomfrei. Das SPS wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im TBX4-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 17q22. Mutationen in diesem Gen werden in Familien mit und ohne charakteristische faziale Anomalien gefunden, ohne dass eine Genotyp-Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelation erkennbar ist. Die Diagnose wird klinisch und r\u00f6ntgenologisch gestellt. Das SPS muss von anderen Krankheiten mit aplastischer oder hypoplastischer Patella differenziert werden, z.B. dem famili\u00e4ren Patella-Aplasie-Hypoplasie-Snndrom (PTLAH) und dem klinisch schwerer verlaufenden Nagel-Patella-Syndrom (NPS). Fr\u00fche chirurgische Behandlung, Schmerztherapie und unterst\u00fctzende Ma\u00dfnahmen sind angezeigt. "}, {"name": "SMA mit Atemnot", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1 is a rare genetic motor neuron disease characterized by severe respiratory distress/respiratory failure in association with diaphragmatic eventration and palsy, as well as progressive, symmetrical, distal-to-proximal muscle weakness and atrophy (in lower limbs especially). Patients typically have a history of intrauterine growth retardation, low birth weight, feeble cry, weak suck and failure to thrive and present with inspiratory stridor, recurrent episodes of dyspnea or apnea, cyanosis and absent deep tendon reflexes. Kyphosis/scoliosis, foot deformities and joint contractures are frequently associated features.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive distal spinal muscular atrophy type 1, Autosomal recessive spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy, Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type 6, Distal-HMN type 6, SIANRF, SMARD1, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 1, dHMN6, dSMA1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "604320", "umls": "C1858517", "gard": "8592"}, {"name": "SMARD1", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1 is a rare genetic motor neuron disease characterized by severe respiratory distress/respiratory failure in association with diaphragmatic eventration and palsy, as well as progressive, symmetrical, distal-to-proximal muscle weakness and atrophy (in lower limbs especially). Patients typically have a history of intrauterine growth retardation, low birth weight, feeble cry, weak suck and failure to thrive and present with inspiratory stridor, recurrent episodes of dyspnea or apnea, cyanosis and absent deep tendon reflexes. Kyphosis/scoliosis, foot deformities and joint contractures are frequently associated features.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive distal spinal muscular atrophy type 1, Autosomal recessive spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy, Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type 6, Distal-HMN type 6, SIANRF, SMARD1, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 1, dHMN6, dSMA1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "604320", "umls": "C1858517", "gard": "8592"}, {"name": "SMARD2", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 2 is a rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by progressive early respiratory failure associated with diaphragm paralysis, distal muscular weakness, joint contractures, and axial hypotonia with preserved antigravity limb movements. Phenotype overlaps considerably with SMARD type 1 but is differentiated by a mutation in a different gene.", "synonyms": "Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy type 2, SMARD2, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 2, X-linked spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2"}, {"name": "SMA Typ 1", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:80.000 und die Jahresinzidenz auf etwa 1:10.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist bei Knaben etwas h\u00e4ufiger als bei M\u00e4dchen. Die Krankheit beginnt vor dem Alter von 6 Monaten, gew\u00f6hnlich vor dem 3. Lebensmonat.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of severe and progressive muscle weakness in the first 6 months of life and presenting with severe, generalized hypotonia and weakness,. Dysphagia and respiratory impairment may also be present at presentation or appear at a later stage. Classically, before the advent of recent therapies, type 1 patients never achieved sitting without support.", "synonyms": "Infantile spinal muscular atrophy, Infantile-onset spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 1, SMA type I, SMA-I, SMA1, Werdnig-Hoffmann disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.0", "omim": "253300", "umls": "C0043116", "gard": "7883", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated at 1/12,000, of which approximately 60% account for type 1.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs before 6 months of age. The severe, symmetrical muscle weakness affects predominantly proximal limbs but often also involves the extremities. Cries are weak. Poor sucking ability and reduced swallowing are frequent, leading to feeding difficulties. Deep tendon reflexes are absent. Patients have paradoxical breathing, a bell shaped chest and develop respiratory failure. Mild contractures (of the knees and, more rarely, of the elbows), and scoliosis may be present. Classically, patients were not able to achieve sitting without support but this has changed following the availability of new treatments.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is clinically suggested by muscle weakness and hypotonia with sparing of the facial muscles, loss of reflexes, typical respiratory pattern with predominance of diaphragmatic movements compared to poor intercostal movements, and tremor. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN2 copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, other spinal muscular atrophies with infantile onset (infantile-onset X-linked spinal muscular atrophy and spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1), congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, some early-onset mitochondrial disorders, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and thus the risk of transmission to offspring is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers. However, around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. This includes respiratory support (noninvasive ventilation and airway clearance), physiotherapy, gastrostomy, and antibiotic treatment in case of pulmonary infection. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it reduces the risk of death and improves motor milestones in type 1 patients, with a number of patients achieving sitting without support. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently successfully completed clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and, for compassionate use, also in Europe. A different approach, using gene therapy, onasemnogene abeparvovec, has also been approved in US and Europe. The results of the clinical trials in young patients also indicate a very high rate of survival beyond 2 years and an improvement of motor function. Real world data are being collected in older patients but are not yet publicly available.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is generally poor with most patients dying within the first two years of life due to respiratory failure. Data on long term outcomes with nusinersen treatment and with other drugs are now becoming increasingly available, suggesting long term survival."}, {"name": "SMA Typ 2", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:70.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist etwas h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen als im weiblichen Geschlecht. Sie beginnt zwischen dem 6. und 18. Lebensmonat (meist um den 15. Monat herum).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset between 6 to 18 months of age with progressive, proximal muscle weakness, mild to moderate hypotonia and finger polymyoclonour tremor, with areflexia. Motor milestones are classically limited to independent sitting or standing.", "synonyms": "Intermediate spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 2, SMA type II, SMA-II, SMA2, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253550", "umls": "C0393538\u00a0 C2931358", "gard": "4945", "epidemiology": "In Europe the average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) type 2 is estimated at 1/50,000. Worldwide the prevalence ranges from 1/11,00-175,000.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs between the ages of 6 and 18 months. Classically, before the advent of the new therapies, affected children achieve sitting independently and may acquire standing but do not acquire independent walking. Progressive proximal muscle weakness is symmetrical and greater in the legs than the arms. Finger trembling is frequent. Scoliosis, joint contractures and ankyloses of the mandible are very common . Progressive respiratory muscle weakness can lead to restrictive lung disease. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, neuromuscular junction disease (botulism), and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus cells.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Assisted airway clearance and non-invasive ventilations are helpful. Physiotherapy and occupational therapy are recommended to prevent scoliosis, maintain joint mobility and promote function and mobility. Antibiotic therapy is required in case of pulmonary infection. The scoliosis may require a corset/back brace for support, and almost invariably needs surgical correction. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it improves motor function in type 2 patients, with a number of patients achieving walking. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently, successfully completed a clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and for compassionate use in Europe. Clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential drug treatments.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy for affected individuals is variable but, with the new standards of care, particularly for respiratory insufficiency, the majority of patients survive up to adulthood."}, {"name": "SMA Typ 3", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:375.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit wird nach dem 12. Lebensmonat manifest (gew\u00f6hnlich zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz), nach Erlernen des Laufens. Einige Autoren unterscheiden zwei Subtypen: SMA3a und SMA3b. SMA3a wird durch Beginn vor und SMA3b durch Beginn nach dem Alter von 3 Jahren definiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of progressive proximal muscle weakness (legs greater than arms) between 18 months and adulthood. Motor development is heterogeneous but walking is typically acquired.", "synonyms": "Juvenile spinal muscular atrophy, Kugelberg-Welander disease, SMA type 3, SMA type III, SMA-III, SMA3, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253400", "umls": "C0152109", "gard": "198", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000, of which more than 10% account for type 3. Prevalence worldwide ranges between 1/70,00-285,000, although studies are limited.", "clinical_description": "The disease manifests between 18 months of age and adulthood, typically presenting with frequent falls, difficulty climbing steps and proximal weakness. Patients are subdivided based on age of onset: early onset is between 18 months and 3 years of age (type 3a) and is associated with a plateau in motor development, reduced or absent reflexes, finger polymyoclonus tremor and, frequently, loss of ambulation before or around puberty. Later onset (type 3b), between 3 and 21 years of age, is associated with comparatively milder decline in gross motor function. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Abnormal gait characteristics are common in order to compensate for weakness. Typically, patients are spared scoliosis and respiratory muscle weakness but these may be a feature after loss of ambulation. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. Type 3 is associated with 3-4 copy numbers of SMN2.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in a typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other disorders of the peripheral nervous system including myopathies or muscular dystrophies (dystrophinopathies, limb girdle muscular dystrophy, metabolic myopathies, or inflammatory myopathies), inflammatory neuropathies (Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome), neuromuscular junction disorders (myasthenia gravis or congenital myasthenic syndromes), and other motor neuron disorders (non-5q form of SMA or late onset hexosaminidase A deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to patients and their families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended and include exercise programs. Clinical evaluations should include timed function tests including the six-minute walk test. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. Real world data following commercial availability of the drug suggest efficacy in type 3 children and adult patients.", "prognosis": "A wheelchair may be required during childhood for some patients (more commonly those with type 3a), whilst others retain the ability to walk into adulthood. Progression is slow and life expectancy is typically normal. Data on long-term outcomes with nusinersen treatment are not currently available."}, {"name": "SMA Typ 4", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 4", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:300.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die SMA4 beginnt in der Regel im zweiten oder dritten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with adult onset, slowly progressive, mild proximal muscle weakness.", "synonyms": "SMA type 4, SMA type IV, SMA-IV, SMA4, Spinal muscular atrophy, adult form, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "271150", "umls": "C1838230", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000 of which approximately 1% account for type 4.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset is typically in the second or third decade of life. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Waddling gait is common. Finger trembling, fasciculation and calf hypertrophy may occur. The clinical picture is similar to that seen in SMA type 3 but the motor weakness is less severe. Cognition is unaffected.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. The disease is modified by the gene SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1 (5q13.1), the copy number of which is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical history and examination. In patients with SMN1 anomalies, the diagnosis may be confirmed by genetic testing. Electromyography and muscle biopsy may be necessary.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include the amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, primary lateral sclerosis, Kennedy disease, myasthenia gravis, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible for families in which the mutations in the SMN1 gene have been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "The SMN1 gene deletions are transmitted in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling should be provided.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptomatic, involves a multidisciplinary approach, and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended. Walking aids may be required as the disease progresses. Documenting functional status in SMA is important, since all patients show limitations in daily functioning. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is now approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. There is no data currently available concerning treatment in SMA type 4; however, it is believed that nusinersen may be most effective when started as soon as possible after diagnosis. Other clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential treatments.", "prognosis": "Affected individuals have a normal life expectancy. The greatest morbidity is on quality of life, with impairment of daily activities. Some patients may lose the ability to walk."}, {"name": "SMA Typ I", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:80.000 und die Jahresinzidenz auf etwa 1:10.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist bei Knaben etwas h\u00e4ufiger als bei M\u00e4dchen. Die Krankheit beginnt vor dem Alter von 6 Monaten, gew\u00f6hnlich vor dem 3. Lebensmonat.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of severe and progressive muscle weakness in the first 6 months of life and presenting with severe, generalized hypotonia and weakness,. Dysphagia and respiratory impairment may also be present at presentation or appear at a later stage. Classically, before the advent of recent therapies, type 1 patients never achieved sitting without support.", "synonyms": "Infantile spinal muscular atrophy, Infantile-onset spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 1, SMA type I, SMA-I, SMA1, Werdnig-Hoffmann disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.0", "omim": "253300", "umls": "C0043116", "gard": "7883", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated at 1/12,000, of which approximately 60% account for type 1.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs before 6 months of age. The severe, symmetrical muscle weakness affects predominantly proximal limbs but often also involves the extremities. Cries are weak. Poor sucking ability and reduced swallowing are frequent, leading to feeding difficulties. Deep tendon reflexes are absent. Patients have paradoxical breathing, a bell shaped chest and develop respiratory failure. Mild contractures (of the knees and, more rarely, of the elbows), and scoliosis may be present. Classically, patients were not able to achieve sitting without support but this has changed following the availability of new treatments.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is clinically suggested by muscle weakness and hypotonia with sparing of the facial muscles, loss of reflexes, typical respiratory pattern with predominance of diaphragmatic movements compared to poor intercostal movements, and tremor. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN2 copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, other spinal muscular atrophies with infantile onset (infantile-onset X-linked spinal muscular atrophy and spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1), congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, some early-onset mitochondrial disorders, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and thus the risk of transmission to offspring is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers. However, around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. This includes respiratory support (noninvasive ventilation and airway clearance), physiotherapy, gastrostomy, and antibiotic treatment in case of pulmonary infection. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it reduces the risk of death and improves motor milestones in type 1 patients, with a number of patients achieving sitting without support. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently successfully completed clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and, for compassionate use, also in Europe. A different approach, using gene therapy, onasemnogene abeparvovec, has also been approved in US and Europe. The results of the clinical trials in young patients also indicate a very high rate of survival beyond 2 years and an improvement of motor function. Real world data are being collected in older patients but are not yet publicly available.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is generally poor with most patients dying within the first two years of life due to respiratory failure. Data on long term outcomes with nusinersen treatment and with other drugs are now becoming increasingly available, suggesting long term survival."}, {"name": "SMA Typ II", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:70.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist etwas h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen als im weiblichen Geschlecht. Sie beginnt zwischen dem 6. und 18. Lebensmonat (meist um den 15. Monat herum).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset between 6 to 18 months of age with progressive, proximal muscle weakness, mild to moderate hypotonia and finger polymyoclonour tremor, with areflexia. Motor milestones are classically limited to independent sitting or standing.", "synonyms": "Intermediate spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 2, SMA type II, SMA-II, SMA2, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253550", "umls": "C0393538\u00a0 C2931358", "gard": "4945", "epidemiology": "In Europe the average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) type 2 is estimated at 1/50,000. Worldwide the prevalence ranges from 1/11,00-175,000.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs between the ages of 6 and 18 months. Classically, before the advent of the new therapies, affected children achieve sitting independently and may acquire standing but do not acquire independent walking. Progressive proximal muscle weakness is symmetrical and greater in the legs than the arms. Finger trembling is frequent. Scoliosis, joint contractures and ankyloses of the mandible are very common . Progressive respiratory muscle weakness can lead to restrictive lung disease. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, neuromuscular junction disease (botulism), and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus cells.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Assisted airway clearance and non-invasive ventilations are helpful. Physiotherapy and occupational therapy are recommended to prevent scoliosis, maintain joint mobility and promote function and mobility. Antibiotic therapy is required in case of pulmonary infection. The scoliosis may require a corset/back brace for support, and almost invariably needs surgical correction. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it improves motor function in type 2 patients, with a number of patients achieving walking. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently, successfully completed a clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and for compassionate use in Europe. Clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential drug treatments.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy for affected individuals is variable but, with the new standards of care, particularly for respiratory insufficiency, the majority of patients survive up to adulthood."}, {"name": "SMA Typ III", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:375.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit wird nach dem 12. Lebensmonat manifest (gew\u00f6hnlich zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz), nach Erlernen des Laufens. Einige Autoren unterscheiden zwei Subtypen: SMA3a und SMA3b. SMA3a wird durch Beginn vor und SMA3b durch Beginn nach dem Alter von 3 Jahren definiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of progressive proximal muscle weakness (legs greater than arms) between 18 months and adulthood. Motor development is heterogeneous but walking is typically acquired.", "synonyms": "Juvenile spinal muscular atrophy, Kugelberg-Welander disease, SMA type 3, SMA type III, SMA-III, SMA3, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253400", "umls": "C0152109", "gard": "198", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000, of which more than 10% account for type 3. Prevalence worldwide ranges between 1/70,00-285,000, although studies are limited.", "clinical_description": "The disease manifests between 18 months of age and adulthood, typically presenting with frequent falls, difficulty climbing steps and proximal weakness. Patients are subdivided based on age of onset: early onset is between 18 months and 3 years of age (type 3a) and is associated with a plateau in motor development, reduced or absent reflexes, finger polymyoclonus tremor and, frequently, loss of ambulation before or around puberty. Later onset (type 3b), between 3 and 21 years of age, is associated with comparatively milder decline in gross motor function. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Abnormal gait characteristics are common in order to compensate for weakness. Typically, patients are spared scoliosis and respiratory muscle weakness but these may be a feature after loss of ambulation. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. Type 3 is associated with 3-4 copy numbers of SMN2.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in a typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other disorders of the peripheral nervous system including myopathies or muscular dystrophies (dystrophinopathies, limb girdle muscular dystrophy, metabolic myopathies, or inflammatory myopathies), inflammatory neuropathies (Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome), neuromuscular junction disorders (myasthenia gravis or congenital myasthenic syndromes), and other motor neuron disorders (non-5q form of SMA or late onset hexosaminidase A deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to patients and their families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended and include exercise programs. Clinical evaluations should include timed function tests including the six-minute walk test. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. Real world data following commercial availability of the drug suggest efficacy in type 3 children and adult patients.", "prognosis": "A wheelchair may be required during childhood for some patients (more commonly those with type 3a), whilst others retain the ability to walk into adulthood. Progression is slow and life expectancy is typically normal. Data on long-term outcomes with nusinersen treatment are not currently available."}, {"name": "SMA Typ IV", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 4", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:300.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die SMA4 beginnt in der Regel im zweiten oder dritten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with adult onset, slowly progressive, mild proximal muscle weakness.", "synonyms": "SMA type 4, SMA type IV, SMA-IV, SMA4, Spinal muscular atrophy, adult form, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "271150", "umls": "C1838230", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000 of which approximately 1% account for type 4.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset is typically in the second or third decade of life. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Waddling gait is common. Finger trembling, fasciculation and calf hypertrophy may occur. The clinical picture is similar to that seen in SMA type 3 but the motor weakness is less severe. Cognition is unaffected.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. The disease is modified by the gene SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1 (5q13.1), the copy number of which is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical history and examination. In patients with SMN1 anomalies, the diagnosis may be confirmed by genetic testing. Electromyography and muscle biopsy may be necessary.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include the amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, primary lateral sclerosis, Kennedy disease, myasthenia gravis, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible for families in which the mutations in the SMN1 gene have been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "The SMN1 gene deletions are transmitted in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling should be provided.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptomatic, involves a multidisciplinary approach, and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended. Walking aids may be required as the disease progresses. Documenting functional status in SMA is important, since all patients show limitations in daily functioning. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is now approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. There is no data currently available concerning treatment in SMA type 4; however, it is believed that nusinersen may be most effective when started as soon as possible after diagnosis. Other clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential treatments.", "prognosis": "Affected individuals have a normal life expectancy. The greatest morbidity is on quality of life, with impairment of daily activities. Some patients may lose the ability to walk."}, {"name": "SMAX1", "sub_name": "Kennedy-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Kennedy-Krankheit, auch Bulbo-spinale Muskelatrophie (BSMA) genannt, ist eine seltene, X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbte Motorneuron-Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch proximalen und bulb\u00e4ren Muskelschwund.", "synonyms": "Muskelatrophie, spinobulb\u00e4re, X-chromosomale, SBMA, SMAX1, X-chromosomale BSMA, X-chromosomale bulbo-spinale Muskelatrophie, X-chromosomale spinale und bulb\u00e4re Muskelatrophie, ", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G12.2", "OMIM": "313200", "UMLS": "C0393547\u00a0 C0752353\u00a0 C1839259", "GARD": "6818", "MedDRA": "10068600", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter m\u00e4nnlichen Neugeborenen betr\u00e4gt 1:30.000. Die Inzidenz symptomatischer F\u00e4lle ist 1:526.315 M\u00e4nner pro Jahr. Die Krankheitssymptome beginnen im Alter zwischen 30 und 60 Jahren.", "clinical_description": "Anf\u00e4ngliche klinische Manifestationen sind Tremor, Muskelkr\u00e4mpfe, Muskelzucken, Mattigkeit und undeutliche Sprache. Mit fortschreitender Krankheit treten zus\u00e4tzlich Muskelschw\u00e4che und -schwund an den Gliedma\u00dfen und Schw\u00e4che der Bulb\u00e4rmuskulatur auf. Resultierende Symptome sind Dysarthrie, Dysphonie, h\u00e4ngender Unterkiefer, Zungenschwund, Probleme beim Kauen und eingeschr\u00e4nkte Mobilit\u00e4t. Intellektueller Abbau ist minimal oder fehlt ganz. Im Endstadium k\u00f6nnen einige Patienten nicht mehr schlucken oder atmen. Nicht-neurologische Symptome sind Gyn\u00e4komastie, Hypogonadismus (mit der Folge von Infertilit\u00e4t und Impotenz) und, in seltenen F\u00e4llen, Dupuytren-Kontraktur oder Leistenhernie.", "etiology": "Ursache der BSMA ist die unstabile Expansion eines CAG-Tripletrepeats (40-62 Repeats) im Exon 1 des Gens f\u00fcr den Androgenrezeptor (AR; Xq11-q12). Die Repeat-Expansion f\u00fchrt zu einer verl\u00e4ngerten Glutaminsequenz im Androgenrezeptor (AR). Die Folgen sind falsche Faltung und Proteolyse des mutierten AR und Insensitivit\u00e4t gegen\u00fcber den androgenen Hormonen. Im Zellkern aggregieren die bei der Proteolyse entstehenden Fragmente, und es wird vermutet, dass diese Aggregate die Transkription verschiedener anderer Proteine st\u00f6ren und dadurch zur Degeneration der Motorneuronen f\u00fchren. Ohne ausreichende Zahl von Motorneuronen sind Beginn und Aufrechterhaltung einer Muskelkontraktion nicht l\u00e4nger m\u00f6glich, und es kommt zur Muskelatrophie. K\u00fcrzlich wurde ein BSMA-\u00e4hnlicher Ph\u00e4notyp mit distal betonter Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie der Gliedma\u00dfen beschrieben, dessen Ursache Mutationen im Gen DCTN1 (2p13) sind, das f\u00fcr eine Untereinheit des Dynactins kodiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren medizinische Vorgeschichte, klinische Untersuchung, erh\u00f6hte Spiegel von Kreatinkinase, Testosteron, Progesteron, follikel-stimulierendem Hormon und luteinisierendem Hormon, reduzierte Nervenleitgeschwindigkeiten oder verminderte Amplituden der Nerven-Aktionspotentiale, Zeichen der akuten oder chronischen De- und Re-Innervierung im Elektromyogramm und der Nachweis einer kausalen Mutation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie (s. diese Termini), andere Motorneuron-Krankheiten, Myopathien, Neuropathien, Blei- oder Aluminiumvergiftung und zervikale Spondylose.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist bei bekannter Mutation m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Heterozygote Tr\u00e4gerinnen der Mutation sind in der Regel klinisch unauff\u00e4llig, \u00fcbertragen aber die Mutation auf 50% ihrer S\u00f6hne und T\u00f6chter. Betroffene M\u00e4nner haben nur gesunde S\u00f6hne, aber alle ihre T\u00f6chter tragen die Mutation.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur symptomatischen Behandlung von Tremor und Muskelkr\u00e4mpfen geh\u00f6ren Physiotherapie und rehabilitative Ma\u00dfnahmen. Die Gyn\u00e4komastie wird hormonell oder chirurgisch behandelt. K\u00fcrzlich hat sich die Behandlung der Patienten mit dem Anti-Testosteron Leuprorelin als hilfreich erwiesen. Im fortgeschrittenem Stadium der Krankheit k\u00f6nnen Sondenern\u00e4hrung und Atemunterst\u00fctzung erforderlich werden. Die Krankheit ist langsam progredient, nur ein Drittel der Patienten ist 20 Jahre nach der Diagnose rollstuhlpflichtig.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose der BSMA ist in der Regel hoffnungsvoll, die Lebenserwartung ist nur wenig eingeschr\u00e4nkt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter m\u00e4nnlichen Neugeborenen betr\u00e4gt 1:30.000. Die Inzidenz symptomatischer F\u00e4lle ist 1:526.315 M\u00e4nner pro Jahr. Die Krankheitssymptome beginnen im Alter zwischen 30 und 60 Jahren."}, {"name": "SMAX2", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, infantile, X-chromosomale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "X-linked distal arthrogryposis multiplex congenital (SMAX2) is a rare form of spinal muscular atrophy characterized by the neonatal onset of severe hypotonia, areflexia, profound weakness, multiple congenital contractures, facial dysmorphic features (myopathic face with open, tent-shaped mouth), cryptorchidism, and mild skeletal abnormalities (i.e. kyphosis, scoliosis), that is often preceded by polyhydramnios and reduced fetal movements in utero and followed by bone fractures shortly after birth. SMAX2 patients often have a limited life span, often succumbing to the disease within 2 years, as muscle weakness is progressive and chest muscle involvement eventually leads to ventilatory insufficiency and respiratory failure.", "synonyms": "SMAX2, Spinal muscular atrophy with arthrogryposis, X-linked distal arthrogryposis multiplex congenita, X-linked spinal muscular atrophy type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "301830", "umls": "C1844934", "mesh": "C535380", "gard": "8521"}, {"name": "SMAX3", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, X-chromosomale, Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die X-chromosomale distale spinale Muskelatrophie Typ 3 ist eine seltene distale heredit\u00e4re motorische Neuropathie. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine langsam fortschreitende Atrophie und Schw\u00e4che der distalen Muskeln von H\u00e4nden und F\u00fc\u00dfen mit normalen tiefen Sehnenreflexen oder fehlenden Kn\u00f6chelreflexen und minimalem (wenn \u00fcberhaupt) sensorischen Verlust, die gelegentlich mit leichter proximaler Schw\u00e4che in den Beinen und F\u00fc\u00dfen und Handdeformit\u00e4ten bei M\u00e4nnern einhergeht.", "synonyms": "ATP7A-assoziierte distale motorische Neuropathie, DSMAX, Neuropathie, distale heredit\u00e4re motorische, X-chromosomale, Typ 3, SMAX3, dHMN, X-chromosomale, Typ 3, dSMA, X-chromosomale, Typ 3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G12.2", "OMIM": "300489", "UMLS": "C1845359"}, {"name": "SMCD", "sub_name": "Hornhautdystrophie, muzin\u00f6se subepitheliale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Subepitheliale muzin\u00f6se Hornhautdystrophie (SMCD) ist eine sehr seltene Form der oberfl\u00e4chlichen Hornhautdystrophie und gekennzeichnet durch im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt h\u00e4ufig rezidivierende Hornhautl\u00e4sionen mit fortschreitendem Visusverlust.", "synonyms": "SMCD, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "H18.5", "OMIM": "612867", "UMLS": "C2748503", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophien ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit wurde bisher nur in einer einzigen Familie beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Schmerzhafte Episoden rezidivierender Hornhauterosionen treten im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt auf und nehmen w\u00e4hrend der Adoleszenz ab. Im sp\u00e4teren Leben entwickeln die Patienten subepitheliale Tr\u00fcbungen und eine Verschleierung der Hornhaut. Die SMCD schreitet eventuell im Verlauf mit Hornhauttr\u00fcbungen und Visusverlust fort.", "etiology": "Die Krankheit ist wahrscheinlich genetisch bedingt, ihre Ursache aber noch nicht bekannt. Ein f\u00fcr SMCD urs\u00e4chliches Gen wurde bisher nicht kartiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Ein auff\u00e4lliges morphologisches Merkmal des Hornhautgewebes bei dieser Form der Hornhautdystrophie ist ein subepitheliales muzin\u00f6ses Material, das durch spezielle F\u00e4rbungen nachgewiesen wird.", "genetic_counseling": "\u00dcber ein autosomal-dominantes Vererbungsmuster wurde berichtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Die SMCD kann pharmakologisch behandelt werden. Ziel der Behandlung ist die Abheilung der Epitheldefekte und der Schutz des nur lose anhaftenden Epithels. Hilfreich sind topische Antibiotika, Zykloplegica (Pupillenerweiterung) und Druckverb\u00e4nde. Hilfreich sind Gleitmittel in der Nacht, hypertone Kochsalzl\u00f6sung und Kontaktlinsen-Bandagen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form von Hornhautdystrophien ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit wurde bisher nur in einer einzigen Familie beschrieben."}, {"name": "SMD-CRD", "sub_name": "Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit Zapfen-St\u00e4bchendystrophie", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch spondylo-metaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie (mit Platyspondylie, verk\u00fcrzten R\u00f6hrenknochen und zunehmend sich auspr\u00e4gender Becherform der Metaphysen), postnatalen Minderwuchs und progrediente Verschlechterung des Visus durch Z\u00e4pfchen-St\u00e4bchen-Dystrophie. Das Syndrom wurde bei 8 Patienten beschrieben und wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondylometaphyseal dysplasia-cone-rod dystrophy syndrome is characterised by the association of spondylometaphyseal dysplasia (marked by platyspondyly, shortening of the tubular bones and progressive metaphyseal irregularity and cupping), with postnatal growth retardation and progressive visual impairment due to cone-rod dystrophy. So far, it has been described in eight individuals. Transmission appears to be autosomal recessive.", "synonyms": "SMD-CRD, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "icd_10": "Q77.8", "omim": "608940", "umls": "C1837073", "gard": "10647"}, {"name": "SMD-Hornhautdystrophie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie-Hornhautdystrophie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SMD-Hornhautdystrophie-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "OMIM": "618961", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SMEI", "sub_name": "Dravet-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Dravet-Syndrom (DS) ist eine therapierefrakt\u00e4re epileptische Enzephalopathie bei sonst gesunden Kleinkindern. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird auf 1-2:40.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Das DS ist im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht doppelt so h\u00e4ufig wie im weiblichen. Die Krankheit beginnt im 1. Lebensjahr mit klonisch/tonisch-klonischen generalisierten oder einseitigen Krampfanf\u00e4llen. Die Anf\u00e4lle treten alle 1-2 Monate auf und sind anfangs oft mit Fieber verbunden. H\u00e4ufig entwickelt sich ein hemiklonischer oder generalisierter Status epilepticus. Andere Krampftypen (meist Myoklonus, atypische Absencen und komplex-partielle Anf\u00e4lle) treten im 2. und 3. Lebensjahr auf. In dieser Zeit nimmt die Dauer der Anf\u00e4lle ab, aber ihre H\u00e4ufigkeit nimmt zu. Ausl\u00f6sende Faktoren sind das Schlie\u00dfen der Augen oder intermittierende Lichtstimulation. Der Verlauf der Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch Verlangsamung der psychomotorischen Entwicklung, durch beginnende Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten und Ataxie. Photosensitivit\u00e4t wurde beschrieben. Mindestens 25% der Patienten mit DS haben eine Familiengeschichte mit Epilepsie und Fieberkr\u00e4mpfen. Bei mindestens 2/3 der F\u00e4lle von DS wurden Mutationen, meist Neumutationen, im SCN1A-Gen (Chromosomenregion 2q24.3) gefunden. Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr einen spannungsgesteuerten Natrium-Kanal. Das DS wird anhand des klinischen Bildes diagnostiziert, d.h., der Nachweis einer SCN1A-Mutation sichert die Diagnose nicht. Im Anfangsstadium der Krankheit ist das EEG noch normal, im Alter von 2-3 Jahren treten dann generalisierte Spikes und Polyspike-Waves auf. Die Assoziation eines fr\u00fchen Anfallgeschehens mit Fieberepisoden kann diagnostisch richtungsweisend sein. Eine Variante des DS (borderline SMEI; SMEB) ohne myoklonische Kr\u00e4mpfe aber mit sonst allen Zeichen des DS wurde beschrieben. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen fr\u00fche Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe, das Lennox-Gastaut-Syndrom und die Epilepsie mit myoklonisch-astatischen Krisen (sh. diese Termini) ausgeschlossen werden. Die F\u00e4lle sprechen auf Antikonvulsiva nicht gut an, aber Valproat und Benzodiazepine (Clobazam) sind wahrscheinlich am wirksamsten. In neuerer Zeit hat sich die zus\u00e4tzliche Therapie mit Stiripentol als hilfreich erwiesen. Die Substanz erhielt im Januar 2007 in der EU die Marktzulassung als Orphan-Medikament f\u00fcr die adjuvante Therapie des DS. Offene klinische Studien ergaben Hinweise, dass Topiramat hilfreich bei Patienten sein kann, die nur schlecht auf Stiripentol ansprechen. Wegen des Risikos einer Verschlimmerung der Anf\u00e4lle sollte die Gabe von Carbamazepin und Vigabatrin vermieden werden. Weitere therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind ketogene Di\u00e4t, Krankengymnastik und Kommunikations-Training. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der Anf\u00e4lle nimmt mit zunehmendem Alter der Kinder ab, aber wegen kognitiver Einschr\u00e4nkung und bleibenden Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten ist die Langzeitprognose ung\u00fcnstig. Das Dravet-Syndrom ist auch mit pl\u00f6tzlichem Kindstod assoziiert, vor allem zwischen dem 2. und 4. Lebensjahr.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, developmental and epileptic encephalopathy characterized by infantile onset of intractable seizures that are often febrile, and associated with cognitive and motor impairment.", "synonyms": "SMEI, Severe myoclonic epilepsy of infancy, Severe myoclonus epilepsy of infancy, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G40.4", "omim": "607208\u00a0 612164\u00a0 615744", "umls": "C0751122", "gard": "10430", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of Dravet syndrome is 1/30,000 (range 1/15,000-40,000).", "clinical_description": "Onset of the first seizure is mainly in the first year of life (usually at 5-8 months) in previously healthy infants. Seizures include clonic seizure, often unilateral that alternates between left and right, and generalized tonic-clonic seizures. Seizures are often febrile and long lasting, presenting as febrile status epilepticus (SE). SE is mainly frequent in the first years. Other seizures types may also occur, such as focal or atypical absence seizures, as well as possible clusters of nocturnal tonic or tonic-clonic seizures between age 4 and 11. Photosensitivity, high temperatures, photic stimulation and exercise may trigger seizures. Developmental delay is often apparent by age 2, followed by cognitive plateauing. Speech impairment, progressive gait deterioration with crouching, and sleeping difficulties may also appear at this stage.", "etiology": "Around 85% of cases are due to a mutation or deletion in the SCN1A gene (2q24.3), encoding a voltage-gated sodium channel. Most mutations are de novo but might be part of a familial spectrum of genetic epilepsy with febrile seizures-plus (GEFS+) in 5-10%. Mutations in the PCDH19 gene (Xq22.1), might account for about 5% of female cases. In about 10% of cases, the etiology is unknown. Somatic mosaic deletions or mutations in SCN1A are found in about 3% of the patients that are initially negative. Few patients are reported with pathogenic variants in other genes such as GABRG2 (5q34), GABRA1 (5q34), STXBP1 (9q34.11), SCN1B (19q13.12), and SCN2A (2q24.3).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and electroencephalographic (EEG) findings. At onset, EEG is usually normal but later spikes or poly spike-waves with a slowing of background and multifocal discharges are recorded. Brain magnetic resonance imaging is usually normal. SCN1A pathogenic variants can confirm the diagnosis in the clinical setting of Dravet syndrome.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes myoclonic atonic epilepsy.", "genetic_counseling": "In families with a known SCN1A mutation, inheritance is autosomal dominant and genetic counselling is possible, even though the phenotypic range in families can be wide. In cases with de novo mutations, counselling may helpful.", "management_and_treatment": "The main aim of treatment is to reduce seizure frequency and prevent SE. Valproate, clobazam, stiripentol and bromide may control the febrile seizures early in the disease. Stiripentol may be effective in reducing the duration and the frequency of seizures in combination with valproate and clobazam. The ketogenic diet, topiramate and levetiracetam may provide substantial efficacy as adjunctive therapy as well as cannabidiol in association with clobazam. Ongoing clinical trials showed substantial efficacy of fenfluramine as an add-on. Vagus nerve stimulation can be also considered. Sodium channel blockers (carbamazepine, oxcarbazepine, eslicarbazepine, lamotrigine and phenytoin) should be avoided as they worsen seizures. Benzodiazepines are used to treat acute seizures. Children with prominent seizures with falls need protective head gear. Treatment management should be handled by clinicians with expertise in rare and complex epilepsies.", "prognosis": "Seizures can decrease in frequency in adulthood but often remain refractory to therapies. Moderate to severe cognitive impairment and intractable epilepsy into adulthood is common. Children present a progressive cognitive decline after early language and visual function impairment. Intellectual deficiency is present in around 86% of patients. Autism spectrum disorder can also appear in 31%. Preventing the occurrence of convulsive SE in children may improve the long-term prognosis."}, {"name": "Smith-Kingsmore-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Makrozephalie-Intelligenzminderung-neurologische Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen-schmaler Thorax-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome with intellectual disability, characterized by macrocephaly, intellectual disability, seizures, dysmorphic facial features (including tall forehead, downslanting palpebral fissures, hypertelorism, depressed nasal bridge, and macrostomia), megalencephaly, and small thorax. Other reported features are umbilical hernia, muscular hypotonia, global developmental delay, autistic behavior, and caf\u00e9-au-lait spots, among others.", "synonyms": "MINDS syndrome, Smith-Kingsmore syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "omim": "616638"}, {"name": "Smith-Lemli-Opitz-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Smith-Lemli-Opitz-Syndrom (SLOS) ist gekennzeichnet durch multiple kongenitale Anomalien, intellektuelles Defizit und auff\u00e4lliges Verhalten.", "synonyms": "7-Dehydrocholesterinreduktase-Mangel, RSH-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "270400", "UMLS": "C0175694\u00a0 C2713347", "MeSH": "D019082", "GARD": "5683", "epidemiology": "Das SLOS tritt am h\u00e4ufigsten in Mittel- und Nordeuropa auf, die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird hier auf 1:20.000 bis 1:40.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit ist bereits bei Geburt manifest, leichte Formen werden aber evtl. erst im sp\u00e4ten Kindes- oder Erwachsenenalter erkannt. Die Patienten fallen durch retardiertes Wachstum und intellektuelles Defizit auf. Das Verhalten ist durch mehrere autistische Merkmale, Hyperaktivit\u00e4t, Autoaggression und Schlafst\u00f6rungen gepr\u00e4gt. Strukturelle Hirnanomalien der Patienten sind hypoplastisches oder fehlendes Corpus callosum und Holoprosenzephalie. H\u00e4ufige kraniofaziale Anomalien sind Mikrozephalie (80% der F\u00e4lle), bitemporale Enge, Ptose, breiter Nasenr\u00fccken, kurze Nasenwurzel, antevertierte Nares (90% der F\u00e4lle), kleines Kinn und Mikrogenie. Gelegentlich werden Katarakt, Strabismus und Nystagmus gesehen. Weitere klinische Symptome sind Gaumenspalte oder Uvula bifida (1/3 der Patienten), Photosensitivit\u00e4t, Rhizomelie, postaxiale Polydaktylie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, Syndaktylie der 2. und 3. Zehe (95% der F\u00e4lle) und kurze, nach proximal verlagerte Daumen. M\u00e4nnlichen Patienten haben h\u00e4ufig (70%) Genitalanomalien (kleiner Penis, Hypospadie, intersexuelles Genitale). M\u00f6glich sind auch kardio-vaskul\u00e4re Anomalien (Vorhof- und Ventrikelseptumdefekte, offener Ductus arteriosus, AV-Kanal). Gastrointestinale Anomalien (schlechte Nahrungsaufnahme, gastro-\u00f6sophagealer Reflux, Pylorusstenose, Malrotation, Aganglionose des Kolons) sind h\u00e4ufig.", "etiology": "Dem SLOS liegt ein angeborener Defekt der Cholesterin-Synthese zugrunde. Ursache sind Mutationen im DHCR7-Gen (11q13.4) mit resultierendem Aktivit\u00e4tsmangel der 3-Beta-hydroxysterol-delta-7-Reduktase, die 7-Dehydrocholesterol (7DHC) in Cholesterin umwandelt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose beruht auf dem Nachweis erh\u00f6hter 7DHC-Spiegel in Plasma und Geweben. Sie wird durch Mutationsanalyse gesichert. Bildgebende Verfahren (CT, MRI, Echo-Kardiographie) erm\u00f6glichen den Nachweis von Fehlbildungen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Lathosterolose, Desmosterolose, Dubowitz-Syndrom, Cornelia-de-Lange-Syndrom, Oculo-digito-\u00f6sophageal-duodenales Syndrom, Noonan-Syndrom, Pallister-Hall-Syndrom, Tisomie 13, Trisomie 18 (s. diese Termini) und Pseudotrisomie 13.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die Diagnose kann vor der Geburt beim Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall vermutet werden und soll dann durch Messung des 7DHC im Fruchtwasser gesichert werden. Bei bekannten DHCR7-Mutationen in der Familie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durch molekulare Analyse in Chorionzotten m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch, die meisten Patienten werden mit Cholesterin-Supplementen behandelt. Z.Zt. laufen klinische Studien \u00fcber die kombinierte Behandlung mit Cholesterin-Supplementen und dem HMG-CoA-Reduktase-Hemmer Simvastatin. Bei fehlbildungsbedingten Problemen werden chirurgische Korrekturen erwogen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch den Schweregrad der Krankheit und die begleitenden Fehlbildungen bestimmt. Herzfehler und Hirnfehlbildungen k\u00f6nnen Todesursache sein. Einige Patienten erreichen das Erwachsenenalter. Leicht betroffene Individuen k\u00f6nnen in betreuten Wohngruppen leben und arbeiten.", "summary": "Das SLOS tritt am h\u00e4ufigsten in Mittel- und Nordeuropa auf, die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird hier auf 1:20.000 bis 1:40.000 gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "Smith-Magenis-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SMS wird auf 1:15.000 bis 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Das SMS wurde weltweit in allen Ethnien beschrieben, wird aber wahrscheinlich zu selten diagnostiziert. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich betroffen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, neurodevelopmental disorder characterized by cognitive impairment of variable severity, behavioral abnormalities, and sleep disturbance. Patients present with distinctive physical features and a wide range of malformations (e.g. cardiac, renal).", "synonyms": "17p11.2 microdeletion syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q93.5", "omim": "182290", "umls": "C0795864", "mesh": "D058496", "gard": "8197", "epidemiology": "Smith-Magenis syndrome (SMS) has an estimated prevalence of 1/15,000-25,000 and has been identified worldwide in all ethnic groups, but is probably underdiagnosed. Males and females are affected equally.", "clinical_description": "Patients have a recognizable clinical picture. Craniofacial features include brachycephaly, a broad square-shaped face, synophrys, mildy upslanted palpebral fissures, midface retrusion with relative prognathism with age, and an everted upper lip with a ''tented'' appearance. Short stature is common in young patients, with height typically in the normal range as adults. Excess weight and/or obesity in teens and adults are common. Other skeletal anomalies include brachydactyly, clinodactyly of the 5th finger, 2-3 toe syndactyly and scoliosis. Otolaryngological problems such as velopharyngeal insufficiency, laryngeal anomalies, a hoarse deep voice and otitis media occur frequently. Hearing loss is frequent and may be mild to moderate. Ophthalmologic features (>80%) include strabismus, myopia, iris anomalies and retinal detachment (often resulting from violent behaviors). The majority of individuals function in the mild to moderate range of intellectual disability. Significant speech delay and maladaptive behaviors (outbursts/temper tantrums, nail yanking, insertion of foreign objects into body orifices, self-injurious behaviors, attention seeking, and anxiety) are common. Sleep disturbance is due to an inversion of the circadian rhythm of melatonin. Organ malformations include cardiac, renal and central nervous system abnormalities.", "etiology": "SMS is typically a sporadic disorder caused either by a 17p11.2 deletion encompassing the retinoic acid-induced 1 (RAI1) gene (90%) or a mutation of the gene (10%). Patients with a mutation can have a less severe phenotype, and manifestations may have a later onset in the least severe cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on initial clinical suspicion followed by molecular confirmation of the genetic defect. Careful history-taking for birth defects, sleep disturbance, delayed milestones, chronic ear infections, self-injurious behaviors, and family history are important to recognize the characteristic features.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Down syndrome, Williams syndrome, brachydactyly-intellectual deficit syndrome (del 2q37), and Kleefstra syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Almost all cases correspond to a single occurrence in a family, but prenatal testing can be offered for at-risk pregnancies where the genetic alteration has been previously identified in an affected family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant with most cases arising sporadically. Genetic counseling is recommended to affected families due the possibility of vertical transmission, parental germline mosaicism, and complex familial chromosome rearrangements. When a chromosomal deletion is identified, parental chromosomal testing is recommended to rule-out any translocation or other rearrangements that might affect the recurrence risk.", "management_and_treatment": "Appropriate assessment of the degree of cognitive, developmental, and behavioral deficits and of systemic/organ abnormality is essential for appropriate and specific management. Treatment is symptomatic and may include psychotropics intended to increase attention, decrease hyperactivity and stabilize behavior and treatment for sleep disorders. However, no single regimen has shown consistent efficacy. Family psychosocial support is recommended.", "prognosis": "Prognosis depends on age of diagnosis, disease severity, and precocity of therapeutic interventions."}, {"name": "Smith-McCort-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Smith-McCort dysplasia (SMC) is a rare spondylo-epi-metaphyseal dysplasia characterized by the clinical manifestations of coarse facies, short neck, short trunk dwarfism with barrel-shaped chest and rhizomelic limb shortening, as well as specific radiological features (i.e. generalized platyspondyly with double-humped vertebral end plates and iliac crests with a lace-like appearance) and normal intelligence. The clinical and skeletal features are similar to those seen in the allelic disorder Dyggve-Melchior-Clausen syndrome (DMC; see this term), but can be distinguished from this syndrome by the absence of intellectual deficiency and microcephaly in SMC.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "607326\u00a0 615222", "umls": "C1846431", "gard": "10620"}, {"name": "SMO-Mangel", "sub_name": "Mikrozephalie-kongenitale Katarakt-psoriasiforme Dermatose-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare sterol biosynthesis disorder characterized by microcephaly, bilateral congenital cataract, mild developmental delay, growth delay with short stature, psoriasiform dermatitis of variable severity, and immune dysregulation. Behavioral disorder, joint contractures, and arthralgia have also been described.", "synonyms": "SMO deficiency, Sterol-C4-methyl oxidase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "616834"}, {"name": "SMS", "sub_name": "Stiff-person-Spektrum-Erkrankungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Stiff-man Syndrom (SMS) ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung. Ihre Symptome sind progressive und fluktuierende Muskelversteifung an Rumpf und Gliedma\u00dfen, schmerzhaft einschie\u00dfende Muskelspasmen, aufgaben-spezifische Angst frei zu gehen, gesteigerte Schreckhaftigkeit und ankylosierende Skelettdeformierungen, am h\u00e4ufigsten fixierte lumbale Hyperlordose.", "synonyms": "Moersch-Woltman-Syndrom, SMS, SPS, SPSD, Stiff-man-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "184850", "UMLS": "C0085292", "GARD": "5023", "MedDRA": "10042044", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome entwickeln sich schleichend \u00fcber Monate oder Jahre. Die Rigidit\u00e4t ist symmetrisch und macht Rumpf und H\u00fcften immobil. Der Gang wird steifbeinig und bizarr. Die \u00fcberlagernd einschiessenden schmerzhaften Spasmen k\u00f6nnen schwere St\u00fcrze verursachen. Die aufgaben-spezifische Phobie, freie Fl\u00e4chen zu betreten, kann pl\u00f6tzliche Gangblockaden, Spasmen und St\u00fcrze verursachen. Neurologische Fokalsymptome fehlen beim SMS, aber Muskelsteifigkeit und myoklonische Spasmen syndromal verkn\u00fcpft mit neurologischen Fokalsymptomen kommen bei der 'Plus-'Variante des SMS vor, der progressiven Enzephalomyelitis mit Rigidit\u00e4t und Myoklonien (PERM). Eine 'Minus'-Variante ist das Stiff limb-Syndrom (SLS), bei dem nur eine Gliedma\u00dfe betroffen ist.", "etiology": "Viele Patienten mit SMS, SLS oder PERM haben Insulin-bed\u00fcrftigen Diabetes mellitus (30%), Autoimmun-Thyreoiditis (10%), atrophische Gastritis mit pernizi\u00f6ser An\u00e4mie (5%), und einige haben Tumoren der Brust, der Lunge oder des Dickdarms. Das Vorhandensein von Autoantik\u00f6rpern (abs) gegen verschiedene Proteine inhibitorischer ZNS-Synapsen wie z.B. Glutamat-Dekarboxylase (GAD; > 70 %), Glycin Rezeptoren (ca 10 %), Amphiphysin (ca 4 %) oder DPPX legt eine autoimmun vermittelte Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der inhibitorischen Neurotransmission nahe.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert vor allem auf der klinischen Untersuchung. Sie wird unterst\u00fctzt durch den Nachweis von antineuronalen abs und durch charakteristische elektromyographische Normabweichungen. Die Untersuchung des Liquors ist einerseits notwendig zum Nachweis antineuronaler abs, andererseits um eine floride Entz\u00fcndung auszuschliessen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfa\u00dft atypische Manifestationen spinaler Erkrankungen, z.B. Multiple Sklerose oder Tumoren, axiale Dystonie, Neuromyotonie, erworbene Hyperekplexie (startle disease) und psychogene Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Benzodiazepine und Baclofen sind die Standardmedikamente f\u00fcr die symptomatische Behandlung. Immunmodulierende Therapien (Kortikosteroide, i.v. Immunglobuline und Plasmapherese) wurden mit unterschiedlichem Erfolg eingesetzt. In der Mehrzahl der Patienten mit SMS, SLS und PERM lassen sich so die Symptome beherrschen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken."}, {"name": "SMZL", "sub_name": "Splenisches Marginalzonen-Lymphom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das splenisches Marginalzonen-Lymphom ist ein seltenes, indolentes B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom, das durch eine abnorme klonale Proliferation reifer B-Lymphozyten mit Beteiligung der Milz, des Knochenmarks und h\u00e4ufig auch des Blutes gekennzeichnet ist. Es pr\u00e4sentiert sich gew\u00f6hnlich mit Splenomegalie, Lymphozytose, An\u00e4mie und/oder Thrombozytopenie. Hepatitis-C-Virus und Autoimmunmanifestationen, wie autoimmune h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie und autoimmune Thrombozytopenie, k\u00f6nnen assoziiert sein.", "synonyms": "SMZL, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C83.0", "UMLS": "C0349632", "MedDRA": "10062113"}, {"name": "Sneddon-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz von SS betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/250.000. Von der Erkrankung sind \u00fcberwiegend Frauen im jungen Erwachsenenalter betroffen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sneddon's syndrome (SS) is a rare non-inflammatory thrombotic vasculopathy characterized by the combination of cerebrovascular disease with livedo racemosa.", "synonyms": "Ehrmann-Sneddon syndrome, Livedo racemosa-cerebrovascular accident syndrome, Livedo reticularis-cerebrovascular accident syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "I77.8", "omim": "182410", "umls": "C0282492", "mesh": "D018860", "gard": "7664", "meddra": "10053841", "epidemiology": "SS has an estimated annual incidence of approximately 1/250,000. The disease predominantly affects women in young adulthood.", "clinical_description": "The mean age of onset of neurological symptoms is 39 years, though the livedo is generally observed up to 10 years earlier and sometimes since childhood. Livedo racemosa is a persistent net-like violaceous-cyanotic, mottled discoloration of the skin affecting primarily the legs and arms, but also involving the buttocks and the trunk, and that is exacerbated by cold or pregnancy. Livedo reticularis, that is limited to the extremities and is visible only in the cold, has also been observed in some cases. Neurological manifestations include recurrent transient ischemic attacks (TIAs) and infarcts, often of the middle cerebral artery territory resulting in contralateral hemiparesis, aphasia, and/or visual field defects. Rarely, spinal strokes or intracranial or subarachnoid hemorrhages occur. Headache and vertigo may precede the onset of livedo racemosa and cerebrovascular manifestations by several years. In the course of the disease, memory disturbances, personality changes, and cognitive decline leading to dementia occur frequently. Rare neurologic symptoms include seizures, chorea, or myelopathies. Secondary hypertension is common, as are valvular heart disease, ocular and kidney involvement.", "etiology": "While about 50% of cases are idiopathic, SS can be associated with autoimmune diseases like systemic lupus erythematosus, antiphospholipid syndrome, Beh\u00e7et disease, and mixed connective tissue disease (see these terms). The manifestations of SS are caused by a progressive, non-inflammatory arteriopathy, usually of the small to medium arteries, leading to occlusion of these arteries by excessive endothelial proliferation with impaired blood flow and clotting. Genetic factors may play a role in the pathogenesis of SS. Loss-of-function mutations in cat eye syndrome chromosome region candidate 1 CECR1 (22q11.2) encoding adenosine deaminase 2 have been found.", "diagnostic_methods": "SS is suspected on the basis of the clinical picture. It has to be considered in cases of unexplained stroke at a young age, cognitive decline without stroke, and assumed autoimmune-related vasculitis in which immunosuppressive therapy has proven ineffective. Skin biopsy may confirm the diagnosis, revealing occlusion of arterioles by intimal proliferation. MRI typically reveals white matter changes, infarcts, microbleeds or atrophy, and is more sensitive than CT. Laboratory testing for antiphospholipid antibodies may be positive in about 60% of cases.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include reversible cerebral vasoconstriction syndrome, MELAS syndrome, cerebrovascular dementia (see these terms), migraine, the autoimmune diseases with which SS can be associated, and cerebral angiitis.", "genetic_counseling": "Most cases are sporadic but some familial cases with an autosomal dominant inheritance have been reported. In these cases, a genetic susceptibility is likely.", "management_and_treatment": "The most widely accepted treatment is anticoagulation with warfarin. Some suggest that aPL-negative patients should follow a less aggressive approach consisting of antiplatelet therapy with aspirin, while others recommend warfarin with a higher international normalized ratio (coagulation index) target. Angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors have been suggested to reduce endothelial proliferation, and prostaglandin to improve microvascular perfusion. Successful intravenous systemic fibrinolysis with tissue plasminogen activator (tpA) has been reported in acute ischemic stroke. While the use of immunosuppressive therapy (azathioprine, cyclophosphamide) doesn't seem effective, there are data indicating that rituximab may be effective in aPL-positive patients.", "prognosis": "SS is a chronic, intermittent or progressive disease leading to major morbidity. Dementia occurs in 50% of patients resulting in early retirement."}, {"name": "Sneddon-Wilkinson-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dermatose, pustul\u00f6se subkorneale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sneddon-Wilkinson-Syndrom, Subkorneale Pustulosis, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "L13.1", "UMLS": "C0600336", "MedDRA": "10042342", "summary": "Die Subkorneale pustul\u00f6se Dermatose ist eine seltene, gutartige, chronische Krankheit mit sterilen pustul\u00e4ren Eruptionen, mit typischer Lokalisation an den Beugeseiten des Stamms und der proximalen Extremit\u00e4ten. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Krankheit tritt bevorzugt im Alter von 40-60 Jahren auf und ist bei M\u00e4nnern 4 Mal h\u00e4ufiger als bei Frauen. Die oberfl\u00e4chlichen, schlaffen, in Gruppen auftretenden Pusteln breiten sich ring- oder girlandenf\u00f6rmig aus. Sie treten innerhalb weniger Stunden auf und bilden sich in wenigen Tagen zur\u00fcck. Gelegentlich kommt es zu Juckreiz und Missempfindungen. Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich zu feinschuppigen Arealen mit Verkrustung und selten mit leichter Hyperpigmentierung weiter. Die Ursache ist noch nicht bekannt. Beschrieben wurden Assoziationen mit monoklonaler IgA-Gammopathie, mit Multiplem Myelom und mit Pyoderma gangraenosum. Seltener sind Assoziationen mit Rheumatoider Arthritis, Lupus erythematodes, Hyperthyreose, Polyzythaemia rubra vera und SAPHO-Syndrom (s. dort). Die Diagnose wird durch die Befunde in der Hautbiopsie best\u00e4tigt: Nachweis einer sterilen, mit Neutrophilen gef\u00fcllten subkornealen Pustel, Fehlen von Akantholyse, negative Testergebnisse in der Immunfluoreszenz. Differentialdiagnostisch ist zu denken an den subkornealen Typ des IgA-Pemphigus, an Pemphigus foliaceus, Dermatitis herpetiformis, Psoriasis pustulosa, generalisierte Pustulose, generalisierte exanthematische Pustulose und an bakterielle Impetigo (s. dort). Durch die Behandlung soll Komplikationen vorgebeugt werden. Mit Dapson kann bei einigen Patienten eine dramatische Besserung erreicht werden. M\u00f6glich sind auch Behandlungen mit Sulfapyridin, oralen Kortikosteroiden, Retinoiden, Colchicinen und Phototherapy. "}, {"name": "Snijders Blok-Campeau-Syndrom", "sub_name": "CHD3-abh\u00e4ngige Sprach-/Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung-Intelligenzminderung-Sehst\u00f6rungen-Gesichtsdysmorphie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Snijders Blok-Campeau-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "OMIM": "618205", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Snyder-Robinson-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Intelligenzminderung, X-chromosomale, Typ Snyder", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch moderate geistige Behinderung, Muskelhypotonie, unsicheren Gang, Osteoporose, Kyphoskoliose und Gesichtsasymmetrie. Es wurde bei 11 m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten beschrieben. Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv. Die Patienten haben eine Mutation im SMS-Gen, das in der Chromosomenregion Xp22.1 liegt und f\u00fcr die Spermin-Synthase kodiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "X-linked intellectual disability, Snyder type is a rare X-linked intellectual disability syndrome characterized by hypotonia, asthenic build with diminished muscle mass, severe generalized psychomotor delay, unsteady gait and moderate to severe intellectual disability, as well as a long, thin, asymmetrical face with prominent lower lip, long fingers and toes and nasal, dysarthric or absent speech. Bone abnormalities (e.g., osteoporosis, kyphoscoliosis, fractures, joint contractures) are also characteristic. Myoclonic, or myoclonic-like, seizures and renal abnormalities have been associated in some patients.", "synonyms": "Snyder-Robinson syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Childhood, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "309583", "umls": "C0796160", "gard": "5615"}, {"name": "SOD", "sub_name": "Septo-optische Dysplasie-Spektrum", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die septo-optische Dysplasie (SOD) ist eine klinisch heterogene Krankheit und gekennzeichnet durch die klassische Trias Hypoplasie der Sehnerven, Anomalien der Hypophysenhormone und Mittelliniendefekte des Hirns.", "synonyms": "De-Morsier-Syndrom, Dysplasie, septo-optische, SOD, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q04.4", "OMIM": "182230", "UMLS": "C0162809\u00a0 C0338503", "MeSH": "D025962", "GARD": "7627", "MedDRA": "10067159", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen ist 1:10.000.", "clinical_description": "Der Schweregrad ist unterschiedlich, nur 30% der Patienten haben die vollst\u00e4ndige Trias, viele Patienten haben zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome. Einige Patienten zeigen bei Geburt zus\u00e4tzliche multiple Fehlbildungen, andere haben im Kindesalter ein verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum und/oder Sehst\u00f6rungen (am h\u00e4ufigsten Strabismus oder Nystagmus).  Die Hypoplasie des Sehnervem kann einseitig (57% der F\u00e4lle) oder beidseitig (32% der F\u00e4lle) sein, 23% der Patienten haben signifikante Sehst\u00f6rungen. Hypophysenvorderlappen (HVL)-Insuffizienz wird bei 62-80% der Patienten gefunden, am h\u00e4ufigsten ist der Mangel an Wachstumshormon mit Kleinwuchs im Kindesalter. Zus\u00e4tzlicher Hormonmangel betrifftt TSH, ACTH und GnRH. Mittelliniendefekte des Gehirns sind: Agenesie des  Septum pellucidum (60% der F\u00e4lle) und/oder des Corpus callosum. Auch assoziierte Fehlbildungen der Hirnrinde wurden beschrieben und gelegentlich SOD-plus-Syndrom genannt. M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind intellektuelles Defizit und neurologische Manifestationen (verz\u00f6gerte Entwicklung, Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Zerebralparese). Weiterhin k\u00f6nnen dazukommen: Diabetes insipidus, Schlafst\u00f6rungen, Autismus, Pubertas praecox, Adipositas, gest\u00f6rte Temperaturregulation, Anosmie, Innenohrschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Herzfehler und Fingerfehlbildungen.", "etiology": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle von SOD sind sporadisch, es wurden aber auch famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle bekannt. Bei diesen wurden homozygote (autosomal-rezessive Vererbung) und heterozygote (autosomal-dominante Vererbung) Mutationen im HESX1-Gen (3p21.2-p21.1) beschrieben. Bei assoziierten Ph\u00e4notypen, die als Teil des SOD-Spektrums angesehen werden k\u00f6nnen, wurden drei weitere Gene mutiert gefunden: Mutationen im SOX2-Gen (3q26.3-q27) bei Anophthalmie/Mikrophthalmie und Merkmalen der SOD; Mutationen im SOX3-Gen (Xq26.3) bei Mittelliniendefekten des Gehirns und HVL-Insuffizienz (ohne dass aber Augenfehlbildungen beschrieben wurden); und OTX2-Mutationen (14q21-q22) bei HVL-Insuffizienz und -Hypoplasie mit oder ohne Augenanomalien. Mutationen in diesen Genen werden bei weniger als 1% der Patienten gefunden, deshalb ist auch eine Beteiligung externer Faktoren (Medikamente, Alkohol, junges m\u00fctterliches Alter) anzunehmen.", "diagnostic_methods": "F\u00fcr die klinische Diagnose m\u00fcssen mindestens zwei Symptome aus der klassischen Trias vorhanden sein. Best\u00e4tigt wird die Diagnose durch ophthalmologische Untersuchung, Bildgebung (MRI) und HVL-Funktionstests. An SOD ist zu denken bei Neugeborenen mit Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Ikterus, Mikropenis (mit oder ohne Maldeszensus) und Nystagmus mit oder ohne assoziierte Mittelliniendefekte (wie z.B. Gaumenspalte).", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind  kongenitale HVL-Insuffizienz und Holoprosenzephalie (s. diese Termini). Die SOD kann schon vor Geburt mittels Sonographie und nachfolgende MRI vermutet werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Im Rahmen einer genetischen Beratung kann eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik angeboten werden, wenn in der Familie urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen bekannt sind. Bei autosomal-dominanter Vererbung ist jedoch wegen des erheblich variablen Ph\u00e4notyps und unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz Vorsicht geboten.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch und soll durch ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team mit regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Kontrollen begleitet werden. Die Hormonersatz-Therapie bei hormonellen Mangelzust\u00e4nden muss eng \u00fcberwacht werden, da der Hormonmangel altersabh\u00e4ngig variiert. Kinder ziehen Nutzen aus Entwicklungsprogrammen f\u00fcr Sehbehinderte und aus Physiotherapie und Besch\u00e4ftigungstherapie.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird vom Schweregrad der Symptomatik und den Zeitpunkt der Diagnose bestimmt: Bei fr\u00fcher Diagnose k\u00f6nnen hormonelle Mangelzust\u00e4nde rechtzeitig behandelt werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen ist 1:10.000."}, {"name": "SOFT-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kleinwuchs-Onychodysplasie-Gesichtsdysmorphie-Hypotrichose-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Short stature-onychodysplasia-facial dysmorphism-hypotrichosis syndrome is a rare, genetic, primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by severe pre- and post-natal short stature, facial dysmorphism (incl.dolicocephaly, long triangular face, tall forehead, down-slanting palpebral fissures, prominent nose, long philtrum, small ears), early-onset or postpubertal sparse, short hair and hypoplastic fingernails. Small hands with tapering fingers, bracydactyly and fifth-finger clinodactyly, as well as a high-pitched voice are also associated.", "synonyms": "SOFT syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.1", "omim": "614813"}, {"name": "Sohval-Soffer-Syndrom", "sub_name": "M\u00e4nnlicher Hypogonadismus-Intelligenzminderung-Skelettanomalien-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sohval-Soffer-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "307500", "UMLS": "C2931285", "GARD": "4899", "summary": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch hypergonadotropen Hypogonadismus, intellektuelles Defizit, kongenitale Skelettanomalien der Wirbels\u00e4ule und der oberen Rippen und durch Diabetes mellitus. Es wurde bei zwei Br\u00fcdern beschrieben. Die Hodenbiopsie ergab eine Germinalzellaplasie und komplette tubul\u00e4re Fibrose. "}, {"name": "SOLAMEN-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Segmentaler Auswuchs-Lipomatose-arterioven\u00f6se Fehlbildung-epidermaler Naevus-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisches, polymalformatives Syndrom, das sich in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit entwickelt. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch progressives, proportionales, asymmetrisches segmentales \u00dcberwachstum (mit Weichteilhypertrophie und Umfangszunahme/Ballonierung), welches schnell fortschreitet, sowie arterioven\u00f6se und lymphatische vaskul\u00e4re Fehlbildungen, Lipomatose und lineare epidermale N\u00e4vus (angeordnet in Quirlen entlang der Blaschko-Linien). Klinische Symptome des Cowden-Syndroms, wie Makrozephalie und progressive Entwicklung zahlreicher hypertropher hamartomat\u00f6ser und neoplastischer L\u00e4sionen, die mehrere Organe und Systeme betreffen, sind ebenfalls assoziiert. Die Patienten weisen ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko auf, an Krebs zu erkranken.", "synonyms": "SOLAMEN-Syndrom, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit"}, {"name": "Solide pseudopapill\u00e4re Neoplasie des Pankreas", "sub_name": "Solides pseudopapill\u00e4res Karzinom des Pankreas", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Solid pseudopapillary carcinoma of the pancreas is a rare carcinoma of the pancreas characterized by a variable combination of nonspecific signs and symptoms, such as abdominal pain, jaundice, abdominal fullness, anorexia, nausea, vomiting, and weight loss. One-third of the patients are asymptomatic. The tumor has low malignant potential, but can invade locally.", "synonyms": "Pancreatic solid pseudopapillary carcinoma, Solid pseudopapillary neoplasm of the pancreas, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C25.0\u00a0 C25.1\u00a0 C25.2\u00a0 C25.7\u00a0 C25.8"}, {"name": "Solider Tumor mit assoziierter erworbener peripherer Neuropathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Solides pseudopapill\u00e4res Karzinom des Pankreas", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Solid pseudopapillary carcinoma of the pancreas is a rare carcinoma of the pancreas characterized by a variable combination of nonspecific signs and symptoms, such as abdominal pain, jaundice, abdominal fullness, anorexia, nausea, vomiting, and weight loss. One-third of the patients are asymptomatic. The tumor has low malignant potential, but can invade locally.", "synonyms": "Pancreatic solid pseudopapillary carcinoma, Solid pseudopapillary neoplasm of the pancreas, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C25.0\u00a0 C25.1\u00a0 C25.2\u00a0 C25.7\u00a0 C25.8"}, {"name": "Solit\u00e4rer fibr\u00f6ser Tumor/H\u00e4mangioperizytom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Solitary fibrous tumor (SFT) represents a diverse group of ubiquitous rare spindle cell neoplasms that may be benign or malignant and that most frequently arises from the pleura and peritoneum and rarely from other sites such as head and neck, liver and skeletal muscle. SFT may be clinically asymptomatic or may present with enlarging mass, compressive effects depending on the site involved and rarely with paraneoplastic manifestations (osteoarthropathy or hypoglycemia).", "synonyms": "SFT/HPC, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D21.9", "omim": "234820", "umls": "C0018922\u00a0 C1266119", "mesh": "D006393", "meddra": "10018825"}, {"name": "Solit\u00e4res Geschw\u00fcr des Rektums", "sub_name": "Solitary-rectal-ulcer-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das solit\u00e4re Geschw\u00fcr des Rektums ist eine seltene Erkrankung mit rektalen Blutungen, Leibschmerzen, Absonderung von Schleim, dem Gef\u00fchl unvollst\u00e4ndiger Entleerung des Darms, Schmerzen beim Stuhlgang, Rektumprolaps. Die Krankheit tritt im Gefolge isch\u00e4mischer Ver\u00e4nderungen des Rektums auf.", "synonyms": "Rektumulkus, solit\u00e4rer, Solit\u00e4res Geschw\u00fcr des Rektums, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "K62.6"}, {"name": "Solitary-rectal-ulcer-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das solit\u00e4re Geschw\u00fcr des Rektums ist eine seltene Erkrankung mit rektalen Blutungen, Leibschmerzen, Absonderung von Schleim, dem Gef\u00fchl unvollst\u00e4ndiger Entleerung des Darms, Schmerzen beim Stuhlgang, Rektumprolaps. Die Krankheit tritt im Gefolge isch\u00e4mischer Ver\u00e4nderungen des Rektums auf.", "synonyms": "Rektumulkus, solit\u00e4rer, Solit\u00e4res Geschw\u00fcr des Rektums, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "K62.6"}, {"name": "Solomon-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Syndrom des linearen Naevus sebaceus", "german_description": "Die Inzidenz des epidermalen Naevus (EN) (isolierter Befund oder als Syndrom) wird auf 1-3 von 1000 Lebendgeburten gesch\u00e4tzt, wobei der Naevus sebaceus (NS) sch\u00e4tzungsweise die H\u00e4lfte der Gesamtzahl ausmacht. Das Naevus-sebaceus-Syndrom (NSS) ist selten; die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung ist nicht bekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare nevus syndrome characterized by the association of an nevus sebaceous with a broad spectrum of abnormalities that affect many organ systems, most commonly the eye, skeletal and central nervous system.", "synonyms": "Nevus sebaceus of Jadassohn, Nevus sebaceus syndrome, Organoid nevus syndrome, Schimmelpenning syndrome, Solomon syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q85.8", "omim": "163200", "umls": "C0265329\u00a0 C3854181", "gard": "10291", "epidemiology": "The incidence of epidermal nevus (EN) (isolated finding or as a syndrome) is estimated at 1-3/1,000 live births, with nevus sebaceous (NS) estimated at half of the total. Nevus sebaceous syndrome (NSS) is rare; the exact prevalence and incidence in the general population is unknown.", "clinical_description": "NSS is the association of NS with extracutaneous manifestations. NS presents typically at birth as hairless yellow-pink, salmon-colored Blaschkoid plaque(s), but nevi may not appear clinically until later in infancy or early childhood. NS are found on the head and neck in two-thirds of cases, and large extensive nevi or a centrofacial location is more associated with NSS. In puberty, NS thicken and can become verrucous in appearance. Later in life, benign neoplasms may grow within the NS; rarely do malignant neoplasms grow, and the risk specifically for basal cell carcinoma is less than 1%. Central nervous system (CNS) findings are the most common extracutaneous anomalies, notably intellectual disability (nearly 80%) and seizures (57%, generalized tonic, tonic-clonic, focal motor, infantile spasms). While structural brain anomalies may occur (hemiatrophy, vascular anomalies, hemimegalencephaly, gyral or posterior fossa abnormalities), 75% of patients with CNS findings have normal imaging. Many other organ systems may also be involved in this syndrome, most commonly ophthalmologic (strabismus, lipodermoids, retinal anomalies, coloboma, cataracts, corneal vascularization) and skeletal (frontal bossing, skeletal hypoplasia, scoliosis and kyphoscoliosis, vitamin D-resistant rickets, hypophosphatemia). Other rare findings have included endocrine, cardiovascular and urogenital systems and oral anomalies (including rare neoplasms of ameloblastoma ,odontoma, giant cell granuloma).", "etiology": "NSS is a sporadic disease. EN syndromes are the result of post-zygotic mutations. Mutations in KRAS, HRAS , and NRAS have been described in both isolated NS and NSS. Mutations in these same genes are seen in keratinocytic EN (KEN).", "diagnostic_methods": "Evaluation should include prenatal, developmental, and family histories. Cutaneous examination should evaluate all skin including areas covered by hair, mucosa, eyes (especially the conjunctiva, sclerae, and extra-ocular eye movements). Careful neurologic and ophthalmologic exams should be performed. Any child with NS on the head or neck and developmental delay should have brain imaging. Skeletal exam should evaluate for kyphoscoliosis, gait and limb length. Skin biopsies and relevant laboratory studies (serum/urine calcium and phosphate, liver and renal function tests) as appropriate. Referral to specialists guided by the above is recommended.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes cutaneous-skeletal hypophosphatemia syndrome, nevus comedonicus syndrome, Becker nevus syndrome, phakomatosis pigmentokeratotica, CHILD syndrome, the spectrum of PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndrome, SOLAMEN (segmental outgrowth-lipomatosis-arteriovenous malformation-epidermal nevus syndrome), and CLOVES syndrome.", "genetic_counseling": "NSS occurs sporadically due to a postzygotic mutation. They do not appear to be heritable, as the severity of the mutations are thought to be incompatible with life when present in the germline.", "management_and_treatment": "NSS management is individualized and multidisciplinary based on the involved organ systems and degree of impairment. NS are no longer prophylactically excised in infancy, given low risk of malignant potential. In puberty, patients may opt for removal of the thickened lesions for cosmetic reasons. Biopsy is recommended for any growths that may occur within lesions. Tissue should be sent to an experienced dermatopathologist to prevent misdiagnosis of basal cell carcinoma.", "prognosis": "The prognosis depends on the severity of the clinical manifestations and the extent of the multisystem involvement."}, {"name": "Somatomammotropinom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Somatomammotropinoma is a rare, mixed, functioning pituitary adenoma characterized by the cosecretion of growth hormone and prolactin, which manifests with signs and symptoms of both acromegaly and hyperprolactinemia.", "synonyms": "GH and PRL cosecreting pituitary adenoma, Growth hormone and prolactin cosecreting pituitary adenoma, Somatolactotropinoma, Somatoprolactinoma, ", "icd_10": "D35.2"}, {"name": "Somatostatinom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Somatostatinoma (SSoma) is an extremely rare pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor or duodenal endocrine tumor (see these terms) that originates either in the pancreas (50%) or the gastrointestinal tract (50%) and mainly presents with non-specific symptoms of abdominal pain, weight loss, jaundice and diarrhea but, in approximately 20% of pancreatic cases, leads to a somatostatin hypersecretion syndrome (somatostatinoma syndrome) characterized by diabetes mellitus, cholelithiasis, steatorrhea and hypochlorhydria.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "E16.8", "umls": "C0037661", "mesh": "D013005", "gard": "4900", "meddra": "10041329", "epidemiology": "The estimated incidence is of 1/40,000,000. Approximately 80 cases of pancreatic SSoma have been reported to date but this is probably an underestimate.", "clinical_description": "SSomas usually range in size from 3-11cm. Most SSomas present with non-specific symptoms of abdominal pain, weight loss, painless obstructive jaundice and diarrhea. Somatostatinoma syndrome occurs in those with a functioning pancreatic SSoma with manifestations including diabetes mellitus, cholelithiasis, diarrhea, weight loss, steatorrhea and hypochlorhydria. More than half of all SSomas are malignant and they have often metastasized at the time of diagnosis. Duodenal somatostatinoma is often associated with neurofibromatosis type 1 (NF1; see this term).", "etiology": "Some SSomas are components of familial endocrine tumor syndromes. The cause of sporadic SSomas is not clear. SSoma hypersecretes stomatostatin, which inhibits the secretion of numerous gastrointestinal hormones (such as gastrin, secretin, insulin, glucagon, and cholecystokinin), resulting in somatostatinoma syndrome"}, {"name": "Somatotropinom", "sub_name": "Adenom, somatotropes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Somatotropinom, ", "ICD-10": "D35.2\u00a0 E22.0", "OMIM": "102200", "UMLS": "C0346302", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sommer-Hines-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Monodaktylie, tetramelische", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Tetramelic monodactyly is a rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation disorder characterized by the presence of a single digit on all four extremities. Malformation is typically isolated however, aplastic and hypoplastic defects in the remaining skeletal parts of hands and feet have been reported. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1992.", "synonyms": "Sommer-Hines syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q73.8", "omim": "187510", "umls": "C1861233", "gard": "3707"}, {"name": "Sommer-Rathbun-Battles-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Aniridie-Nierenagenesie-psychomotorische Retardierung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An extremely rare syndrome reported in two siblings of non consanguineous parents that is characterized by the association of ocular abnormalities (partial aniridia, congenital glaucoma, telecanthus) with frontal bossing, hypertelorism, unilateral renal agenesis and mild psychomotor delay. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1974.", "synonyms": "Sommer-Rathbun-Battles syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "206750", "umls": "C1859782", "mesh": "C536371", "gard": "690"}, {"name": "Sommer-Young-Wee-Frye-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Sch\u00e4del-Gesicht-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Hand-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Sch\u00e4del-Gesicht-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Hand-Syndrom ist definiert als das Zusammentreffen von flachem Gesichtsprofil, Hypertelorismus, angeborenem Fehlen der Tr\u00e4neng\u00e4nge, hypoplastischer Nase mit schlitzartigen Nasenl\u00f6chern und Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit. Es wurde bei einer Mutter und ihrer kleinen Tochter beschrieben, sp\u00e4ter auch beim Sohn, der genau wie Schwester und Mutter betroffen war. Radiologische Befunde: kleine Maxilla, fehlende oder kleine Nasenknochen und Ulnardeviation der H\u00e4nde. Immer war die neuropsychologische Entwicklung normal. Wegen der \u00c4hnlichkeiten mit dem Waardenburg-Syndrom Typ I wurde das PAX3 -Gen in der Chromosomenregion 2q35 untersucht, und wirklich hatten die Betroffenen in diesem Gen eine Mutation. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal dominant, multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by facial dysmorphism (flat facial profile with normal calvarium, hypertelorism, small downslanting palpebral fissures, hypoplastic nose with button tip and slitlike nares, and small, pursed mouth), profound sensorineural deafness, ulnar deviations and contractures of the hand. This disorder is allelic to Waardenburg syndrome, and distinguished by the imaging findings and distinct facial features.", "synonyms": "CDHS, Craniofacial-hearing loss-hand syndrome, Sommer-Young-Wee-Frye syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "122880", "umls": "C1852510", "mesh": "C536453", "gard": "1571"}, {"name": "Sonnenurtikaria", "german_description": "Die Sonnenurtikaria (SU) ist eine seltene, nicht leicht behandelbare prim\u00e4re Photodermatose. Exposition mit nat\u00fcrlichem Sonnenlicht oder sogar k\u00fcnstlichen Lichtquellen mit UV-Anteil f\u00fchrt innerhalb weniger Minuten zu einer \u00f6rtlichen Schwellung der Haut. Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz sind weder f\u00fcr Europa noch f\u00fcr andere Gegenden der Erde bekannt. Charakteristisch sind Quaddelbildung und Pruritus, m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind aber auch Kopfschmerzen, allgemeines Unwohlsein, erh\u00f6hte Herzfrequenz, niedriger Blutdruck und Ohnmacht. In der Regel bilden sich die Symptome im Verlauf von 24 Stunden zur\u00fcck. \u00c4tiologie und Pathogenese der SU sind nicht vollst\u00e4ndig bekannt, m\u00f6glich erscheint aber eine Antigen-Antik\u00f6rper-Reaktion. Das an der urtikariellen Reaktion beteiligte Antigen k\u00f6nnte ein normales Produkt sein, das durch UV-Strahlung in der Haut entsteht. Das verantwortliche Chromophor wurde aber nicht eindeutig identifiziert. Die Antwort des Immunsystems ist eine lichtallergische Reaktion mit Histaminaussch\u00fcttung durch die Mastzellen. Ein wichtiges Hilfsmittel, um die Diagnose zu best\u00e4tigen und um die pathogene Wellenl\u00e4nge, die minimale Quaddeldosis und die Therapieantwort zu ermitteln, ist die Lichttestung. Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen sind die Polymorphe Lichteruption (PLE), die meist erst 2-3 Tage nach Sonnenlichtexposition auftritt, und der Lupus erythematodes tumidus (s. dort), der nach etwa 8 Tagen auftreten kann. Eine Behandlung kann mit Antihistaminika und Immunsuppressiva versucht werden, aber die Ergebnisse sind oft entt\u00e4uschend. Breitspektrum-Sonnenschutzmittel versagen h\u00e4ufig, da viele Patienten extrem empfindlich nicht nur gegen gegen UVA, sondern auch gegen sichtbares Licht sind. Im Jahr 2005 wurde die Kombination von Titandioxid und Bisoctrizol in der EU als Orphan-Medikament zur Behandlung der SU und anderer, durch UVA oder sichtbares Licht ausgel\u00f6ster Photodermatosen gekennzeichnet. Das scheinbar paradoxe Prinzip der 'UVA-Abh\u00e4rtung', durch wiederholte therapeutische Bestrahlung eine UV-Toleranz zu erzeugen, hat sich als wirksamste Behandlung erwiesen. Eine hohe kumulative UVA-Dosis wurde aber mit vorzeitiger Hautalterung in Zusammenhang gebracht. Evtl. tr\u00e4gt sie auch zur Entstehung UV-induzierter Malignome der Haut bei. Gegenw\u00e4rtig werden neue therapeutische Ans\u00e4tze untersucht, Kombinationsbehandlungen mit Antihistaminika erwiesen sich dabei als wirkungsvoll. Insgesamt kann heute durch verschiedene Therapien die Lebensqualit\u00e4t der Betroffenen entscheidend verbessert werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare photodermatosis characterized by an abrupt onset of transient erythema, wheals, and pruritus appearing within minutes of exposure to light.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L56.3", "umls": "C0263610", "meddra": "10041307", "epidemiology": "Exact, prevalence and incidence of solar urticaria are not known. It is reported as representing only 4-8% of all photodermatosis presentations and estimated to account for only 0.4% of all urticarias. To date, more than 650 cases have been described worldwide. Females are predominantly affected.", "clinical_description": "Wheal formation and pruritus are characteristic, but other manifestations have been reported such as headaches, general malaise, increased heart rate, low blood pressure and syncope. Symptoms almost always clear within 24 hours. The disease can initially appear in all age groups, although it most commonly presents during the third or fourth decade of life. It is a chronic disease requiring long-term treatment. However, some patients (up to 15%) experience spontaneous remissions.", "etiology": "The etiology and pathophysiology are not clearly defined; however, the disease may be caused by an antigen-antibody reaction. There are two possible mechanisms, antibodies are either targeted against an abnormal photoallergen which is generated only in patients with SU, or they are targeted against a normal photoallergen generated both in patients and in normal individuals. The immune response involves a photoallergic reaction resulting in histamine release by mast cells.", "diagnostic_methods": "Phototesting is an important tool for confirming the diagnosis, to assess the responsible wavelengths, the minimal whealing (urticaria) dose (MUD) and the response to therapy.", "differential_diagnosis": "The major differential diagnoses to be considered include polymorphic light eruption (which generally appears only 2-3 days after sun exposure and lasts more than 24 hours), lupus erythematosus tumidus (which typically occurs more than a week after sun exposure) and erythropoietic protoporphyria, (an inherited disease that may have similar clinical manifestations).", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is difficult and referral to a specialist is recommended. Treatment recommendations are based on retrospective studies and small case series. They include broad\u2010spectrum sunscreens, antihistamines, leucotriene receptor antagonist (LRA), UV phototherapy (hardening), azathioprine, ciclosporin, intravenous immunoglobulins and omalizumab. The European consensus is first-line treatment with non-sedative anti-histamines. If the disease is inadequately controlled, treatment is stepwise with increased dose, followed by omalizumab and then ciclosporin.", "prognosis": "Therapeutic intervention can significantly improve the quality of life but response is variable. Spontaneous resolution of symptoms may occur in 15% of patients within 10 years. Some patients have to avoid outdoor activities completely, severely impacting their quality of life."}, {"name": "Sonoda-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kongenitaler Herzfehler-rundes Gesicht-Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Herzfehler - rundes Gesicht - kongenitale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung ist sehr selten und wurde bisher nur in 1 japanischen Familie bei 3 Geschwistern beschrieben. Charakteristisch sind angeborener Herzfehler, rundes Gesicht mit flachem Nasenr\u00fccken, kleiner Mund, Kleinwuchs, relativ dunkle Haut, typische dermatoglyphische Anomalien und intellektuelles Defizit.", "synonyms": "Sonoda-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "270460", "UMLS": "C0796162", "GARD": "4905"}, {"name": "Sonstige Immundefekt-Syndrome mit vorwiegendem Antik\u00f6rper-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "D80.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sonstiges Immundefekt-Syndrom durch St\u00f6rung der adaptiven Immunit\u00e4t", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sonstiges Syndrom mit ZNS-Fehlbildung als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sonstige Syndrome mit Lissenzephalie als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "Q04.3", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "SOPH-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kleinwuchs-Optikusatrophie-Pelger-Hu\u00ebt-Anomalie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisches Fehlbildungssyndrom, das aus einem Entwicklungsdefekt w\u00e4hrend der Embryogenese resultiert und gekennzeichnet ist durch schwere postnatale Wachstumsretardierung, kraniofaziale Dysmorphien (inkl. progeroide Gesichtsmerkmale, Brachyzephalie mit Hypoplasie der Frontal- und Parietalh\u00f6cker und flachen Okzipitalbereich, schmale Stirn, prominente Glabella, kleine Orbita, leichter bilateraler Exophthalmus, gerade Nase, hypoplastische Wangenknochen, langes Philtrum und d\u00fcnne Lippen), Skelettanomalien (Mikromelie, Brachydaktylie und starker Kleinwuchs mit kurzen Gliedma\u00dfen), Pelger-Hu\u00ebt-Anomalie der Leukozyten, schlaffe Haut mit vermindertem Gewebeturgor und beidseitige Optikusatrophie mit Verlust des Farbsehens und der Sehsch\u00e4rfe. Es gibt keine Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen der Intelligenz. Gelegentlich wurde \u00fcber rezidivierendes Leberversagen, ausgel\u00f6st durch Fieber, berichtet. R\u00f6ntgenbilder k\u00f6nnen ein verz\u00f6gertes Knochenalter, eine sp\u00e4te Verkn\u00f6cherung und/oder Osteoporose zeigen.", "synonyms": "SOPH-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "614800"}, {"name": "Sorsby-Fundusdystrophie, pseudoinflammatorische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Fundus-Dystrophie Typ Sorsby ist eine seltene progressive, autosomal-dominant vererbte Makuladystrophie. Sie wird im 3. bis 6. Lebensjahrzehnt mit Netzhautatrophie und Netzhautabl\u00f6sung manifest. Die Folge sind Verlust zuerst des zentralen und danach des peripheren Sehens und eventuell Erblindung.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "H35.5", "OMIM": "136900\u00a0 264420", "UMLS": "C0339515", "GARD": "10511\u00a0 9633"}, {"name": "Sorsby-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Makula-Kolobom - Brachydaktylie Typ B", "german_description": "Die Assoziation eines pigmentierten Makula-Koloboms mit Brachydaktylie wurde bisher bei 12 Patienten beschrieben. In einer gro\u00dfen Familie waren in 4 Generationen insgesamt 9 Mitglieder betroffen. In einer anderen Familie hatten 2 Br\u00fcder \u00e4hnliche Symptome, und noch ein anderer Fall hatte zus\u00e4tzlich einen nicht n\u00e4her klassifizierten Kleinwuchs mit kurzen Gliedma\u00dfen. Symptome bei jeweils 1 oder 2 Betroffene waren Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Oligodontie (teilweises Fehlen von Z\u00e4hnen), Nierenagenesie, gedoppelter Uterus und gedoppelte Vagina. Ob diese zus\u00e4tzlichen Symptome Teil des Syndroms sind, ist nicht gekl\u00e4rt. Die Brachydaktylie ist vom Typ B, d.h., es sind die Mittel- und Endphalangen betroffen. Die Endphalangen sind rudiment\u00e4t oder fehlen ganz. Nagel-Aplasie und partielle Syndaktylie k\u00f6nnen hinzukommen. Das Endglied von Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehe ist meist verbreitert oder zweigeteilt. Das angeborene pigmentierte Kolobom der Makula ist meist beidseitig. Es geht mit Nystagmus und verminderter Sehsch\u00e4rfe einher. Die gro\u00dfe Familie mit 9 Betroffenen l\u00e4\u00dft autosomal-dominante Vererbung vermuten. Das urs\u00e4chliche Gen wurde bisher nicht gefunden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Coloboma of macula - brachydactyly type B or Sorsby syndrome is a malformation syndrome characterized by the combination of bilateral coloboma of macula with horizontal pendular nystagmus and severe visual loss, and brachydactyly type B (see these terms). The hand and feet defects comprise shortening of the middle and terminal phalanges of the second to fifth digits, hypoplastic or absent nails (congenital anonychia; see this term), broad or bifid thumbs and halluces, syndactyly and flexion deformities of the joints of some digits. Coloboma of macula - brachydactyly type B is inherited in a dominant manner.", "synonyms": "Sorsby syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.1", "omim": "120400", "umls": "C1852752", "mesh": "C535969", "gard": "1437"}, {"name": "Sotos-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Sotos-Syndrom ist ein Gro\u00dfwuchs-Syndrom. Zu den Kardinalsymptomen z\u00e4hlen exzessives Wachstum im Kindesalter, Makrozephalie, charakteristische Gesichtsform, unterschiedlich stark ausgepr\u00e4gte Lernschwierigkeiten und eine Reihe kleiner Anomalien. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht genau bekannt, aber Hunderte von F\u00e4llen wurden schon beschrieben. Exzessive K\u00f6rperl\u00e4nge, gro\u00dfer Kopfumfang (OFC), akzeleriertes Knochenalter, Muskelhypotonie, Trinkschwierigkeiten und Besonderheiten des Gesichts (schmales, langes Gesicht, spitzes Kinn, breite gew\u00f6lbte Stirn, sp\u00e4rliches, feines Haar, Hypertelorismus, anti-mongoloide Lidachsen) lassen in der Regel schon bald nach der Geburt an die Diagnose denken. Nicht konstante Symptome sind Skoliose, Herzfehler, Anomalien des Urogenitaltraktes, Krampfanf\u00e4lle und gesteigerte Sehnenreflexe. M\u00f6glich ist auch eine unterschiedlich starke Verz\u00f6gerung der kognitiven und motorischen Entwicklung. Es besteht ein erh\u00f6htes Tumorrisiko. Mehr als 75% der F\u00e4lle von Sotos-Syndrom sind verursacht durch Mutationen im NSD1-Gen (Chromosomenregion 5q35), das f\u00fcr eine Histon-Methyltransferase kodiert. Das Enzym ist an der Regulation der Transkription beteiligt. Totale und partielle NSD1-Deletionen werden durch FISH-Analyse, MLPA oder quantitative Multiplex-PCR diagnostiziert und kleinere NSD1-Mutationen durch direkte Sequenzierung. Die gro\u00dfe Mehrheit der NSD1-Mutationen sind Neumutationen, d.h., es werden nur wenige famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle beobachtet, die dann einer autosomal-dominanten Vererbung folgen. Ein Keimzell-Mosaik konnte bisher nicht nachgewiesen werden. Bei unauff\u00e4lligen Eltern ist das Wiederholungsriko sehr gering (< 1%). Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen des Sotos-Syndroms sind: Weaver Syndrom, Beckwith-Wiedemann-Syndrom, Fragiles-X-Syndrom, Simpson-Golabi-Behmel-Syndrom und Deletion-22qter-Syndrom (s. diese Termini). Die Patienten ben\u00f6tigen eine multidisziplin\u00e4re Betreuung. Die Neugeborenen werden haupts\u00e4chlich symptombezogen behandelt: Phototherapie bei Ikterus, Behandlung von Trinkschwierigkeiten und gastro\u00f6sophagealem Reflux, \u00dcberwachung in Hinblick auf m\u00f6gliche Hypoglyk\u00e4mien und ggf. deren Behandlung. In den ersten Lebensjahren sind regelm\u00e4\u00dfige allgemein-p\u00e4driatrische Kontrollen wichtig, um Komplikationen wie Skoliose und Fieberkr\u00e4mpfe rechtzeitig erkennen und behandeln zu k\u00f6nnen. F\u00fcr die allgemeine Entwicklung der Patienten sind ad\u00e4quate psychologische und p\u00e4dagogische Programme mit Sprachtherapie und motorischer Stimulation unerl\u00e4sslich. Die K\u00f6rper-Endgr\u00f6\u00dfe kann nur schwer vorausgesagt werden. Auch bein Sotos-Syndrom sistiert das Wachstum nach der Pubert\u00e4t.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic overgrowth syndrome characterized by a typical facial appearance, overgrowth with macrocephaly and variable intellectual impairment.", "synonyms": "Cerebral gigantism, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.3", "omim": "117550\u00a0 617169", "umls": "C0175695", "mesh": "D058495", "gard": "10091", "meddra": "10064387", "epidemiology": "Prevalence at birth is estimated at 1/14,000.", "clinical_description": "Excessive growth is evident across life, especially in childhood, and can manifest since fetal life., with final adult height beyond or in the upper part of the normal ranges. Macrocephaly is usually striking and disproportioned with respect to height. The distinct facial appearance is most easily recognized in early childhood (long narrow face, flushed cheeks, prominent forehead with frontotemporal hair scarcity, down-slanting palpebral fissures, hypertelorism, a high arched palate, and pointed chin). Sotos syndrome is associated with mild to severe intellectual disability as well as a wide spectrum of behavioral disorders. Developmental milestones are commonly delayed. Additional features may include in the neonatal period hypotonia and poor feeding and subsequently advanced bone age, scoliosis, prognathia, premature dental eruption, large hands and feet. Seizures and electroencephalogram abnormalities are common. Less common features are conductive hearing loss, and cardiac and genitourinary anomalies. Cancer predisposition is debated: the increased risk, if any, appears to be low.", "etiology": "Sotos syndrome is caused by mutations or microdeletions in the NSD1 gene (5q35) in more than 95% of cases. NSD1 is involved in normal growth and development. Biallelic mutations in the APC2 gene (19p13.3) have also been reported in a few cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on the major clinical manifestations (characteristic facial features, learning disability, and overgrowth). It can be confirmed by molecular genetic testing of the causative genes. Overlap with other overgrowth syndromes may complicate diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis should include Malan syndrome, Simpson-Golabi-Behmal syndrome, Weaver syndrome, Tatton-Brown syndrome, Bannayan-Riley-Ruvalcaba syndrome, Fragile X syndrome and megalocephalic syndromes associated with mutations in the PI3K-AKT-mTOR pathway. A Sotos-like phenotype has been reported in patients with SETD2 mutations.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible if the disease-causing mutation has been identified in the family or if there is the strong suspicion of the condition (e.g. macrocephaly).", "genetic_counseling": "Sotos syndrome follows an autosomal dominant pattern of inheritance in the rare familial cases associated with NSD1; genetic counseling should be offered to affected individuals informing them that, for every pregnancy, there is a 50% risk of transmitting the disorder to offspring. The vast majority of patients have de novo mutations. In these cases, risk of recurrence is very low.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific treatment for the syndrome. Management of Sotos syndrome requires a multidisciplinary approach.", "prognosis": "Sotos syndrome shows a wide spectrum of intellectual impairment, with functioning from fully independent to fully dependent. Affected individuals are generally healthy with few medical issues."}, {"name": "Sotos-Syndrom Typ 2", "sub_name": "Malan-Gro\u00dfwuchs-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Malan-Gro\u00dfwuchssyndrom ist ein Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien, das durch m\u00e4\u00dfiges postnatales \u00dcberwachstum, Makrozephalie, kraniofaziale Dysmorphien (einschlie\u00dflich hoher Stirn und anteriorer Haarlinie, nach unten verlaufender Lidspalten, prominentem Kinn), Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und Intelligenzminderung gekennzeichnet ist. Weitere variable Manifestationen umfassen ungew\u00f6hnliches Verhalten mit oder ohne autistische Z\u00fcge sowie okul\u00e4re (z. B. Schielen, Nystagmus, Bl\u00e4sse des Sehnervenkopfes/Hypoplasie), gastrointestinale (z. B. Erbrechen, chronische Diarrh\u00f6e) Erbrechen, chronischer Durchfall, Verstopfung), muskuloskelettale (z. B. Skoliose und Pectus excavatum), Hand-/Fu\u00dfanomalien (z. B. lange, spitz zulaufende Finger) und Anomalien des zentralen Nervensystems (z. B. leicht vergr\u00f6\u00dferte Ventrikel).", "synonyms": "Malan-Syndrom, Sotos-Syndrom Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.3", "OMIM": "614753"}, {"name": "SOX5 Haploinsuffizienz-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Lamb-Shaffer-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic syndromic intellectual disability characterized by global developmental delay and speech delay, variable degrees of intellectual disability, and dysmorphic facial features (such as frontal bossing, epicanthal folds, strabismus, depressed nasal bridge, short philtrum, auricular abnormalities, micrognathia, or crowded teeth, among others). Additional reported manifestations are behavioral problems (stereotypies, aggression, anxiety, autism spectrum disorder), skeletal anomalies (scoliosis, pectus carinatum, clinodactyly of fingers and toes, among others), and seizures.", "synonyms": "SOX5 haploinsufficiency syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "epidemiology": "Lamb-Shaffer syndrome (LAMSHF) is a rare disorder reported in less than 100 patients worldwide. The prevalence is not known.", "clinical_description": "In most cases, pregnancy and delivery are unremarkable and the neonatal period is uneventful. Developmental delay (delayed independent walking and speech) and truncal hypotonia during infancy are the usual first manifestations. In older children, mild-to-moderate intellectual disability is the main clinical feature, with some patients having either more severe or milder cognitive impairment. Behavioral disturbances are frequent, including autism spectrum disorder, stereotypies, isolation, tantrums and hyperactivity. Seizures may occur but epilepsy is relatively infrequent (<10%). Height, weight and occipitofrontal circumference are within normal ranges. Mild dysmorphological features are noted in most patients, including broad/full nasal tip, thin upper lip or full lips, small jaw or chin, strabismus, long face and/or epicanthus. Optic atrophy is a rare feature. Malformations of organs are infrequent, skeletal malformations mainly involve the spine (scoliosis, thoracic kyphosis, fused cervical vertebrae).", "etiology": "LAMSHF is an autosomal dominant disorder caused by haplo-insufficiency of the SOX5 gene (12p12.1) due to either a 12p12.1 microdeletion encompassing the gene or heterozygous point variants. Points variants are either truncating variants or missense variants affecting functional domains of the protein.", "diagnostic_methods": "LAMSHF diagnosis may be suspected on clinical presentation and confirmed by micro-array analysis (SOX5 deletion) or sequencing of SOX5 (gene panel, exome sequencing, genome sequencing).", "differential_diagnosis": "Many differential diagnoses may be considered, i.e. developmental disorders with mild-to-moderate intellectual disability and mild morphological features.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is autosomal dominant and whilst most cases arise sporadically, parental mosaicism is not exceptional. Genetic counseling should be offered to i) couples with an affected child informing them that there is a risk of having another affected child, ii) affected individuals informing them that there is a 50% risk of transmission.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific treatment for LAMSHF. Management of patients requires medical and social care as for other patients with intellectual disability, including special schooling, speech therapy, etc.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy of individuals with LAMSHF does not seem to be affected. The functional prognosis depends on the severity of intellectual disability."}, {"name": "Spaltbildung des harten Gaumens", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "Q35.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Gaumenspalte"}, {"name": "Spaltbildung-Ektropium-konische Z\u00e4hne-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Blepharo-cheilo-dentales Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden mehr als 50 F\u00e4lle in der Literatur beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ectodermal dysplasia syndrome characterized by the association of lower eyelid ectropion, upper eyelid distichiasis, euryblepharon, bilateral cleft lip and palate, and conical teeth.", "synonyms": "BCD syndrome, Blepharocheilodontic syndrome, Clefting-ectropion-conical teeth syndrome, Ectropion inferior-cleft lip and/or palate syndrome, Elschnig syndrome, Lagophthalmia-cleft lip and palate syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "119580\u00a0 617681", "umls": "C1861536", "gard": "2071\u00a0 3167", "epidemiology": "Over 50 cases have been described in literature to date.", "clinical_description": "Blepharocheilodontic syndrome (BCD) syndrome is characterized by eyelid malformations, cleft lip with or without cleft palate (CLP), and dental anomalies. CLP is usually bilateral and eyelid malformations are typical (ectropion of the lower eyelids, euryblepharon, and lagophthalmia). Patients harbor variable expression of ectodermal dysplasia, with constant dental anomalies corresponding to conical teeth and tooth agenesis. Additional variable features have been reported, including congenital hypothyroidism due to thyroid gland hypoplasia or aplasia, imperforate anus, neural tube defect, and syndactyly. Patients have normal intellectual development. Significant interindividual and intrafamilial variability have been reported, as well as incomplete penetrance. Diffuse gastric cancer and lobular breast cancer have been reported in two families so far. To date, the risk of cancer in BCD syndrome is not precisely known, since cancers were not reported in the other reported families.", "etiology": "BCD syndrome is due to either heterozygous CDH1 or CTNND1 variants. CDH1 encodes the E-cadherin, a transmembrane glycoprotein. CTNND1 encodes the Delta-Catenin, a protein linked to the cytoplasmic domain of E-cadherin. Both proteins are involved in a cell-cell adhesion complex, critical for establishing and maintaining polarized and differentiated epithelia during development. Recurrent missense CDH1 variants have been identified in BCD syndrome, probably impairing ion calcium binding. Variations in CTNND1 correspond predominantly to truncating variants, but missense variants have also been reported. BCD-related to CDH1 and CTNND1 variants are clinically indistinguishable, although the latter usually shows a milder phenotype. CDH1 variants also cause hereditary diffuse gastric cancer (HDGC), and diffuse gastric cancer and lobular breast cancer have been reported in two BCD families with CDH1 variants. Since cancers have not been reported in other reported families to date, the risk of cancer development is not precisely known. No HDGC-related cancer has been reported in patients with CTNND1 variants.", "diagnostic_methods": "The syndrome is suspected on the association of CLP, typical eyelid malformations and ectodermal dysplasia features. Molecular genetic testing approaches include targeted sequencing of the entire CDH1 and CTNND1 coding regions.", "differential_diagnosis": "BSD presents with a unique constellation of features and there are no relevant differential diagnoses.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible if the pathogenic variant has been identified in an affected family member. However if the pathogenic variant is identified in the fetus, the severity of the condition is not predictable.", "genetic_counseling": "BCD syndrome is usually sporadic, but large families have been described. The disorder is autosomal dominant and patients harboring BCD syndrome features and carrying a CDH1 variant or a CTNND1 variant have 50% risk to transmit the pathogenic variant to their offspring. Due to intrafamilial variability and incomplete penetrance, prediction of the severity is difficult.", "management_and_treatment": "Management of BCD syndrome is supportive and symptomatic. CLP management is surgical, dental, and orthodontic. Early orthodontic follow-up should be proposed. Blepharoplasty is required for ankyloblepharon and for severe eyelid anomalies. Lagophthalmos can lead to corneal abrasion. Ophthalmologic evaluation is recommended to assess eye movement and possible tearing reduction. Congenital hypothyroidism is usually diagnosed through neonatal screening and treated with thyroid replacement therapy. Assessment of risk of cancer is challenging. Currently, there are no clear guidelines for surveillance or prophylactic total gastrectomy.", "prognosis": "The prognosis and functional consequences are variable and dependent on the associated anomalies. In families carrying a CDH1 variant and with a positive familial history of CDH1-related cancers, or fitting criteria for hereditary diffuse gastric cancer (HDGC), prognosis can be worsened by the occurrence of cancer."}, {"name": "Spalte des weichen Gaumens", "sub_name": "Velumspalte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Gaumensegelspalte ist eine Spalten-Embryopathie. In unterschiedlichem Ausma\u00df betroffen ist der weiche Gaumen.", "synonyms": "Gaumensegelspalte, Spalte des weichen Gaumens, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q35.3", "OMIM": "119570", "UMLS": "C0432098", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt reicht von 1:3.300 bis 1:10.000, abh\u00e4ngig von der geographischen Region und der ethnischen Gruppe. Diese Fehlbildung ist h\u00e4ufiger bei M\u00e4dchen.", "clinical_description": "Die Gaumensegelspalte verbindet die Mundh\u00f6hle und den Nasenrachenraum oder die Nasenh\u00f6hle. Die klinische Auspr\u00e4gung reicht von einer partiellen Spalte des Gaumensegels bis zu einer vollst\u00e4ndigen Spalte, die bis zum hinteren Ende des harten Gaumens reicht. Die submuk\u00f6se Gaumenspalte ist eine spezifische Form mit Muskel-und Knochendefekten, die von der Mund- und Nasenschleimhaut gedeckt sind. In diesen F\u00e4llen ist die Diagnose schwieriger, aber von Geburt an besteht ein Milch-Reflux und sp\u00e4ter k\u00f6nnen Sprachprobleme auftreten. Die Gaumensegelspalte kann bei Neugeborenen das Saugen und Schlucken in unterschiedlichem Ausma\u00df beeintr\u00e4chtigen. Bei nicht-syndromalen Formen ist normale Brustern\u00e4hrung m\u00f6glich. Bei syndromaler Formen besteht ein Risiko f\u00fcr die Aspiration von Nahrung (isolierte oder syndromale Pierre-Robin-Sequenz). Durch die Gaumensegelspalte kann die Physiologie der Eustachischen Tube gest\u00f6rt sein. Die m\u00f6gliche Folge ist mangelhafte Drainage des Mittelohres mit rezidivierenden Infektionen (Otitis) und Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit.", "etiology": "Diese Embryopathie tritt zwischen der 7. und 12. Woche der Schwangerschaft nach einem Fehler in der Fusion des Gaumenfortsatzes auf. Als Ursache werden sowohl genetische Faktoren als auch Umwelteinfl\u00fcsse angenommen. Umweltfaktoren wie Exposition mit teratogenen Substanzen w\u00e4hrend der Schwangerschaft (Alkohol, Tabak oder Drogen) k\u00f6nnen die genetische Suszeptibilit\u00e4t beeinflussen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird klinisch gestellt.", "differential_diagnosis": "\u00dcber vorhandene Fehlbildungen kann zwischen isolierten und syndromaler Formen unterschieden werden. Differentialdiagnosen sind syndromale heredit\u00e4re Formen der Gaumen Segelspalte (Pierre-Robin-, Stickler-, van der Woude- und Velo-kardio-faziales Syndrom; s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Ab dem 2. Trimenon ist mit Ultraschall eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich. Diagnostischer Hinweis ist eine mandibul\u00e4re Retrogenie, die mit abnormem Fluss der Amnionfl\u00fcssigkeit verbunden ist. In einem multidisziplin\u00e4ren Zentrum f\u00fcr vorgeburtliche Diagnostik muss danach gekl\u00e4rt werden, ob es sich um eine isolierte Anomalie handelt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Patienten sollen von der Geburt bis zum Ende der Entwicklung multidisziplin\u00e4r medizinisch und chirurgisch versorgt werden. Nach dem ersten operativen Eingriff folgen sekund\u00e4r Operationen von Maxilla und Gesicht zusammen mit kosmetisch-chirurgischen Eingriffen. Schon in der Neugeborenenperiode muss f\u00fcr die Operationen ein Zeitplan erstellt werden. Die sekund\u00e4re Versorgung ist auf die Bed\u00fcrfnisse des Kindes ausgerichtet und ber\u00fccksichtigt die morphologischen und funktionellen Probleme, die w\u00e4hrend Wachstum und Entwicklung auftreten k\u00f6nnen. Die Sprachtherapie zielt auf Anleitung und Rehabilitation von fr\u00fcherem Alter an und, falls erforderlich, eine Pharynx-Plastik vor Eintritt in die Schule. Zur HNO-Versorgung geh\u00f6ren Kontrollen eventueller ser\u00f6s-muk\u00f6ser St\u00f6rungen (Otitis), des Geh\u00f6rs und der Aussprache.", "prognosis": "Die Qualit\u00e4t der anf\u00e4nglichen Therapie und regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen durch ein erfahrenes multidisziplin\u00e4res Team bestimmen die Prognose. Die Gaumensegelspalte kann funktionelle (morphologisch, phonetisch und auditorisch) Folgen haben, die eine Betreuung in einem spezialisierten Gesundheitszentrum erfordern.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt reicht von 1:3.300 bis 1:10.000, abh\u00e4ngig von der geographischen Region und der ethnischen Gruppe. Diese Fehlbildung ist h\u00e4ufiger bei M\u00e4dchen."}, {"name": "Spaltfu\u00df-Fehlbildung-mesoaxiale Polydaktylie-Nagelanomalien-sensorineuraler H\u00f6rverlust-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spaltfu\u00df-Fehlbildung-mesoaxiale Polydaktylie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic syndrome with limb malformations as a major feature characterized by unilateral or bilateral split-foot malformation, nail abnormalities of the hand, and bilateral sensorineural hearing impairment. Mesoaxial polydactyly of the foot has also been described.", "synonyms": "SFMMP, Split-foot malformation-mesoaxial polydactyly-nail abnormalities-sensorineural hearing loss syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "omim": "616890"}, {"name": "Spaltfu\u00df-Fehlbildung-mesoaxiale Polydaktylie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic syndrome with limb malformations as a major feature characterized by unilateral or bilateral split-foot malformation, nail abnormalities of the hand, and bilateral sensorineural hearing impairment. Mesoaxial polydactyly of the foot has also been described.", "synonyms": "SFMMP, Split-foot malformation-mesoaxial polydactyly-nail abnormalities-sensorineural hearing loss syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "omim": "616890"}, {"name": "Spalthand - Harnwegsanomalien - Spina bifida", "sub_name": "Czeizel-Losonci-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch die Assoziation von Hydronephrose (verursacht durch eine obstruktive Uropathie) und Syndaktylie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe. Beschrieben wurde es bei einer Mutter und ihren beiden S\u00f6hnen und bei einem weiteren, nicht verwandten Patienten. Bei den Hand- und Fu\u00dffehlbildungen handelte es sich entweder um Spalthand/Spaltfu\u00df oder um Syndaktylie, mit oder ohne Gliedma\u00dfenreduktion. Ursache der Hydronephrose war in zwei F\u00e4llen eine Ureteratresie und in einem Fall ein Megaloureter. Weitere Fehlbildungen waren in zwei F\u00e4llen eine Spina bifida aperta, in einem Fall eine Spina bifida occulta und in zwei F\u00e4llen eine Zwerchfellhernie. Das famili\u00e4re Muster der \u00dcbertragung l\u00e4\u00dft an autosomal-dominante Vererbung mit variabler Expressivit\u00e4t denken. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Czeizel-Losonci syndrome (CLS) is an exceedingly rare, severe, congenital genetic malformation disorder characterized by split hand/split foot, hydronephrosis, and spina bifida. Spinal and skeletal manifestations were thoracolumbar scoliosis, spinabifida (spina bifida occulta or spina bifida cystic), Bochdalek diaphragmatic hernia, and radial defects.There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1987.", "synonyms": "Split hand with obstructive uropathy, spina bifida and diaphragmatic defects, Split hand-urinary anomalies-spina bifida syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "183802", "umls": "C1866739", "gard": "4969"}, {"name": "Spalthand mit mandibulofazialer Dysostose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Patterson-Stevenson-Fontaine syndrome is a very rare variant of acrofacial dysostosis characterized by mandibulofacial dysostosis and limb anomalies.", "synonyms": "Patterson-Stevenson syndrome, Split foot deformity-mandibulofacial dysostosis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "183700", "umls": "C1866741\u00a0 C3489790", "gard": "4260", "epidemiology": "It has been described in less of ten patients.", "clinical_description": "The mandibulofacial dysostosis consists of retrognathism, complete or occult posterior cleft palate, and anomalies of the external ears. Limb anomalies consist of split-foot deformity with syndactyly of some toes.", "genetic_counseling": "The condition is transmitted as an autosomal dominant trait with variable penetrance and expressivity."}, {"name": "Spalthand mit obstruktiver Uropathie, Spina bifida und Zwerchfell-Defekt", "sub_name": "Czeizel-Losonci-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch die Assoziation von Hydronephrose (verursacht durch eine obstruktive Uropathie) und Syndaktylie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe. Beschrieben wurde es bei einer Mutter und ihren beiden S\u00f6hnen und bei einem weiteren, nicht verwandten Patienten. Bei den Hand- und Fu\u00dffehlbildungen handelte es sich entweder um Spalthand/Spaltfu\u00df oder um Syndaktylie, mit oder ohne Gliedma\u00dfenreduktion. Ursache der Hydronephrose war in zwei F\u00e4llen eine Ureteratresie und in einem Fall ein Megaloureter. Weitere Fehlbildungen waren in zwei F\u00e4llen eine Spina bifida aperta, in einem Fall eine Spina bifida occulta und in zwei F\u00e4llen eine Zwerchfellhernie. Das famili\u00e4re Muster der \u00dcbertragung l\u00e4\u00dft an autosomal-dominante Vererbung mit variabler Expressivit\u00e4t denken. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Czeizel-Losonci syndrome (CLS) is an exceedingly rare, severe, congenital genetic malformation disorder characterized by split hand/split foot, hydronephrosis, and spina bifida. Spinal and skeletal manifestations were thoracolumbar scoliosis, spinabifida (spina bifida occulta or spina bifida cystic), Bochdalek diaphragmatic hernia, and radial defects.There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1987.", "synonyms": "Split hand with obstructive uropathy, spina bifida and diaphragmatic defects, Split hand-urinary anomalies-spina bifida syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "183802", "umls": "C1866739", "gard": "4969"}, {"name": "Spalthand-Spaltfu\u00df-Fehlbildung", "sub_name": "Isolierte Spalthand-Spaltfu\u00df-Fehlbildung", "german_description": "Die Spalthand-Spaltfu\u00df-Malformation (SHFM) ist eine seltene Fehlbildung. Sie betrifft die mittleren Strahlen der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, mal an einer, mal an mehreren oder an allen 4 Gliedma\u00dfen. Syndaktylie mit Oligodaktylie, eine mediane Spalte von H\u00e4nden und F\u00fc\u00dfen mit opponierbaren Fingern f\u00fchren zum sog. 'Krebsscheren'-Aspekt. Manchmal ergibt sich ein etwas anderer Aspekt mit Monodaktylie und dem Fehlen der radialen Strahlen. Hierbei ist es meist der 5. Finger, der bestehen bleibt. Die Patienten haben entweder nur eine dieser beiden Auspr\u00e4gungen oder beide. Bei den nicht-syndromalen Formen fehlen weitere Anomalien. Gesicherte Assoziationen bestehen mit Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit (OMIM 605617), Aniridie (OMIM 106200) und Alport-Syndrom (OMIM 104200). Die Hand- und Fu\u00dffehlbildungen k\u00f6nnen chirurgisch und prothetisch gebessert werden. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit bei der Geburt wird auf 1/90.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Bisher wurden 5 Loci kartiert: SHFM1 in der Chromosomenregion 7q21.2-q21, SHFM2 auf Chromosom Xq26, SHFM3 auf Chromosom 10, SHFM4 mit Mutationen im TP63-Gen auf Chromosom 3 und SHFM5 auf Chromosom 2q31. SHFM3 und SHFM4 werden autosomal-dominant mit inkompletter Penetranz vererbt, SHFM2 X-chromosomal-rezessiv. Die Vererbung von SHFM 5 ist noch unklar, sowohl rezessive Vererbung, als auch dominante Vererbung mit unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz werden diskutiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, congenital, bone development disorder characterized by a spectrum of terminal limb malformations including hypoplasia/absence of central rays of the hands and feet (that can occur in one to all four digits), variable degrees of median clefts of the hands and/or feet, aplasia and syndactyly, with a wide range of severity ranging from malformed central finger/toe to a lobster claw-like appearance of the hands and feet. It can occur as an isolated malformation or it can be a feature in various syndromes.", "synonyms": "Ectrodactyly, SHFM, Split hand foot malformation, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q74.8", "omim": "183600\u00a0 225300\u00a0 246560\u00a0 313350\u00a0 605289\u00a0 606708", "umls": "C0265554", "gard": "6319"}, {"name": "Spalthand/Spaltfu\u00df - Hypoplasie, mandibul\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Akro-reno-mandibul\u00e4res Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Akro-reno-mandibul\u00e4re Syndrom ist mit bisher nur 7 beschriebenen Kindern eine extrem seltene Erkrankung. Es handelt sich um die Kombination von Spaltfu\u00df und/oder Spalthand mit Nierenanomalien (z.B. Polycystische Nieren oder Nierenagenesie) mit Unterkieferhypoplasie und im weiblichen Geschlecht Uterusanomalien. Da in 2 Familien die Eltern blutsverwandt waren und weil auch Geschwister gleichartig betroffen waren, kann autosomal-rezessive Vererbung angenommen werden. Die \u00c4tiologie ist unbekannt. Obwohl die Schwere der Symptome von Fall zu Fall variiert, bleibt die Prognose schlecht, da die meisten Patienten in der Perinatalperiode verstarben. Durch Fehlbildungsultraschall k\u00f6nnen die Nieren- und/oder Gliedma\u00dfenanomalien pr\u00e4natal diagnostiziert werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by limb deficiencies and renal anomalies that include split hand-split foot malformation, renal agenesis, polycystic kidneys, uterine anomalies and severe mandibular hypoplasia. An autosomal recessive mode of inheritance has been suggested.", "synonyms": "Split hand/split foot-mandibular hypoplasia syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "200980", "umls": "C1860166", "mesh": "C535665", "gard": "480"}, {"name": "Spalthand/Spaltfu\u00df - Nystagmus", "sub_name": "Karsch-Neugebauer-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Karsch-Neugebauer syndrome is a rare syndrome characterized by split-hand and split-foot deformity and ocular abnormalities, mainly a congenital nystagmus.", "synonyms": "Split hand/split foot-nystagmus syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "183800", "umls": "C1866740", "mesh": "C537319", "gard": "4967", "epidemiology": "Ten cases from four families have been reported in the literature.", "clinical_description": "In some cases the hands are monodactylous. The affected patients have normal mental development.", "genetic_counseling": "The condition seems to be autosomal dominant with a relatively high proportion of gonadal mosaicism."}, {"name": "Spalthand - Spaltfu\u00df - Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Spalthand - Spaltfu\u00df - Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit ist ein extrem seltenes, bisher nur in wenigen Familien beschriebenes genetisches Syndrom und klinisch gekennzeichnet durch Spalthand-/Spaltfu\u00df-Fehlbildung (SHFM; s. dort) und leichte bis moderate Schallempfindungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, manchmal in Verbindung mit Gaumenspalte und intellektuellem Defizit.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.2", "OMIM": "220600", "UMLS": "C1857344"}, {"name": "SPARCA", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Spectrin-assoziierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive Kleinhirnataxie ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte neurologische Erkrankung, die auf SPTBN2-Mutationen zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren ist. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung im S\u00e4uglingsalter, gefolgt von einer im Kindesalter auftretenden Gangataxie mit Dysmetrie der Gliedma\u00dfen und Dysdiadochokinese, leichte bis schwere Intelligenzminderung, Entwicklung einer Kleinhirnatrophie und abnorme Augenbewegungen (einschlie\u00dflich eines konvergenten Schielens, hypometrischer Sakkaden, ruckartiger Verfolgungsbewegungen und unvollst\u00e4ndigem Bewegungsumfang).", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 14, Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie - kognitive St\u00f6rung, SCAR14, SPARCA, SPARCA1, Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 1, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Beginn im Kindesalter und psychomotorischer Retardierung, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "615386"}, {"name": "SPARCA1", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Spectrin-assoziierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive Kleinhirnataxie ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte neurologische Erkrankung, die auf SPTBN2-Mutationen zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren ist. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung im S\u00e4uglingsalter, gefolgt von einer im Kindesalter auftretenden Gangataxie mit Dysmetrie der Gliedma\u00dfen und Dysdiadochokinese, leichte bis schwere Intelligenzminderung, Entwicklung einer Kleinhirnatrophie und abnorme Augenbewegungen (einschlie\u00dflich eines konvergenten Schielens, hypometrischer Sakkaden, ruckartiger Verfolgungsbewegungen und unvollst\u00e4ndigem Bewegungsumfang).", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 14, Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie - kognitive St\u00f6rung, SCAR14, SPARCA, SPARCA1, Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 1, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Beginn im Kindesalter und psychomotorischer Retardierung, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "615386"}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4rliches Haar-Kleinwuchs-Hautanomalien-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Daumenfehlbildung-Alopezie-Pigmentanomalie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Thumb deformity-alopecia-pigmentation anomaly syndrome is a rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation syndrome characterized by short stature, sparse scalp hair, hypoplastic, proximally-placed thumbs, and skin hyperpigmentation with areas of 'raindrop' depigmentation. Presence of a single, upper central incisor has also been reported. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1988.", "synonyms": "Sparse hair-short stature-skin anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "omim": "188150", "umls": "C2931366", "mesh": "C536904", "gard": "5199"}, {"name": "Spasmus nutans", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Spasmus nutans (SN), eine seltene St\u00f6rung der Augen, ist gekennzeichnet durch die klinische Trias 'Asymmetrischer Pendelnystagmus, Kopfnicken und Torticollis (Schiefhals)'.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "F98.4", "UMLS": "C1527306", "MedDRA": "10059593", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SN ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit beginnt im Alter von 4 bis 12 Monaten und ist klinisch gekennzeichnet durch die Symptomtrias Nystagmus, Kopfnicken und abnorme Kopfdrehung und -neigung (Torticollis). Der Nystagmus bei SN ist in typischen F\u00e4llen pendulierend, intermittierend, kleinamplitudig und hochfrequent (Flimmernystagmus) und in der Regel beidseitig. Er kann aber auch einseitig, asymmetrisch und in verschiedenen Blickrichtungen unterschiedlich auftreten. Kopfnicken besteht nicht immer, oft folgt es nach Beginn des Nystagmus. In der Regel ist es intermittierend und hat eine geringere Frequenz als der Nystagmus. Nystagmus und Kopfnicken kann in jeder Ebene auftreten (horizontal (h\u00e4ufiger), vertikal, schr\u00e4g oder rotierend). M\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Strabismus und Amblyopie. Oszillopsie fehlt. In der Regel fehlen auch Anomalien des Sehnerven, der Retina und des Sch\u00e4delinneren.", "etiology": "SN ist eine idiopathische Erkrankung. Kopfnicken unterdr\u00fcckt den Nystagmus (vestibulo-okul\u00e4rer Reflex) und unterst\u00fctzt dadurch das Sehen. Klinisch und durch Elektrookulographie (EOG) wurde gezeigt, dass in \u00e4hnlicher Weise auch der Torticollis (durch einen hypothetischen vestibul\u00e4ren Mechanismus) den Nystagmus abschw\u00e4cht. Ein Risikofaktor f\u00fcr die Entwicklung von SN ist niedriger sozio\u00f6konomischer Status.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose erfordert den Ausschluss neurologischer und ophthalmologischer Krankheiten. Die Registrierung der Augenbewegungen dokumentiert einen feinen, hochfrequenten, horizontalen Pendelnystagmus, der die normale optokinetische Reaktion offenbar nicht \u00fcberlagert. Die Sehsch\u00e4rfe ist in der Regel im Auge mit dem st\u00e4rkeren Nystagmus geringer und liegt zwischen 6/6 und 6/24. Die Sehnervpapille ist unauff\u00e4llig. Zum Ausschluss von Netzhauterkrankungen, die den SN nachahmen k\u00f6nnen, dienen elektrophysiologische Untersuchungen (visuell evozierte Potentiale (VEP) und Elektroretinogramm (ERG)).", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: (i) SN-\u00e4hnlicher Nystagmus. Er ist definiert als eine St\u00f6rung, bei der die Kinder, \u00e4hnlich wie bei SN, Nystagmus mit Kopfnicken und abnormer Kopfhaltung manifestieren, aber mit zus\u00e4tzlichen St\u00f6rungen: Sehschw\u00e4che (z.B. Nervus opticus-Hypoplasie, Achromatopsie, kongenitale station\u00e4re Nachtblindheit, Bardet-Biedl-Syndrom), neurologische St\u00f6rungen (Sehbahn-Gliom (Chiasma), Arachnoidalzyste, Opsoklonus-Myoklonus-Syndrom, Dienzephalisches Syndrom und Leigh-Syndrom (s. diese Termini)) oder systemische St\u00f6rungen; (ii) Idiopathischer infantiler Nystagmus (s. dort); (iii) Irrt\u00fcmliche Diagnosen: Thalamus-Neoplasie oder Leere Sella.", "genetic_counseling": "SN tritt in der Regel sporadisch auf, jedoch wurden auch gleichsinnig betroffene eineiige Zwillinge beschrieben.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung der Patienten zielt auf unterst\u00fctzende Ma\u00dfnahmen bei Strabismus, Amblyopie und Refraktionsanomalien.", "prognosis": "SN ist eine benigne Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung der Augen von in der Regel sonst gesunden Patienten. Die Intensit\u00e4t des Nystagmus nimmt im Verlauf ab. Innerhalb von 1 bis 5 Jahren nach seinem Auftreten hat sich der Nystagmus ganz zur\u00fcckgebildet, und ein verbleibender feiner Restnystagmus ist dann nur noch durch Registrierung der Augenbewegungen zu erkennen. Nur in seltenen F\u00e4llen bestehen die Symptome bis zu 8 Jahre.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SN ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Spastic paraparesis-cataracts-speech delay syndrome", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "OMIM": "619338", "UMLS": "C5543440", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spastik-Ataxie-Ganganomalien-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spastik mit Hyperglyzin\u00e4mie, im Kindesalter beginnend", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Childhood-onset spasticity with hyperglycinemia is a rare neurometabolic disease characterized by a childhood onset of progressive spastic ataxia associated with gait disturbances, hyperreflexia, extensor plantar responses and non-ketotic hyperglycinemia typically revealed by biochemical analysis. Additional signs of upper extremity spasticity, dysarthria, learning difficulties, poor concentration, nystagmus, optic atrophy and reduced visual acuity may also be associated.", "synonyms": "Childhood-onset spasticity with variant non-ketotic hyperglycinemia, Spasticity-ataxia-gait anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "616859"}, {"name": "Spastik mit Hyperglyzin\u00e4mie, im Kindesalter beginnend", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Childhood-onset spasticity with hyperglycinemia is a rare neurometabolic disease characterized by a childhood onset of progressive spastic ataxia associated with gait disturbances, hyperreflexia, extensor plantar responses and non-ketotic hyperglycinemia typically revealed by biochemical analysis. Additional signs of upper extremity spasticity, dysarthria, learning difficulties, poor concentration, nystagmus, optic atrophy and reduced visual acuity may also be associated.", "synonyms": "Childhood-onset spasticity with variant non-ketotic hyperglycinemia, Spasticity-ataxia-gait anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "616859"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SPAX, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "UMLS": "C1849156", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie - Augenanomalien", "sub_name": "Spastische Ataxie - Hornhautdystrophie", "german_description": "Charakterisierende Symptome des Mousa-Al Din-Al-Nassar-Syndroms sind spastische Ataxie, kongenitale Katarakt, fleckige Hornhautdystrophie und nicht-axiale Myopie. Das Syndrom wurde bei einer konsanguinen Beduinen-Familie beschrieben. H\u00e4ufig bestanden auch immunologische St\u00f6rungen. Im Gegensatz zum Kornea-Kleinhirn-Syndrom (s. dort) ist die intellektuelle Entwicklung normal, und die Korneadystrophie betrifft nicht das Epithel sondern das Stroma. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spastic ataxia-corneal dystrophy syndrome is a rare, hereditary ataxia disorder characterized by the presence of spastic ataxia in association with bilateral congenital cataract, macular corneal dystrophy (stromal with deposition of mucoid material) and nonaxial myopia. Patients present normal intellectual development. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1986.", "synonyms": "Bedouin spastic ataxia syndrome, Mousa-Al Din-Al Nassar syndrome, Spastic ataxia-ocular anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "271320", "umls": "C1849085", "gard": "3795"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "AD-SPAX, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, autosomal dominant spastic ataxia disorder characterized by lower-limb spasticity and ataxia in the form of head jerks, ocular movement abnormalities, dysarthria, dysphagia and gait disturbances.", "synonyms": "SPAX1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "108600", "umls": "C1970107"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 7", "sub_name": "Spastische Ataxie mit kongenitaler Miosis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Spastische Ataxie mit kongenitaler Miosis ist eine seltene heredit\u00e4re Ataxie, die durch eine scheinbar nicht progrediente oder langsam progrediente symmetrische Ataxie des Ganges, pyramidale Zeichen in den Gliedma\u00dfen, Spastik und Hyperreflexie (besonders in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen) zusammen mit Dysarthrie und beeintr\u00e4chtigter Pupillenreaktion auf Licht gekennzeichnet ist und sich als fixierte Miosis (mit Pupillen, die selten einen Durchmesser von 2 mm \u00fcberschreiten und sich bei Mydriatikern schlecht erweitern) pr\u00e4sentiert. Ein Nystagmus kann ebenfalls vorhanden sein.", "synonyms": "SPAX7, Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 7, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "108650", "UMLS": "C1862441"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "AR-SPAX, ", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 4", "sub_name": "Spastische Ataxie - Optikusatrophie - Dysarthrie, autosomal-rezessiv", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, autosomal recessive spastic ataxia disease characterized by onset in early childhood of spastic paraparesis, cerebellar ataxia, dysarthria and optic atrophy.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spastic ataxia type 4, SPAX4, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "613672", "gard": "10992"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 5", "sub_name": "Fr\u00fch beginnende spastische Ataxie-myoklonische Epilepsie-Neuropathie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Early-onset spastic ataxia-myoclonic epilepsy-neuropathy syndrome is a rare hereditary spastic ataxia disorder characterized by childhood onset of slowly progressive lower limb spastic paraparesis and cerebellar ataxia (with dysarthria, swallowing difficulties, motor degeneration), associated with sensorimotor neuropathy (including muscle weakness and distal amyotrophy in lower extremities) and progressive myoclonic epilepsy. Ocular signs (ptosis, oculomotor apraxia), dysmetria, dysdiadochokinesia, dystonic movements and myoclonus may also be associated.", "synonyms": "AFG3L2-related spastic ataxia-myoclonic epilepsy-neuropathy syndrome, Autosomal recessive spastic ataxia type 5, SPAX5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "614487"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie - Hornhautdystrophie", "german_description": "Charakterisierende Symptome des Mousa-Al Din-Al-Nassar-Syndroms sind spastische Ataxie, kongenitale Katarakt, fleckige Hornhautdystrophie und nicht-axiale Myopie. Das Syndrom wurde bei einer konsanguinen Beduinen-Familie beschrieben. H\u00e4ufig bestanden auch immunologische St\u00f6rungen. Im Gegensatz zum Kornea-Kleinhirn-Syndrom (s. dort) ist die intellektuelle Entwicklung normal, und die Korneadystrophie betrifft nicht das Epithel sondern das Stroma. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spastic ataxia-corneal dystrophy syndrome is a rare, hereditary ataxia disorder characterized by the presence of spastic ataxia in association with bilateral congenital cataract, macular corneal dystrophy (stromal with deposition of mucoid material) and nonaxial myopia. Patients present normal intellectual development. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1986.", "synonyms": "Bedouin spastic ataxia syndrome, Mousa-Al Din-Al Nassar syndrome, Spastic ataxia-ocular anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "271320", "umls": "C1849085", "gard": "3795"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie mit Dysarthrie durch Glutaminase-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurometabolic disease characterized by childhood onset of global developmental delay, progressive spastic ataxia leading to loss of independent ambulation, and elevated plasma levels of glutamine. Optic atrophy, tremor, and dysarthria have also been reported. Brain imaging may show cerebellar atrophy.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "E88.8"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie mit kongenitaler Miosis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Spastische Ataxie mit kongenitaler Miosis ist eine seltene heredit\u00e4re Ataxie, die durch eine scheinbar nicht progrediente oder langsam progrediente symmetrische Ataxie des Ganges, pyramidale Zeichen in den Gliedma\u00dfen, Spastik und Hyperreflexie (besonders in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen) zusammen mit Dysarthrie und beeintr\u00e4chtigter Pupillenreaktion auf Licht gekennzeichnet ist und sich als fixierte Miosis (mit Pupillen, die selten einen Durchmesser von 2 mm \u00fcberschreiten und sich bei Mydriatikern schlecht erweitern) pr\u00e4sentiert. Ein Nystagmus kann ebenfalls vorhanden sein.", "synonyms": "SPAX7, Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 7, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "108650", "UMLS": "C1862441"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie-Neuropathie-Syndrom, AFG3L2-assoziiertes", "sub_name": "Fr\u00fch beginnende spastische Ataxie-myoklonische Epilepsie-Neuropathie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Early-onset spastic ataxia-myoclonic epilepsy-neuropathy syndrome is a rare hereditary spastic ataxia disorder characterized by childhood onset of slowly progressive lower limb spastic paraparesis and cerebellar ataxia (with dysarthria, swallowing difficulties, motor degeneration), associated with sensorimotor neuropathy (including muscle weakness and distal amyotrophy in lower extremities) and progressive myoclonic epilepsy. Ocular signs (ptosis, oculomotor apraxia), dysmetria, dysdiadochokinesia, dystonic movements and myoclonus may also be associated.", "synonyms": "AFG3L2-related spastic ataxia-myoclonic epilepsy-neuropathy syndrome, Autosomal recessive spastic ataxia type 5, SPAX5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "614487"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie - Optikusatrophie - Dysarthrie, autosomal-rezessiv", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, autosomal recessive spastic ataxia disease characterized by onset in early childhood of spastic paraparesis, cerebellar ataxia, dysarthria and optic atrophy.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spastic ataxia type 4, SPAX4, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "613672", "gard": "10992"}, {"name": "Spastische Ataxie-Syndrom Bedouin", "sub_name": "Spastische Ataxie - Hornhautdystrophie", "german_description": "Charakterisierende Symptome des Mousa-Al Din-Al-Nassar-Syndroms sind spastische Ataxie, kongenitale Katarakt, fleckige Hornhautdystrophie und nicht-axiale Myopie. Das Syndrom wurde bei einer konsanguinen Beduinen-Familie beschrieben. H\u00e4ufig bestanden auch immunologische St\u00f6rungen. Im Gegensatz zum Kornea-Kleinhirn-Syndrom (s. dort) ist die intellektuelle Entwicklung normal, und die Korneadystrophie betrifft nicht das Epithel sondern das Stroma. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spastic ataxia-corneal dystrophy syndrome is a rare, hereditary ataxia disorder characterized by the presence of spastic ataxia in association with bilateral congenital cataract, macular corneal dystrophy (stromal with deposition of mucoid material) and nonaxial myopia. Patients present normal intellectual development. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1986.", "synonyms": "Bedouin spastic ataxia syndrome, Mousa-Al Din-Al Nassar syndrome, Spastic ataxia-ocular anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "271320", "umls": "C1849085", "gard": "3795"}, {"name": "Spastische-Ataxie-Syndrom Bedouin", "sub_name": "Spastische Ataxie - Hornhautdystrophie", "german_description": "Charakterisierende Symptome des Mousa-Al Din-Al-Nassar-Syndroms sind spastische Ataxie, kongenitale Katarakt, fleckige Hornhautdystrophie und nicht-axiale Myopie. Das Syndrom wurde bei einer konsanguinen Beduinen-Familie beschrieben. H\u00e4ufig bestanden auch immunologische St\u00f6rungen. Im Gegensatz zum Kornea-Kleinhirn-Syndrom (s. dort) ist die intellektuelle Entwicklung normal, und die Korneadystrophie betrifft nicht das Epithel sondern das Stroma. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spastic ataxia-corneal dystrophy syndrome is a rare, hereditary ataxia disorder characterized by the presence of spastic ataxia in association with bilateral congenital cataract, macular corneal dystrophy (stromal with deposition of mucoid material) and nonaxial myopia. Patients present normal intellectual development. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1986.", "synonyms": "Bedouin spastic ataxia syndrome, Mousa-Al Din-Al Nassar syndrome, Spastic ataxia-ocular anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "271320", "umls": "C1849085", "gard": "3795"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraparese-Amyopathie-Katarakte-gastro\u00f6sophagealer Reflux-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 9A", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by juvenile to adult onset of slowly progressive spasticity mainly affecting the lower limbs, associated with spastic dysarthria and motor neuropathy. Additional manifestations include congenital bilateral cataract, gastroesophageal reflux, persistent vomiting, mild cerebellar signs, pes cavus, and occasionally short stature, among others.", "synonyms": "AD-SPG9A, Cataracts-motor neuropathy-short stature-skeletal anomalies syndrome, Spastic paraparesis-amyopathy-cataracts-gastroesophageal reflux syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "601162"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraparese, heredit\u00e4re, Typ 15", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 15 ist eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindes- bis Erwachsenenalter. Sie ist gelennzeichnet durch eine langsam fortschreitende Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen (die zu Gangst\u00f6rungen, extensorischen Plantarreflexen und vermindertem Vibrationsempfinden f\u00fchrt) in Verbindung mit einer leichten Intelligenzminderung, einer leichten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie, einer peripheren Neuropathie (mit distaler Amyotrophie der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen) und einer Netzhautdegeneration. Ein d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum ist ein h\u00e4ufiger Bildgebungsbefund.", "synonyms": "Kjellin-Syndrom, SPG15, Spastische Paraparese, heredit\u00e4re, Typ 15, Spastische Paraplegie - Netzhautdegeneration, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "270700", "UMLS": "C1849128", "MeSH": "C536642", "GARD": "9581"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraparese-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch spastische Paraparese in der sp\u00e4ten Kindheit und H\u00f6rverlust gekennzeichnet ist. Weitere Merkmale k\u00f6nnen Netzhautanomalien, linsenf\u00f6rmige Tr\u00fcbungen, Kleinwuchs, Hypogonadismus, sensorische Defizite, Tremor, Dysdiochokinese, erh\u00f6hte Liquorproteine und fehlende oder verl\u00e4ngerte somatosensorisch evozierte Potenziale sein. Die Plasma- und Fibroblastenwerte f\u00fcr ges\u00e4ttigte, sehr langkettige Fetts\u00e4uren sind normal. Seit 1986 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "synonyms": "Wells-Jankovic-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "312910", "UMLS": "C2931291", "GARD": "5555"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraparese Typ 2", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spastische Paraplegie Typ 2, eine X-chromosomale Leukodystrophie, ist gekennzeichnet durch spastischen Gang und autonome Dysfunktion. Mit zus\u00e4tzlichen zentralnerv\u00f6sen Symptomen (intellektuelles Defizit, Ataxie, extrapyramidale Zeichen), wird das Syndrom als Komplizierte SPG bezeichnet.", "synonyms": "SPG2, Spastische Paraparese Typ 2, Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "312920", "UMLS": "C1839264", "MeSH": "C536857", "GARD": "4923", "epidemiology": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz der SPG2 sind nicht bekannt, aber als Teil des Pelizaeus-Merzbacher (PMD)-Spektrums macht die SPG2 etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle aus. Bisher wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. An SPG2 erkranken m\u00e4nnliche Indiduen, berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber weibliche Heterozygote mit milden Symptomen im Erwachsenenalter.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild der SPG2 \u00fcberspannt ein Kontinuum von Ph\u00e4notypen, von reiner bis zu komplizierter SPG2. Die reine SPG2 wird schon im Kleinkindalter oder der fr\u00fchen Kindheit (< 5 Jahre) manifest, kann aber auch erst im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter einsetzen. Symptome sind Muskelschw\u00e4che, Hyperreflexie, Babinski-Zeichen und spastischer Gang als Folge von spastischer Paraparese. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine autonome Dysfunktion (spastische Harnblase und evtl. spastischer Darm mit geh\u00e4ufter Harn- und Stuhlentleerung und Inkontinenz). Die Patienten sind gehf\u00e4hig, die Sprache ist normal. Zentralnerv\u00f6se Funktionen sind nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt, es kommt nicht zu kognitivem Abbau. Die komplizierte SPG2 hat die gleichen Symptome wie die SPG2, aber zus\u00e4tzlich ab dem ersten Lebensjahr auch zentralnerv\u00f6se St\u00f6rungen wie Nystagmus und Ataxie. Optikusatrophie und leichtes intellektuelles Defizit sind m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Ursache der SPG2 sind Missense-Mutationen im PLP1-Gen. PLP1 kodiert f\u00fcr das Proteolipidprotein PLP1, das h\u00e4ufigste Protein in den Myelinscheiden des ZNS und seine alternativ gesplicete Isoform DM20. Auch die die Pelizaeus-Merzbacher-Krankheit (PMD; s.dort) ist durch Mutationen im PLP1-Gen verursacht, d.h., SPG2 und PMD sind allelische Krankheiten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen, elektrophysiologischen und neuroradiologischen Befunde. In der wei\u00dfen Substanz ist die Konzentration des N-Acetyl-Aspartats verringert. Die zerebrale Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt in T2-gewichteten Bildern eine fleckf\u00f6rmige oder diffuse Hypomyelinisierung. Bei Patienten mit reiner SPG2 sind sehr subtile T2-Hyperintensit\u00e4ten m\u00f6glich. Auch andere MR-Techniken (MR-Spektroskopie, Diffusions-Tensor-Bildgebung) sind diagnostisch hilfreich. Durch Mutationsanalyse wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Formen von Heredit\u00e4rer spastischer Paraplegie. Die komplizierte SPG2 kann nicht eindeutig von milder PMD und dem Null-Syndrom unterschieden werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei in der Familie bekannter Mutation sind pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv: S\u00f6hne von heterozygoten Frauen erkranken mit einer Wahrscheinlichkeit von 50 %, S\u00f6hne von betroffenen M\u00e4nnern erkranken nicht.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung ist multidisziplin\u00e4r und schlie\u00dft Neurologen, Physiotherapeuten und Orthop\u00e4den ein. Therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind erforderlich bei Krampfanf\u00e4llen (Antikonvulsiva) und Spastik (Physiotherapie und spasmolytisch wirkende Medikamente [Baclofen, Diazepam, Tizanidin, Botulinumtoxin, Dantrolen]). Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen sind erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Patienten mit reiner SPG2 haben eine normale Lebenserwartung. Die neurologischen St\u00f6rungen der komplizierten SPG2 bedingen durch Aspirationspneumonie, Lungenembolie und duch andere Komplikationen und allgemeine Schw\u00e4che eine verk\u00fcrzte Lebenserwartung (4. bis 7. Lebensjahrzehnt).", "summary": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz der SPG2 sind nicht bekannt, aber als Teil des Pelizaeus-Merzbacher (PMD)-Spektrums macht die SPG2 etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle aus. Bisher wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. An SPG2 erkranken m\u00e4nnliche Indiduen, berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber weibliche Heterozygote mit milden Symptomen im Erwachsenenalter."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie - Amyotrophie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 17", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia, upper and lower limb muscle atrophy, hyperreflexia, extensor plantar responses, pes cavus and occasionally impaired vibration sense. Association with hand muscles amyotrophy typical.", "synonyms": "SPG17, Silver syndrome, Spastic paraplegia-amyotrophy of hands and feet, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "270685", "umls": "C2931276", "gard": "4219"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, famili\u00e4re, Typ 2", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit hoher intrafamili\u00e4rer klinischer Variabilit\u00e4t, die in den meisten F\u00e4llen als reiner Ph\u00e4notyp mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter (haupts\u00e4chlich in der 3. bis 5. Lebensdekade, kann aber in jedem Alter auftreten) mit fortschreitender Gangst\u00f6rung aufgrund von beidseitiger Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen sowie sehr leichter proximaler Schw\u00e4che und Harndrang charakterisiert ist. In einigen F\u00e4llen wird auch ein komplexer Ph\u00e4notyp mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen einschlie\u00dflich kognitiver Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie, Epilepsie und Neuropathie beobachtet. Ein schnellerer Krankheitsverlauf wird bei Patienten mit einem sp\u00e4teren Erkrankungsalter beobachtet.", "synonyms": "SPG4, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, famili\u00e4re, Typ 2, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "182601", "UMLS": "C1866855", "MeSH": "C536865", "GARD": "4925"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 10", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die entweder als reine Form der spastischen Paraplegie mit Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Hyperreflexie und extensorischen Plantarreflexen im Kindes- oder Jugendalter auftreten kann, oder als komplexer Ph\u00e4notyp in Verbindung mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen wie peripherer Neuropathie mit Amyotrophie der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen, m\u00e4\u00dfiger Intelligenzminderung und Parkinsonismus. Taubheit und Retinitis pigmentosa wurden in einem Fall berichtet.", "synonyms": "SPG10, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "604187", "UMLS": "C1858712", "MeSH": "C537482", "GARD": "9590"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 12", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 12 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine im Kindes- bis Erwachsenenalter auftretende, langsam progrediente Spastik und Hyperreflexie der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten, extensorischer Plantarreflex, distale sensorische Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, variable Harndrangst\u00f6rung und Pes cavus gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "SPG12, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "604805", "UMLS": "C1858106", "MeSH": "C537484", "GARD": "9586"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 13", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, pure or complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia with pyramidal signs in the upper and lower limbs, and decreased vibration sense.", "synonyms": "SPG13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "605280", "umls": "C1854467", "mesh": "C537485", "gard": "9616"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 17", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia, upper and lower limb muscle atrophy, hyperreflexia, extensor plantar responses, pes cavus and occasionally impaired vibration sense. Association with hand muscles amyotrophy typical.", "synonyms": "SPG17, Silver syndrome, Spastic paraplegia-amyotrophy of hands and feet, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "270685", "umls": "C2931276", "gard": "4219"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 19", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 19 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine langsam fortschreitende und relativ gutartige spastische Paraplegie gekennzeichnet ist, die sich im Erwachsenenalter mit spastischem Gang, Hyperreflexie der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, extensorischen Plantarreflex, Blasenfunktionsst\u00f6rungen (Harndrang und/oder Inkontinenz) und leichter sensorischer und motorischer peripherer Neuropathie zeigt.", "synonyms": "SPG19, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "607152", "UMLS": "C1846685", "MeSH": "C536856", "GARD": "9588"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 29", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine spastische Paraplegie gekennzeichnet ist, die sich in der Adoleszenz pr\u00e4sentiert, verbunden mit den zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen in Form einer sensorischen H\u00f6rst\u00f6rung aufgrund einer auditorischen Neuropathie und anhaltendem Erbrechen infolge einer hiatalen oder para\u00f6sophagealen Hernie.", "synonyms": "SPG29, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "609727", "UMLS": "C1857855", "MeSH": "C536863", "GARD": "9729"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 3", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, pure or complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia, with variable phenotype, typically characterized by childhood-onset of minimally progressive, bilateral, mainly symmetric lower limb spasticity and weakness, associated with pes cavus, scoliosis, sphincter disturbances and/or urinary bladder hyperactivity. Rare additional associated manifestations may include mild intellectual disability, axonal motor neuropathy, and seizures.", "synonyms": "Str\u00fcmpell disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "182600", "umls": "C2931355", "mesh": "C536864", "gard": "5041"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 31", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die in der Regel durch einen reinen Ph\u00e4notyp mit proximaler Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten, spastischen Gang und lebhaften Reflexen gekennzeichnet ist. Sie zeigt ein bimodales Manifestationsalter, entweder in der Kindheit oder im Erwachsenenalter (\u203a 30 Jahre). In einigen F\u00e4llen kann es sich um einen komplexen Ph\u00e4notyp mit zus\u00e4tzlichen assoziierten Manifestationen wie peripherer Neuropathie, Bulb\u00e4rparese (mit Dysarthrie und Dysphagie), distaler Amyotrophie und beeintr\u00e4chtigter distaler Vibrationsempfindlichkeit handeln.", "synonyms": "SPG31, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "610250", "UMLS": "C1853247", "GARD": "10817"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 36", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindes- oder Erwachsenenalter. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch progressive spastische Paraplegie (mit spastischem Gang, Spastik, Schw\u00e4che der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Pes cavus und Harndrang) in Verbindung mit einer peripheren sensomotorischen Neuropathie.", "synonyms": "SPG36, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613096", "UMLS": "C2936879"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 37", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 37 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch einen im Kindes- bis Erwachsenenalter auftretenden, langsam progredienten spastischen Gang, extensorische Plantarreflexe, rege Sehnenreflexe in Armen und Beinen, ein vermindertes Vibrationsempfinden an den Kn\u00f6cheln und eine Harndysfunktion gekennzeichnet ist. Bei einigen Patienten wird auch ein Kn\u00f6chelklonus berichtet.", "synonyms": "SPG37, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "611945", "UMLS": "C2936880"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 38", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by mild to severe lower limb spasticity, hyperreflexia, extensor plantar responses, impaired vibration sensation, pes cavus, and significant wasting and weakness of the small hand muscles. Temporal lobe epilepsy and cognitive dysfunction have been also reported.", "synonyms": "SPG38, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "612335", "umls": "C2676732"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit hoher intrafamili\u00e4rer klinischer Variabilit\u00e4t, die in den meisten F\u00e4llen als reiner Ph\u00e4notyp mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter (haupts\u00e4chlich in der 3. bis 5. Lebensdekade, kann aber in jedem Alter auftreten) mit fortschreitender Gangst\u00f6rung aufgrund von beidseitiger Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen sowie sehr leichter proximaler Schw\u00e4che und Harndrang charakterisiert ist. In einigen F\u00e4llen wird auch ein komplexer Ph\u00e4notyp mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen einschlie\u00dflich kognitiver Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie, Epilepsie und Neuropathie beobachtet. Ein schnellerer Krankheitsverlauf wird bei Patienten mit einem sp\u00e4teren Erkrankungsalter beobachtet.", "synonyms": "SPG4, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, famili\u00e4re, Typ 2, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "182601", "UMLS": "C1866855", "MeSH": "C536865", "GARD": "4925"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 41", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 41 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch einen Beginn im Jugend- oder fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter mit langsam fortschreitender spastischer Paraplegie, proximaler Muskelschw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten und der kleinen Handmuskeln, Hyperreflexie, spastischem Gang und leichter Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der Harnwege gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "SPG41, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613364"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 42", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 42 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine langsam fortschreitende spastische Paraplegie der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten gekennzeichnet ist. Die Krankheit kann sich in der Kindheit bis zum Erwachsenenalter manifestieren. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen einen spastischen Gang, erh\u00f6hte Sehnenreflexe in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, extensorischen Plantarreflex, Schw\u00e4che und Atrophie der Muskeln der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und in seltenen F\u00e4llen einen Pes cavus aufweisen. In der Magnetresonanztomographie werden keine Abnormalit\u00e4ten festgestellt.", "synonyms": "SPG42, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "612539", "UMLS": "C2675528"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 6", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die sich in der Regel im sp\u00e4ten Jugend- oder fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter als reiner Ph\u00e4notyp in Form einer Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen mit Hyperreflexie und extensorischem Plantarreflex sowie leichten Blasenst\u00f6rungen und Pes cavus pr\u00e4sentiert. In seltenen F\u00e4llen kann es sich um einen komplexen Ph\u00e4notyp mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen wie Epilepsie, variabler peripherer Neuropathie und/oder Ged\u00e4chtnisst\u00f6rungen handeln.", "synonyms": "SPG6, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "600363", "UMLS": "C1838192", "MeSH": "C536866", "GARD": "4928"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 73", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 73 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die im Erwachsenenalter einsetzt. Sie manifestiert sich mit spastischen Paraparese in den Unterschenkeln, Hyperreflexie, plantare Streckreaktionen, proximale Muskelschw\u00e4che, milde Muskelatrophie, vermindertes Vibrationsempfinden an den Kn\u00f6cheln und milde Dysfunktion des Harntrakts. Es wurde berichtet, dass bei einigen Patienten Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten auftreten k\u00f6nnen. Bei der Magnetresonanztomographie des Gehirns und bei Untersuchungen der peripheren Nervenleitgeschwindigkeit werden keine Anomalien festgestellt.", "synonyms": "SPG73, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "616282"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 8", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, pure or complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by early adulthood onset of slowly progressive lower limb spasticity resulting in gait disturbances, hyperreflexia and extensor plantar responses, urinary urgency and/or incontinence, muscle weakness, decreased vibration sense and mild muscular atrophy in lower extremities. It may be associated with complicating signs, such as sensory neuropathy, ataxia (i.e. mild dysmetria, uncoordinated eye movement) and mild dysphagia.", "synonyms": "SPG8, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "603563", "umls": "C1863704", "mesh": "C536867", "gard": "9591"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 9A", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by juvenile to adult onset of slowly progressive spasticity mainly affecting the lower limbs, associated with spastic dysarthria and motor neuropathy. Additional manifestations include congenital bilateral cataract, gastroesophageal reflux, persistent vomiting, mild cerebellar signs, pes cavus, and occasionally short stature, among others.", "synonyms": "AD-SPG9A, Cataracts-motor neuropathy-short stature-skeletal anomalies syndrome, Spastic paraparesis-amyopathy-cataracts-gastroesophageal reflux syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "601162"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 9B", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare predominantly pure hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by juvenile or adult onset of slowly progressive spastic paraparesis, gait disturbances, and increased tendon reflexes. Additional variable manifestations include pes cavus, dysarthria, sensory impairment, and urinary symptoms. Cognition is normal.", "synonyms": "AD-SPG9B, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Infancy, Adolescent", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 2", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 58", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener, komplexer Subtyp der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, der durch einen variablen Beginn der langsam fortschreitenden Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten und eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Kleinhirnataxie gekennzeichnet ist, die mit Gangst\u00f6rungen, Dysarthrie, erh\u00f6hten Reflexen der tiefen Sehne und extensorischen plantare Reaktionen einhergeht. Weitere Merkmale k\u00f6nnen sich in Form von unwillk\u00fcrlichen Bewegungen (z.B. Klonus, Tremor, Faszikulationen, Chorea), verminderten Vibrationsempfinden, okulomotorischen Anomalien (z.B. Nystagmus) und distaler Amyotrophie der oberen und unteren Extremit\u00e4ten manifestieren.", "synonyms": "SPAX2, SPG58, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "611302"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 30", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomale spastische Paraplegie Typ 30 ist eine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die entweder als reine spastische Paraplegie oder als komplizierter Ph\u00e4notyp manifestiert. Sie tritt normalerweise im ersten oder zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt auf und ist gekennzeichnet durch spastische untere Extremit\u00e4ten, einen unsicheren Gang, Hyperreflexie und extensorische Plantarreflexe. Die komplizierte Form weist zus\u00e4tzliche Manifestationen auf, die distalen Schwund, sakkadischen Augenbewegungen, leichte zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie und leichte distale axonale Neuropathie umfassen k\u00f6nnen.", "synonyms": "SPG30, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "610357", "UMLS": "C1835896"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 58", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener, komplexer Subtyp der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, der durch einen variablen Beginn der langsam fortschreitenden Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten und eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Kleinhirnataxie gekennzeichnet ist, die mit Gangst\u00f6rungen, Dysarthrie, erh\u00f6hten Reflexen der tiefen Sehne und extensorischen plantare Reaktionen einhergeht. Weitere Merkmale k\u00f6nnen sich in Form von unwillk\u00fcrlichen Bewegungen (z.B. Klonus, Tremor, Faszikulationen, Chorea), verminderten Vibrationsempfinden, okulomotorischen Anomalien (z.B. Nystagmus) und distaler Amyotrophie der oberen und unteren Extremit\u00e4ten manifestieren.", "synonyms": "SPAX2, SPG58, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "611302"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive - Bandscheibenvorfall", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 25", "german_description": "Die Ursache des SPG25-Ph\u00e4notyps wurde auf Chromosom 6q23-q24.1 lokalisiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 25 (SPG25) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by adult-onset spastic paraplegia associated with spinal pain that radiates to the upper or lower limbs and is related to disk herniation (with minor spondylosis), as well as mild sensorimotor neuropathy. The SPG25 phenotype has been mapped to a locus on chromosome 6q23-q24.1.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia-disc herniation syndrome, SPG25, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "608220", "umls": "C2936860", "mesh": "C536861", "gard": "9582"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 11", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive lower limbs weakness and spasticity, upper limbs weakness, dysarthria, hypomimia, sphincter disturbances, peripheral neuropathy, learning difficulties, cognitive impairment and dementia. Magnetic resonance imaging shows thin corpus callosum, cerebral atrophy, and periventricular white matter changes.", "synonyms": "Nakamura-Osame syndrome, SPG11, Spastic paraplegia-intellectual disability-thin corpus callosum syndrome, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "604360", "umls": "C1858479\u00a0 C2931821", "mesh": "C537483\u00a0 C538335", "gard": "4919"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 14", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 14 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by adulthood-onset of slowly progressive spastic paraplegia of lower limbs presenting with spastic gait, hyperreflexia, and mild lower limb hypertonicity associated with mild intellectual disability, visual agnosia, short and long-term memory deficiency and mild distal motor neuropathy. Bilateral pes cavus and extensor plantar responses are also associated.", "synonyms": "SPG14, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "605229", "umls": "C1854568", "mesh": "C537486", "gard": "9589"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 15 ist eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindes- bis Erwachsenenalter. Sie ist gelennzeichnet durch eine langsam fortschreitende Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen (die zu Gangst\u00f6rungen, extensorischen Plantarreflexen und vermindertem Vibrationsempfinden f\u00fchrt) in Verbindung mit einer leichten Intelligenzminderung, einer leichten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie, einer peripheren Neuropathie (mit distaler Amyotrophie der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen) und einer Netzhautdegeneration. Ein d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum ist ein h\u00e4ufiger Bildgebungsbefund.", "synonyms": "Kjellin-Syndrom, SPG15, Spastische Paraparese, heredit\u00e4re, Typ 15, Spastische Paraplegie - Netzhautdegeneration, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "270700", "UMLS": "C1849128", "MeSH": "C536642", "GARD": "9581"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 18", "german_description": "SPG18 entsteht durch eine Mutation im ERLIN2-Gen (8p11.2), welches das Protein Erlin-2 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 18 (SPG18) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia (presenting in early childhood) associated with delayed motor development, severe intellectual disability and joint contractures. A thin corpus callosum is equally noted on brain magnetic resonance imaging. SPG18 is caused by a mutation in the ERLIN2 gene (8p11.2) encoding the protein, Erlin-2.", "synonyms": "SPG18, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "611225", "umls": "C2749936", "gard": "4922"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 20", "german_description": "Die SPG20 ist auf Mutationen im SPG20-Gen (13q13.1) zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, welches f\u00fcr das Protein Spartin kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 20 (SPG20) is a type of complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of progressive spastic paraparesis associated with distal amyotrophy, psuedobulbar palsy, motor and cognitive delays, mild cerebellar signs (dysarthria, dysdiadochokinesia, mild intention tremor), short stature and subtle skeletal abnormalities (pes cavus, mild talipes equinovarus, kyphoscoliosis). SPG20 is due to mutations in the SPG20 gene (13q13.1), which encodes the protein spartin.", "synonyms": "Childhood-onset spastic paraparesis-distal muscle wasting syndrome, SPG20, Troyer syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "275900", "umls": "C0393559", "gard": "5372"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 21", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 21 ist eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch den Beginn einer langsam fortschreitenden spastischen Paraparese im Jugend- oder Erwachsenenalter gekennzeichnet ist. Sie geht einher mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen wie Apraxie, kognitivem und sprachlichem Verfall (der in einigen F\u00e4llen zu Demenz und akinetischem Mutismus f\u00fchrt), Pers\u00f6nlichkeitsst\u00f6rungen und extrapyramidalen Zeichen (z. B. oromandibul\u00e4re Dyskinesie, Rigidit\u00e4t) sowie zerebell\u00e4ren Auff\u00e4lligkeiten (Dysdiadochokinesie und Inkoordination). Subtile Anomalien (z. B. Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen) k\u00f6nnen bereits in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit festgestellt werden. In der Magnetresonanztomographie k\u00f6nnen ein d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum und Anomalien der wei\u00dfen Substanz beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "Mast-Syndrom, SPG21, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "248900", "UMLS": "C1855346"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 23", "german_description": "Die Ursache des SPG23-Ph\u00e4notyps wurde auf Chromosom 1q24-q32 lokalisiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 23 (SPG23) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia that presents in childhood with progressive spastic paraplegia, associated with peripheral neuropathy, skin pigment abnormalities (i.e. vitiligo, hyperpigmentation, diffuse lentigines), premature graying of hair, and characteristic facies (i.e. thin with ''sharp'' features). The SPG23 phenotype has been mapped to a locus on chromosome 1q24-q32.", "synonyms": "Lison syndrome, SPG23, Spastic paraparesis-vitiligo-premature graying-characteristic facies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "270750", "umls": "C0796019", "gard": "336"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 24", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare, pure form of spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of lower limb spasticity associated with gait disturbances, scissor gait, tiptoe walking, clonus and increased deep tendon reflexes. Mild upper limb involvement may occasionally also be associated.", "synonyms": "SPG24, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "607584", "umls": "C1843569", "gard": "9296"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 25", "german_description": "Die Ursache des SPG25-Ph\u00e4notyps wurde auf Chromosom 6q23-q24.1 lokalisiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 25 (SPG25) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by adult-onset spastic paraplegia associated with spinal pain that radiates to the upper or lower limbs and is related to disk herniation (with minor spondylosis), as well as mild sensorimotor neuropathy. The SPG25 phenotype has been mapped to a locus on chromosome 6q23-q24.1.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia-disc herniation syndrome, SPG25, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "608220", "umls": "C2936860", "mesh": "C536861", "gard": "9582"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 26", "german_description": "SPG26 wird durch Mutationen im B4GALNT1-Gen (12q13.3) ausgel\u00f6st, welches die Beta-1,4-N-Acetyl-Glucosaminyl-Transferase 1 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 26 (SPG26) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by the onset in childhood/adolescence (ages 2-19) of progressive spastic paraplegia associated mainly with mild to moderate cognitive impairment and developmental delay, cerebellar ataxia, dysarthria, and peripheral neuropathy. Less commonly reported manifestations include skeletal abnormalities (i.e. pes cavus, scoliosis), dyskinesia, dystonia, cataracts, cerebellar signs (i.e. saccadic dysfunction, nystagmus, dysmetria), bladder disturbances, and behavioral problems. SPG26 is caused by mutations in the B4GALNT1 gene (12q13.3), encoding Beta-1, 4 N-acetylgalactosaminyltransferase 1.", "synonyms": "GM2 synthase deficiency, SPG26, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "609195", "umls": "C1836632", "mesh": "C536862", "gard": "9587"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 27", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 27 is a rare, pure or complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by a variable onset of slowly progressive lower limb spasticity, hyperreflexia and extensor plantar responses, that may be associated with sensorimotor polyneuropathy, decreased vibration sense, lower limb distal muscle wasting, dysarthria and mild to moderate intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "SPG27, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Adolescent", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "609041", "umls": "C1836899"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 28", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 28 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindes- oder Jugendalter. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine langsam fortschreitende, rein krurale spastischen Paraparese, die sich durch eine leichte Schw\u00e4che der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Gangschwierigkeiten, extensorische Plantarreflexe und Hyperreflexie der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten manifestiert. Zu den selteneren Manifestationen geh\u00f6ren zerebell\u00e4re okulomotorische St\u00f6rungen mit sakkadischer Augenverfolgung, Pes cavus und Skoliose. Einige Patienten zeigen auch einen Verlust von Nadel- und Vibrationsempfindlichkeit in den Unterschenkeln.", "synonyms": "SPG28, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "609340", "UMLS": "C1836295"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 32", "german_description": "Die Ursache des SPG32-Ph\u00e4notyps wurde auf Chromosom 14q12-q21 lokalisiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 32 (SPG32) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by a slowly progressive spastic paraplegia (with walking difficulties appearing at onset at 6-7 years of age) associated with mild intellectual disability. Brain imaging reveals thin corpus callosum, cortical and cerebellar atrophy, and pontine dysraphia. The SPG32 phenotype has been mapped to a locus on chromosome 14q12-q21.", "synonyms": "SPG32, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "611252", "umls": "C1970009", "gard": "12749"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 35", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch den Beginn eines komplexen Ph\u00e4notyps im Kindesalter (selten im Jugendalter) gekennzeichnet ist, der sich durch eine Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen (gefolgt von den oberen Gliedma\u00dfen) mit Hyperreflexie und extensorischen Plantarreflexen auszeichnet. Zu den zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen geh\u00f6ren progressive Dysarthrie, Dystonie, leichter kognitiver Verfall, extrapyramidale Merkmalen, Optikusatrophie und Krampfanf\u00e4lle. In der Magnetresonanztomographie k\u00f6nnen Anomalien der wei\u00dfen Substanz und eine Eisenanreicherung im Gehirn auff\u00e4llig sein.", "synonyms": "SPG35, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "612319"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 39", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch progediente spastische Paraplegie und distale Muskelatrophie. Bisher wurde es in 2 Familien beschrieben. Alle Betroffenen hatten Mutationen im PNPLA6-Gen (19p13.3) der 'neuropathy target'-Esterase, einem neuronalen Membranprotein. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia and distal muscle wasting.", "synonyms": "SPG39, Spastic paraplegia due to NTE mutation, Spastic paraplegia due to neuropathy target esterase mutation, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "612020", "umls": "C2677586", "gard": "4924"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 43", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 43 ist eine seltene, komplexe heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, die durch eine im Kindes- bis Jugendalter einsetzende progressive Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen gekennzeichnet ist, die mit leichten bis schweren Gangst\u00f6rungen, extensorischen Plantarreflexen, Muskelschw\u00e4che und schwerer distaler Atrophie, h\u00e4ufig mit Beteiligung der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen, einhergeht. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale k\u00f6nnen Gelenkkontrakturen, distaler sensorischer Verlust und rege oder fehlende tiefe Sehnenreflexe sein. Andere Anzeichen wie Depressionen, Ged\u00e4chtnisverlust, Optikusatrophie (mit Sehkraftverlust) und Eisenablagerungen im Gehirn (die durch Bildgebung sichtbar werden) wurden ebenfalls dokumentiert.", "synonyms": "SPG43, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615043"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 44", "german_description": "SPG44 entsteht durch Mutationen im GJC2-Gen (1q41-q42), welches das Gap Junction Gamma-2-Protein kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 44 (SPG44) is a very rare, complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by a late-onset, slowly progressive spastic paraplegia associated with mild ataxia and dysarthria, upper extremity involvement (i.e. loss of finger dexterity, dysmetria), and mild cognitive impairment, without the presence of nystagmus. A hypomyelinating leukodystrophy and thin corpus callosum is observed in all cases and psychomotor development is normal or near normal. SPG44 is caused by mutations in the GJC2 gene (1q41-q42) encoding the gap junction gamma-2 protein.", "synonyms": "SPG44, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "613206", "umls": "C2750784"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 45", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 45 ist eine seltene, reine oder komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch im Kindesalter beginnende progressive Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Gangst\u00f6rungen, erh\u00f6hte tiefe Sehnenreflexe und extensorische Plantarreflexe. Sie kann mit Intelligenzminderung einhergehen und zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale wie Kontrakturen der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Amyotrophie, Klumpfu\u00df und Optikusatrophie sind beschrieben worden.", "synonyms": "SPG45, SPG65, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 65, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613162"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 46", "german_description": "SPG46 entsteht durch eine Mutation im GBA2-Gen (9p13.2), welches eine nicht-lysosomale Glukosylceramidase kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 46 (SPG46) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset, in infancy or childhood, of the typical signs of spastic paraplegia (i.e. spastic gait and weakness of the lower limbs) associated with a variety of additional manifestations including upper limb spasticity and weakness, pseudobulbar dysarthria, bladder dysfunction, cerebellar ataxia, cataracts, and cognitive impairment that can progress to dementia. Brain imaging may show thinning of the corpus callosum and mild atrophy of the cerebrum and cerebellum. SPG46 is due to mutations in the GBA2 gene (9p13.2) encoding non-lysosomal glucosylceramidase.", "synonyms": "SPG46, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "614409"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 48", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 48 ist eine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit einem Beginn im mittleren bis sp\u00e4ten Erwachsenenalter. In der Regel manifestiert sie als reiner Ph\u00e4notyp einer langsam progredienten spastischen Paraplegie in Verbindung mit Harninkontinenz. Ein komplexer Ph\u00e4notyp mit den zus\u00e4tzlichen Befunden kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, sensomotorische Polyneuropathie, Ataxie und Parkinsonismus sowie d\u00fcnnem Corpus callosum und L\u00e4sionen der wei\u00dfen Substanz (gesehen in der Magnetresonanztomographie) wurde ebenfalls berichtet.", "synonyms": "SPG48, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613647"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 49", "sub_name": "Heredit\u00e4re sensorische und autonome Neuropathie durch TECPR2-Mutation", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hereditary sensory and autonomic neuropathy due to TECPR2 mutation is a rare genetic peripheral neuropathy characterized by early hypotonia evolving to spastic paraparesis, areflexia, decreased pain and temperature sensitivity, autonomic neuropathy, gastroesophageal reflux disease, recurrent pneumonia and respiratory problems. Patients also have intellectual disability and dysmorphic features, including mild brachycephalic microcephaly, short broad neck, low anterior hairline and coarse face.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 49, HSAN due to TECPR2 mutation, SPG49, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615031"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 53", "german_description": "SPG53 wird durch Mutationen im VPS37A-Gen (8p22) verursacht, welches das vacuolar protein sorting-Protein 37A kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 53 (SPG53) is a very rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by early-onset spastic paraplegia (with spasticity in the lower extremities that progresses to the upper extremities) associated with developmental and motor delay, mild to moderate cognitive and speech delay, skeletal dysmorphism (e.g. kyphosis and pectus), hypertrichosis and mildly impaired vibration sense. SPG53 is due to mutations in the VPS37A gene (8p22) encoding vacuolar protein sorting-associated protein 37A.", "synonyms": "SPG53, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "614898"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 54", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 54 (SPG54) ist eine seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch progressive spastische Paraplegie mit Beginn im fr\u00fchen Kindesalter und zerebell\u00e4ren Zeichen, Minderwuchs, verz\u00f6gerter psychomotorischer Entwicklung, Intelligenzminderung und, weniger h\u00e4ufig, Fu\u00dfkontrakturen, Dysarthrie, Dysphagie, Strabismus und Sehnervhypoplasie gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "SPG54, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615033"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 55", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 55 (SPG55) ist eine seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine progressive spastische Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindesalter gekennzeichnet ist. Es kommt zu einer Sehnervatrophie (mit reduzierter visueller Sch\u00e4rfe und zentralem Skotom), Ophtalmoplegie, einer reduzierten Kraft und Feinmotorik der oberen Extremit\u00e4t, muskul\u00e4rer Atrophie in den unteren Extremit\u00e4ten und sensomotorischer Neuropathie.", "synonyms": "SPG55, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615035"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 56", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by delayed walking, toe walking, unsteady and spastic gait, hyperreflexia of the lower limbs, and extensor plantar responses. Upper limbs spasticity and dystonia, subclinical axonal neuropathy, cognitive impairment and intellectual disability have also been associated.", "synonyms": "SPG56, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615030"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 57", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 57 (SPG57) ist eine sehr seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die sich durch einen Beginn von im Kleinkindalter mit Spastik in den Beinen (f\u00fchrt zum Verlust des Gehverm\u00f6gens), reduzierte Sehsch\u00e4rfe auf Grund von Sehnervatrophie und Kraftverlust der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe aufgrund von demyelinisierender sensomotorischer Neuropathie auszeichnet.", "synonyms": "SPG57, Spastische Paraplegie durch partiellen TFG-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615658"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 59", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 59 is a very rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an early onset of progressive lower limb spasticity, tip-toe walking, scissor gait, hyperreflexia and clonus that may be associated with borderline intellectual disability. Nystagmus and pes equinovarus have also been reported.", "synonyms": "SPG59, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 5A", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 5A ist eine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die entweder durch einen reinen Ph\u00e4notyp einer langsam progredienten spastischen Paraplegie der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten mit Blasenfunktionsst\u00f6rung und Pes cavus oder durch eine komplexe Pr\u00e4sentation mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen wie zerebell\u00e4ren Zeichen, Nystagmus, distaler oder generalisierter Muskelatrophie und kognitiven Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen gekennzeichnet ist. Das Alter des Auftretens ist sehr variabel und reicht von der fr\u00fchen Kindheit bis zum Erwachsenenalter. In der Magnetresonanztomographie des Gehirns k\u00f6nnen bei einigen Patienten eine Hyperintensit\u00e4t der wei\u00dfen Substanz sowie eine Atrophie des Kleinhirns und des R\u00fcckenmarks festgestellt werden.", "synonyms": "SPG5A, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "270800", "UMLS": "C1849115\u00a0 C2931356", "MeSH": "C536871", "GARD": "4926"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 60", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 60 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by infantile onset of progressive lower limb spasticity, inability to walk, hypertonia and impaired vibration sense at ankles, with complicating signs including sensory impairment, nystagmus, motor axonal neuropathy and mild intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "SPG60, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 61", "german_description": "SPG61 entsteht durch eine Mutation im ARL6IP1-Gen (16p12-p11.2), welches das ADP-Ribosylierungsfaktor-\u00e4hnliche Protein 6-interagierende Protein 1 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 61 (SPG61) is a rare, complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of spastic paraplegia (presenting with the inability to walk unsupported and a scissors gait) associated with a motor and sensory polyneuropathy with loss of terminal digits and acropathy. SPG61 is due to a mutation in the ARL6IP1 gene (16p12-p11.2) encoding the ADP-ribosylation factor-like protein 6-interacting protein 1.", "synonyms": "SPG61, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615685"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 62", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 62 ist eine reine oder komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt. Sie manifestiert sich mit spastischer Paraparese (st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gt in den unteren als in den oberen Extremit\u00e4ten) und unsicheren Gang, sowie erh\u00f6hten tiefen Sehnenreflexen, Amyotrophie, zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie und teilweise Flexionskontrakturen der Knie.", "synonyms": "SPG62, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615681"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 63", "german_description": "SPG63 entsteht durch eine homozygote Mutation im AMPD2-Gen (1p13.3), welches die AMP-Deaminase 2 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 63 (SPG63) is an extremely rare and complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of spastic paraplegia (presenting with delayed walking and a scissors gait) associated with short stature, and normal cognition. Periventricular deep white matter changes in the corpus callosum are noted on brain imaging. SPG63 is caused by a homozygous mutation in the AMPD2 gene (1p13.3) encoding AMP deaminase 2.", "synonyms": "SPG63, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615686"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 64", "german_description": "SPG64 entsteht durch Mutationen im ENTPD1-Gen (10q24.1), welches die Ektonukleosid-Triphostphat-Disphosphohydrolase 1 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 64 is an extremely rare and complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia (see this term), reported in only 4 patients from 2 families to date, characterized by spastic paraplegia (presenting between the ages of 1 to 4 years with abnormal gait) associated with microcephaly, amyotrophy, cerebellar signs (e.g. dysarthria) aggressiveness, delayed puberty and mild to moderate intellectual disability. SPG64 is due to mutations in the ENTPD1 gene (10q24.1), encoding ectonucleoside triphosphate diphosphohydrolase 1.", "synonyms": "SPG64, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615683"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 65", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 45", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 45 ist eine seltene, reine oder komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch im Kindesalter beginnende progressive Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Gangst\u00f6rungen, erh\u00f6hte tiefe Sehnenreflexe und extensorische Plantarreflexe. Sie kann mit Intelligenzminderung einhergehen und zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale wie Kontrakturen der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Amyotrophie, Klumpfu\u00df und Optikusatrophie sind beschrieben worden.", "synonyms": "SPG45, SPG65, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 65, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613162"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 66", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 66 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by infantile onset of progressive lower limb spasticity, severe gait disturbances leading to a non-ambulatory state, absent deep tendon reflexes and amyotrophy. Additional signs include severe sensorimotor neuropathy, pes equinovarus and mild intellectual disability. Cerebellar and corpus callosum hypoplasia, as well as colpocephaly, are observed on neuroimaging.", "synonyms": "SPG66, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 67", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine extrem seltene, komplexe heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, die durch eine im S\u00e4uglings- oder Kindesalter einsetzende globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und eine progressive Spastik mit Tremor in den distalen Gliedma\u00dfen, erh\u00f6hten tiefen Sehnenreflexen und extensorischen Plantarreflexen gekennzeichnet ist, die mit einer leichten Intelligenzminderung einhergehen k\u00f6nnen. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale sind Muskelschwund und Kleinhirnanomalien.", "synonyms": "SPG67, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 69", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 69 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by infantile onset of progressive lower limb spasticity, global developmental delay, hyperreflexia, clonus and extensor plantar reflexes, associated with dysarthria, intellectual disability, cataracts and hearing impairment.", "synonyms": "SPG69, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 7", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of hereditary spastic ataxia characterized by an onset usually in adulthood (but ranging from 10-72 years) of progressive bilateral lower limb weakness and spasticity and sometimes predominant cerebellar ataxia. In addition to frequent sphincter dysfunction and decreased vibratory sense at the ankles, manifestations may include optical neuropathy, nystagmus, blepharoptosis, ophthalmoplegia, decreased hearing, scoliosis, pes cavus, motor and sensory neuropathy, muscle atrophy, parkinsonism, and dystonia.", "synonyms": "SPG7, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "607259", "umls": "C1846564\u00a0 C3711370", "gard": "4927", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence of autosomal dominant and autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia (SPG) combined is about 1.8 /100.000, the prevalence of SPG type 7 is unknown.", "clinical_description": "The disease onset is typically between the third and fifth decade, even though earlier or later onset are reported (10-72 years). The clinical presentation can be a pure spastic paraplegia (pyramidal syndrome, sphincter dysfunction, lower limbs weakness, diminished vibration sense, pes cavus) mostly associated with, cerebellar ataxia. Optic atrophy, ptosis and oculomotor abnormalities (nystagmus, progressive external ophthalmoplegia, saccadic pursuit) are frequently associated. Additional neurological signs are spastic dysarthria, dysphagia, parkinsonism, dystonia, scoliosis, hearing loss, and cognitive impairment. Brain magnetic resonance imaging nearly always shows a cerebellar atrophy and electromyography can detect a motor and sensory neuropathy.", "etiology": "The disease is due to biallelic pathogenic variants in the SPG7 gene (chromosome 16q24.3) coding for paraplegin protein.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation and confirmed by genetic testing (panel sequencing of hereditary spastic paraplegia genes, exome or genome analysis).", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes autosomal dominant and recessive spastic paraplegias, spinocerebellar ataxias (e.g. Spinocerebellar ataxia type 28), adrenomyeloneuropathy and other leukodystrophies, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, and primary progressive multiple sclerosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible if the pathogenic variants are known and present in at risk couples (where both parents are heterozygous carriers).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy. Few cases of dominant transmission are reported, individuals carrying one pathogenic variant could present signs (e. g. mild cerebellar atrophy, peripheral neuropathy) or symptoms (e. g. cerebellar ataxia, brisk deep tendon reflexes).", "management_and_treatment": "The treatment is symptomatic, including myorelaxants (oral or intrathecal baclofen, dantrolene, intramuscular botulinum toxin, etc.), bladder control medications, anti-parkinsonian drugs (L-Dopa, dopamine-agonists). Physical, occupational, and speech therapy should be proposed in association with medication.", "prognosis": "The disease course is variable but often the walking autonomy is decreased requiring the use of a wheelchair. The disease strongly affects the quality of life."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 70", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 70 is a very rare, complex subtype of hereditary spastic paraplegia that presents in infancy with delayed motor development (i.e. crawling, walking) and is characterized by lower limb spasticity, increased deep tendon reflexes, extensor plantar responses, impaired vibratory sensation at ankles, amyotrophy and borderline intellectual disability. Additional signs may include gait disturbances, Achilles tendon contractures, scoliosis and cerebellar abnormalities.", "synonyms": "SPG70, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 71", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 71 is a rare, genetic, pure hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by infancy onset of crural spastic paraperesis with scissors gait, extensor plantar response, and increased tendon reflexes. Neuroimaging reveals a thin corpus callosum and electromyography and nerve conduction velocity studies are normal.", "synonyms": "SPG71, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 72", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal spastic paraplegia type 72 is a rare, genetic, pure hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by early childhood onset of slowly progressive crural spastic paraparesis presenting with spastic gait, mild stiffness at rest, hyperreflexia (in lower limbs), extensor plantar responses and, in some, mild postural tremor, pes cavus, sphincter disturbances and sensory loss at ankles.", "synonyms": "SPG72, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615625"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 74", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 74 is a rare, genetic, spastic paraplegia-optic atrophy-neuropathy-related (SPOAN-like) disorder characterized by childhood onset of mild to moderate spastic paraparesis which manifests with gait impairment that very slowly progresses into late adulthood, hyperactive patellar reflex and bilateral extensor plantar response, in association with optic atrophy and typical symptoms of peripheral neuropathy, including reduced or absent ankle reflexes, lower limb atrophy and distal sensory impairment. Reduced visual acuity and pes cavus are frequently reported.", "synonyms": "SPG74, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "616451"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 75", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 75 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an early onset and slow progression of spastic paraplegia associated with cerebellar signs, nystagmus, peripheral neuropathy, extensor plantar responses and borderline to mild intellectual disability. Additional features of hypo- or areflexia, mild upper limb involvement and significant visual impairment (optic atrophy, vision loss, astigmatism) have been reported.", "synonyms": "SPG75, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "616680"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 76", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 76 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by adult onset slowly progressive, mild to moderate lower limb spasticity and hyperreflexia, resulting in gait disturbances, commonly associated with upper limb hyperreflexia and dysarthria. Foot deformities (usually pes cavus) and extensor plantar responses are also frequent. Additional features may include ataxia, lower limb weakness/amyotrophy, abnormal bladder function, distal sensory loss and mild intellectual deterioration.", "synonyms": "SPG76, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "616907"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 77", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 77 is a rare, pure or complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an infancy to childhood onset of slowly progressive lower limb spasticity, delayed motor milestones, gait disturbances, hyperreflexia and various muscle abnormalities, including weakness, hypotonia, intention tremor and amyotrophy. Ocular abnormalities (e.g. strabismus, ptosis) and other neurological abnormalities, such as dysarthria, seizures and extensor plantar responses, may also be associated.", "synonyms": "SPG77, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "617046"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 78", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive complex spastic paraplegia characterized by mostly adult-onset progressive spasticity and weakness predominantly affecting the lower limbs, axonal motor and sensory neuropathy, and cerebellar symptoms like ataxia, dysarthria, and oculomotor abnormalities. Variable degrees of cognitive impairment may also be present. Subtle extrapyramidal involvement and supranuclear gaze palsy were reported in some cases. Features on brain imaging include cerebral and cerebellar atrophy and sometimes abnormalities of the corpus callosum or basal ganglia.", "synonyms": "SPG78, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "617225"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 9B", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by early onset of slowly progressive spastic para- or tetraparesis, increased tendon reflexes, positive Babinski sign, global developmental delay, cognitive impairment, and pseudobulbar palsy. Additional manifestations include dysmorphic facial features, tremor, short stature, and urinary incontinence.", "synonyms": "AR-SPG9B, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "616586"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie durch NTE (neuropathy target esterase)-Genmutation", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 39", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch progediente spastische Paraplegie und distale Muskelatrophie. Bisher wurde es in 2 Familien beschrieben. Alle Betroffenen hatten Mutationen im PNPLA6-Gen (19p13.3) der 'neuropathy target'-Esterase, einem neuronalen Membranprotein. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia and distal muscle wasting.", "synonyms": "SPG39, Spastic paraplegia due to NTE mutation, Spastic paraplegia due to neuropathy target esterase mutation, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "612020", "umls": "C2677586", "gard": "4924"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie durch partiellen TFG-Mangel", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 57", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 57 (SPG57) ist eine sehr seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die sich durch einen Beginn von im Kleinkindalter mit Spastik in den Beinen (f\u00fchrt zum Verlust des Gehverm\u00f6gens), reduzierte Sehsch\u00e4rfe auf Grund von Sehnervatrophie und Kraftverlust der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe aufgrund von demyelinisierender sensomotorischer Neuropathie auszeichnet.", "synonyms": "SPG57, Spastische Paraplegie durch partiellen TFG-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615658"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie - Glaukom - Intelligenzminderung", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch progrediente spastische Paraplegie, Glaukom und geistige Behinderung. Es wurde in 2 Geschwisterschaften beschrieben, eine davon mit blutsverwandten Eltern. Die Vererbung ist wahrscheinlich autosomal-rezesssiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spastic paraplegia-glaucoma-intellectual disability syndrome is characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia, glaucoma and intellectual deficit. It has been described in two families. The second described sibship was born to consanguineous parents. The mode of inheritance is autosomal recessive.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "270850", "umls": "C1849113"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, heredit\u00e4re - distaler Muskelschwund", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 20", "german_description": "Die SPG20 ist auf Mutationen im SPG20-Gen (13q13.1) zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, welches f\u00fcr das Protein Spartin kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 20 (SPG20) is a type of complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of progressive spastic paraparesis associated with distal amyotrophy, psuedobulbar palsy, motor and cognitive delays, mild cerebellar signs (dysarthria, dysdiadochokinesia, mild intention tremor), short stature and subtle skeletal abnormalities (pes cavus, mild talipes equinovarus, kyphoscoliosis). SPG20 is due to mutations in the SPG20 gene (13q13.1), which encodes the protein spartin.", "synonyms": "Childhood-onset spastic paraparesis-distal muscle wasting syndrome, SPG20, Troyer syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "275900", "umls": "C0393559", "gard": "5372"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Intelligenzminderung-d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 11", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive lower limbs weakness and spasticity, upper limbs weakness, dysarthria, hypomimia, sphincter disturbances, peripheral neuropathy, learning difficulties, cognitive impairment and dementia. Magnetic resonance imaging shows thin corpus callosum, cerebral atrophy, and periventricular white matter changes.", "synonyms": "Nakamura-Osame syndrome, SPG11, Spastic paraplegia-intellectual disability-thin corpus callosum syndrome, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "604360", "umls": "C1858479\u00a0 C2931821", "mesh": "C537483\u00a0 C538335", "gard": "4919"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Intelligenzminderung-Nystagmus-Adipositas-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by the association of congenital spastic paraplegia with global developmental delay and intellectual disability, ophthalmologic abnormalities (including nystagmus, reduced visual acuity, or hypermetropia), and obesity. Additional manifestations are brachyplagiocephaly and dysmorphic facial features. Brain imaging may show dilated ventricles, abnormal myelination, and mild generalized atrophy. Homozygous loss-of-function variants of KIDINS220 associated with a fetal lethal phenotype with ventriculomegaly and limb contractures have been reported.", "synonyms": "SINO syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "617296"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, komplexe Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, komplizierte, X-chromosomale, Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A congenital, X-linked, clinical subtype of L1 syndrome, characterized by spastic paraplegia, mild to moderate intellectual disability and normal brain morphology. This subtype represents the milder end of the L1 syndrome spectrum.", "synonyms": "SPG1, ", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "gard": "12525"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-kutane Gesichtsl\u00e4sionen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Spastische Paraplegie-kutane Gesichtsl\u00e4sionen-Syndrom ist eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch Verz\u00f6gerungen in der motorischen Entwicklung, gefolgt von einer langsam progredienten spastischen Paraplegie (die haupts\u00e4chlich die unteren Extremit\u00e4ten betrifft) in Verbindung mit einem schuppenden Gesichtsausschlag mit Schmetterlingsverteilung (der sich im Alter von etwa zwei Monaten zeigt) und Dysarthrie gekennzeichnet ist. Seit 1982 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "synonyms": "Bahemuka-Brown-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "UMLS": "C2931617", "GARD": "806"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie mit Paget-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spastische Paraplegie mit Paget-Syndrom ist eine extrem seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die im Erwachsenenalter auftritt und durch eine langsam fortschreitende spastische Paraplegie (mit erh\u00f6htem Muskeltonus, verminderter Kraft in den vorderen tibialen Muskeln und Hyperreflexie in den unteren Extremit\u00e4ten mit Babinski-Zeichen) gekennzeichnet ist, die mit der Paget-Knochenkrankheit einhergeht. Kognitiver Verfall, Demenz und myopathische Ver\u00e4nderungen bei der Muskelbiopsie wurden nicht berichtet.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, m\u00fctterlich-vererbte", "sub_name": "Mitochondriale spastische Paraplegie, MT-ATP6-assoziierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "MT-ATP6-related mitochondrial spastic paraplegia is a rare, genetic, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by adulthood-onset of slowly progressive, bilateral, mainly lower limb spasticity and distal weakness associated with lower limb pain, hyperreflexia, and reduced vibration sense. Axonal neuropathy is frequently observed on electromyography and nerve conduction examination.", "synonyms": "Maternally-inherited SPG, Maternally-inherited spastic paraplegia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Mitochondrial inheritance\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Nephritis-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine progressive, variable spastische Paraplegie in Verbindung mit beidseitiger sensorineuraler Taubheit, Intelligenzminderung und progressiver Nephropathie gekennzeichnet ist. Seit 1988 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "synonyms": "Fitzsimmons-Walson-Mellor-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Keine Daten verf\u00fcgbar", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "182690", "UMLS": "C2931667", "GARD": "2342"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie - Netzhautdegeneration", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 15 ist eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindes- bis Erwachsenenalter. Sie ist gelennzeichnet durch eine langsam fortschreitende Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen (die zu Gangst\u00f6rungen, extensorischen Plantarreflexen und vermindertem Vibrationsempfinden f\u00fchrt) in Verbindung mit einer leichten Intelligenzminderung, einer leichten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie, einer peripheren Neuropathie (mit distaler Amyotrophie der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen) und einer Netzhautdegeneration. Ein d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum ist ein h\u00e4ufiger Bildgebungsbefund.", "synonyms": "Kjellin-Syndrom, SPG15, Spastische Paraparese, heredit\u00e4re, Typ 15, Spastische Paraplegie - Netzhautdegeneration, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "270700", "UMLS": "C1849128", "MeSH": "C536642", "GARD": "9581"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Neuropathie-Poikilodermie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch spastische Paraplegie, demyelinisierende periphere sensomotorische Neuropathie, Poikilodermie (manifestiert sich mit Verlust von Augenbrauen und Wimpern in der Kindheit zus\u00e4tzlich zu zarter, glatter und \u00fcbersch\u00fcssiger Haut) und nach der Pubert\u00e4t auftretender distaler Amyotrophie gekennzeichnet ist. Seit 1992 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "synonyms": "Antinolo-Nieto-Borrego-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "182815", "UMLS": "C1866851", "MeSH": "C536870", "GARD": "4921"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Optikusatrophie-Neuropathie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das spastische Paraplegie-Sehnervatrophie-Neuropathie-Syndrom ist eine seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch progressive spastische Paraplegie beginnend im Kleinkindalter zusammen mit einer Sehnervatrophie und Fixationsnystagmus gekennzeichnet ist. Ab der sp\u00e4ten Kindheit/fr\u00fchen Jugend tritt h\u00e4ufig eine Polyneuropathie hinzu, welche dann zu schweren motorischen Einschr\u00e4nkungen, progressiven Gelenkskontrakturen und Skoliose f\u00fchrt.", "synonyms": "SPOAN, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "609541", "UMLS": "C1836010"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Optikusatrophie-Neuropathie und verwandte Krankheiten", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine Gruppe seltener, genetisch bedingter, neurodegenerativer Erkrankungen, die durch eine im S\u00e4uglings- bis Kindesalter einsetzende progressive spastische Paraplegie (mit verz\u00f6gerten motorischen Meilensteinen, Gangst\u00f6rungen, Hyperreflexie und extensorem Plantarreflex), Optikusatrophie (die mit Nystagmus und Sehverlust einhergehen kann) und progressive periphere Neuropathie (mit sensorischen Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen und distaler Muskelschw\u00e4che/-atrophie in den oberen und unteren Extremit\u00e4ten) gekennzeichnet sind. Weitere Anzeichen k\u00f6nnen Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten, Wirbels\u00e4ulendefekte (Skoliose, Kyphose), Gelenkkontrakturen, \u00fcbertriebene Schreckreaktion, Sprachst\u00f6rungen, Hyperhidrose, extrapyramidale Zeichen und Intelligenzminderung sein. In sehr seltenen F\u00e4llen kann ein abweichender Ph\u00e4notyp mit weniger ausgepr\u00e4gter oder fehlender Optikusatrophie und/oder Neuropathie beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "SPOAN und SPOAN-verwandte Krankheiten, "}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-psychomotorische Retardierung-Kr\u00e4mpfe-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie-schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen-Epilepsie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spastic paraplegia-severe developmental delay-epilepsy syndrome is a rare, genetic, complex spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by an infantile-onset of psychomotor developmental delay with severe intellectual disability and poor speech acquisition, associated with seizures (mostly myoclonic), muscular hypotonia which may be noted at birth, and slowly progressive spasticity in the lower limbs leading to severe gait disturbances. Ocular abnormalities and incontinence are commonly associated. Other symptoms may include verbal dyspraxia, hypogenitalism, macrocephaly and sensorineural hearing loss, as well as dystonic movements and ataxia with upper limb involvement.", "synonyms": "SPPRS syndrome, Spastic paraplegia-psychomotor retardation-seizures syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "omim": "616756"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe, autosomal-dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, autosomal-dominante, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe, autosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, autosomal-rezessive, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe, famili\u00e4re Form", "sub_name": "Heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "HSP, reine oder komplizierte, Reine oder komplizierte famili\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe, famili\u00e4re Form, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe, X-chromosomale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, X-chromosomale, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, autosomal-dominante", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe, autosomal-dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, autosomal-dominante, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, autosomal-rezessive", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe, autosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, autosomal-rezessive, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, X-chromosomale", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplexe, X-chromosomale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine oder komplizierte, X-chromosomale, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, reine, X-chromosomale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen-Epilepsie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spastic paraplegia-severe developmental delay-epilepsy syndrome is a rare, genetic, complex spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by an infantile-onset of psychomotor developmental delay with severe intellectual disability and poor speech acquisition, associated with seizures (mostly myoclonic), muscular hypotonia which may be noted at birth, and slowly progressive spasticity in the lower limbs leading to severe gait disturbances. Ocular abnormalities and incontinence are commonly associated. Other symptoms may include verbal dyspraxia, hypogenitalism, macrocephaly and sensorineural hearing loss, as well as dystonic movements and ataxia with upper limb involvement.", "synonyms": "SPPRS syndrome, Spastic paraplegia-psychomotor retardation-seizures syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "omim": "616756"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spastische Paraplegie Typ 2, eine X-chromosomale Leukodystrophie, ist gekennzeichnet durch spastischen Gang und autonome Dysfunktion. Mit zus\u00e4tzlichen zentralnerv\u00f6sen Symptomen (intellektuelles Defizit, Ataxie, extrapyramidale Zeichen), wird das Syndrom als Komplizierte SPG bezeichnet.", "synonyms": "SPG2, Spastische Paraparese Typ 2, Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "312920", "UMLS": "C1839264", "MeSH": "C536857", "GARD": "4923", "epidemiology": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz der SPG2 sind nicht bekannt, aber als Teil des Pelizaeus-Merzbacher (PMD)-Spektrums macht die SPG2 etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle aus. Bisher wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. An SPG2 erkranken m\u00e4nnliche Indiduen, berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber weibliche Heterozygote mit milden Symptomen im Erwachsenenalter.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild der SPG2 \u00fcberspannt ein Kontinuum von Ph\u00e4notypen, von reiner bis zu komplizierter SPG2. Die reine SPG2 wird schon im Kleinkindalter oder der fr\u00fchen Kindheit (< 5 Jahre) manifest, kann aber auch erst im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter einsetzen. Symptome sind Muskelschw\u00e4che, Hyperreflexie, Babinski-Zeichen und spastischer Gang als Folge von spastischer Paraparese. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine autonome Dysfunktion (spastische Harnblase und evtl. spastischer Darm mit geh\u00e4ufter Harn- und Stuhlentleerung und Inkontinenz). Die Patienten sind gehf\u00e4hig, die Sprache ist normal. Zentralnerv\u00f6se Funktionen sind nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt, es kommt nicht zu kognitivem Abbau. Die komplizierte SPG2 hat die gleichen Symptome wie die SPG2, aber zus\u00e4tzlich ab dem ersten Lebensjahr auch zentralnerv\u00f6se St\u00f6rungen wie Nystagmus und Ataxie. Optikusatrophie und leichtes intellektuelles Defizit sind m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Ursache der SPG2 sind Missense-Mutationen im PLP1-Gen. PLP1 kodiert f\u00fcr das Proteolipidprotein PLP1, das h\u00e4ufigste Protein in den Myelinscheiden des ZNS und seine alternativ gesplicete Isoform DM20. Auch die die Pelizaeus-Merzbacher-Krankheit (PMD; s.dort) ist durch Mutationen im PLP1-Gen verursacht, d.h., SPG2 und PMD sind allelische Krankheiten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen, elektrophysiologischen und neuroradiologischen Befunde. In der wei\u00dfen Substanz ist die Konzentration des N-Acetyl-Aspartats verringert. Die zerebrale Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt in T2-gewichteten Bildern eine fleckf\u00f6rmige oder diffuse Hypomyelinisierung. Bei Patienten mit reiner SPG2 sind sehr subtile T2-Hyperintensit\u00e4ten m\u00f6glich. Auch andere MR-Techniken (MR-Spektroskopie, Diffusions-Tensor-Bildgebung) sind diagnostisch hilfreich. Durch Mutationsanalyse wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Formen von Heredit\u00e4rer spastischer Paraplegie. Die komplizierte SPG2 kann nicht eindeutig von milder PMD und dem Null-Syndrom unterschieden werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei in der Familie bekannter Mutation sind pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv: S\u00f6hne von heterozygoten Frauen erkranken mit einer Wahrscheinlichkeit von 50 %, S\u00f6hne von betroffenen M\u00e4nnern erkranken nicht.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung ist multidisziplin\u00e4r und schlie\u00dft Neurologen, Physiotherapeuten und Orthop\u00e4den ein. Therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind erforderlich bei Krampfanf\u00e4llen (Antikonvulsiva) und Spastik (Physiotherapie und spasmolytisch wirkende Medikamente [Baclofen, Diazepam, Tizanidin, Botulinumtoxin, Dantrolen]). Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen sind erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Patienten mit reiner SPG2 haben eine normale Lebenserwartung. Die neurologischen St\u00f6rungen der komplizierten SPG2 bedingen durch Aspirationspneumonie, Lungenembolie und duch andere Komplikationen und allgemeine Schw\u00e4che eine verk\u00fcrzte Lebenserwartung (4. bis 7. Lebensjahrzehnt).", "summary": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz der SPG2 sind nicht bekannt, aber als Teil des Pelizaeus-Merzbacher (PMD)-Spektrums macht die SPG2 etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle aus. Bisher wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. An SPG2 erkranken m\u00e4nnliche Indiduen, berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber weibliche Heterozygote mit milden Symptomen im Erwachsenenalter."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie - Vitiligo - vorzeitiges Ergrauen - charakteristisches Gesicht", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 23", "german_description": "Die Ursache des SPG23-Ph\u00e4notyps wurde auf Chromosom 1q24-q32 lokalisiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 23 (SPG23) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia that presents in childhood with progressive spastic paraplegia, associated with peripheral neuropathy, skin pigment abnormalities (i.e. vitiligo, hyperpigmentation, diffuse lentigines), premature graying of hair, and characteristic facies (i.e. thin with ''sharp'' features). The SPG23 phenotype has been mapped to a locus on chromosome 1q24-q32.", "synonyms": "Lison syndrome, SPG23, Spastic paraparesis-vitiligo-premature graying-characteristic facies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "270750", "umls": "C0796019", "gard": "336"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie-vorzeitige Pubert\u00e4t-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch das Auftreten einer progressiven spastischen Paraplegie in Verbindung mit einer vorzeitigen Pubert\u00e4t (aufgrund einer Leydig-Zell-Hyperplasie) in der Kindheit (im Alter von 2 Jahren) gekennzeichnet ist. Es wurde auch \u00fcber eine m\u00e4\u00dfige Intelligenzminderung berichtet. Seit 1983 gibt es keine weiteren Beschreibungen in der Literatur.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "182820", "UMLS": "C1866850", "MeSH": "C536874", "GARD": "4918"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 16", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex, hereditary, spastic paraplegia characterized by delayed motor development, spasticity, and inability to walk, later progressing to quadriplegia, motor aphasia, bowel and bladder dysfunction. Patients also present with vision problems and mild intellectual disability. The disease affects only males.", "synonyms": "SPG16, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "300266", "umls": "C1846046", "mesh": "C536643", "gard": "9585"}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 2", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spastische Paraplegie Typ 2, eine X-chromosomale Leukodystrophie, ist gekennzeichnet durch spastischen Gang und autonome Dysfunktion. Mit zus\u00e4tzlichen zentralnerv\u00f6sen Symptomen (intellektuelles Defizit, Ataxie, extrapyramidale Zeichen), wird das Syndrom als Komplizierte SPG bezeichnet.", "synonyms": "SPG2, Spastische Paraparese Typ 2, Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "312920", "UMLS": "C1839264", "MeSH": "C536857", "GARD": "4923", "epidemiology": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz der SPG2 sind nicht bekannt, aber als Teil des Pelizaeus-Merzbacher (PMD)-Spektrums macht die SPG2 etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle aus. Bisher wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. An SPG2 erkranken m\u00e4nnliche Indiduen, berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber weibliche Heterozygote mit milden Symptomen im Erwachsenenalter.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild der SPG2 \u00fcberspannt ein Kontinuum von Ph\u00e4notypen, von reiner bis zu komplizierter SPG2. Die reine SPG2 wird schon im Kleinkindalter oder der fr\u00fchen Kindheit (< 5 Jahre) manifest, kann aber auch erst im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter einsetzen. Symptome sind Muskelschw\u00e4che, Hyperreflexie, Babinski-Zeichen und spastischer Gang als Folge von spastischer Paraparese. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine autonome Dysfunktion (spastische Harnblase und evtl. spastischer Darm mit geh\u00e4ufter Harn- und Stuhlentleerung und Inkontinenz). Die Patienten sind gehf\u00e4hig, die Sprache ist normal. Zentralnerv\u00f6se Funktionen sind nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt, es kommt nicht zu kognitivem Abbau. Die komplizierte SPG2 hat die gleichen Symptome wie die SPG2, aber zus\u00e4tzlich ab dem ersten Lebensjahr auch zentralnerv\u00f6se St\u00f6rungen wie Nystagmus und Ataxie. Optikusatrophie und leichtes intellektuelles Defizit sind m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Ursache der SPG2 sind Missense-Mutationen im PLP1-Gen. PLP1 kodiert f\u00fcr das Proteolipidprotein PLP1, das h\u00e4ufigste Protein in den Myelinscheiden des ZNS und seine alternativ gesplicete Isoform DM20. Auch die die Pelizaeus-Merzbacher-Krankheit (PMD; s.dort) ist durch Mutationen im PLP1-Gen verursacht, d.h., SPG2 und PMD sind allelische Krankheiten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen, elektrophysiologischen und neuroradiologischen Befunde. In der wei\u00dfen Substanz ist die Konzentration des N-Acetyl-Aspartats verringert. Die zerebrale Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt in T2-gewichteten Bildern eine fleckf\u00f6rmige oder diffuse Hypomyelinisierung. Bei Patienten mit reiner SPG2 sind sehr subtile T2-Hyperintensit\u00e4ten m\u00f6glich. Auch andere MR-Techniken (MR-Spektroskopie, Diffusions-Tensor-Bildgebung) sind diagnostisch hilfreich. Durch Mutationsanalyse wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Formen von Heredit\u00e4rer spastischer Paraplegie. Die komplizierte SPG2 kann nicht eindeutig von milder PMD und dem Null-Syndrom unterschieden werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei in der Familie bekannter Mutation sind pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv: S\u00f6hne von heterozygoten Frauen erkranken mit einer Wahrscheinlichkeit von 50 %, S\u00f6hne von betroffenen M\u00e4nnern erkranken nicht.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung ist multidisziplin\u00e4r und schlie\u00dft Neurologen, Physiotherapeuten und Orthop\u00e4den ein. Therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind erforderlich bei Krampfanf\u00e4llen (Antikonvulsiva) und Spastik (Physiotherapie und spasmolytisch wirkende Medikamente [Baclofen, Diazepam, Tizanidin, Botulinumtoxin, Dantrolen]). Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen sind erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Patienten mit reiner SPG2 haben eine normale Lebenserwartung. Die neurologischen St\u00f6rungen der komplizierten SPG2 bedingen durch Aspirationspneumonie, Lungenembolie und duch andere Komplikationen und allgemeine Schw\u00e4che eine verk\u00fcrzte Lebenserwartung (4. bis 7. Lebensjahrzehnt).", "summary": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz der SPG2 sind nicht bekannt, aber als Teil des Pelizaeus-Merzbacher (PMD)-Spektrums macht die SPG2 etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle aus. Bisher wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. An SPG2 erkranken m\u00e4nnliche Indiduen, berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber weibliche Heterozygote mit milden Symptomen im Erwachsenenalter."}, {"name": "Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 34", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die X-chromosomale spastische Paraplegie Typ 34 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch das Auftreten einer langsam fortschreitenden spastischen Paraplegie im sp\u00e4ten Kindes- bis fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter mit spastischem Gang und Hyperreflexie der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, lebhaften Sehnenreflexen und Kn\u00f6chelklonus gekennzeichnet ist. Schmerzen in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und ein vermindertes Vibrationsempfinden der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen werden auch bei einigen \u00e4lteren erwachsenen Patienten berichtet.", "synonyms": "SPG34, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "300750", "UMLS": "C2677897"}, {"name": "Spastische Spinalparalyse, heredit\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine genetisch und klinisch heterogene Gruppe von langsam fortschreitenden neurologischen St\u00f6rungen. Die HSPs k\u00f6nnen in reine und komplexe Formen unterteilt werden. Die reine (unkomplizierte) Form ist gekennzeichnet durch pyramidale Zeichen (Schw\u00e4che, Spastizit\u00e4t, rege Sehnenreflexe und extensorische Plantarreflexe) vorwiegend an den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen m\u00f6glicherweise in Assoziation mit Sphinkterst\u00f6rungen und reduzierter Tiefensensibilit\u00e4t. Bei den komplexe Formen k\u00f6nnen dar\u00fcber hinaus variable neurologische oder nicht-neurologische Merkmale auftreten.", "synonyms": "Famili\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, HSP, SPG, Spastische Spinalparalyse, heredit\u00e4re, Str\u00fcmpell-Lorrain-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "UMLS": "C0037773\u00a0 C2931355", "GARD": "6637", "MedDRA": "10019903", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie (HSP) ist sehr unterschiedlich und liegt zwischen 1/11.000 und 77.000 in Europa.", "clinical_description": "Klinisch k\u00f6nnen HSPs in die reine und komplexe Form unterteilt werden. Reine HSPs sind durch langsam fortschreitende Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten, oft in Verbindung mit St\u00f6rungen des Harnverhaltens, und tiefgreifende sensorische Anomalien (Verminderung des Vibrationsempfindens der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten) gekennzeichnet. Komplexe Formen der HSP sind durch das Vorhandensein zus\u00e4tzlicher neurologischer oder nicht-neurologischer Merkmale gekennzeichnet. Die zus\u00e4tzlichen neurologische Merkmale umfassen zerebell\u00e4re Dysfunktion (Ataxie, Nystagmus, Tremor), axonale oder demyelinisierende periphere Neuropathie (sensorische und/oder motorische St\u00f6rungen), kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (dysexekutives Syndrom, Demenz), sensorische Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (optische, auditive Neuropathie), Epilepsie, myopathische Merkmale (Ptosis, Opthalmoparese), extrapyramidale Merkmale (Parkinsonismus, Chorea, Dystonie), psychiatrische St\u00f6rungen und Bildgebungsanomalien des Gehirns und der Wirbels\u00e4ule (Ver\u00e4nderungen der wei\u00dfen Substanz des Gehirns, d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum, Eisenanreicherung im Gehirn, Kleinhirnatrophie), die auf einen genetischen Subtyp hinweisen k\u00f6nnen. Zu den nicht-neurologische Manifestationen geh\u00f6ren ophthalmologische Auff\u00e4lligkeiten (Katarakt, Retinitis pigmentosa, Makuladegeneration) und orthop\u00e4dische Anomalien (Skoliose, Gelenkverrenkungen und verschiedene Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten).", "etiology": "Die Krankheit beruht auf einer Funktionsst\u00f6rung der oberen motorischen Neuronen des kortikospinalen Trakts. Bis heute wurden mehr als 80 Gene beschrieben, die mit HSP assoziiert sind. Die kodierten Proteine sind an vielen Prozessen beteiligt, u. a. am axonalen Transport, an der Myelinisierung, am Endo-Membran-Trafficking, an Mitochondrienfunktionen, am komplexen Lipid- und Nukleotidstoffwechsel. Zu den h\u00e4ufigsten urs\u00e4chlichen Genen geh\u00f6ren SPAST (2p22.3), ATL1 (14q22.1), REEP1 (2p11.2) und KIF5A (12q.13 .3)SPG7 (16q24.3), SPG11  (15q21.1) und CYP7B1 (8q12.3) f\u00fcr autosomal-rezessive HSP-Typen. Eine signifikante Anzahl von Patienten bleibt jedoch auch nach systematischer Testung ohne genetische Diagnose.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den klinischen Symptomen, der neurologischen Untersuchung, dem progressiven Krankheitsverlauf, dem Vorliegen von Biomarkern, der MRT von Gehirn und Wirbels\u00e4ule, der Familienanamnese, der molekulargenetischen Untersuchung und dem Ausschluss der Differentialdiagnosen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren Multiple Sklerose, spinale Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien, Vitamin B12-Mangel, HTLVI-Infektion, prim\u00e4re Lateralsklerose, diplegische Zerebralparese, metabolische genetische Erkrankungen (Dopa-responsive Dystonie, Leukodystrophien, Hirnst\u00f6rungen, die mit einer Akkumulation von Metallen assoziiert sind).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannter Mutation in der Familie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die HSP wird \u00fcberwiegend autosomal-dominant, autosomal-rezessiv und seltener X-chromosomal-rezessiv oder mitochondrial vererbt. Es existieren mehrere autosomal-dominante und autosomal-rezessive Varianten f\u00fcr die Gene KIF1C (17p13.2), REEP2  (5q31.2), ALDH18A1  (10q24.1) und ERLIN2 (8p11.23). Die Gene SPAST (2p22.3), ATL1 (14q22.1), REEP1 (2p11.2) sind meist mit der reinen Form assoziiert, autosomal-rezessive Formen f\u00fchren oft zu komplizierteren Ph\u00e4notypen, w\u00e4hrend einige Gene mit beiden Ph\u00e4notypen assoziiert sind. Hohe intrafamili\u00e4re Variabilit\u00e4t und unvollst\u00e4ndige Penetranz sind h\u00e4ufig.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfolgt symptomatisch mit Physiotherapie, Medikamenten gegen Spastizit\u00e4t (Baclofen, Tizanidin, Diazepam, Botulinumtoxin) und Orthesen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose h\u00e4ngt vom Ph\u00e4notyp (reine/komplexe Form) und Genotyp ab und ist aufgrund der unvollst\u00e4ndigen Penetranz und der variablen Genexpression sehr variabel.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie (HSP) ist sehr unterschiedlich und liegt zwischen 1/11.000 und 77.000 in Europa."}, {"name": "Spastische Tetraplegie-d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum-progressive postnatale Mikrozephalie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurometabolic disorder due to serine deficiency characterized by neonatal to infantile onset of global developmental delay, postnatal microcephaly and intellectual disability, which may be associated with slowly progressive spastic tetraplegia mainly affecting the lower extremities, seizures, and brain MRI findings including thin corpus callosum, delayed myelination and cerebral atrophy. Additional symptoms include brisk deep tendon reflexes, extensor plantar responses, behavioral abnormalities (such as irritability, hyperactivity, sleep disorder), abnormal hand movements and stereotypy.", "synonyms": "ASCT1 deficiency, Spastic quadriplegia-thin corpus callosum-progressive postnatal microcephaly syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q02", "omim": "616657"}, {"name": "Spastische Tetraplegie, kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Inherited congenital spastic tetraplegia is a rare, genetic, neurological disease characterized by non-progressive, variable spastic quadriparesis in multiple members of a family, in the absence of additional factors complicating pregnancy or birth (e.g. perinatal asphyxia, congenital infection). Additional clinical features include congenital hypotonia, intellectual disability, and developmental delay. Dysphagia, dysarthria, exotropia, nystagmus, seizures and brain atrophy with ventriculomegaly may be also present.", "synonyms": "Inherited congenital spastic quadriplegia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G82.4", "omim": "612900\u00a0 617008"}, {"name": "Spastische Tetraplegie-Retinitis pigmentosa-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, syndromic intellectual disability disorder characterized by the association of nonprogressive spastic quadriparesis, retinitis pigmentosa, intellectual disability, and variable deafness. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1976.", "synonyms": "Spastic quadriplegia-retinitis pigmentosa-intellectual disability syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "omim": "270950", "umls": "C1849112", "gard": "4932"}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t beginnende benigne okzipitale Epilepsie des Kindesalters", "sub_name": "Benigne okzipitale Epilepsie des Kindesalters Typ Gastaut", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign childhood occipital epilepsy, Gastaut type is a rare, genetic neurological disorder characterized by childhood to mid-adolescence onset of frequent, brief, diurnal simple partial seizures which usually begin with visual hallucinations (e.g. phosphenes) and/or ictal blindness and may associate non visual seizures (such as deviation of the eyes, oculoclonic seizures), forced eyelid closure and blinking and sensory hallucinations. Post-ictal headache is common while impairment of consciousness is rare.", "synonyms": "Late-onset benign childhood occipital epilepsy, ", "icd_10": "G40.0"}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t beginnende distale Cristallinopathie", "sub_name": "Alpha-B Crystallin-abh\u00e4ngige sp\u00e4t beginnende Myopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, alpha-crystallinopathy disease characterized by adult-onset myofibrillar myopathy, variably associated with cardiomyopathy and/or posterior pole cataracts. Patients typically present progressive proximal and distal muscle weakness and wasting of lower and upper limbs, often with velopharyngeal involvement including dysphagia, dysphonia and ventilatory insufficiency. Electromyography shows myopathic features and muscle biopsy reveals myofibrillar myopathy changes.", "synonyms": "Alpha-B crystallin-related late-onset distal myopathy, Late-onset distal crystallinopathy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G71.0", "omim": "608810"}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t-beginnende distale Myopathie Typ Markesbery-Griggs", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, non-dystrophic myofibrillar myopathy disorder characterized by late-adult onset of distal and/or proximal limb muscle weakness with initial involvement of posterior lower leg muscles, medial gastrocnemius and soleus. Patients present with ankle weakness followed by weakness of finger and wrist extensors and later on of proximal muscles. Ambulation is usually preserved. Late-onset associated cardiomyopathy and/or neuropathy has been reported in a minority of cases.", "synonyms": "ZASP-related myofibrillar myopathy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G71.8", "omim": "609452", "umls": "C1836155"}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t beginnende famili\u00e4re Enzephalopathie mit Neuroserpin-Einschlussk\u00f6rperchen", "sub_name": "Progressive Demenz mit Neuroserpin-Einschlussk\u00f6rperchen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sp\u00e4t beginnende famili\u00e4re Enzephalopathie mit Neuroserpin-Einschlussk\u00f6rperchen, ", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "G40.3", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t beginnende SPMD mit hyalinen K\u00f6rperchen", "sub_name": "Muskelatrophie, scapuloperoneale spinale, mit hyalinen K\u00f6rperchen, sp\u00e4t beginnende Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sp\u00e4t beginnende SPMD mit hyalinen K\u00f6rperchen, Sp\u00e4t beginnendes scapulo-peroneales Syndrom, myopathischer Typ, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t-beginnendes prim\u00e4res Lymph\u00f6dem ohne systemische oder viszerale Beteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t beginnendes scapulo-peroneales Syndrom, myopathischer Typ", "sub_name": "Muskelatrophie, scapuloperoneale spinale, mit hyalinen K\u00f6rperchen, sp\u00e4t beginnende Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sp\u00e4t beginnende SPMD mit hyalinen K\u00f6rperchen, Sp\u00e4t beginnendes scapulo-peroneales Syndrom, myopathischer Typ, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t-einsetzende lokalisierte JEB-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Sp\u00e4t-einsetzende lokalisierte junktionale Epidermolysis bullosa-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare junctional epidermolysis bullosa subtype characterized by late-onset blistering surrounded by erythema and localized on the anterior aspect of the lower legs, associated with dystrophic toenails, tooth enamel defects and mild to severe intellectual disability. Lens subluxation and mild facial dysmorphism (with short midface, prognatism and thin upper lip vermilion) are additional reported features. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1992.", "synonyms": "Late-onset localized JEB-intellectual disability syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q81.8", "omim": "226440", "umls": "C1856969", "gard": "299"}, {"name": "Sp\u00e4t-einsetzende lokalisierte junktionale Epidermolysis bullosa-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare junctional epidermolysis bullosa subtype characterized by late-onset blistering surrounded by erythema and localized on the anterior aspect of the lower legs, associated with dystrophic toenails, tooth enamel defects and mild to severe intellectual disability. Lens subluxation and mild facial dysmorphism (with short midface, prognatism and thin upper lip vermilion) are additional reported features. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1992.", "synonyms": "Late-onset localized JEB-intellectual disability syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q81.8", "omim": "226440", "umls": "C1856969", "gard": "299"}, {"name": "SPAX", "sub_name": "Spastische Ataxie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SPAX, ", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "UMLS": "C1849156", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "SPAX2", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 58", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener, komplexer Subtyp der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, der durch einen variablen Beginn der langsam fortschreitenden Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten und eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Kleinhirnataxie gekennzeichnet ist, die mit Gangst\u00f6rungen, Dysarthrie, erh\u00f6hten Reflexen der tiefen Sehne und extensorischen plantare Reaktionen einhergeht. Weitere Merkmale k\u00f6nnen sich in Form von unwillk\u00fcrlichen Bewegungen (z.B. Klonus, Tremor, Faszikulationen, Chorea), verminderten Vibrationsempfinden, okulomotorischen Anomalien (z.B. Nystagmus) und distaler Amyotrophie der oberen und unteren Extremit\u00e4ten manifestieren.", "synonyms": "SPAX2, SPG58, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "611302"}, {"name": "SPAX3", "sub_name": "Autosomal-rezessive spastische Ataxie mit Leukoenzephalopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, autosomal recessive spastic ataxia disease characterized by cerebellar ataxia, spasticity, cerebellar (and in some cases cerebral) atrophy, dystonia, and leukoencephalopathy.", "synonyms": "ARSAL, Autosomal recessive spastic ataxia type 3, SPAX3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "611390", "umls": "C1969645"}, {"name": "SPAX4", "sub_name": "Spastische Ataxie - Optikusatrophie - Dysarthrie, autosomal-rezessiv", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, autosomal recessive spastic ataxia disease characterized by onset in early childhood of spastic paraparesis, cerebellar ataxia, dysarthria and optic atrophy.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spastic ataxia type 4, SPAX4, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "613672", "gard": "10992"}, {"name": "SPAX5", "sub_name": "Fr\u00fch beginnende spastische Ataxie-myoklonische Epilepsie-Neuropathie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Early-onset spastic ataxia-myoclonic epilepsy-neuropathy syndrome is a rare hereditary spastic ataxia disorder characterized by childhood onset of slowly progressive lower limb spastic paraparesis and cerebellar ataxia (with dysarthria, swallowing difficulties, motor degeneration), associated with sensorimotor neuropathy (including muscle weakness and distal amyotrophy in lower extremities) and progressive myoclonic epilepsy. Ocular signs (ptosis, oculomotor apraxia), dysmetria, dysdiadochokinesia, dystonic movements and myoclonus may also be associated.", "synonyms": "AFG3L2-related spastic ataxia-myoclonic epilepsy-neuropathy syndrome, Autosomal recessive spastic ataxia type 5, SPAX5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "614487"}, {"name": "SPAX6", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spastische, autosomal-rezessive, Typ Charlevoix-Saguenay", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "ARSACS, Ataxie, spastische, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 6, SPAX6, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "270550", "UMLS": "C1849140", "MeSH": "C536787", "GARD": "4910", "summary": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Ataxie des Typs Charlevoix-Saguenay (ARSACS) ist eine neurodegenerative Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch fr\u00fch einsetzende zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, Spastik, Pyramidenbahn-Syndrom und periphere Neuropathie. Zuerst beschrieben wurde die Krankheit in der Region Charlevoix-Saguenay der kanadischen Provinz Quebec, wo ARSACS eine Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt von 1: 1.930 hat. Im Rest der Welt ist die Krankheit sehr selten, die genaue H\u00e4ufigkeit aber nicht bekannt. Beschrieben wurden F\u00e4lle aus der T\u00fcrkei, Japan, den Niederlanden, Italien, Belgien, Frankreich und Spanien. W\u00e4hrend in Quebec die Krankheit im Alter zwischen 12 und 18 Monaten mit Gangst\u00f6rungen beginnt, ist das Erkrankungsalter der nicht-kanadischen Patienten unterschiedlich: Es gibt sp\u00e4t-infantile, juvenile und fr\u00fch-adulte F\u00e4lle,. Andere fr\u00fche Zeichen sind Dysarthrie und Nystagmus. Die Spastik ist progredient und kann evtl. klinisch im Vordergrund stehen. Das Pyramidensyndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch gesteigerten Patellarsehnenreflexe und Babinskizeichen. In der Regel erst im weiteren Verlauf tritt eine periphere Neuropathie mit Verlust des Achillessehnenreflexes, mit distaler Amyotrophie und herabgesetzter Vibrationsempfindung auf. Ein regelm\u00e4\u00dfiges Symptom bei ARSACS-Patienten aus Quebec, das aber bei Patienten aus anderen L\u00e4ndern fehlen kann, ist eine Hyper-Myelinisierung der Retina (ohne Sehverlust). In einigen Familien aus Japan fehlte die Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, und bei nicht-kanadischen Patienten kann ein intellektuelles Defizit ein weiteres Symptom sein. Andere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Mitralklappenprolaps, Hohlfu\u00df und Funktionsst\u00f6rungen der Harnblase. ARSACS wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im SACS-Gen (13q11), das d\u00fcr ein gro\u00dfes Protein (Sacsin) unbekannter Funktion kodiert. Die klinische Diagnose basiert auf den Befunden der zerebralen Bildgebung (Nachweis einer Atrophie des oberen Kleinhirnwurms und des zervikalen R\u00fcckenmarks mittels MRI und CT) und der neurophysiologischen Untersuchungen (Zeichen einer axonalen und einer demyelinisierenden Neuropathie; Verlust der sensorischen Nervenleitung; verringerte motorische Nerven-leitgeschwindigkeit). Eine Untersuchung des Augenhintergrundes ist evtl. diagnostisch hilfreich. Der Nachweis von SACS-Mutationen best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose. Differentialdiagnosen sind andere autosomal-rezessive Ataxien, z.B. Friedreichsche Ataxie, Ataxie mit Vitamin E-Mangel (AVED) und heredit\u00e4re Formen von Spastischer Paraplegie (sh. diese Termini), besonders die Spastische Paraplegie 20 (SPG20-Troyer-Syndrom). Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden. Wenn die urs\u00e4chlichen Mutationen bekannt sind, ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich. Die Behandlung ist symptomatisch und zielt auf eine Beherrschung der Spastik durch Krankengymnastik, Pharmaka und Fu\u00dforthesen. Die meisten Patienten ben\u00f6tigen ab dem 5. Lebensjahrzehnt einen Rollstuhl. In der Regel sterben die Patienten im 6. Lebensjahrzehnt, aber auch ein \u00dcberleben bis in die Siebziger wurde beschrieben."}, {"name": "SPAX7", "sub_name": "Spastische Ataxie mit kongenitaler Miosis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Spastische Ataxie mit kongenitaler Miosis ist eine seltene heredit\u00e4re Ataxie, die durch eine scheinbar nicht progrediente oder langsam progrediente symmetrische Ataxie des Ganges, pyramidale Zeichen in den Gliedma\u00dfen, Spastik und Hyperreflexie (besonders in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen) zusammen mit Dysarthrie und beeintr\u00e4chtigter Pupillenreaktion auf Licht gekennzeichnet ist und sich als fixierte Miosis (mit Pupillen, die selten einen Durchmesser von 2 mm \u00fcberschreiten und sich bei Mydriatikern schlecht erweitern) pr\u00e4sentiert. Ein Nystagmus kann ebenfalls vorhanden sein.", "synonyms": "SPAX7, Spastische Ataxie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 7, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "108650", "UMLS": "C1862441"}, {"name": "SPAX8", "sub_name": "NKX6-2-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive hypomyelinisierende Leukodystrophie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare leukodystrophy characterized by a spectrum of progressive neurologic manifestations comprising rapidly progressive early-onset nystagmus, spastic tetraplegia, and visual and hearing impairment, resulting in death in early childhood, as well as later onset of slowly progressive complex spastic ataxia with pyramidal and cerebellar symptoms and loss of developmental milestones. Brain imaging shows diffuse hypomyelination of the subcortical and deep white matter, cerebellar atrophy, and diffuse spinal cord volume loss.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive hypomyelinating leukodystrophy-progressive spastic ataxia, SPAX8, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "E75.2", "omim": "617560"}, {"name": "SPCD", "sub_name": "Carnitin-Mangel, prim\u00e4rer systemischer", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine St\u00f6rung des Carnitin-Zyklus und des Carnitin-Transports, die klassischerweise durch eine fr\u00fchkindliche Kardiomyopathie, oft verbunden mit Schw\u00e4che, Muskelhypotonie, Gedeihst\u00f6rung, rezidivierenden hypoglyk\u00e4misch-hypoketotischen Kr\u00e4mpfen und/oder Koma gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "CDSP, CUD, Carnitin-Aufnahme-Mangel, Carnitin-Transporter-Mangel, Mangel des Plasmamembranst\u00e4ndigen Carnitin-Transporters, SPCD, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E71.3", "OMIM": "212140", "UMLS": "C0342788", "GARD": "5104", "epidemiology": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz des systemischen prim\u00e4ren Carnitinmangels (SPCD) ist unbekannt und variiert je nach ethnischer Zugeh\u00f6rigkeit. Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz liegt bei 1/20.000 - 1/70.000 Neugeborenen in Europa und den USA, w\u00e4hrend die gesch\u00e4tzte Inzidenz in Japan bei 1/40.000 Geburten liegt. Auf den F\u00e4r\u00f6er-Inseln liegt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei 1/1.300 und die Inzidenz bei 1/720.", "clinical_description": "Typisch beginnt die Krankheit im Alter zwischen 3 Monaten und 2 Jahren, h\u00e4ufig mit hypoketotischer Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, schlechter Nahrungsaufnahme, Reizbarkeit, Lethargie und Hepatomegalie. Ausl\u00f6ser sind Fasten, Stress oder Allgemeinerkrankungen wie Gastroenteritis und Atemwegsinfektionen. Symptome bei etwa der H\u00e4lfte der klinisch betroffenen Kinder sind Muskelhypotonie und progrediente Kardiomyopathie mit \u00dcbergang in Herzinsuffizienz. Entsprechend der Rolle des Carnitins im Stoffwechsel der Erythrozyten besteht manchmal eine An\u00e4mie. Erwachsene haben schw\u00e4chere Symptome wie Mattigkeit und Antriebsschw\u00e4che, beschrieben wurden aber auch dilatative Kardiomyopathie, Arrhythmien und pl\u00f6tzlicher Herztod. W\u00e4hrend der Schwangerschaft ist eine Verschlechterung der kleinen Symptome und der Herzrhythmusst\u00f6rungen m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Ursache des SPCD sind Mutationen im SLC22A5-Gen (5q23.3). Es kodiert f\u00fcr den natrium-abh\u00e4ngigen Plasmamembran-Carnitin-Transporter mit hoher Affinit\u00e4t (OCTN2). Er wird in den meisten Geweben (Muskel, Niere, Darm, Herz), in Lymphozyten und in kultivierten Fibroblasten exprimiert. OCTN2 ist erforderlich f\u00fcr den Transport von L-Carnitin \u00fcber die Plasmamembran. L-Carnitin transportiert langkettige Fetts\u00e4uren in die Mitochondrien, wo diese oxidiert werden. Bei Fettmangel wird Glukose verbraucht (mit der Folge einer Hypoglyk\u00e4mie) und Fett aus dem Fettgewebe freigesetzt, das bei SPCD in Leber, Herz und Skelettmuskel akkumuliert. Die Folge sind Lebersteatose und Lipidmyopathie.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf einem Befund von sehr niedrigen Konzentrationen an freiem und Gesamt-Carnitin im Plasma (<5-10 Mikromol/L) und wird durch den Nachweis eines signifikant reduzierten Carnitin-Transports in Hautfibroblasten oder biallelischen pathogenen Mutationen im SLC22A5-Gen best\u00e4tigt. Es besteht eine Lipidmyopathie mit mikrovesikul\u00e4rer Lipidakkumulation in Muskel und Leber sowie erh\u00f6hten Lebertransaminasen und Hyperammon\u00e4mie. Ein ausgepr\u00e4gter renaler Carnitinverlust auch bei sehr niedrigen Plasma- und Gewebe-Carnitin-Konzentrationen wird ebenfalls festgestellt. Das Neugeborenenscreening ist in \u00d6sterreich, D\u00e4nemark, Ungarn, Island, Portugal und Spanien verf\u00fcgbar.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere St\u00f6rungen der Fetts\u00e4ureoxidation, wie der Mangel der Mittelketten- und der Langketten-Acyl-CoA-Dehydrogenase (s. diese Termini).", "genetic_counseling": "Der SPCD wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Den Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Lebenslange orale Levocarnitin (L-Carnitin)-Supplementierung ist die Standardtherapie. In der Regel sind 100-400 mg/kg K\u00f6rpergew./Tag in drei getrennten Gaben erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Solange die Patienten oral mit Carnitin supplementiert werden, haben sie eine sehr g\u00fcnstige Prognose.", "summary": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz des systemischen prim\u00e4ren Carnitinmangels (SPCD) ist unbekannt und variiert je nach ethnischer Zugeh\u00f6rigkeit. Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz liegt bei 1/20.000 - 1/70.000 Neugeborenen in Europa und den USA, w\u00e4hrend die gesch\u00e4tzte Inzidenz in Japan bei 1/40.000 Geburten liegt. Auf den F\u00e4r\u00f6er-Inseln liegt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei 1/1.300 und die Inzidenz bei 1/720."}, {"name": "SPD1", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Vordingborg, SD2a, SPD Typ Vordingborg, SPD1, Synpolydaktylie Typ Vordingborg, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "186000", "UMLS": "C1861367", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SPD2", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Debeer, SD2b, SPD Typ Debeer, SPD2, Synpolydaktylie Typ Debeer, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "608180", "UMLS": "C1842422", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SPD3", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Malik, SD2c, SPD Typ Malik, SPD3, Synpolydaktylie, Typ Malik, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "610234", "UMLS": "C1853255", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SPD Typ Debeer", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Debeer, SD2b, SPD Typ Debeer, SPD2, Synpolydaktylie Typ Debeer, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "608180", "UMLS": "C1842422", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SPD Typ Malik", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Malik, SD2c, SPD Typ Malik, SPD3, Synpolydaktylie, Typ Malik, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "610234", "UMLS": "C1853255", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SPD Typ Vordingborg", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Vordingborg, SD2a, SPD Typ Vordingborg, SPD1, Synpolydaktylie Typ Vordingborg, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "186000", "UMLS": "C1861367", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "SPECC1L-assoziiertes Hypertelorismus-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal dominant malformation syndrome characterized by hypertelorism, omphalocoele, cleft lip, ear pits, uterine malformation (bicornuate uterus), and more variably by diaphragmatic hernia and congenital heart defects.", "synonyms": "Brachycephalofrontonasal dysplasia, Teebi hypertelorism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "145420", "umls": "C1840378", "gard": "957", "epidemiology": "Unknown. Less than 40 patients reported with genetic confirmation. The clinical diagnostic is unreliable in older literature due to phenotypic confusion.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically with characteristic facial dysmorphism: prominent forehead, hypertelorism (>95%) and telecanthus, cleft lip/palate (25%), slightly downslanting palpebral fissures, long philtrum prominent nasal root, and a large nose with a large tip. Malformations include omphalocoele (50%), uterine malformations (>25%), congenital heart malformations (20%), ear pits (30%), dysphagia, reflux and other esophageal problems (30%) and, less commonly, diaphragmatic herniae (10%), inguinal herniae, aortic root dilation, and rarely CNS anomalies (ventriculomegaly, agenesis of the corpus callosum) and craniosynostosis. Learning disability affects 20% of patients, and intellectual disability (ID) is present in 10%.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to heterozygous gain of function variants in SPECC1L (Sperm antigen with calponin homology and Coiled-Coil domains 1 Like) located in 22q11.23. The SPECC1L protein is a cytoskeletal protein that associates with both actin and microtubules to affect larger cytoskeletal function. It is involved in cell adhesion, actin cytoskeleton organization, microtubule stabilization, spindle organization and cytokinesis. Of note, heterozygous loss of function of SPECC1L causes Tessier IV oblique facial cleft.", "diagnostic_methods": "SPECC1L-related hypertelorism syndrome is suspected on clinical findings : ocular hypertelorism and at least one other of the characterstic findings (omphalocoele or diaphragmatic hernia, bicornuate uterus, ear pits). Diagnosis is confirmed by identification of a SPECC1L variant.", "differential_diagnosis": "Opitz GBBB syndrome is the main differential diagnosis of SPECC1L-related hypertelorism syndrome. Opitz GBBB syndrome has strikingly overlapping craniofacial phenotype, leading to confusion in the past literature between MID1-confirmed Opitz GBBG and various overlapping conditions. Earpits, uterine malformations, omphalocoele, diaphragmatic herniae are specific to SPECC1L, whereas laryngeal and anorectal defects are specific to Optiz GBBB. ID is more common in the latter. Baraitser-Winter cerebrofrontofacial syndrome (ACTB and ACTG1), craniofrontonasal dysplasia (EFNB1), frontonasal dysplasia and Aarskog syndrome (FGD1) share marked hypertelorism.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal testing is possible for at-risk pregnancies if a SPECC1L mutation has been previously identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal dominant and genetic counseling is recommended for young adults who are affected. The offspring of an affect individual have a 50% risk of also being affected.", "management_and_treatment": "Multidisciplinary medical support with pediatricians, craniofacial, ENT (ear, nose and throat) and abdominal surgeons, cardiologists, and a medical geneticist is required. Neurodevelopmental support and speech therapy may be necessary. Uterine anomalies may cause fertility issues.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable but usually favorable, depending on the severity of malformations and associated ID."}, {"name": "Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 1", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Spectrin-assoziierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive Kleinhirnataxie ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte neurologische Erkrankung, die auf SPTBN2-Mutationen zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren ist. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung im S\u00e4uglingsalter, gefolgt von einer im Kindesalter auftretenden Gangataxie mit Dysmetrie der Gliedma\u00dfen und Dysdiadochokinese, leichte bis schwere Intelligenzminderung, Entwicklung einer Kleinhirnatrophie und abnorme Augenbewegungen (einschlie\u00dflich eines konvergenten Schielens, hypometrischer Sakkaden, ruckartiger Verfolgungsbewegungen und unvollst\u00e4ndigem Bewegungsumfang).", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 14, Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie - kognitive St\u00f6rung, SCAR14, SPARCA, SPARCA1, Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 1, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Beginn im Kindesalter und psychomotorischer Retardierung, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "615386"}, {"name": "spEDS", "sub_name": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylodysplastischer Typ", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Bindegewebsst\u00f6rung, f\u00fcr die drei genetische Subtypen existieren, die mit den Genen B4GALT7, B3GALT6 oder SLC39A13 assoziiert sind. Die klinisch \u00fcberlappende Merkmale sind Kleinwuchs (in der Kindheit progredient), weiche, teigige, d\u00fcnne, hyperextensible Haut, Muskelhypotonie (von kongenital schwer bis leicht mit sp\u00e4terem Beginn) und Pes planus/equinovarus/valgus. Zu den eher variablen Gemeinsamkeiten geh\u00f6ren Osteopenie, verz\u00f6gerte kognitive und motorische Entwicklung und Gliedma\u00dfenverkr\u00fcmmung. Jeder Subtyp pr\u00e4sentiert sich mit genspezifischen Merkmalen, die ebenfalls eine variable Auspr\u00e4gung aufweisen.", "synonyms": "EDS, spondylodysplastisches, spEDS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q79.6"}, {"name": "spEDS-B3GALT6", "sub_name": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylodysplastischer Typ, B3GALT6-assoziiert", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome due to variants in  and characterized by short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, especially of the hands, bowing of limbs and congenital or early onset, progressive kyphoscoliosis. Additional features include the typical craniofacial gestalt (prominent forehead, sparse hair, mid-face hypoplasia, blue sclerae, proptosis and abnormal dentition), hyperextensible, soft, thin, translucent and doughy skin, delayed motor and/or cognitive development, characteristic radiographic findings (spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia, platyspondyly, anterior beak of vertebral body, short ilia, elbow malalignment and generalized osteoporosis), joint contractures and ascending aortic aneurysm.", "synonyms": "B3GALT6-related spEDS, B3GALT6-related spondylodysplastic EDS, Beta3GalT6-deficient EDS, Ehlers-Danlos syndrome progeroid type 2, spEDS-B3GALT6, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q79.6", "omim": "615349", "epidemiology": "To date, 41 individuals with molecularly diagnosed B3GALT6-related spondylodysplastic EDS, have been reported.", "clinical_description": "The main features are short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, bowing of limbs and congenital or early onset, progressive kyphoscoliosis. Joint hypermobility, especially of the hands and feet, and soft, doughy and hyperextensible skin are some of the most striking characteristics. Facial dysmorphism includes prominent forehead, sparse hair, mid-face hypoplasia, blue sclerae, proptosis and abnormal dentition with discoloration of teeth. Most affected children present from infancy with delayed motor development and hypotonia; half of patients have delayed cognitive development. The majority of patients display severe kyphoscoliosis, which is usually congenital or early onset and progressive. Skeletal anomalies include platyspondyly, short iliac bones and elbow dislocation. Osteopenia has been frequently reported, usually in conjunction with fractures and luxations. Less frequent skeletal anomalies include cervical spine instability, pectus carinatum/excavatum, joint contractures, radioulnar synostosis, limited elbow extension, carpal synostosis, short metacarpals, ulnar deviation of fingers, oligodactyly, hip dysplasia, epiphyseal dysplasia of femoral heads, genu valgus, pes planus, talipes equinovarus, recurrent luxation of the toes and hallux valgus. Approximately one third of the patients have ophthalmological abnormalities, such as myopia, corneal opacity, sclerocornea, blue sclerae, microcornea, glaucoma, optic nerve atrophy and retinal detachment. Cardiovascular anomalies infrequently reported include mitral valve prolapse, aortic valve stenosis and aortic root aneurysm. Other less common features include urinary defects with nephroptosis, bilateral caliceal and ureteral dilatation, laryngeal cleft, tracheomalacia, spontaneous repeated pneumothoraces, chronic respiratory insufficiency, Wilms tumor, cryptorchidism, prominent superficial veins, hypoplastic nails. There are rare reports of sensorineural and conductive hearing loss and cleft palate.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to variants of the B3GALT6 gene (1p36.33), encoding for galactosyltransferase II. This gene is responsible for the synthesis of the linker region of proteoglycans, which are essential components of the extracellular matrix of connective tissues.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, radiological studies and molecular findings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasias (e.g due to KIF22 or EXOC6B), the other forms of spondylodysplastyic EDSs, as well as other genetic syndromes characterized by kyphoscoliosis, joint hypermobility, skin hyperextensibility and short stature.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where a known pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variant) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach. Musculoskeletal anomalies, in particular kyphoscoliosis, may require a precocious orthopedic intervention. Specific regular follow-up is recommended based on the patient's clinical manifestation. Rehabilitation therapies must be tailored to the patient's characteristics.", "prognosis": "Currently, data is limited with regard to life expectancy. Whilst four cases of death in infancy have been described, there are no known reasons to suspect reduced life expectancy. Functional consequences and quality of life depend on disease severity."}, {"name": "spEDS-B4GALT7", "sub_name": "B4GALT7-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome due to variants in B4GALT7 and characterized by short stature, variable degrees of muscle hypotonia, joint hypermobility, especially of the hands, and bowing of limbs. Additional features include the typical craniofacial gestalt (mid-face hypoplasia, round, flat face, proptosis and narrow mouth), hyperextensible skin that is soft, thin, translucent and doughy, delayed motor and/or cognitive development, characteristic radiographic findings (such as radio-ulnar synostosis, radial head subluxation or dislocation, metaphyseal flaring and osteopenia) and ocular abnormalities.", "synonyms": "B4GALT7-related spondylodysplastic EDS, EDS progeroid type 1, EDS with short stature and limb anomalies, spEDS-B4GALT7, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q79.6", "omim": "130070\u00a0 615349", "umls": "C1869122", "mesh": "C536201", "gard": "9991", "epidemiology": "To date, 34 individuals with molecularly diagnosed B4GALT7-related spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndrome have been reported.", "clinical_description": "The main features in affected individuals are short stature, bowing of limbs, small joint hypermobility, hyperextensible, soft, doughy skin with delayed wound healing, and radioulnar synostosis. Facial dysmorphism includes short face with midface hypoplasia, proptosis, narrow mouth and loose skin also evident in the face. Most affected children present from infancy with delayed motor development and hypotonia; half of patients have delayed cognitive development. The most frequent skeletal anomalies are contractures or limited elbow movements, radioulnar synostosis, bowing of the ulna and radius, pes planus and osteopenia. Less frequently observed skeletal features include sagittal craniosynostosis, temporomandibular joint dislocation, scoliosis/kyphosis, vertebral coronal cleft, pectus carinatum, clavicular exostoses, patellar dislocation, hip dysplasia, bifid thumb, broad fingertips, ulnar deviation of fingers, equinovarus deformity and hallux valgus. Approximately half of the patients have ophthalmological abnormalities, such as hypermetropia, myopia, strabismus, blue sclerae, ptosis, nystagmus, glaucoma, megalocornea, iris and optic nerve coloboma, small optic nerves and cataracts. Dental anomalies include defective and discoloration of teeth. Less frequently reported features include cardiovascular anomalies (such as aortic/pulmonary stenosis and atrial septal defects) and urinogenetial defects (vesicoureteral reflux, cryptorchidism, hypogonadism, inguinal hernia) as well as hemidiaphragmatic eventration, varicose veins, lymphedema and multiple nevi. Sensorineural/conductive hearing loss and cleft palate are rarely reported.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to variants of the B4GALT7 gene (5q35.3), encoding for galactosyltransferase I. This gene is responsible for the synthesis of the linker region of proteoglycans, essential components of the extracellular matrix in connective tissues.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, radiological studies and molecular findings.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other spondylodysplastic Ehlers-Danlos syndromes and genetic conditions with joint hypermobility, skin hyperextensibility and short stature.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where a known pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variant) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multi-disciplinary approach. Specific regular follow-up is recommended based on the patient's clinical manifestations. Rehabilitation therapy must be tailored to the patient's characteristics. Musculoskeletal anomalies may require a precocious orthopedic intervention.", "prognosis": "Data is limited with respect to life expectancy; whilst there is only one adult patient reported in the literature, there are currently no known reasons suspect a reduced life expectancy. Functional consequences and quality of life depend on disease severity. The pathology is not progressive."}, {"name": "spEDS-SLC39A13", "sub_name": "SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener Subtyp des spondylodysplastischen Ehlers-Danlos-Syndroms (EDS), der durch das Vorhandensein klassischer kutaner Merkmale des EDS gekennzeichnet ist (d. h. hyperextensible, weiche, samtige, d\u00fcnne, durchscheinende Haut mit atrophischer Narbenbildung) in Verbindung mit Kleinwuchs (progressiv im Kindesalter), vorstehenden Augen mit bl\u00e4ulichen Skleren, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfig runzeligen Handfl\u00e4chen, hypotrophen Thenarmuskeln, spitzen Fingern und hypermobilen distalen Gelenken mit Neigung zu Kontrakturen. Charakteristische radiologische Befunde sind Platyspondylie, Osteopenie (vorwiegend an den Wirbeln), verbreiterte Metaphysen (Ellenbogen, Handgelenk, Interphalangen), flache Epiphysen (Oberschenkelhals und kurze R\u00f6hrenknochen) und ein kleines Ileum. Urs\u00e4chlich sind Mutationen im SLC39A13-Gen.", "synonyms": "Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrom, spondylo-cheiro dysplastische Form, SCD-EDS, SLC39A13-abh\u00e4ngiges spEDS, SLC39A13-assoziiertes spondylodysplastisches EDS, spEDS-SLC39A13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.6", "OMIM": "612350", "UMLS": "C2676510", "GARD": "12610"}, {"name": "Speicheldr\u00fcsenadenom, pleomorphes", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare tumor of salivary glands characterized by a benign, well-circumscribed, slow-growing, painless mass most commonly occurring in the parotid gland (but also the palate, submandibular gland, or nasal septal mucosa), histopathologically composed of epithelial and myoepithelial / stromal components. Possible signs and symptoms depend on the location of the tumor and include facial nerve weakness, mild dysphagia, or unilateral nasal obstruction. Recurrence rates are low, although tumor rupture and spillage have been reported. Malignant transformation may occur in a small percentage of cases.", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D11.0", "omim": "181030"}, {"name": "Speicheldr\u00fcsentumor, epithelialer benigner", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Benign epithelial tumor of salivary glands is a rare neoplastic disease characterized by the presence of a tumor located in the parotid, sublingual, submandibular and/or minor salivary glands, which presents with a wide spectrum of clinical features depending on the location, size and type of salivary gland involved, usually manifesting as a slow-growing, painless, commonly solitary mass, rarely associated with facial nerve palsy or nasal/airway obstruction.", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "D11.0\u00a0 D11.7", "omim": "181030"}, {"name": "Speiser\u00f6hrenkrebs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Speiser\u00f6hrenkrebs (EC) ist ein Tumor, der im Epithel, das die Speiser\u00f6hre auskleidet, entsteht und der in zwei Subtypen unterteilt wird: \u00d6sophagus-Plattenepithelkarzimon (ESCC) und -Adenokarzinom (EAC) (siehe jeweils dort).", "synonyms": "\u00d6sophaguskarzinom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "UMLS": "C0014859\u00a0 C0152018\u00a0 C0546837", "MedDRA": "10030155", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz des EC in Europa betr\u00e4gt rund 1/13.300.", "clinical_description": "Der Tumor tritt in der Regel im Alter von 50-70 Jahren auf. Oft bleibt er bis zu fortgeschrittenen Stadien symptomfrei. Erstes Symptom sind meist Schwierigkeiten beim Schlucken (Dysphagie), insbesonders beim Schlucken trockener Nahrung. Unerkl\u00e4rter Gewichtsverlust ist ebenfalls h\u00e4ufig. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind R\u00fccken- oder Brustschmerzen, eine rauhe Stimme, unerkl\u00e4rlicher Husten, l\u00e4ngeres Schluckauf (Singultus) und schwerer Reflux. In selteneren F\u00e4llen sind vergr\u00f6\u00dferte Hals-Lymphknoten das erste Symptom.", "etiology": "Die Ursachen sind nicht bekannt, jedoch wurden eine ganze Reihe von Risikofaktoren f\u00fcr den Speiser\u00f6hrenkrebs identifiziert: Alkoholabusus, Rauchen, das Verschlucken von Lauge, Strahlentherapie und Achalasie sind mit ESCC assoziiert. EAC ist mit dem Barrett-\u00d6sophagus (siehe dort) assoziiert, bei dem es sich um eine intestinale Metaplasie (anstelle normaler \u00f6sophagealer Epithelzellen treten intestinale Epithelzellen) handelt, die mit einer chronischen gastro\u00f6sophagealen Reflux-Erkrankung assoziiert ist. EAC wurde au\u00dferdem mit Adipositas in Verbindung gebracht, insbesondere mit der viszeralen Adipositas, sowie mit Stoffwechsel-Syndromen, die bei M\u00e4nnern h\u00e4ufiger als bei Frauen auftreten.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz des EC in Europa betr\u00e4gt rund 1/13.300."}, {"name": "Speiser\u00f6hrenkrebs vom Speicheldr\u00fcsentyp", "sub_name": "\u00d6sophaguskarzinom vom Speicheldr\u00fcsentyp", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare gastroesophageal tumor characterized by a typically submucosal tumor occurring usually in the middle to distal esophagus and histologically characterized as either mucoepidermoid (intimate mixture of mucus, intermediate, and epidermoid cells) or as adenoid cystic carcinoma (biphasic admixture of duct\u2010lining epithelial and myoepithelial cells with tubular, cribriform, solid, or basaloid growth patterns). Patients may be asymptomatic or may present with progressive dysphagia, heartburn, retrosternal pain and/or weight loss.", "synonyms": "Esophageal carcinoma, salivary gland type, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C15.0\u00a0 C15.1\u00a0 C15.2\u00a0 C15.3\u00a0 C15.4\u00a0 C15.5\u00a0 C15.8"}, {"name": "SPENCD", "sub_name": "Spondyloenchondrodysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spondyloenchondrodysplasie (SPENCD) ist eine sehr seltene genetische Skelettdysplasie, die klinisch durch Skelettanomalien (Kleinwuchs, Platyspondylie, kurzes breites Os ilium) und Enchondrome in den R\u00f6hrenknochen oder im Becken charakterisiert ist. SPENCD kann ein heterogenes klinisches Spektrum mit neurologischen Beteiligung (Spastizit\u00e4t, Intelligenzminderung und zerebrale Verkalkungen) oder Autoimmunmanifestationen (wie immun-thrombozytopenische Purpura, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie und Thyreoiditis) aufweisen.", "synonyms": "SPENCD, Spondyloenchondromatose, Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit enchondromat\u00f6sen Ver\u00e4nderungen, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "271550", "UMLS": "C0432222", "MeSH": "C535782", "GARD": "4978"}, {"name": "Spezifische Lernbehinderungen", "sub_name": "Spezifische Lernst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Spezifische Lernbehinderungen, Spezifische Lernsschw\u00e4che, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spezifische Lernsschw\u00e4che", "sub_name": "Spezifische Lernst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Spezifische Lernbehinderungen, Spezifische Lernsschw\u00e4che, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spezifische Lernst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Spezifische Lernbehinderungen, Spezifische Lernsschw\u00e4che, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spezifischer Antipolysaccharid-Antik\u00f6rper-Mangel", "sub_name": "Immundefekt durch selektiven Antipolysaccharid-Antik\u00f6rper-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Spezifischer Antipolysaccharid-Antik\u00f6rper-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D80.8", "GARD": "11903", "summary": "Immundefizienz mit selektivem Mangel von Anti-Polysaccharid-Antik\u00f6rpern ist charakterisiert durch normale Immunglobulinspiegel (einschlie\u00dflich IgG-Unterklassen) bei gest\u00f6rter Immunantwort auf Polysaccharide. Die genaue H\u00e4ufigkeit ist nicht bekannt, es handelt sich aber wohl um eine seltene prim\u00e4re Immundefizienz, da bisher in der Literatur nur etwa 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben wurden. Erstmals manifestiert sich die Krankheit meist im Kindesalter, zwischen dem 2. und 7. Lebensjahr. Etwa 60% der Patienten sind m\u00e4nnlich. Die Patienten leiden unter rezidivierenden bakteriellen Infekten, meist der Atemwege. Ausl\u00f6ser sind Bakterien mit einer Polysaccharid-Kapsel, z.B. Pneumokokken, Haemophilus influenzae, Meningokokken und Gruppe-B-Streptokokken. Sepsis und Meningitis sind seltener. Allergische Manifestationen werden in der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle beobachtet. Sehr wahrscheinlich hat diese Form der Immundefizienz mehrere Ursachen. Eine gr\u00f6\u00dfere H\u00e4ufigkeit in einigen ethnischen Bev\u00f6lkerungen und die Beobachtung famili\u00e4rer F\u00e4lle sprechen f\u00fcr die Beteiligung genetischer Faktoren. \u00dcber die Ursache der Krankheit gibt es unterschiedliche Hypothesen, am wahrscheinlichsten ist ein Defekt der B-Zellen in der Milzrinde. Tats\u00e4chlich werden hier die Polysaccharid-Antigene durch dendritische Zellen konzentriert und den B-Zellen pr\u00e4sentiert. F\u00fcr diese Hypothese spricht auch die Beobachtung, dass splenektomierte Patienten eine verminderte Immunantwort auf Polysaccharide zeigen. Die Diagnose wird etabliert durch den Nachweis einer verminderten Immunantwort auf Polysaccharid-Antigene (in der Regel Haemophilus influenzae b-Vakzine) bei ganz normalen Immunoglobulin-Spiegeln (einschlie\u00dflich IgG-Subklassen) und normaler Produktion von Antik\u00f6rpern gegen Protein-Antigene (Tetanus-Toxoid, Diphtherie). Da die meisten Kinder unter 2 Jahren eine normale Polysaccharid-Antwort aufweisen, kann die Krankheit erst nach diesem Alter diagnostiziert werden. Differentialdiagnostisch m\u00fcssen andere prim\u00e4re Immundefizienzen mit ebenfalls gest\u00f6rter Antwort auf Polysaccharid-Antigene ausgeschlossen werden, vor allem der IgG2-IgG4-Mangel. Eine defekte Produktion von Polysaccharid-Antik\u00f6rpern wird auch beim Wiskott-Aldrich-Syndrom und der 'Common Variable ImmunoDeficiency' (CVID) gesehen. K\u00fcrzlich wurde ein Patient mit X-chromosomaler Agammaglobulin\u00e4mie Typ Bruton (BTK-Mangel) beschrieben, der lediglich eine gest\u00f6rte Polysaccharid-Antwort aufwies. Antibiotika sollten nicht nur therapeutisch, sondern auch prophylaktisch eingesetzt werden. Eine Substitution mit Immunglobulinen kann in F\u00e4llen hilfreich sein, bei denen die Antibiotika-Prophylaxe versagt. Auch ist eine Impfung mit konjugierter Anti-Pneumokokken-Vakzine erforderlich. Die Infektionen k\u00f6nnen in der Regel gut behandelt werden. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen aber sorgf\u00e4ltig beobachtet werden, da sich im Verlauf der Krankheit eine schwerere Immun-Defizienz mit IgG-Subklassen-Mangel oder eine CVID entwickeln kann."}, {"name": "Spezifische Sprachentwicklungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Dysphasie, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "SPG", "sub_name": "Heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine genetisch und klinisch heterogene Gruppe von langsam fortschreitenden neurologischen St\u00f6rungen. Die HSPs k\u00f6nnen in reine und komplexe Formen unterteilt werden. Die reine (unkomplizierte) Form ist gekennzeichnet durch pyramidale Zeichen (Schw\u00e4che, Spastizit\u00e4t, rege Sehnenreflexe und extensorische Plantarreflexe) vorwiegend an den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen m\u00f6glicherweise in Assoziation mit Sphinkterst\u00f6rungen und reduzierter Tiefensensibilit\u00e4t. Bei den komplexe Formen k\u00f6nnen dar\u00fcber hinaus variable neurologische oder nicht-neurologische Merkmale auftreten.", "synonyms": "Famili\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, HSP, SPG, Spastische Spinalparalyse, heredit\u00e4re, Str\u00fcmpell-Lorrain-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "UMLS": "C0037773\u00a0 C2931355", "GARD": "6637", "MedDRA": "10019903", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie (HSP) ist sehr unterschiedlich und liegt zwischen 1/11.000 und 77.000 in Europa.", "clinical_description": "Klinisch k\u00f6nnen HSPs in die reine und komplexe Form unterteilt werden. Reine HSPs sind durch langsam fortschreitende Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten, oft in Verbindung mit St\u00f6rungen des Harnverhaltens, und tiefgreifende sensorische Anomalien (Verminderung des Vibrationsempfindens der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten) gekennzeichnet. Komplexe Formen der HSP sind durch das Vorhandensein zus\u00e4tzlicher neurologischer oder nicht-neurologischer Merkmale gekennzeichnet. Die zus\u00e4tzlichen neurologische Merkmale umfassen zerebell\u00e4re Dysfunktion (Ataxie, Nystagmus, Tremor), axonale oder demyelinisierende periphere Neuropathie (sensorische und/oder motorische St\u00f6rungen), kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (dysexekutives Syndrom, Demenz), sensorische Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (optische, auditive Neuropathie), Epilepsie, myopathische Merkmale (Ptosis, Opthalmoparese), extrapyramidale Merkmale (Parkinsonismus, Chorea, Dystonie), psychiatrische St\u00f6rungen und Bildgebungsanomalien des Gehirns und der Wirbels\u00e4ule (Ver\u00e4nderungen der wei\u00dfen Substanz des Gehirns, d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum, Eisenanreicherung im Gehirn, Kleinhirnatrophie), die auf einen genetischen Subtyp hinweisen k\u00f6nnen. Zu den nicht-neurologische Manifestationen geh\u00f6ren ophthalmologische Auff\u00e4lligkeiten (Katarakt, Retinitis pigmentosa, Makuladegeneration) und orthop\u00e4dische Anomalien (Skoliose, Gelenkverrenkungen und verschiedene Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten).", "etiology": "Die Krankheit beruht auf einer Funktionsst\u00f6rung der oberen motorischen Neuronen des kortikospinalen Trakts. Bis heute wurden mehr als 80 Gene beschrieben, die mit HSP assoziiert sind. Die kodierten Proteine sind an vielen Prozessen beteiligt, u. a. am axonalen Transport, an der Myelinisierung, am Endo-Membran-Trafficking, an Mitochondrienfunktionen, am komplexen Lipid- und Nukleotidstoffwechsel. Zu den h\u00e4ufigsten urs\u00e4chlichen Genen geh\u00f6ren SPAST (2p22.3), ATL1 (14q22.1), REEP1 (2p11.2) und KIF5A (12q.13 .3)SPG7 (16q24.3), SPG11  (15q21.1) und CYP7B1 (8q12.3) f\u00fcr autosomal-rezessive HSP-Typen. Eine signifikante Anzahl von Patienten bleibt jedoch auch nach systematischer Testung ohne genetische Diagnose.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den klinischen Symptomen, der neurologischen Untersuchung, dem progressiven Krankheitsverlauf, dem Vorliegen von Biomarkern, der MRT von Gehirn und Wirbels\u00e4ule, der Familienanamnese, der molekulargenetischen Untersuchung und dem Ausschluss der Differentialdiagnosen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren Multiple Sklerose, spinale Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien, Vitamin B12-Mangel, HTLVI-Infektion, prim\u00e4re Lateralsklerose, diplegische Zerebralparese, metabolische genetische Erkrankungen (Dopa-responsive Dystonie, Leukodystrophien, Hirnst\u00f6rungen, die mit einer Akkumulation von Metallen assoziiert sind).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannter Mutation in der Familie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die HSP wird \u00fcberwiegend autosomal-dominant, autosomal-rezessiv und seltener X-chromosomal-rezessiv oder mitochondrial vererbt. Es existieren mehrere autosomal-dominante und autosomal-rezessive Varianten f\u00fcr die Gene KIF1C (17p13.2), REEP2  (5q31.2), ALDH18A1  (10q24.1) und ERLIN2 (8p11.23). Die Gene SPAST (2p22.3), ATL1 (14q22.1), REEP1 (2p11.2) sind meist mit der reinen Form assoziiert, autosomal-rezessive Formen f\u00fchren oft zu komplizierteren Ph\u00e4notypen, w\u00e4hrend einige Gene mit beiden Ph\u00e4notypen assoziiert sind. Hohe intrafamili\u00e4re Variabilit\u00e4t und unvollst\u00e4ndige Penetranz sind h\u00e4ufig.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfolgt symptomatisch mit Physiotherapie, Medikamenten gegen Spastizit\u00e4t (Baclofen, Tizanidin, Diazepam, Botulinumtoxin) und Orthesen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose h\u00e4ngt vom Ph\u00e4notyp (reine/komplexe Form) und Genotyp ab und ist aufgrund der unvollst\u00e4ndigen Penetranz und der variablen Genexpression sehr variabel.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie (HSP) ist sehr unterschiedlich und liegt zwischen 1/11.000 und 77.000 in Europa."}, {"name": "SPG1", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, komplizierte, X-chromosomale, Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A congenital, X-linked, clinical subtype of L1 syndrome, characterized by spastic paraplegia, mild to moderate intellectual disability and normal brain morphology. This subtype represents the milder end of the L1 syndrome spectrum.", "synonyms": "SPG1, ", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "gard": "12525"}, {"name": "SPG10", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 10", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die entweder als reine Form der spastischen Paraplegie mit Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Hyperreflexie und extensorischen Plantarreflexen im Kindes- oder Jugendalter auftreten kann, oder als komplexer Ph\u00e4notyp in Verbindung mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen wie peripherer Neuropathie mit Amyotrophie der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen, m\u00e4\u00dfiger Intelligenzminderung und Parkinsonismus. Taubheit und Retinitis pigmentosa wurden in einem Fall berichtet.", "synonyms": "SPG10, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "604187", "UMLS": "C1858712", "MeSH": "C537482", "GARD": "9590"}, {"name": "SPG11", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 11", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive lower limbs weakness and spasticity, upper limbs weakness, dysarthria, hypomimia, sphincter disturbances, peripheral neuropathy, learning difficulties, cognitive impairment and dementia. Magnetic resonance imaging shows thin corpus callosum, cerebral atrophy, and periventricular white matter changes.", "synonyms": "Nakamura-Osame syndrome, SPG11, Spastic paraplegia-intellectual disability-thin corpus callosum syndrome, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "604360", "umls": "C1858479\u00a0 C2931821", "mesh": "C537483\u00a0 C538335", "gard": "4919"}, {"name": "SPG12", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 12", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 12 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine im Kindes- bis Erwachsenenalter auftretende, langsam progrediente Spastik und Hyperreflexie der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten, extensorischer Plantarreflex, distale sensorische Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, variable Harndrangst\u00f6rung und Pes cavus gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "SPG12, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "604805", "UMLS": "C1858106", "MeSH": "C537484", "GARD": "9586"}, {"name": "SPG13", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 13", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, pure or complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia with pyramidal signs in the upper and lower limbs, and decreased vibration sense.", "synonyms": "SPG13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "605280", "umls": "C1854467", "mesh": "C537485", "gard": "9616"}, {"name": "SPG14", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 14", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 14 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by adulthood-onset of slowly progressive spastic paraplegia of lower limbs presenting with spastic gait, hyperreflexia, and mild lower limb hypertonicity associated with mild intellectual disability, visual agnosia, short and long-term memory deficiency and mild distal motor neuropathy. Bilateral pes cavus and extensor plantar responses are also associated.", "synonyms": "SPG14, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "605229", "umls": "C1854568", "mesh": "C537486", "gard": "9589"}, {"name": "SPG15", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 15", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 15 ist eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindes- bis Erwachsenenalter. Sie ist gelennzeichnet durch eine langsam fortschreitende Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen (die zu Gangst\u00f6rungen, extensorischen Plantarreflexen und vermindertem Vibrationsempfinden f\u00fchrt) in Verbindung mit einer leichten Intelligenzminderung, einer leichten zerebell\u00e4ren Ataxie, einer peripheren Neuropathie (mit distaler Amyotrophie der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen) und einer Netzhautdegeneration. Ein d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum ist ein h\u00e4ufiger Bildgebungsbefund.", "synonyms": "Kjellin-Syndrom, SPG15, Spastische Paraparese, heredit\u00e4re, Typ 15, Spastische Paraplegie - Netzhautdegeneration, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "270700", "UMLS": "C1849128", "MeSH": "C536642", "GARD": "9581"}, {"name": "SPG16", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 16", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex, hereditary, spastic paraplegia characterized by delayed motor development, spasticity, and inability to walk, later progressing to quadriplegia, motor aphasia, bowel and bladder dysfunction. Patients also present with vision problems and mild intellectual disability. The disease affects only males.", "synonyms": "SPG16, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "300266", "umls": "C1846046", "mesh": "C536643", "gard": "9585"}, {"name": "SPG17", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 17", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia, upper and lower limb muscle atrophy, hyperreflexia, extensor plantar responses, pes cavus and occasionally impaired vibration sense. Association with hand muscles amyotrophy typical.", "synonyms": "SPG17, Silver syndrome, Spastic paraplegia-amyotrophy of hands and feet, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "270685", "umls": "C2931276", "gard": "4219"}, {"name": "SPG18", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 18", "german_description": "SPG18 entsteht durch eine Mutation im ERLIN2-Gen (8p11.2), welches das Protein Erlin-2 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 18 (SPG18) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia (presenting in early childhood) associated with delayed motor development, severe intellectual disability and joint contractures. A thin corpus callosum is equally noted on brain magnetic resonance imaging. SPG18 is caused by a mutation in the ERLIN2 gene (8p11.2) encoding the protein, Erlin-2.", "synonyms": "SPG18, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "611225", "umls": "C2749936", "gard": "4922"}, {"name": "SPG19", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 19", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 19 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine langsam fortschreitende und relativ gutartige spastische Paraplegie gekennzeichnet ist, die sich im Erwachsenenalter mit spastischem Gang, Hyperreflexie der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, extensorischen Plantarreflex, Blasenfunktionsst\u00f6rungen (Harndrang und/oder Inkontinenz) und leichter sensorischer und motorischer peripherer Neuropathie zeigt.", "synonyms": "SPG19, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "607152", "UMLS": "C1846685", "MeSH": "C536856", "GARD": "9588"}, {"name": "SPG2", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spastische Paraplegie Typ 2, eine X-chromosomale Leukodystrophie, ist gekennzeichnet durch spastischen Gang und autonome Dysfunktion. Mit zus\u00e4tzlichen zentralnerv\u00f6sen Symptomen (intellektuelles Defizit, Ataxie, extrapyramidale Zeichen), wird das Syndrom als Komplizierte SPG bezeichnet.", "synonyms": "SPG2, Spastische Paraparese Typ 2, Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "312920", "UMLS": "C1839264", "MeSH": "C536857", "GARD": "4923", "epidemiology": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz der SPG2 sind nicht bekannt, aber als Teil des Pelizaeus-Merzbacher (PMD)-Spektrums macht die SPG2 etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle aus. Bisher wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. An SPG2 erkranken m\u00e4nnliche Indiduen, berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber weibliche Heterozygote mit milden Symptomen im Erwachsenenalter.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild der SPG2 \u00fcberspannt ein Kontinuum von Ph\u00e4notypen, von reiner bis zu komplizierter SPG2. Die reine SPG2 wird schon im Kleinkindalter oder der fr\u00fchen Kindheit (< 5 Jahre) manifest, kann aber auch erst im fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter einsetzen. Symptome sind Muskelschw\u00e4che, Hyperreflexie, Babinski-Zeichen und spastischer Gang als Folge von spastischer Paraparese. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine autonome Dysfunktion (spastische Harnblase und evtl. spastischer Darm mit geh\u00e4ufter Harn- und Stuhlentleerung und Inkontinenz). Die Patienten sind gehf\u00e4hig, die Sprache ist normal. Zentralnerv\u00f6se Funktionen sind nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt, es kommt nicht zu kognitivem Abbau. Die komplizierte SPG2 hat die gleichen Symptome wie die SPG2, aber zus\u00e4tzlich ab dem ersten Lebensjahr auch zentralnerv\u00f6se St\u00f6rungen wie Nystagmus und Ataxie. Optikusatrophie und leichtes intellektuelles Defizit sind m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Ursache der SPG2 sind Missense-Mutationen im PLP1-Gen. PLP1 kodiert f\u00fcr das Proteolipidprotein PLP1, das h\u00e4ufigste Protein in den Myelinscheiden des ZNS und seine alternativ gesplicete Isoform DM20. Auch die die Pelizaeus-Merzbacher-Krankheit (PMD; s.dort) ist durch Mutationen im PLP1-Gen verursacht, d.h., SPG2 und PMD sind allelische Krankheiten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen, elektrophysiologischen und neuroradiologischen Befunde. In der wei\u00dfen Substanz ist die Konzentration des N-Acetyl-Aspartats verringert. Die zerebrale Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) zeigt in T2-gewichteten Bildern eine fleckf\u00f6rmige oder diffuse Hypomyelinisierung. Bei Patienten mit reiner SPG2 sind sehr subtile T2-Hyperintensit\u00e4ten m\u00f6glich. Auch andere MR-Techniken (MR-Spektroskopie, Diffusions-Tensor-Bildgebung) sind diagnostisch hilfreich. Durch Mutationsanalyse wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Formen von Heredit\u00e4rer spastischer Paraplegie. Die komplizierte SPG2 kann nicht eindeutig von milder PMD und dem Null-Syndrom unterschieden werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei in der Familie bekannter Mutation sind pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik und Pr\u00e4implantationsdiagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv: S\u00f6hne von heterozygoten Frauen erkranken mit einer Wahrscheinlichkeit von 50 %, S\u00f6hne von betroffenen M\u00e4nnern erkranken nicht.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung ist multidisziplin\u00e4r und schlie\u00dft Neurologen, Physiotherapeuten und Orthop\u00e4den ein. Therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen sind erforderlich bei Krampfanf\u00e4llen (Antikonvulsiva) und Spastik (Physiotherapie und spasmolytisch wirkende Medikamente [Baclofen, Diazepam, Tizanidin, Botulinumtoxin, Dantrolen]). Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrollen sind erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Patienten mit reiner SPG2 haben eine normale Lebenserwartung. Die neurologischen St\u00f6rungen der komplizierten SPG2 bedingen durch Aspirationspneumonie, Lungenembolie und duch andere Komplikationen und allgemeine Schw\u00e4che eine verk\u00fcrzte Lebenserwartung (4. bis 7. Lebensjahrzehnt).", "summary": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz der SPG2 sind nicht bekannt, aber als Teil des Pelizaeus-Merzbacher (PMD)-Spektrums macht die SPG2 etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle aus. Bisher wurden etwa 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. An SPG2 erkranken m\u00e4nnliche Indiduen, berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber weibliche Heterozygote mit milden Symptomen im Erwachsenenalter."}, {"name": "SPG20", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 20", "german_description": "Die SPG20 ist auf Mutationen im SPG20-Gen (13q13.1) zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, welches f\u00fcr das Protein Spartin kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 20 (SPG20) is a type of complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of progressive spastic paraparesis associated with distal amyotrophy, psuedobulbar palsy, motor and cognitive delays, mild cerebellar signs (dysarthria, dysdiadochokinesia, mild intention tremor), short stature and subtle skeletal abnormalities (pes cavus, mild talipes equinovarus, kyphoscoliosis). SPG20 is due to mutations in the SPG20 gene (13q13.1), which encodes the protein spartin.", "synonyms": "Childhood-onset spastic paraparesis-distal muscle wasting syndrome, SPG20, Troyer syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "275900", "umls": "C0393559", "gard": "5372"}, {"name": "SPG21", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 21", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 21 ist eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch den Beginn einer langsam fortschreitenden spastischen Paraparese im Jugend- oder Erwachsenenalter gekennzeichnet ist. Sie geht einher mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen wie Apraxie, kognitivem und sprachlichem Verfall (der in einigen F\u00e4llen zu Demenz und akinetischem Mutismus f\u00fchrt), Pers\u00f6nlichkeitsst\u00f6rungen und extrapyramidalen Zeichen (z. B. oromandibul\u00e4re Dyskinesie, Rigidit\u00e4t) sowie zerebell\u00e4ren Auff\u00e4lligkeiten (Dysdiadochokinesie und Inkoordination). Subtile Anomalien (z. B. Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen) k\u00f6nnen bereits in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit festgestellt werden. In der Magnetresonanztomographie k\u00f6nnen ein d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum und Anomalien der wei\u00dfen Substanz beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "Mast-Syndrom, SPG21, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "248900", "UMLS": "C1855346"}, {"name": "SPG23", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 23", "german_description": "Die Ursache des SPG23-Ph\u00e4notyps wurde auf Chromosom 1q24-q32 lokalisiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 23 (SPG23) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia that presents in childhood with progressive spastic paraplegia, associated with peripheral neuropathy, skin pigment abnormalities (i.e. vitiligo, hyperpigmentation, diffuse lentigines), premature graying of hair, and characteristic facies (i.e. thin with ''sharp'' features). The SPG23 phenotype has been mapped to a locus on chromosome 1q24-q32.", "synonyms": "Lison syndrome, SPG23, Spastic paraparesis-vitiligo-premature graying-characteristic facies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "270750", "umls": "C0796019", "gard": "336"}, {"name": "SPG24", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 24", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A very rare, pure form of spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of lower limb spasticity associated with gait disturbances, scissor gait, tiptoe walking, clonus and increased deep tendon reflexes. Mild upper limb involvement may occasionally also be associated.", "synonyms": "SPG24, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "607584", "umls": "C1843569", "gard": "9296"}, {"name": "SPG25", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 25", "german_description": "Die Ursache des SPG25-Ph\u00e4notyps wurde auf Chromosom 6q23-q24.1 lokalisiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 25 (SPG25) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by adult-onset spastic paraplegia associated with spinal pain that radiates to the upper or lower limbs and is related to disk herniation (with minor spondylosis), as well as mild sensorimotor neuropathy. The SPG25 phenotype has been mapped to a locus on chromosome 6q23-q24.1.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia-disc herniation syndrome, SPG25, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "608220", "umls": "C2936860", "mesh": "C536861", "gard": "9582"}, {"name": "SPG26", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 26", "german_description": "SPG26 wird durch Mutationen im B4GALNT1-Gen (12q13.3) ausgel\u00f6st, welches die Beta-1,4-N-Acetyl-Glucosaminyl-Transferase 1 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 26 (SPG26) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by the onset in childhood/adolescence (ages 2-19) of progressive spastic paraplegia associated mainly with mild to moderate cognitive impairment and developmental delay, cerebellar ataxia, dysarthria, and peripheral neuropathy. Less commonly reported manifestations include skeletal abnormalities (i.e. pes cavus, scoliosis), dyskinesia, dystonia, cataracts, cerebellar signs (i.e. saccadic dysfunction, nystagmus, dysmetria), bladder disturbances, and behavioral problems. SPG26 is caused by mutations in the B4GALNT1 gene (12q13.3), encoding Beta-1, 4 N-acetylgalactosaminyltransferase 1.", "synonyms": "GM2 synthase deficiency, SPG26, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "609195", "umls": "C1836632", "mesh": "C536862", "gard": "9587"}, {"name": "SPG27", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 27", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 27 is a rare, pure or complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by a variable onset of slowly progressive lower limb spasticity, hyperreflexia and extensor plantar responses, that may be associated with sensorimotor polyneuropathy, decreased vibration sense, lower limb distal muscle wasting, dysarthria and mild to moderate intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "SPG27, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Adolescent", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "609041", "umls": "C1836899"}, {"name": "SPG28", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 28", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 28 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindes- oder Jugendalter. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine langsam fortschreitende, rein krurale spastischen Paraparese, die sich durch eine leichte Schw\u00e4che der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Gangschwierigkeiten, extensorische Plantarreflexe und Hyperreflexie der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten manifestiert. Zu den selteneren Manifestationen geh\u00f6ren zerebell\u00e4re okulomotorische St\u00f6rungen mit sakkadischer Augenverfolgung, Pes cavus und Skoliose. Einige Patienten zeigen auch einen Verlust von Nadel- und Vibrationsempfindlichkeit in den Unterschenkeln.", "synonyms": "SPG28, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "609340", "UMLS": "C1836295"}, {"name": "SPG29", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 29", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine spastische Paraplegie gekennzeichnet ist, die sich in der Adoleszenz pr\u00e4sentiert, verbunden mit den zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen in Form einer sensorischen H\u00f6rst\u00f6rung aufgrund einer auditorischen Neuropathie und anhaltendem Erbrechen infolge einer hiatalen oder para\u00f6sophagealen Hernie.", "synonyms": "SPG29, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "609727", "UMLS": "C1857855", "MeSH": "C536863", "GARD": "9729"}, {"name": "SPG30", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 30", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomale spastische Paraplegie Typ 30 ist eine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die entweder als reine spastische Paraplegie oder als komplizierter Ph\u00e4notyp manifestiert. Sie tritt normalerweise im ersten oder zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt auf und ist gekennzeichnet durch spastische untere Extremit\u00e4ten, einen unsicheren Gang, Hyperreflexie und extensorische Plantarreflexe. Die komplizierte Form weist zus\u00e4tzliche Manifestationen auf, die distalen Schwund, sakkadischen Augenbewegungen, leichte zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie und leichte distale axonale Neuropathie umfassen k\u00f6nnen.", "synonyms": "SPG30, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "610357", "UMLS": "C1835896"}, {"name": "SPG31", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 31", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die in der Regel durch einen reinen Ph\u00e4notyp mit proximaler Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten, spastischen Gang und lebhaften Reflexen gekennzeichnet ist. Sie zeigt ein bimodales Manifestationsalter, entweder in der Kindheit oder im Erwachsenenalter (\u203a 30 Jahre). In einigen F\u00e4llen kann es sich um einen komplexen Ph\u00e4notyp mit zus\u00e4tzlichen assoziierten Manifestationen wie peripherer Neuropathie, Bulb\u00e4rparese (mit Dysarthrie und Dysphagie), distaler Amyotrophie und beeintr\u00e4chtigter distaler Vibrationsempfindlichkeit handeln.", "synonyms": "SPG31, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "610250", "UMLS": "C1853247", "GARD": "10817"}, {"name": "SPG32", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 32", "german_description": "Die Ursache des SPG32-Ph\u00e4notyps wurde auf Chromosom 14q12-q21 lokalisiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 32 (SPG32) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by a slowly progressive spastic paraplegia (with walking difficulties appearing at onset at 6-7 years of age) associated with mild intellectual disability. Brain imaging reveals thin corpus callosum, cortical and cerebellar atrophy, and pontine dysraphia. The SPG32 phenotype has been mapped to a locus on chromosome 14q12-q21.", "synonyms": "SPG32, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "611252", "umls": "C1970009", "gard": "12749"}, {"name": "SPG34", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, X-chromosomale, Typ 34", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die X-chromosomale spastische Paraplegie Typ 34 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch das Auftreten einer langsam fortschreitenden spastischen Paraplegie im sp\u00e4ten Kindes- bis fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter mit spastischem Gang und Hyperreflexie der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, lebhaften Sehnenreflexen und Kn\u00f6chelklonus gekennzeichnet ist. Schmerzen in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und ein vermindertes Vibrationsempfinden der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen werden auch bei einigen \u00e4lteren erwachsenen Patienten berichtet.", "synonyms": "SPG34, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "300750", "UMLS": "C2677897"}, {"name": "SPG35", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 35", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch den Beginn eines komplexen Ph\u00e4notyps im Kindesalter (selten im Jugendalter) gekennzeichnet ist, der sich durch eine Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen (gefolgt von den oberen Gliedma\u00dfen) mit Hyperreflexie und extensorischen Plantarreflexen auszeichnet. Zu den zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen geh\u00f6ren progressive Dysarthrie, Dystonie, leichter kognitiver Verfall, extrapyramidale Merkmalen, Optikusatrophie und Krampfanf\u00e4lle. In der Magnetresonanztomographie k\u00f6nnen Anomalien der wei\u00dfen Substanz und eine Eisenanreicherung im Gehirn auff\u00e4llig sein.", "synonyms": "SPG35, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "612319"}, {"name": "SPG36", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 36", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindes- oder Erwachsenenalter. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch progressive spastische Paraplegie (mit spastischem Gang, Spastik, Schw\u00e4che der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Pes cavus und Harndrang) in Verbindung mit einer peripheren sensomotorischen Neuropathie.", "synonyms": "SPG36, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613096", "UMLS": "C2936879"}, {"name": "SPG37", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 37", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 37 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch einen im Kindes- bis Erwachsenenalter auftretenden, langsam progredienten spastischen Gang, extensorische Plantarreflexe, rege Sehnenreflexe in Armen und Beinen, ein vermindertes Vibrationsempfinden an den Kn\u00f6cheln und eine Harndysfunktion gekennzeichnet ist. Bei einigen Patienten wird auch ein Kn\u00f6chelklonus berichtet.", "synonyms": "SPG37, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "611945", "UMLS": "C2936880"}, {"name": "SPG38", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 38", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by mild to severe lower limb spasticity, hyperreflexia, extensor plantar responses, impaired vibration sensation, pes cavus, and significant wasting and weakness of the small hand muscles. Temporal lobe epilepsy and cognitive dysfunction have been also reported.", "synonyms": "SPG38, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "612335", "umls": "C2676732"}, {"name": "SPG39", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 39", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch progediente spastische Paraplegie und distale Muskelatrophie. Bisher wurde es in 2 Familien beschrieben. Alle Betroffenen hatten Mutationen im PNPLA6-Gen (19p13.3) der 'neuropathy target'-Esterase, einem neuronalen Membranprotein. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia characterized by progressive spastic paraplegia and distal muscle wasting.", "synonyms": "SPG39, Spastic paraplegia due to NTE mutation, Spastic paraplegia due to neuropathy target esterase mutation, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "612020", "umls": "C2677586", "gard": "4924"}, {"name": "SPG4", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit hoher intrafamili\u00e4rer klinischer Variabilit\u00e4t, die in den meisten F\u00e4llen als reiner Ph\u00e4notyp mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter (haupts\u00e4chlich in der 3. bis 5. Lebensdekade, kann aber in jedem Alter auftreten) mit fortschreitender Gangst\u00f6rung aufgrund von beidseitiger Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen sowie sehr leichter proximaler Schw\u00e4che und Harndrang charakterisiert ist. In einigen F\u00e4llen wird auch ein komplexer Ph\u00e4notyp mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen einschlie\u00dflich kognitiver Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie, Epilepsie und Neuropathie beobachtet. Ein schnellerer Krankheitsverlauf wird bei Patienten mit einem sp\u00e4teren Erkrankungsalter beobachtet.", "synonyms": "SPG4, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, famili\u00e4re, Typ 2, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "182601", "UMLS": "C1866855", "MeSH": "C536865", "GARD": "4925"}, {"name": "SPG41", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 41", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 41 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch einen Beginn im Jugend- oder fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter mit langsam fortschreitender spastischer Paraplegie, proximaler Muskelschw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten und der kleinen Handmuskeln, Hyperreflexie, spastischem Gang und leichter Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der Harnwege gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "SPG41, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613364"}, {"name": "SPG42", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 42", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 42 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine langsam fortschreitende spastische Paraplegie der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten gekennzeichnet ist. Die Krankheit kann sich in der Kindheit bis zum Erwachsenenalter manifestieren. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen einen spastischen Gang, erh\u00f6hte Sehnenreflexe in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, extensorischen Plantarreflex, Schw\u00e4che und Atrophie der Muskeln der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und in seltenen F\u00e4llen einen Pes cavus aufweisen. In der Magnetresonanztomographie werden keine Abnormalit\u00e4ten festgestellt.", "synonyms": "SPG42, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "612539", "UMLS": "C2675528"}, {"name": "SPG43", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 43", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 43 ist eine seltene, komplexe heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, die durch eine im Kindes- bis Jugendalter einsetzende progressive Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen gekennzeichnet ist, die mit leichten bis schweren Gangst\u00f6rungen, extensorischen Plantarreflexen, Muskelschw\u00e4che und schwerer distaler Atrophie, h\u00e4ufig mit Beteiligung der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen, einhergeht. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale k\u00f6nnen Gelenkkontrakturen, distaler sensorischer Verlust und rege oder fehlende tiefe Sehnenreflexe sein. Andere Anzeichen wie Depressionen, Ged\u00e4chtnisverlust, Optikusatrophie (mit Sehkraftverlust) und Eisenablagerungen im Gehirn (die durch Bildgebung sichtbar werden) wurden ebenfalls dokumentiert.", "synonyms": "SPG43, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615043"}, {"name": "SPG44", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 44", "german_description": "SPG44 entsteht durch Mutationen im GJC2-Gen (1q41-q42), welches das Gap Junction Gamma-2-Protein kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 44 (SPG44) is a very rare, complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by a late-onset, slowly progressive spastic paraplegia associated with mild ataxia and dysarthria, upper extremity involvement (i.e. loss of finger dexterity, dysmetria), and mild cognitive impairment, without the presence of nystagmus. A hypomyelinating leukodystrophy and thin corpus callosum is observed in all cases and psychomotor development is normal or near normal. SPG44 is caused by mutations in the GJC2 gene (1q41-q42) encoding the gap junction gamma-2 protein.", "synonyms": "SPG44, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "613206", "umls": "C2750784"}, {"name": "SPG45", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 45", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 45 ist eine seltene, reine oder komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch im Kindesalter beginnende progressive Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Gangst\u00f6rungen, erh\u00f6hte tiefe Sehnenreflexe und extensorische Plantarreflexe. Sie kann mit Intelligenzminderung einhergehen und zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale wie Kontrakturen der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Amyotrophie, Klumpfu\u00df und Optikusatrophie sind beschrieben worden.", "synonyms": "SPG45, SPG65, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 65, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613162"}, {"name": "SPG46", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 46", "german_description": "SPG46 entsteht durch eine Mutation im GBA2-Gen (9p13.2), welches eine nicht-lysosomale Glukosylceramidase kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 46 (SPG46) is a rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset, in infancy or childhood, of the typical signs of spastic paraplegia (i.e. spastic gait and weakness of the lower limbs) associated with a variety of additional manifestations including upper limb spasticity and weakness, pseudobulbar dysarthria, bladder dysfunction, cerebellar ataxia, cataracts, and cognitive impairment that can progress to dementia. Brain imaging may show thinning of the corpus callosum and mild atrophy of the cerebrum and cerebellum. SPG46 is due to mutations in the GBA2 gene (9p13.2) encoding non-lysosomal glucosylceramidase.", "synonyms": "SPG46, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "614409"}, {"name": "SPG48", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 48", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 48 ist eine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit einem Beginn im mittleren bis sp\u00e4ten Erwachsenenalter. In der Regel manifestiert sie als reiner Ph\u00e4notyp einer langsam progredienten spastischen Paraplegie in Verbindung mit Harninkontinenz. Ein komplexer Ph\u00e4notyp mit den zus\u00e4tzlichen Befunden kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, sensomotorische Polyneuropathie, Ataxie und Parkinsonismus sowie d\u00fcnnem Corpus callosum und L\u00e4sionen der wei\u00dfen Substanz (gesehen in der Magnetresonanztomographie) wurde ebenfalls berichtet.", "synonyms": "SPG48, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613647"}, {"name": "SPG49", "sub_name": "Heredit\u00e4re sensorische und autonome Neuropathie durch TECPR2-Mutation", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hereditary sensory and autonomic neuropathy due to TECPR2 mutation is a rare genetic peripheral neuropathy characterized by early hypotonia evolving to spastic paraparesis, areflexia, decreased pain and temperature sensitivity, autonomic neuropathy, gastroesophageal reflux disease, recurrent pneumonia and respiratory problems. Patients also have intellectual disability and dysmorphic features, including mild brachycephalic microcephaly, short broad neck, low anterior hairline and coarse face.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 49, HSAN due to TECPR2 mutation, SPG49, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615031"}, {"name": "SPG53", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 53", "german_description": "SPG53 wird durch Mutationen im VPS37A-Gen (8p22) verursacht, welches das vacuolar protein sorting-Protein 37A kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 53 (SPG53) is a very rare, complex type of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by early-onset spastic paraplegia (with spasticity in the lower extremities that progresses to the upper extremities) associated with developmental and motor delay, mild to moderate cognitive and speech delay, skeletal dysmorphism (e.g. kyphosis and pectus), hypertrichosis and mildly impaired vibration sense. SPG53 is due to mutations in the VPS37A gene (8p22) encoding vacuolar protein sorting-associated protein 37A.", "synonyms": "SPG53, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "614898"}, {"name": "SPG54", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 54", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 54 (SPG54) ist eine seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch progressive spastische Paraplegie mit Beginn im fr\u00fchen Kindesalter und zerebell\u00e4ren Zeichen, Minderwuchs, verz\u00f6gerter psychomotorischer Entwicklung, Intelligenzminderung und, weniger h\u00e4ufig, Fu\u00dfkontrakturen, Dysarthrie, Dysphagie, Strabismus und Sehnervhypoplasie gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "SPG54, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615033"}, {"name": "SPG55", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 55", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 55 (SPG55) ist eine seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch eine progressive spastische Paraplegie mit Beginn im Kindesalter gekennzeichnet ist. Es kommt zu einer Sehnervatrophie (mit reduzierter visueller Sch\u00e4rfe und zentralem Skotom), Ophtalmoplegie, einer reduzierten Kraft und Feinmotorik der oberen Extremit\u00e4t, muskul\u00e4rer Atrophie in den unteren Extremit\u00e4ten und sensomotorischer Neuropathie.", "synonyms": "SPG55, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615035"}, {"name": "SPG56", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 56", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by delayed walking, toe walking, unsteady and spastic gait, hyperreflexia of the lower limbs, and extensor plantar responses. Upper limbs spasticity and dystonia, subclinical axonal neuropathy, cognitive impairment and intellectual disability have also been associated.", "synonyms": "SPG56, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615030"}, {"name": "SPG57", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 57", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 57 (SPG57) ist eine sehr seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die sich durch einen Beginn von im Kleinkindalter mit Spastik in den Beinen (f\u00fchrt zum Verlust des Gehverm\u00f6gens), reduzierte Sehsch\u00e4rfe auf Grund von Sehnervatrophie und Kraftverlust der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe aufgrund von demyelinisierender sensomotorischer Neuropathie auszeichnet.", "synonyms": "SPG57, Spastische Paraplegie durch partiellen TFG-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615658"}, {"name": "SPG58", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 58", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener, komplexer Subtyp der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, der durch einen variablen Beginn der langsam fortschreitenden Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten und eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Kleinhirnataxie gekennzeichnet ist, die mit Gangst\u00f6rungen, Dysarthrie, erh\u00f6hten Reflexen der tiefen Sehne und extensorischen plantare Reaktionen einhergeht. Weitere Merkmale k\u00f6nnen sich in Form von unwillk\u00fcrlichen Bewegungen (z.B. Klonus, Tremor, Faszikulationen, Chorea), verminderten Vibrationsempfinden, okulomotorischen Anomalien (z.B. Nystagmus) und distaler Amyotrophie der oberen und unteren Extremit\u00e4ten manifestieren.", "synonyms": "SPAX2, SPG58, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomale, Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "611302"}, {"name": "SPG59", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 59", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 59 is a very rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an early onset of progressive lower limb spasticity, tip-toe walking, scissor gait, hyperreflexia and clonus that may be associated with borderline intellectual disability. Nystagmus and pes equinovarus have also been reported.", "synonyms": "SPG59, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "SPG5A", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 5A", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 5A ist eine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die entweder durch einen reinen Ph\u00e4notyp einer langsam progredienten spastischen Paraplegie der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten mit Blasenfunktionsst\u00f6rung und Pes cavus oder durch eine komplexe Pr\u00e4sentation mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen wie zerebell\u00e4ren Zeichen, Nystagmus, distaler oder generalisierter Muskelatrophie und kognitiven Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen gekennzeichnet ist. Das Alter des Auftretens ist sehr variabel und reicht von der fr\u00fchen Kindheit bis zum Erwachsenenalter. In der Magnetresonanztomographie des Gehirns k\u00f6nnen bei einigen Patienten eine Hyperintensit\u00e4t der wei\u00dfen Substanz sowie eine Atrophie des Kleinhirns und des R\u00fcckenmarks festgestellt werden.", "synonyms": "SPG5A, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "270800", "UMLS": "C1849115\u00a0 C2931356", "MeSH": "C536871", "GARD": "4926"}, {"name": "SPG6", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 6", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die sich in der Regel im sp\u00e4ten Jugend- oder fr\u00fchen Erwachsenenalter als reiner Ph\u00e4notyp in Form einer Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen mit Hyperreflexie und extensorischem Plantarreflex sowie leichten Blasenst\u00f6rungen und Pes cavus pr\u00e4sentiert. In seltenen F\u00e4llen kann es sich um einen komplexen Ph\u00e4notyp mit zus\u00e4tzlichen Manifestationen wie Epilepsie, variabler peripherer Neuropathie und/oder Ged\u00e4chtnisst\u00f6rungen handeln.", "synonyms": "SPG6, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "600363", "UMLS": "C1838192", "MeSH": "C536866", "GARD": "4928"}, {"name": "SPG60", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 60", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 60 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by infantile onset of progressive lower limb spasticity, inability to walk, hypertonia and impaired vibration sense at ankles, with complicating signs including sensory impairment, nystagmus, motor axonal neuropathy and mild intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "SPG60, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "SPG61", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 61", "german_description": "SPG61 entsteht durch eine Mutation im ARL6IP1-Gen (16p12-p11.2), welches das ADP-Ribosylierungsfaktor-\u00e4hnliche Protein 6-interagierende Protein 1 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 61 (SPG61) is a rare, complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of spastic paraplegia (presenting with the inability to walk unsupported and a scissors gait) associated with a motor and sensory polyneuropathy with loss of terminal digits and acropathy. SPG61 is due to a mutation in the ARL6IP1 gene (16p12-p11.2) encoding the ADP-ribosylation factor-like protein 6-interacting protein 1.", "synonyms": "SPG61, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615685"}, {"name": "SPG62", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 62", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 62 ist eine reine oder komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie mit Beginn im ersten Lebensjahrzehnt. Sie manifestiert sich mit spastischer Paraparese (st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gt in den unteren als in den oberen Extremit\u00e4ten) und unsicheren Gang, sowie erh\u00f6hten tiefen Sehnenreflexen, Amyotrophie, zerebell\u00e4rer Ataxie und teilweise Flexionskontrakturen der Knie.", "synonyms": "SPG62, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "615681"}, {"name": "SPG63", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 63", "german_description": "SPG63 entsteht durch eine homozygote Mutation im AMPD2-Gen (1p13.3), welches die AMP-Deaminase 2 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 63 (SPG63) is an extremely rare and complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an onset in infancy of spastic paraplegia (presenting with delayed walking and a scissors gait) associated with short stature, and normal cognition. Periventricular deep white matter changes in the corpus callosum are noted on brain imaging. SPG63 is caused by a homozygous mutation in the AMPD2 gene (1p13.3) encoding AMP deaminase 2.", "synonyms": "SPG63, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615686"}, {"name": "SPG64", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 64", "german_description": "SPG64 entsteht durch Mutationen im ENTPD1-Gen (10q24.1), welches die Ektonukleosid-Triphostphat-Disphosphohydrolase 1 kodiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 64 is an extremely rare and complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia (see this term), reported in only 4 patients from 2 families to date, characterized by spastic paraplegia (presenting between the ages of 1 to 4 years with abnormal gait) associated with microcephaly, amyotrophy, cerebellar signs (e.g. dysarthria) aggressiveness, delayed puberty and mild to moderate intellectual disability. SPG64 is due to mutations in the ENTPD1 gene (10q24.1), encoding ectonucleoside triphosphate diphosphohydrolase 1.", "synonyms": "SPG64, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615683"}, {"name": "SPG65", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 45", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive spastische Paraplegie Typ 45 ist eine seltene, reine oder komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch im Kindesalter beginnende progressive Spastik der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Gangst\u00f6rungen, erh\u00f6hte tiefe Sehnenreflexe und extensorische Plantarreflexe. Sie kann mit Intelligenzminderung einhergehen und zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale wie Kontrakturen der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Amyotrophie, Klumpfu\u00df und Optikusatrophie sind beschrieben worden.", "synonyms": "SPG45, SPG65, Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 65, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "613162"}, {"name": "SPG66", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 66", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 66 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by infantile onset of progressive lower limb spasticity, severe gait disturbances leading to a non-ambulatory state, absent deep tendon reflexes and amyotrophy. Additional signs include severe sensorimotor neuropathy, pes equinovarus and mild intellectual disability. Cerebellar and corpus callosum hypoplasia, as well as colpocephaly, are observed on neuroimaging.", "synonyms": "SPG66, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "SPG67", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 67", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine extrem seltene, komplexe heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, die durch eine im S\u00e4uglings- oder Kindesalter einsetzende globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und eine progressive Spastik mit Tremor in den distalen Gliedma\u00dfen, erh\u00f6hten tiefen Sehnenreflexen und extensorischen Plantarreflexen gekennzeichnet ist, die mit einer leichten Intelligenzminderung einhergehen k\u00f6nnen. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale sind Muskelschwund und Kleinhirnanomalien.", "synonyms": "SPG67, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "SPG69", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 69", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 69 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by infantile onset of progressive lower limb spasticity, global developmental delay, hyperreflexia, clonus and extensor plantar reflexes, associated with dysarthria, intellectual disability, cataracts and hearing impairment.", "synonyms": "SPG69, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "SPG7", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 7", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A form of hereditary spastic ataxia characterized by an onset usually in adulthood (but ranging from 10-72 years) of progressive bilateral lower limb weakness and spasticity and sometimes predominant cerebellar ataxia. In addition to frequent sphincter dysfunction and decreased vibratory sense at the ankles, manifestations may include optical neuropathy, nystagmus, blepharoptosis, ophthalmoplegia, decreased hearing, scoliosis, pes cavus, motor and sensory neuropathy, muscle atrophy, parkinsonism, and dystonia.", "synonyms": "SPG7, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "607259", "umls": "C1846564\u00a0 C3711370", "gard": "4927", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence of autosomal dominant and autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia (SPG) combined is about 1.8 /100.000, the prevalence of SPG type 7 is unknown.", "clinical_description": "The disease onset is typically between the third and fifth decade, even though earlier or later onset are reported (10-72 years). The clinical presentation can be a pure spastic paraplegia (pyramidal syndrome, sphincter dysfunction, lower limbs weakness, diminished vibration sense, pes cavus) mostly associated with, cerebellar ataxia. Optic atrophy, ptosis and oculomotor abnormalities (nystagmus, progressive external ophthalmoplegia, saccadic pursuit) are frequently associated. Additional neurological signs are spastic dysarthria, dysphagia, parkinsonism, dystonia, scoliosis, hearing loss, and cognitive impairment. Brain magnetic resonance imaging nearly always shows a cerebellar atrophy and electromyography can detect a motor and sensory neuropathy.", "etiology": "The disease is due to biallelic pathogenic variants in the SPG7 gene (chromosome 16q24.3) coding for paraplegin protein.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation and confirmed by genetic testing (panel sequencing of hereditary spastic paraplegia genes, exome or genome analysis).", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes autosomal dominant and recessive spastic paraplegias, spinocerebellar ataxias (e.g. Spinocerebellar ataxia type 28), adrenomyeloneuropathy and other leukodystrophies, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, and primary progressive multiple sclerosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible if the pathogenic variants are known and present in at risk couples (where both parents are heterozygous carriers).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy. Few cases of dominant transmission are reported, individuals carrying one pathogenic variant could present signs (e. g. mild cerebellar atrophy, peripheral neuropathy) or symptoms (e. g. cerebellar ataxia, brisk deep tendon reflexes).", "management_and_treatment": "The treatment is symptomatic, including myorelaxants (oral or intrathecal baclofen, dantrolene, intramuscular botulinum toxin, etc.), bladder control medications, anti-parkinsonian drugs (L-Dopa, dopamine-agonists). Physical, occupational, and speech therapy should be proposed in association with medication.", "prognosis": "The disease course is variable but often the walking autonomy is decreased requiring the use of a wheelchair. The disease strongly affects the quality of life."}, {"name": "SPG70", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 70", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 70 is a very rare, complex subtype of hereditary spastic paraplegia that presents in infancy with delayed motor development (i.e. crawling, walking) and is characterized by lower limb spasticity, increased deep tendon reflexes, extensor plantar responses, impaired vibratory sensation at ankles, amyotrophy and borderline intellectual disability. Additional signs may include gait disturbances, Achilles tendon contractures, scoliosis and cerebellar abnormalities.", "synonyms": "SPG70, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "SPG71", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 71", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 71 is a rare, genetic, pure hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by infancy onset of crural spastic paraperesis with scissors gait, extensor plantar response, and increased tendon reflexes. Neuroimaging reveals a thin corpus callosum and electromyography and nerve conduction velocity studies are normal.", "synonyms": "SPG71, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "SPG72", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 72", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal spastic paraplegia type 72 is a rare, genetic, pure hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by early childhood onset of slowly progressive crural spastic paraparesis presenting with spastic gait, mild stiffness at rest, hyperreflexia (in lower limbs), extensor plantar responses and, in some, mild postural tremor, pes cavus, sphincter disturbances and sensory loss at ankles.", "synonyms": "SPG72, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "615625"}, {"name": "SPG73", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 73", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante spastische Paraplegie Typ 73 ist eine reine Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die im Erwachsenenalter einsetzt. Sie manifestiert sich mit spastischen Paraparese in den Unterschenkeln, Hyperreflexie, plantare Streckreaktionen, proximale Muskelschw\u00e4che, milde Muskelatrophie, vermindertes Vibrationsempfinden an den Kn\u00f6cheln und milde Dysfunktion des Harntrakts. Es wurde berichtet, dass bei einigen Patienten Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten auftreten k\u00f6nnen. Bei der Magnetresonanztomographie des Gehirns und bei Untersuchungen der peripheren Nervenleitgeschwindigkeit werden keine Anomalien festgestellt.", "synonyms": "SPG73, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "616282"}, {"name": "SPG74", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 74", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 74 is a rare, genetic, spastic paraplegia-optic atrophy-neuropathy-related (SPOAN-like) disorder characterized by childhood onset of mild to moderate spastic paraparesis which manifests with gait impairment that very slowly progresses into late adulthood, hyperactive patellar reflex and bilateral extensor plantar response, in association with optic atrophy and typical symptoms of peripheral neuropathy, including reduced or absent ankle reflexes, lower limb atrophy and distal sensory impairment. Reduced visual acuity and pes cavus are frequently reported.", "synonyms": "SPG74, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "616451"}, {"name": "SPG75", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 75", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 75 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an early onset and slow progression of spastic paraplegia associated with cerebellar signs, nystagmus, peripheral neuropathy, extensor plantar responses and borderline to mild intellectual disability. Additional features of hypo- or areflexia, mild upper limb involvement and significant visual impairment (optic atrophy, vision loss, astigmatism) have been reported.", "synonyms": "SPG75, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "616680"}, {"name": "SPG76", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 76", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 76 is a rare, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by adult onset slowly progressive, mild to moderate lower limb spasticity and hyperreflexia, resulting in gait disturbances, commonly associated with upper limb hyperreflexia and dysarthria. Foot deformities (usually pes cavus) and extensor plantar responses are also frequent. Additional features may include ataxia, lower limb weakness/amyotrophy, abnormal bladder function, distal sensory loss and mild intellectual deterioration.", "synonyms": "SPG76, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "616907"}, {"name": "SPG77", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 77", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Autosomal recessive spastic paraplegia type 77 is a rare, pure or complex hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by an infancy to childhood onset of slowly progressive lower limb spasticity, delayed motor milestones, gait disturbances, hyperreflexia and various muscle abnormalities, including weakness, hypotonia, intention tremor and amyotrophy. Ocular abnormalities (e.g. strabismus, ptosis) and other neurological abnormalities, such as dysarthria, seizures and extensor plantar responses, may also be associated.", "synonyms": "SPG77, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "617046"}, {"name": "SPG78", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 78", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive complex spastic paraplegia characterized by mostly adult-onset progressive spasticity and weakness predominantly affecting the lower limbs, axonal motor and sensory neuropathy, and cerebellar symptoms like ataxia, dysarthria, and oculomotor abnormalities. Variable degrees of cognitive impairment may also be present. Subtle extrapyramidal involvement and supranuclear gaze palsy were reported in some cases. Features on brain imaging include cerebral and cerebellar atrophy and sometimes abnormalities of the corpus callosum or basal ganglia.", "synonyms": "SPG78, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "617225"}, {"name": "SPG8", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 8", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, pure or complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia characterized by early adulthood onset of slowly progressive lower limb spasticity resulting in gait disturbances, hyperreflexia and extensor plantar responses, urinary urgency and/or incontinence, muscle weakness, decreased vibration sense and mild muscular atrophy in lower extremities. It may be associated with complicating signs, such as sensory neuropathy, ataxia (i.e. mild dysmetria, uncoordinated eye movement) and mild dysphagia.", "synonyms": "SPG8, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "603563", "umls": "C1863704", "mesh": "C536867", "gard": "9591"}, {"name": "SPG, maternal-vererbte", "sub_name": "Mitochondriale spastische Paraplegie, MT-ATP6-assoziierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "MT-ATP6-related mitochondrial spastic paraplegia is a rare, genetic, complex hereditary spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by adulthood-onset of slowly progressive, bilateral, mainly lower limb spasticity and distal weakness associated with lower limb pain, hyperreflexia, and reduced vibration sense. Axonal neuropathy is frequently observed on electromyography and nerve conduction examination.", "synonyms": "Maternally-inherited SPG, Maternally-inherited spastic paraplegia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Mitochondrial inheritance\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4"}, {"name": "Sph\u00e4roidk\u00f6rper-Myopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Sph\u00e4roidk\u00f6rper-Myopathie ist eine seltene Form der myofibrill\u00e4ren Myopathie, die durch eine vorwiegend proximale Muskelschw\u00e4che (die entweder nicht oder langsam fortschreitend sein kann) gekennzeichnet ist, die mit Sph\u00e4roidk\u00f6rper-Einschl\u00fcssen (bestehend aus myofilament\u00e4rem Material innerhalb einzelner Muskelfasern) in Skelettmuskelbiopsien einhergeht. Die Pr\u00e4sentation ist vielf\u00e4ltig und kann von asymptomatisch bis zu schwerer Muskelschw\u00e4che reichen, die sich mit fehlenden Achillesreflexen, Gangst\u00f6rungen und/oder anderen motorischen Behinderungen manifestiert.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G71.8", "OMIM": "182920", "UMLS": "C1866785", "GARD": "8711"}, {"name": "Sph\u00e4rophakie - Brachymorphie", "sub_name": "Weill-Marchesani-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Sph\u00e4rophakie - Brachymorphie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "277600\u00a0 608328\u00a0 614819", "UMLS": "C0265313", "MeSH": "D056846", "GARD": "4936", "MedDRA": "10064963", "summary": "Das Weill-Marchesani-Syndrom (WMS) ist eine Krankheit mit Minderwuchs, Brachydaktylie, Gelenkversteifung und charakteristischen Augenanomalien (Mikrosphaerophakie, Linsenektopie, schwere Myopie, Glaukom). Es gibt keine Angaben zur Pr\u00e4valenz. Der Minderwuchs (in der Regel unterhalb der 3. Perzentile) und die Brachydaktylie werden bei 98% der Patienten gefunden. Die Augensymptome haben folgende H\u00e4ufigkeiten: Myopie 94%, Mikrospaerophakie 84%, Ectopia lentis 73%, Glaukom 80%, Katarakt 23%. Weitere Syptome sind eingeschr\u00e4nkte Beweglichkeit der Gelenke, muskul\u00f6ser Habitus, verdickte Haut und kardiale Anomalien (Pulmonalklappenstenose, Mitralinsuffizienz, Aortenklappenstenose, offener Ductus Botalli, Ventrikelseptumdefekt). Eine Minderbegabung immer nur leichten Grades wurde bei 13% der F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Sowohl autosomal-rezessive als auch autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde beobachtet. Der rezessive Typ scheint h\u00e4ufiger zu sein. Er wird verursacht durch homozygote Mutationen im ADAMTS10-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 19p13.3-p13.2. Das ADAMST10-Protein geh\u00f6rt zur Familie der Proteasen der extrazellul\u00e4ren Matrix und wird in der Haut, den fetalen Chondrozyten und im fetalen und adulten Herz exprimiert. Elektronenoptische und immunologische Analysen an Hautfibroblasten von WMS-Patienten lassen vermuten, da\u00df das Syndrom mit einer St\u00f6rung der extrazellul\u00e4ren Matrix einhergeht. Heterozygote Mutationen im FBN1-Gen (15q21.1) wurden bei Patienten mit der dominant vererbten Form gefunden, ein Beispiel, welche Vielfalt von Ph\u00e4notypen die Mutationen des Fibrillin-1 verursachen (Marfan-Syndrom, MASS, Shprintzen-Goldberg-Syndrom und WMS). Trotz der verschiedenen Erbg\u00e4nge und der unterschiedlichen beteiligten Gene ist das klinische Bild des WMS einheitlich. Dies erschwert die genetische Beratung bei sporadischen F\u00e4llen. Einige Heterozygote f\u00fcr das rezessive WMS manifestieren leichte klinische Zeichen der Krankheit, z.B.eine Brachydaktylie. Es gibt keine Berichte \u00fcber vorgeburtliche Diagnostik. Die Prognose ist gut. Besonders wegen der M\u00f6glichkeit ophthalmologischer Komplikationen m\u00fcssen die Patienten in Beobachtung bleiben. Physiotherapie ist wegen der Steifigkeit der Gelenke angezeigt."}, {"name": "Sph\u00e4rozytose, heredit\u00e4re", "german_description": "Die Heredit\u00e4re Sph\u00e4rozytose ist eine h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie, die durch Anomalien verschiedener Erythrozytenmembran-Proteine verursacht wird. Bei Nordeurop\u00e4ern betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz etwa 1:5.000. Die klinischen Symptome der Krankheit sind im ersten Lebensjahr oft besonders schwer, etwa 65% der Patienten werden in der Neugeborenenperiode diagnostiziert. Ikterus ist bei Neugeborenen das erste Symptom, innerhalb der ersten Lebenstage entwickelt sich eine schwere An\u00e4mie. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Splenomegalie. Erkrankungsalter und Schweregrad sind au\u00dferordentlich variabel. Die Mehrheit (60-70%) der Patienten mit Heredit\u00e4rer Sph\u00e4rozytose haben eine moderate An\u00e4mie mit unvollst\u00e4ndig kompensierter H\u00e4molyse. F\u00e4lle ohne Ikterus, Splenomegalie oder Komplikationen werden evtl. niemals diagnostiziert. In den meisten F\u00e4llen wird die Krankheit autosomal-dominant vererbt, aber in 25-35% der F\u00e4lle werden bei den Eltern keine h\u00e4matologischen Anomalien gefunden. In diesen F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit entweder durch eine Neumutation verursacht, oder es handelt sich um eine autosomal-rezessiv vererbte Form mit Mutationen im Alpha-Spectrin-Gen SPTA1. (In F\u00e4llen von rezessiver Vererbung wird oft ein besonders defektes SPTA1-Allel gefunden.) Die biochemische Klassifikation der Heredit\u00e4ren Sph\u00e4rozytose basiert auf der Identifizierung der Membranproteine, die bei den einzelnen Formen teilweise fehlen, und der dazugeh\u00f6rigen Kandidatengene: Alpha-Spectrin (SPTA1), Beta-Spektrin (SPTB), Ankyrin (ANK1) und Band 3 (EPB3). In diesen Genen wurden zahlreiche Mutationen gefunden, die zu einem Mangel der jeweiligen Erythrozyten-Membranproteine f\u00fchren. Durch diesen Mangel wird die Membranoberfl\u00e4che verringert, was sich in der Entstehung von Sph\u00e4rozyten \u00e4u\u00dfert. W\u00e4hrend der Passage durch den Venensinus der Milz werden die Erythrozyten durch Entzug von Wasser weiter gesch\u00e4digt. Die Diagnose einer Heredit\u00e4ren Sph\u00e4rozytose ist auch heute noch schwierig und h\u00e4ngt davon ab, ob im Blutausstrich Kugelzellen gefunden werden, ob nach Inkubation die Autoh\u00e4molyse verst\u00e4rkt ist, ob die osmotische Fragilit\u00e4t erh\u00f6ht ist und ob die Sph\u00e4rozyten in der Milz pr\u00e4ferentiell sequestriert werden. Die gegenw\u00e4rtig sicherste diagnostische Methode ist die Analyse der Membranstabilit\u00e4t in Abh\u00e4ngigkeit von der Osmolarit\u00e4t des Mediums durch Ektazytometrie. Wie bei allen h\u00e4molytischen An\u00e4mien besteht die Behandlung der Neugeborenen mit Heredit\u00e4rer Sph\u00e4rozytose in der Kontrolle des Ikterus durch Phototherapie und, falls notwendig, auch Blutaustausch mit dem Ziel, einer hyperbilirubin\u00e4mischen Enzephalopathie vorzubeugen. Die dauerhaft schwere An\u00e4mie erfordert die Transfusion von Erythrozytenkonzentraten. W\u00e4hrend des ersten Lebensjahres kann durch eine Behandlung mit Erythropoetin die Zahl der Transfusionen eingeschr\u00e4nkt werden. Die Heredit\u00e4re Sph\u00e4rozytose ist die einzige angeborene h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie, bei der die Splenektomie immer zu einer Besserung f\u00fchrt. Wenn indiziert, wird die Splenektomie im Alter von 7-8 Jahren durchgef\u00fchrt. Mit dem neuen Verfahren der sub-totalen Splenektomie bleibt die immunologische Funktion der Milz erhalten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hereditary spherocytosis is a congenital hemolytic anemia with a wide clinical spectrum (from symptom-free carriers to severe hemolysis) characterized by anemia, variable jaundice, splenomegaly and cholelithiasis.", "synonyms": "Minkowski-Chauffard disease, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D58.0", "omim": "182900\u00a0 270970\u00a0 612653\u00a0 612690\u00a0 616649", "umls": "C0037889\u00a0 C0221409", "mesh": "C536356\u00a0 D013103", "gard": "6639", "meddra": "10019904", "epidemiology": "HS is the most common cause of inherited chronic hemolysis in North America with a prevalence of 1/5,000 births. However, osmotic fragility studies suggest the existence of extremely mild or subclinical forms, raising the prevalence to 1/2,000 in Northern Europe.", "clinical_description": "Jaundice is usually the first clinical manifestation in newborns (50% of cases) with anemia developing a few days after birth and requiring exchange transfusion (~10%) and transfusion support (~35%). Splenomegaly is frequently observed. Age of onset and severity vary considerably depending on the degree of anemia and hemolysis. Four HS categories have been identified: trait (normal hemoglobin (Hb), reticulocytes < 3%, bilirubin < 17micromoles/L), mild (Hb 11-15 g/dL, reticulocytes 3-6%, bilirubin 17-34 micromoles/L), moderate (Hb 8-12 g/dL, reticulocytes > 6%, bilirubin > 34 micromoles/L), and severe (Hb < 8 g/dL, reticulocytes > 10%, bilirubin > 51 micromoles/L). Aplastic crisis, often associated with viral infections, is observed in 10-15% of cases, particularly pediatric. Rare complications include poor growth, skin ulceration, chronic dermatitis, high output heart failure, and secondary iron overload.", "etiology": "HS is caused by mutations in one of the following genes: SPTA1 (1q21), SPTB (14q23.3), ANK1 (8p11.21), SLC4A1 ( 17q21.31) and EPB42 (15q15-q21), that encode the red blood cell (RBC) membrane proteins erythrocytic 1 spectrin alpha chain, erythrocytic 1 spectrin beta chain, ankyrin-1, band 3 anion transport protein, and erythrocyte membrane protein band 4.2, respectively. Defects in these proteins lead to a loss in RBC membrane cohesion and membrane surface area, resulting in erythrocyte sphering, decreased deformability and premature destruction in the spleen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and family history, physical examination and laboratory test results. Red cell morphology, osmotic resistance, hypertonic cryohemolysis test, eosin-5-maleimide binding in flow cytometry, sodium dodecyl sulfate-poly acrylamide gel electrophoresis and ektacytometry are all used to diagnose HS. Mean cellular Hb concentration is usually above normal range (~35 g/dl), reticulocyte count normal or increased, and indirect bilirubin moderately increased. Molecular genetic testing is not routinely used to confirm diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include hereditary elliptocytosis, hereditary stomatocytosis, Southeast Asian ovalocytosis, glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency, pyruvate kinase deficiency, autoimmune hemolytic anemia, and alpha-thalassemia (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis for at-risk pregnancies is possible if disease-causing mutations have been identified in a family, but it is not routinely performed due to the usually mild disease course.", "genetic_counseling": "HS is inherited autosomal dominantly in 75% of cases. Autosomal recessive inheritance and de novo mutations have also been reported, but are less common. Genetic counseling is recommended in families with a history of HS.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment involves management of jaundice (phototherapy and even exchange blood transfusion to prevent hyperbilirubinemic encephalopathy) and RBC transfusions in case of severe, symptomatic anemia. Splenectomy usually results in disappearance of anemia and clear amelioration of hemolytic markers. It is not indicated in patients with HS trait, whereas it is usually necessary in severe cases, albeit delayed if possible until the age of 6 years. For intermediate categories the indication is less clear, being useful in moderate cases before puberty. Laparoscopic splenectomy is preferred if performed by experienced surgeons. A combined splenectomy and cholecystectomy may be beneficial in patients with gallstones. Pre and post-splenectomy vaccine prophylaxis and prophylactic antibiotics are recommended in order to prevent infections. Folate supplement is recommended particularly after infectious events. Serum ferritin levels should be checked annually.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is variable and depends on the severity of the disease and any associated complications."}, {"name": "Spherulozytose", "sub_name": "Myospherulose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare maxillo-facial surgical disease characterized by an inflammatory, granulomatous lesion, most commonly of iatrogenic origin due to interaction of extravasated erythrocytes with exogenous lipids, in particular petrolatum-based antibiotic ointment used after surgical procedures. Most frequent locations are the paranasal sinuses and jaws, although the lesion can occur in any part of the body. It is typically found incidentally as an asymptomatic soft tissue swelling.", "synonyms": "Spherulocytosis, Subcutaneous spherulocystic disease, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "M79.8", "umls": "C0027123"}, {"name": "Sphingolipidose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E75.0\u00a0 E75.1\u00a0 E75.2\u00a0 E75.3", "UMLS": "C0037899", "MeSH": "D013106", "GARD": "7672", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sphingolipidose mit Epilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sphrintzen-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Deletion 22q11", "german_description": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz bei lebend Geborenen wird auf 1/2.000-1/4.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare chromosomal anomaly which causes a congenital malformation disorder that is typically characterized by cardiac defects, palatal anomalies, facial dysmorphism, developmental delay and immune deficiency.", "synonyms": "22q11DS, CATCH 22, Cayler cardiofacial syndrome, Conotruncal anomaly face syndrome, DiGeorge sequence, DiGeorge syndrome, Microdeletion 22q11.2, Monosomy 22q11, Sedlackova syndrome, Shprintzen syndrome, Takao syndrome, Velocardiofacial syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D82.1", "omim": "188400\u00a0 192430", "umls": "C0012236\u00a0 C0220704\u00a0 C0431406\u00a0 C0795907\u00a0 C2936346\u00a0 C3266101", "mesh": "D058165", "gard": "10299", "meddra": "10012979\u00a0 10066430", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence at birth is estimated at 1/4,500-1/10,000.", "clinical_description": "22q11.2 deletion syndrome shows a variable clinical phenotype that can range from mild to severe. Congenital heart defects (two-thirds of cases) include mainly conotruncal malformations such as ventricular septal defect, truncus arteriosus, tetralogy of Fallot and interrupted aortic arch. Anomalies of the aortic arch and vascular ring are frequent. More than 65% of patients present with palatal anomalies (e.g. velopharyngeal incompetence, submucous cleft palate or bifid uvula) that may lead to hypernasal speech and feeding difficulties. Overt cleft palate and cleft lip are less frequent. Most patients display subtle but recognizable facial features (e.g. ptosis, hypertelorism, epicanthal folds, prominent nasal root, malar flatness, small ears). Immune deficiency is the consequence of thymic aplasia/hypoplasia and improvement in T-cell production occurs over time. Patients have a higher risk of developing an autoimmune disease such as idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura and juvenile idiopathic arthritis. Hypocalcemia as a consequence of hypoparathyroidism is frequent in the neonatal period and usually resolves but can reappear at any age. Additional clinical findings may include gastrointestinal anomalies (intestinal malrotation, imperforate anus), hearing loss, renal anomalies (renal agenesis), dental anomalies (enamel hypoplasia), and skeletal anomalies (scoliosis, clubfoot). Learning difficulties and developmental delay are almost always present. Psychiatric illness (anxiety, depression, schizophrenia) and Parkinson's disease are more frequent than in the general population.", "etiology": "In most cases, the syndrome is due to a 3 million base pair (Mb) deletion on the chromosomal region 22q11.2 that is flanked by low copy number repeats. The deletion is due to a non-allelic meiotic recombination during spermatogenesis or oogenesis. In ~15% of cases, the deletion is nested within the 3 Mb DiGeorge critical region and varies in size. Most deletions include the TBX1 gene that has been shown to be implicated in cardiac, parathyroid, thymus and facial structure development. The variable expression of the 22q11.2 phenotype is thought to be due to genetic modifiers on either the other 22q11.2 allele or on other chromosomes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected upon clinical examination and confirmed by detection of the 22q11.2 deletion, using fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH), multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification (MLPA), array comparative genomic hybridization (aCGH) or genome-wide SNP (single nucleotide polymorphism) microarrays.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Smith-Lemli-Opitz syndrome, CHARGE syndrome, Alagille syndrome, VATER syndrome, Goldenhar syndrome and isotretinoin embryopathy.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible in familial cases by chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis, and in pregnancies where associated anomalies have been noted by fetal echocardiography. Preimplantation genetic diagnosis is possible.", "genetic_counseling": "The deletion arises de novo in ~90% of the cases. The recurrence risk in the sibship of a de novo case is 2-3% due to of low-grade germline parental mosaicism. Affected individuals have a 50% risk of having an affected child.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptom-based and requires a multidisciplinary approach. It may consist of heart and/or palate surgery, nasogastric feeding, calcium supplementation, occupational, physical, and speech therapy, educational and behavioral therapy, as well as support and treatment for psychiatric disease. Tonsillectomy is not recommended unless indicated by a center of expertise. A regular surveillance of calcium, thyroid function and blood cell count is necessary. Immune function must be evaluated before administering live vaccines.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is variable and depends on the severity of the disease. The infant mortality rate is relatively low (~4%); in adults mortality is higher than that of the rest of the adult population. Most congenital malformations and medical problems can be managed. Prognosis in adults depends on the degree of autonomy."}, {"name": "SP-HUS", "sub_name": "Streptococcus pneumoniae-assoziiertes h\u00e4molytisch-ur\u00e4misches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "S. pneumoniae-bedingtes HUS, SP-HUS, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D58.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spiegelbewegungen, famili\u00e4re kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, movement disorder characterized by involuntary movements on one side of the body that mirror intentional movements on the opposite side of the body, which are present in various first-degree members of a family, persist beyond the first decade of life, and have no associated comorbidities.", "synonyms": "Familial congenital controlateral synkinesia, Hereditary congenital controlateral synkinesia, Hereditary congenital mirror movements, Isolated congenital controlateral synkinesia, Isolated congenital mirror movements, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G25.8", "omim": "157600\u00a0 614508\u00a0 616059\u00a0 618264", "gard": "12551"}, {"name": "Spiegelbewegungen, isolierte kongenitale", "sub_name": "Spiegelbewegungen, famili\u00e4re kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, movement disorder characterized by involuntary movements on one side of the body that mirror intentional movements on the opposite side of the body, which are present in various first-degree members of a family, persist beyond the first decade of life, and have no associated comorbidities.", "synonyms": "Familial congenital controlateral synkinesia, Hereditary congenital controlateral synkinesia, Hereditary congenital mirror movements, Isolated congenital controlateral synkinesia, Isolated congenital mirror movements, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G25.8", "omim": "157600\u00a0 614508\u00a0 616059\u00a0 618264", "gard": "12551"}, {"name": "Spiegelbildliche Polydaktylie - Duplikation des Fu\u00dfes", "sub_name": "Fibul\u00e4re Dimelie-Diplopodie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein sehr seltenes, genetisch bedingtes, kongenitales Fehlbildungssyndrom der Gliedma\u00dfen, das durch eine Duplikation der Fibula in Verbindung mit einer pr\u00e4axialen Spiegelpolydaktylie des Fu\u00dfes gekennzeichnet ist. Sie kann isoliert auftreten, oder zusammen mit einer ulnaren Dimelie, fazialen Anomalien und Stei\u00dfbeinteratom.", "synonyms": "Beinverdoppelung - Fu\u00dfverdoppelung, Spiegelbildliche Polydaktylie - Duplikation des Fu\u00dfes, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q74.8"}, {"name": "Spiegelbild-Polydaktylie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic limb malformation characterized by a hand or foot with more than five digits that has a recognizable anterior/posterior axis of symmetry, either with a hallux- or thumb-like structure or an interdigital space in the middle. The most lateral digits on each side typically resemble fifth fingers or toes. The malformation may be unilateral or bilateral and may occur in isolation or in association with other congenital anomalies."}, {"name": "Spieghel-Hernie-Kryptorchismus-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spigelian hernia-cryptorchidism syndrome is a rare developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by a ventral, uni- or bilateral protrusion of extraperitoneal fat, peritoneum and/or intra-abdominal organs through a defect in the spigelian fascia (Spigelian hernia), associated with ipsi- or bilateral undescended testis (usually found within or just beneath the hernial sac) in male neonates. The gubernaculum and/or inguinal canal may be absent.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "K43.6"}, {"name": "Spielmeyer-Vogt-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Ceroid-Lipofuszinose, neuronale, juvenile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Juvenilen Neuronalen Ceroidlipofuscinosen (JNCLs) sind eine genetisch heterogene Gruppe der Neuronalen Ceroidlipofuscinosen (NCLs; s. dort). Typische F\u00e4lle sind gekennzeichnet durch Beginn der Symptome (Visusverlust mit Retinopathie, zerebrale Kr\u00e4mpfe und Abbau der motorischen und geistigen F\u00e4higkeiten) im fr\u00fchen Schulalter.", "synonyms": "Batten-Krankheit, JNCL, NCL, juvenile, Spielmeyer-Vogt-Krankheit, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E75.4", "OMIM": "204200\u00a0 204500\u00a0 256730\u00a0 600143\u00a0 609055\u00a0 610127", "UMLS": "C0751383", "GARD": "5897", "MedDRA": "10052073", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist in den meisten L\u00e4ndern nicht bekannt. H\u00e4ufiger sind diese Krankheiten in skandinavischen L\u00e4ndern: In Schweden wurde die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung zu ca. 1:217.000 und bei der Geburt zu ca. 1:45.000 bestimmt. In Deutschland betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt etwa 1:143.000.", "clinical_description": "Die klassische Form der JNCLs (auch als Batten-Krankheit und Spielmeyer-Vogt-Krankheit bezeichnet) wird bei sonst noch gesunden, etwa 6 Jahre alten Kindern mit Verschlechterung des Visus manifest. Die Kinder erblinden innerhalb weniger Jahre. Mehrere Jahre nach Beginn der Visusprobleme nehmen die kognitiven F\u00e4higkeiten ab und eine Epilepsie setzt ein. Der dementive Abbau und motorische St\u00f6rungen schreiten zunehmend fort. Auch \u00fcber psychiatrische St\u00f6rungen (aggressives Verhalten, Schlafst\u00f6rungen) wurde berichtet. In seltenen F\u00e4llen von JNCL sind die Augen weniger stark beteiligt. Epilepsie und Demenz ohne Visusverlust muss bei diesen Patienten an die Epilepsie-Variante 'Northern' der JNCL (Progressive Epilepsie - intellektuelles Defizit, Finnischer Typ; s. dort) denken lassen.", "etiology": "Die JNCLs werden autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Mutationen in den folgenden Genen f\u00fchren zur JNCL mit klassischem und/oder varianten Ph\u00e4notyp: PPT1/CLN1 (1p32), TPP1/CLN2/i> (11p15), CLN3/i> (16p12), CLN8/i> (8p23; verantwortlich f\u00fcr die Epilepsie-Variante 'Northern') und CTSD/CLN10/i> (11p15.5). Zus\u00e4tzlich wurde eine Entit\u00e4t als CLN9-Krankheit beschrieben, deren Ph\u00e4notyp der klassischen JNCL gleicht,  deren urs\u00e4chliches Gen aber noch nicht gefunden wurde. H\u00e4ufigste Ursache der cJNCL sind Mutationen im CLN3/i>-Gen (16p12), das f\u00fcr ein Protein mit putativen Transmembran-Dom\u00e4nen kodiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostisches Hauptmerkmal der Patienten mit CLN3-Krankheit sind im Blutausstrich Lymphozyten mit gro\u00dfen Vakuolen. Enzymatische Tests stehen zum Nachweis des Mangels der Palmitoyl-Protein-Thioesterase 1 (PPT1-Mutationen), der Tripeptidyl-Peptidase 1 (TPP1-Mutationen) und des Cathepsins D (CTSD-Mutationen) zur Verf\u00fcgung. Mit Ausnahme der CLN9-Krankheit kann die Diagnose durch molekulare Analyse best\u00e4tigt werden. Im initialen Stadium der Krankheit wird evtl. an das Vorliegen einer Retinitis pigmentosa (s. dort) gedacht.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen im sp\u00e4teren Krankheitsverlauf sind andere Ursachen von Demenz und zerebralen Kr\u00e4mpfen im Schulalter, einschlie\u00dflich Mitochondriopathien und Subakute sklerosierende Panenzephalitis (s. dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung besteht in palliativer Pflege, der Anwendung von Antikonvulsiva, sowie p\u00e4dagogischer, psychologischer und psychiatrischer Begleitung.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose der JNCL ist schwer, aber die Lebenserwartung unterschiedlich. Einige Patienten errreichen das vierte Lebensjahrzehnt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist in den meisten L\u00e4ndern nicht bekannt. H\u00e4ufiger sind diese Krankheiten in skandinavischen L\u00e4ndern: In Schweden wurde die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung zu ca. 1:217.000 und bei der Geburt zu ca. 1:45.000 bestimmt. In Deutschland betr\u00e4gt die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt etwa 1:143.000."}, {"name": "Spina bifida aperta", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener Neuralrohrverschlussdefekt, der durch einen Hautdefekt mit freiliegendem Nervengewebe im Bereich der Wirbels\u00e4ule gekennzeichnet ist, mit oder ohne vorstehende Aussackung an der Stelle des Defekts. Anzeichen und Symptome sind je nach Inhalt (nur Hirnhaut oder auch R\u00fcckenmarksgewebe), Lage und Schwere der L\u00e4sion variabel, k\u00f6nnen aber u. a. motorische, sensorische und/oder Sphinkter-Funktionsst\u00f6rungen, Hydrozephalus und/oder Skelettanomalien (z. B. Skoliose, Halbwirbel) umfassen.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q05.0\u00a0 Q05.1\u00a0 Q05.2\u00a0 Q05.3\u00a0 Q05.4\u00a0 Q05.5\u00a0 Q05.6\u00a0 Q05.7\u00a0 Q05.8\u00a0 Q05.9"}, {"name": "Spina bifida aperta, lumbosakrale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida aperta, thorakolumbosakrale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida aperta, totale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida aperta, zervikale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida aperta, zervikothorakale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida cystica", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q05.0\u00a0 Q05.1\u00a0 Q05.2\u00a0 Q05.3\u00a0 Q05.4\u00a0 Q05.5\u00a0 Q05.6\u00a0 Q05.7\u00a0 Q05.8\u00a0 Q05.9", "UMLS": "C0037917", "MedDRA": "10071011", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spina bifida cystica, lumbosakrale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida cystica, obere thorakale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida cystica, thorakolumbosakrale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida cystica, totale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida cystica, untere thorakale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida cystica, zervikale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida cystica, zervikothorakale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spina bifida-Hypospadie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Spina bifida-Hypospadie-Syndrom ist eine seltene Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung w\u00e4hrend der Embryogenese, die durch die spezifische Assoziation von glandul\u00e4rer Hypospadie und lumbo-sakraler Spina bifida gekennzeichnet ist. Betroffene Individuen k\u00f6nnen zus\u00e4tzliche kongenitale Anomalien aufweisen, wie Hydrozephalie, Mikrostomie, offener Ductus arteriosus, Kryptorchismus, intestinale Malrotation, Talus vertikalis congenitus und Hypertrichose.", "ICD-10": "Q05.9", "GARD": "4940"}, {"name": "Spina bifida, isolierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine Gruppe seltener Neuralrohrdefekt-Erkrankungen, die durch einen unzureichenden Verschluss der Wirbels\u00e4ule w\u00e4hrend der Embryonalentwicklung gekennzeichnet sind und nicht mit anderen gr\u00f6\u00dferen angeborenen Fehlbildungen oder Ventrikulomegalie einhergehen. Das Ausma\u00df des Verschlussdefekts kann variieren und reicht von Spina bifida occulta, bei der die Stelle der L\u00e4sion nicht sichtbar ist (z. B. einem isolierten hinteren Wirbelbogendefekt), bis hin zur Spina bifida aperta, bei der die L\u00e4sion aus vorstehendem R\u00fcckenmark und Hirnh\u00e4uten bestehen kann (Myelomeningozele) oder nur die Hirnh\u00e4ute freiliegen (Meningozele), mit oder ohne vorstehendem Sack an der Stelle der L\u00e4sion, bis hin zum schwersten Defekt, der eine vollst\u00e4ndige Freilegung des R\u00fcckenmarks \u00fcber seine gesamte L\u00e4nge beinhaltet (Rachischisis). Je nach Art, Gr\u00f6\u00dfe und Lokalisation des Defekts kann eine schwere Morbidit\u00e4t, typischerweise mit motorischen, sensorischen und Sphinkter-Funktionsst\u00f6rungen, sowie eine hohe Mortalit\u00e4t auftreten. Eine Spina bifida occulta kann asymptomatisch sein.", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q05.0\u00a0 Q05.1\u00a0 Q05.2\u00a0 Q05.3\u00a0 Q05.4\u00a0 Q05.5\u00a0 Q05.6\u00a0 Q05.7\u00a0 Q05.8\u00a0 Q05.9", "OMIM": "182940\u00a0 301410\u00a0 601634", "UMLS": "C0080178", "MeSH": "D016135", "GARD": "7673", "MedDRA": "10041524"}, {"name": "Spinale Atrophie-Ophthalmoplegie-Pyramidenbahn-Symptomatik-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal atrophy-ophthalmoplegia-pyramidal syndrome is a rare, bulbospinal muscular atrophy characterized by generalized neonatal hypotonia, progressive pontobulbar and spinal palsy, pyramidal signs, and deafness. External ophthalmoplegia and bilateral mydriasis are typical signs. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1994.", "synonyms": "Hamano-Tsukamoto syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2", "umls": "C2930956", "gard": "4942"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, adulte", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 4", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:300.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die SMA4 beginnt in der Regel im zweiten oder dritten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with adult onset, slowly progressive, mild proximal muscle weakness.", "synonyms": "SMA type 4, SMA type IV, SMA-IV, SMA4, Spinal muscular atrophy, adult form, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "271150", "umls": "C1838230", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000 of which approximately 1% account for type 4.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset is typically in the second or third decade of life. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Waddling gait is common. Finger trembling, fasciculation and calf hypertrophy may occur. The clinical picture is similar to that seen in SMA type 3 but the motor weakness is less severe. Cognition is unaffected.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. The disease is modified by the gene SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1 (5q13.1), the copy number of which is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical history and examination. In patients with SMN1 anomalies, the diagnosis may be confirmed by genetic testing. Electromyography and muscle biopsy may be necessary.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include the amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, primary lateral sclerosis, Kennedy disease, myasthenia gravis, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible for families in which the mutations in the SMN1 gene have been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "The SMN1 gene deletions are transmitted in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling should be provided.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptomatic, involves a multidisciplinary approach, and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended. Walking aids may be required as the disease progresses. Documenting functional status in SMA is important, since all patients show limitations in daily functioning. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is now approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. There is no data currently available concerning treatment in SMA type 4; however, it is believed that nusinersen may be most effective when started as soon as possible after diagnosis. Other clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential treatments.", "prognosis": "Affected individuals have a normal life expectancy. The greatest morbidity is on quality of life, with impairment of daily activities. Some patients may lose the ability to walk."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, benigne, autosomal-dominante", "sub_name": "Kongenitale benigne spinale Muskelatrophie, autosomal-dominante Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene distale heredit\u00e4re motorische Neuropathie mit einem variablen klinischen Ph\u00e4notyp, der typischerweise durch kongenitale, nicht-progressive, vorwiegend distale Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und kongenitale (oder fr\u00fch einsetzende) Beugekontrakturen der H\u00fcft-, Knie- und Sprunggelenke gekennzeichnet ist. Reduzierte oder fehlende tiefe Sehnenreflexe der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Skelettanomalien (bilaterale Talipes equinovarus, Skoliose, Kyphoskoliose, lumbale Hyperlordose), versp\u00e4tetes Gehen, Watschelgang, Gelenkhyperlaxie und/oder Blasen- und Darmfunktionsst\u00f6rungen sind in der Regel ebenfalls assoziiert.", "synonyms": "Kongenitale benigne spinale Muskelatrophie mit Krampfanf\u00e4llen, Spinale Muskelatrophie, benigne, autosomal-dominante, Spinale Muskelatrophie, kongenitale nicht-progressive, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G12.1", "OMIM": "600175"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie - Dandy-Walker-Malformation - Katarakte", "german_description": "Klinische Merkmale dieses Syndroms sind: Infantile symmetrische distale Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie der Beine, beidseitige vordere Polkatarakt und Dandy-Walker-Malformation. Es wurde bei zwei Br\u00fcdern beschrieben. Sensorische oder kognitive Einschr\u00e4nkungen wurden nicht gesehen. Beide Patienten hatten einen normalen Karyotyp. In den folgenden Genen konnte keine Mutation gefunden: SMN ('survival motor neuron'), NAIP ('neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein'), AR (Androgen-Rezeptor). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by bilateral cataract, Dandy-Walker malformation, and childhood onset of distal spinal muscular atrophy. Patients present with progressively deteriorating symmetrical distal muscle weakness and atrophy of the lower limbs (and, to a much lesser degree, also the upper limbs) and decreased tendon reflexes in the lower and upper limbs.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.8"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, diaphragmatische", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1 is a rare genetic motor neuron disease characterized by severe respiratory distress/respiratory failure in association with diaphragmatic eventration and palsy, as well as progressive, symmetrical, distal-to-proximal muscle weakness and atrophy (in lower limbs especially). Patients typically have a history of intrauterine growth retardation, low birth weight, feeble cry, weak suck and failure to thrive and present with inspiratory stridor, recurrent episodes of dyspnea or apnea, cyanosis and absent deep tendon reflexes. Kyphosis/scoliosis, foot deformities and joint contractures are frequently associated features.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive distal spinal muscular atrophy type 1, Autosomal recessive spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy, Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type 6, Distal-HMN type 6, SIANRF, SMARD1, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 1, dHMN6, dSMA1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "604320", "umls": "C1858517", "gard": "8592"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, diaphragmatische, Typ 2", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 2 is a rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by progressive early respiratory failure associated with diaphragm paralysis, distal muscular weakness, joint contractures, and axial hypotonia with preserved antigravity limb movements. Phenotype overlaps considerably with SMARD type 1 but is differentiated by a mutation in a different gene.", "synonyms": "Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy type 2, SMARD2, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 2, X-linked spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, autosomal-dominante", "sub_name": "Neuropathy, motorische, distale, heredit\u00e4re, autosomal-dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Autosomal-dominante dHMN, Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, autosomal-dominante, ", "ICD-10": "G12.1", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, autosomal-rezessive", "sub_name": "Neuropathy, motorische, distale, heredit\u00e4re, autosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Autosomal-rezessive dHMN, Autosomal-rezessive dSMA, Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, autosomal-rezessive, ", "ICD-10": "G12.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 5", "sub_name": "Neuropathie, distale kongenitale motorische, des jungen Erwachsenen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Young adult-onset distal hereditary motor neuropathy is a rare autosomal recessive distal hereditary motor neuropathy characterized by slowly progressive muscular weakness, hypotonia and atrophy of the lower limbs, more pronounced distally, leading to paralysis, and loss of tendon reflexes. Additional features may include pes cavus and mild dysphonia. The upper limbs are relatively spared.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive distal spinal muscular atrophy type 5, Young adult-onset dHMN, dSMA5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "614881\u00a0 619216"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, juvenile, autosomal-dominante, Typ 1", "sub_name": "Neuropathie, distale heredit\u00e4re motorische, Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type 1 is a rare neuromuscular disease characterized by slowly-progressive lower limb muscular weakness and atrophy, without sensory impairment. Additional clinical features may include pes cavus, hammertoe and increased muscle tone.", "synonyms": "Autosomal dominant distal juvenile spinal muscular atrophy type 1, dHMN1, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "182960", "umls": "C1866784"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, mit Stimmbandl\u00e4hmung", "sub_name": "Neuropathie, distale motorische, heredit\u00e4re, Typ 7", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, slowly progressive genetic peripheral neuropathy characterized by distal atrophy and weakness affecting the upper limbs (with a predilection for the thenar eminence) and subsequently the lower limbs, associated with uni- or bilateral vocal cord paresis leading to hoarse voice and breathing difficulties, and facial weakness.", "synonyms": "Distal spinal muscular atrophy with vocal cord paralysis, dHMN7, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "158580\u00a0 607641"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, Typ 2", "sub_name": "Neuropathie, distale heredit\u00e4re motorische, Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, Typ 2, dHMN2, dSMA2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G12.2", "OMIM": "158590\u00a0 608634\u00a0 613376\u00a0 615575", "UMLS": "C1854023\u00a0 C3711384", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, Typ 3", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Distal spinal muscular atrophy type 3 is a rare neuromuscular disease characterized by progressive muscular weakness and atrophy predominantly affecting distal parts of limbs, later involvement of proximal and trunk muscles with marked hyperlordosis and late diaphragmatic dysfunction.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive distal spinal muscular atrophy type 3, Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type 3 and type 4, dHMN3 and dHMN4, dSMA3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "607088", "umls": "C1846823"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, Typ 5", "sub_name": "Neuropathie, distale heredit\u00e4re motorische, Typ 5", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal dominant distal hereditary motor neuropathy disease characterized by muscle weakness and wasting predominantly affecting the hands, in particular the thenar and first dorsal interosseus muscles, and/or marked foot deformity and gait disturbance. Sensation is normal, although reduced response to vibration has been described. The disease is slowly progressive with an age of onset within the first few decades of life.", "synonyms": "Distal HMN V, Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type V, Distal spinal muscular atrophy type 5, dHMN5, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Childhood, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "600794\u00a0 614751\u00a0 619112", "umls": "C1833308"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, X-chromosomale", "sub_name": "Neuropathie, distale heredit\u00e4re motorische, X-chromosomale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, X-chromosomale, dHMN, X-chromosomal, ", "ICD-10": "G12.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, distale, X-chromosomale, Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die X-chromosomale distale spinale Muskelatrophie Typ 3 ist eine seltene distale heredit\u00e4re motorische Neuropathie. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine langsam fortschreitende Atrophie und Schw\u00e4che der distalen Muskeln von H\u00e4nden und F\u00fc\u00dfen mit normalen tiefen Sehnenreflexen oder fehlenden Kn\u00f6chelreflexen und minimalem (wenn \u00fcberhaupt) sensorischen Verlust, die gelegentlich mit leichter proximaler Schw\u00e4che in den Beinen und F\u00fc\u00dfen und Handdeformit\u00e4ten bei M\u00e4nnern einhergeht.", "synonyms": "ATP7A-assoziierte distale motorische Neuropathie, DSMAX, Neuropathie, distale heredit\u00e4re motorische, X-chromosomale, Typ 3, SMAX3, dHMN, X-chromosomale, Typ 3, dSMA, X-chromosomale, Typ 3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G12.2", "OMIM": "300489", "UMLS": "C1845359"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, infantile", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:80.000 und die Jahresinzidenz auf etwa 1:10.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist bei Knaben etwas h\u00e4ufiger als bei M\u00e4dchen. Die Krankheit beginnt vor dem Alter von 6 Monaten, gew\u00f6hnlich vor dem 3. Lebensmonat.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of severe and progressive muscle weakness in the first 6 months of life and presenting with severe, generalized hypotonia and weakness,. Dysphagia and respiratory impairment may also be present at presentation or appear at a later stage. Classically, before the advent of recent therapies, type 1 patients never achieved sitting without support.", "synonyms": "Infantile spinal muscular atrophy, Infantile-onset spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 1, SMA type I, SMA-I, SMA1, Werdnig-Hoffmann disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.0", "omim": "253300", "umls": "C0043116", "gard": "7883", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated at 1/12,000, of which approximately 60% account for type 1.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs before 6 months of age. The severe, symmetrical muscle weakness affects predominantly proximal limbs but often also involves the extremities. Cries are weak. Poor sucking ability and reduced swallowing are frequent, leading to feeding difficulties. Deep tendon reflexes are absent. Patients have paradoxical breathing, a bell shaped chest and develop respiratory failure. Mild contractures (of the knees and, more rarely, of the elbows), and scoliosis may be present. Classically, patients were not able to achieve sitting without support but this has changed following the availability of new treatments.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is clinically suggested by muscle weakness and hypotonia with sparing of the facial muscles, loss of reflexes, typical respiratory pattern with predominance of diaphragmatic movements compared to poor intercostal movements, and tremor. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN2 copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, other spinal muscular atrophies with infantile onset (infantile-onset X-linked spinal muscular atrophy and spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1), congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, some early-onset mitochondrial disorders, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and thus the risk of transmission to offspring is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers. However, around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. This includes respiratory support (noninvasive ventilation and airway clearance), physiotherapy, gastrostomy, and antibiotic treatment in case of pulmonary infection. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it reduces the risk of death and improves motor milestones in type 1 patients, with a number of patients achieving sitting without support. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently successfully completed clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and, for compassionate use, also in Europe. A different approach, using gene therapy, onasemnogene abeparvovec, has also been approved in US and Europe. The results of the clinical trials in young patients also indicate a very high rate of survival beyond 2 years and an improvement of motor function. Real world data are being collected in older patients but are not yet publicly available.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is generally poor with most patients dying within the first two years of life due to respiratory failure. Data on long term outcomes with nusinersen treatment and with other drugs are now becoming increasingly available, suggesting long term survival."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, infantile, X-chromosomale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "X-linked distal arthrogryposis multiplex congenital (SMAX2) is a rare form of spinal muscular atrophy characterized by the neonatal onset of severe hypotonia, areflexia, profound weakness, multiple congenital contractures, facial dysmorphic features (myopathic face with open, tent-shaped mouth), cryptorchidism, and mild skeletal abnormalities (i.e. kyphosis, scoliosis), that is often preceded by polyhydramnios and reduced fetal movements in utero and followed by bone fractures shortly after birth. SMAX2 patients often have a limited life span, often succumbing to the disease within 2 years, as muscle weakness is progressive and chest muscle involvement eventually leads to ventilatory insufficiency and respiratory failure.", "synonyms": "SMAX2, Spinal muscular atrophy with arthrogryposis, X-linked distal arthrogryposis multiplex congenita, X-linked spinal muscular atrophy type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "301830", "umls": "C1844934", "mesh": "C535380", "gard": "8521"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, intermedi\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:70.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist etwas h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen als im weiblichen Geschlecht. Sie beginnt zwischen dem 6. und 18. Lebensmonat (meist um den 15. Monat herum).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset between 6 to 18 months of age with progressive, proximal muscle weakness, mild to moderate hypotonia and finger polymyoclonour tremor, with areflexia. Motor milestones are classically limited to independent sitting or standing.", "synonyms": "Intermediate spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 2, SMA type II, SMA-II, SMA2, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253550", "umls": "C0393538\u00a0 C2931358", "gard": "4945", "epidemiology": "In Europe the average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) type 2 is estimated at 1/50,000. Worldwide the prevalence ranges from 1/11,00-175,000.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs between the ages of 6 and 18 months. Classically, before the advent of the new therapies, affected children achieve sitting independently and may acquire standing but do not acquire independent walking. Progressive proximal muscle weakness is symmetrical and greater in the legs than the arms. Finger trembling is frequent. Scoliosis, joint contractures and ankyloses of the mandible are very common . Progressive respiratory muscle weakness can lead to restrictive lung disease. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, neuromuscular junction disease (botulism), and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus cells.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Assisted airway clearance and non-invasive ventilations are helpful. Physiotherapy and occupational therapy are recommended to prevent scoliosis, maintain joint mobility and promote function and mobility. Antibiotic therapy is required in case of pulmonary infection. The scoliosis may require a corset/back brace for support, and almost invariably needs surgical correction. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it improves motor function in type 2 patients, with a number of patients achieving walking. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently, successfully completed a clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and for compassionate use in Europe. Clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential drug treatments.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy for affected individuals is variable but, with the new standards of care, particularly for respiratory insufficiency, the majority of patients survive up to adulthood."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, juvenile", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:375.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit wird nach dem 12. Lebensmonat manifest (gew\u00f6hnlich zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz), nach Erlernen des Laufens. Einige Autoren unterscheiden zwei Subtypen: SMA3a und SMA3b. SMA3a wird durch Beginn vor und SMA3b durch Beginn nach dem Alter von 3 Jahren definiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of progressive proximal muscle weakness (legs greater than arms) between 18 months and adulthood. Motor development is heterogeneous but walking is typically acquired.", "synonyms": "Juvenile spinal muscular atrophy, Kugelberg-Welander disease, SMA type 3, SMA type III, SMA-III, SMA3, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253400", "umls": "C0152109", "gard": "198", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000, of which more than 10% account for type 3. Prevalence worldwide ranges between 1/70,00-285,000, although studies are limited.", "clinical_description": "The disease manifests between 18 months of age and adulthood, typically presenting with frequent falls, difficulty climbing steps and proximal weakness. Patients are subdivided based on age of onset: early onset is between 18 months and 3 years of age (type 3a) and is associated with a plateau in motor development, reduced or absent reflexes, finger polymyoclonus tremor and, frequently, loss of ambulation before or around puberty. Later onset (type 3b), between 3 and 21 years of age, is associated with comparatively milder decline in gross motor function. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Abnormal gait characteristics are common in order to compensate for weakness. Typically, patients are spared scoliosis and respiratory muscle weakness but these may be a feature after loss of ambulation. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. Type 3 is associated with 3-4 copy numbers of SMN2.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in a typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other disorders of the peripheral nervous system including myopathies or muscular dystrophies (dystrophinopathies, limb girdle muscular dystrophy, metabolic myopathies, or inflammatory myopathies), inflammatory neuropathies (Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome), neuromuscular junction disorders (myasthenia gravis or congenital myasthenic syndromes), and other motor neuron disorders (non-5q form of SMA or late onset hexosaminidase A deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to patients and their families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended and include exercise programs. Clinical evaluations should include timed function tests including the six-minute walk test. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. Real world data following commercial availability of the drug suggest efficacy in type 3 children and adult patients.", "prognosis": "A wheelchair may be required during childhood for some patients (more commonly those with type 3a), whilst others retain the ability to walk into adulthood. Progression is slow and life expectancy is typically normal. Data on long-term outcomes with nusinersen treatment are not currently available."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, kongenitale nicht-progressive", "sub_name": "Kongenitale benigne spinale Muskelatrophie, autosomal-dominante Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene distale heredit\u00e4re motorische Neuropathie mit einem variablen klinischen Ph\u00e4notyp, der typischerweise durch kongenitale, nicht-progressive, vorwiegend distale Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und kongenitale (oder fr\u00fch einsetzende) Beugekontrakturen der H\u00fcft-, Knie- und Sprunggelenke gekennzeichnet ist. Reduzierte oder fehlende tiefe Sehnenreflexe der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Skelettanomalien (bilaterale Talipes equinovarus, Skoliose, Kyphoskoliose, lumbale Hyperlordose), versp\u00e4tetes Gehen, Watschelgang, Gelenkhyperlaxie und/oder Blasen- und Darmfunktionsst\u00f6rungen sind in der Regel ebenfalls assoziiert.", "synonyms": "Kongenitale benigne spinale Muskelatrophie mit Krampfanf\u00e4llen, Spinale Muskelatrophie, benigne, autosomal-dominante, Spinale Muskelatrophie, kongenitale nicht-progressive, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G12.1", "OMIM": "600175"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Arthrogrypose", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, infantile, X-chromosomale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "X-linked distal arthrogryposis multiplex congenital (SMAX2) is a rare form of spinal muscular atrophy characterized by the neonatal onset of severe hypotonia, areflexia, profound weakness, multiple congenital contractures, facial dysmorphic features (myopathic face with open, tent-shaped mouth), cryptorchidism, and mild skeletal abnormalities (i.e. kyphosis, scoliosis), that is often preceded by polyhydramnios and reduced fetal movements in utero and followed by bone fractures shortly after birth. SMAX2 patients often have a limited life span, often succumbing to the disease within 2 years, as muscle weakness is progressive and chest muscle involvement eventually leads to ventilatory insufficiency and respiratory failure.", "synonyms": "SMAX2, Spinal muscular atrophy with arthrogryposis, X-linked distal arthrogryposis multiplex congenita, X-linked spinal muscular atrophy type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "301830", "umls": "C1844934", "mesh": "C535380", "gard": "8521"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit assoziierten Anomalien des Zentralnervensystems", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1 is a rare genetic motor neuron disease characterized by severe respiratory distress/respiratory failure in association with diaphragmatic eventration and palsy, as well as progressive, symmetrical, distal-to-proximal muscle weakness and atrophy (in lower limbs especially). Patients typically have a history of intrauterine growth retardation, low birth weight, feeble cry, weak suck and failure to thrive and present with inspiratory stridor, recurrent episodes of dyspnea or apnea, cyanosis and absent deep tendon reflexes. Kyphosis/scoliosis, foot deformities and joint contractures are frequently associated features.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive distal spinal muscular atrophy type 1, Autosomal recessive spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy, Distal hereditary motor neuropathy type 6, Distal-HMN type 6, SIANRF, SMARD1, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 1, dHMN6, dSMA1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2", "omim": "604320", "umls": "C1858517", "gard": "8592"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Atemnot Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 2 is a rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by progressive early respiratory failure associated with diaphragm paralysis, distal muscular weakness, joint contractures, and axial hypotonia with preserved antigravity limb movements. Phenotype overlaps considerably with SMARD type 1 but is differentiated by a mutation in a different gene.", "synonyms": "Diaphragmatic spinal muscular atrophy type 2, SMARD2, Severe infantile axonal neuropathy with respiratory failure type 2, X-linked spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.2"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, autosomal-dominante, Typ Finkel", "sub_name": "Proximale spinale Muskelatrophie mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter, autosomal-dominante", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by adulthood-onset of slowly progressive, proximal muscular weakness with fasciculations, amyotrophy, cramps, and absent/hypoactive reflexes, without bulbar or pyramidal involvement.", "synonyms": "Autosomal dominant adult-onset proximal SMA, Autosomal dominant late-onset spinal muscular atrophy, Finkel type, Finkel disease, SMAFK, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "182980", "umls": "C1854058\u00a0 C1866777"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie-progressive Myoklonusepilepsie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch erblichen Myoklonus und progrediente distale Muskelatrophie. Weniger als 10 F\u00e4lle wurden beschrieben. Die Behandlung mit Clonazepam f\u00fchrt zu vollst\u00e4ndiger und anhaltender Besserung des Myoklonus. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinal muscular atrophy-progressive myoclonic epilepsy syndrome is characterized by hereditary myoclonus and progressive distal muscular atrophy. Less than 10 cases have been reported. Treatment with clonazepam results in complete and lasting improvement of the myoclonus.", "synonyms": "Hereditary myoclonus-progressive distal muscular atrophy syndrome, Jankovic-Rivera syndrome, SMA-PME, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G25.3", "omim": "159950", "umls": "C1834569", "gard": "3044\u00a0 3875"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die proximalen spinalen Muskelatrophien sind eine Gruppe neuromuskul\u00e4rer Krankheiten mit fortschreitender Muskelschw\u00e4che als Folge einer Degeneration oder eines Verlustes der unteren Motorneurone im R\u00fcckenmark (Vorderhornzellen) und in den Kernen des Hirnstamms.", "synonyms": "SMA, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G12.0\u00a0 G12.1", "OMIM": "253300\u00a0 253400\u00a0 253550\u00a0 271150", "GARD": "4531", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:30.000. Nach Erkrankungsalter und Schwere der Symptome wurden vier Untertypen definiert: Typ 1 (SMA1), die schwerste Form, mit Beginn vor dem 6. Lebensmonat; Typ 2 (SMA2), mit Beginn zwischen 6 und 18 Monaten; Typ 3 (SMA3) mit Beginn zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz; und Typ 4 (SMA4), die am wenigsten schwere Verlaufsform mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter (s. diese Termini).", "clinical_description": "Alle Typen sind gekennzeichnet durch Muskelschw\u00e4che und -atrophie unterschiedlichen Schweregrades besonders der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen und der Atemmuskulatur. Die Schw\u00e4che ist fast immer symmetrisch und progredient. Skoliose, Muskelretraktion und Gelenkkontrakturen k\u00f6nnen auftreten. H\u00e4ufig bestehen Obstipation und gastro-\u00f6sophagealer Reflux.", "etiology": "Etwa 95% der F\u00e4lle von SMA sind durch homozygote Deletionen entweder des Exons 7 oder der Exons 7 und 8 des SMN1-Gens (5q12.2-q13.3) verursacht. Dieses Gen kodiert f\u00fcr das SMN (survival motor neuron)-Protein. Ein zweites SMN-Gen (SMN2; 5q13.2) ist an der Produktion von nur 10% des vollst\u00e4ndigen SMN-Proteins beteiligt. Der Schweregrad der SMA ist variabel, korreliert aber invers mit der Zahl der SMN2-Genkopien, wenn auch nicht strikt: Patienten mit 3 oder 4 Kopien manifestieren h\u00e4ufiger SMA3/4 als SMA1. Gefunden wurden auch Deletionen des NAIP-Gens (5q13.1). Evtl. spielen sie eine Rolle bei der Modifizierung des Schweregrades. Die SMN1- und NAIP-Deletionen werden autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle sind durch Neumutationen verursacht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Vorgeschichte und klinisches Bild f\u00fchren zur Diagnose, die durch genetische Analyse gesichert wird. Weitere diagnostische Verfahren sind Elektromyographie und Muskelbiopsie.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdignosen sind Amyotrophe Lateralsklerose, kongenitale Muskeldystrophien, kongenitale Myopathien, prim\u00e4re Lateralsklerose, Myasthenia gravis und St\u00f6rungen des Kohlehydrat-Stoffwechsels (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist durch DNA-Analyse in Amnionzellen oder Chorionzotten m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Den Patienten und ihren Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Gegenw\u00e4rtig laufende klinische Studien untersuchen m\u00f6gliche medikament\u00f6se Behandlungsarten der SMA, die vor allem auf h\u00f6here Spiegel des vollst\u00e4ndigen SMN-Proteins zielen. Bisher jedoch ist die Therapie lediglich symptomatisch und soll durch multidisziplin\u00e4re Betreuung die Lebensqualit\u00e4t verbessern. Notwendig sind Ergo-, Physio- und Atemtherapie. Nicht-invasive Beatmung und Gastrostomie k\u00f6nnen erforderlich werden, auch Antibiotika bei Atemwegsinfektionen. Skoliose und Gelenkver\u00e4nderungen verlangen evtl. chirurgische Korrektur. Im Verlauf k\u00f6nnen die Patienten rollstuhlpflichtig werden oder ein St\u00fctzkorsett/St\u00fctzmieder ben\u00f6tigen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch den Schweregrad der Krankheit bestimmt, der wiederum mit dem Alter bei Krankheitsbeginn korreliert: Fr\u00fch beginnende Formen sind im allgemeinen mit ung\u00fcnstiger Prognose verbunden, w\u00e4hrend die Lebenserwartung bei den Formen mit sp\u00e4tem Beginn nahezu normal ist. Todesursachen sind Ateminsuffizienz und Infektionen.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:30.000. Nach Erkrankungsalter und Schwere der Symptome wurden vier Untertypen definiert: Typ 1 (SMA1), die schwerste Form, mit Beginn vor dem 6. Lebensmonat; Typ 2 (SMA2), mit Beginn zwischen 6 und 18 Monaten; Typ 3 (SMA3) mit Beginn zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz; und Typ 4 (SMA4), die am wenigsten schwere Verlaufsform mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter (s. diese Termini)."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, autosomal-dominante", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A group of rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by childhood or adult onset progressive, predominantly proximal, muscular weakness and wasting. Included diseases are Autosomal dominant adult-onset proximal spinal muscular atrophy, Lower motor neuron syndrome with late-adult onset, and Autosomal dominant childhood-onset proximal spinal muscular atrophy.", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "icd_10": "G12.1"}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:80.000 und die Jahresinzidenz auf etwa 1:10.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist bei Knaben etwas h\u00e4ufiger als bei M\u00e4dchen. Die Krankheit beginnt vor dem Alter von 6 Monaten, gew\u00f6hnlich vor dem 3. Lebensmonat.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of severe and progressive muscle weakness in the first 6 months of life and presenting with severe, generalized hypotonia and weakness,. Dysphagia and respiratory impairment may also be present at presentation or appear at a later stage. Classically, before the advent of recent therapies, type 1 patients never achieved sitting without support.", "synonyms": "Infantile spinal muscular atrophy, Infantile-onset spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 1, SMA type I, SMA-I, SMA1, Werdnig-Hoffmann disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.0", "omim": "253300", "umls": "C0043116", "gard": "7883", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated at 1/12,000, of which approximately 60% account for type 1.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs before 6 months of age. The severe, symmetrical muscle weakness affects predominantly proximal limbs but often also involves the extremities. Cries are weak. Poor sucking ability and reduced swallowing are frequent, leading to feeding difficulties. Deep tendon reflexes are absent. Patients have paradoxical breathing, a bell shaped chest and develop respiratory failure. Mild contractures (of the knees and, more rarely, of the elbows), and scoliosis may be present. Classically, patients were not able to achieve sitting without support but this has changed following the availability of new treatments.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is clinically suggested by muscle weakness and hypotonia with sparing of the facial muscles, loss of reflexes, typical respiratory pattern with predominance of diaphragmatic movements compared to poor intercostal movements, and tremor. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN2 copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, other spinal muscular atrophies with infantile onset (infantile-onset X-linked spinal muscular atrophy and spinal muscular atrophy with respiratory distress type 1), congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, some early-onset mitochondrial disorders, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and thus the risk of transmission to offspring is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers. However, around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. This includes respiratory support (noninvasive ventilation and airway clearance), physiotherapy, gastrostomy, and antibiotic treatment in case of pulmonary infection. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it reduces the risk of death and improves motor milestones in type 1 patients, with a number of patients achieving sitting without support. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently successfully completed clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and, for compassionate use, also in Europe. A different approach, using gene therapy, onasemnogene abeparvovec, has also been approved in US and Europe. The results of the clinical trials in young patients also indicate a very high rate of survival beyond 2 years and an improvement of motor function. Real world data are being collected in older patients but are not yet publicly available.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is generally poor with most patients dying within the first two years of life due to respiratory failure. Data on long term outcomes with nusinersen treatment and with other drugs are now becoming increasingly available, suggesting long term survival."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf etwa 1:70.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist etwas h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen als im weiblichen Geschlecht. Sie beginnt zwischen dem 6. und 18. Lebensmonat (meist um den 15. Monat herum).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset between 6 to 18 months of age with progressive, proximal muscle weakness, mild to moderate hypotonia and finger polymyoclonour tremor, with areflexia. Motor milestones are classically limited to independent sitting or standing.", "synonyms": "Intermediate spinal muscular atrophy, SMA type 2, SMA type II, SMA-II, SMA2, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253550", "umls": "C0393538\u00a0 C2931358", "gard": "4945", "epidemiology": "In Europe the average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) type 2 is estimated at 1/50,000. Worldwide the prevalence ranges from 1/11,00-175,000.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs between the ages of 6 and 18 months. Classically, before the advent of the new therapies, affected children achieve sitting independently and may acquire standing but do not acquire independent walking. Progressive proximal muscle weakness is symmetrical and greater in the legs than the arms. Finger trembling is frequent. Scoliosis, joint contractures and ankyloses of the mandible are very common . Progressive respiratory muscle weakness can lead to restrictive lung disease. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. The number of copies of the SMN2 is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation and, if possible, SMN copy number testing. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in patients with typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include, congenital muscular dystrophies, congenital myopathies, congenital myasthenic syndromes, neuromuscular junction disease (botulism), and carbohydrate metabolism disorders (glycogen storage disease due to acid maltase deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus cells.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Assisted airway clearance and non-invasive ventilations are helpful. Physiotherapy and occupational therapy are recommended to prevent scoliosis, maintain joint mobility and promote function and mobility. Antibiotic therapy is required in case of pulmonary infection. The scoliosis may require a corset/back brace for support, and almost invariably needs surgical correction. In the last few years, nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, has been approved and made available for treatment of all SMA types in Europe and the USA. Clinical trials and real world data have shown that it improves motor function in type 2 patients, with a number of patients achieving walking. The best results are seen following early intervention and in presymptomatic patients. Risdiplam (a small molecule) has a also recently, successfully completed a clinical trials and has become commercially available in US and for compassionate use in Europe. Clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential drug treatments.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy for affected individuals is variable but, with the new standards of care, particularly for respiratory insufficiency, the majority of patients survive up to adulthood."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:375.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit wird nach dem 12. Lebensmonat manifest (gew\u00f6hnlich zwischen Kindesalter und Adoleszenz), nach Erlernen des Laufens. Einige Autoren unterscheiden zwei Subtypen: SMA3a und SMA3b. SMA3a wird durch Beginn vor und SMA3b durch Beginn nach dem Alter von 3 Jahren definiert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with onset of progressive proximal muscle weakness (legs greater than arms) between 18 months and adulthood. Motor development is heterogeneous but walking is typically acquired.", "synonyms": "Juvenile spinal muscular atrophy, Kugelberg-Welander disease, SMA type 3, SMA type III, SMA-III, SMA3, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "253400", "umls": "C0152109", "gard": "198", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000, of which more than 10% account for type 3. Prevalence worldwide ranges between 1/70,00-285,000, although studies are limited.", "clinical_description": "The disease manifests between 18 months of age and adulthood, typically presenting with frequent falls, difficulty climbing steps and proximal weakness. Patients are subdivided based on age of onset: early onset is between 18 months and 3 years of age (type 3a) and is associated with a plateau in motor development, reduced or absent reflexes, finger polymyoclonus tremor and, frequently, loss of ambulation before or around puberty. Later onset (type 3b), between 3 and 21 years of age, is associated with comparatively milder decline in gross motor function. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Abnormal gait characteristics are common in order to compensate for weakness. Typically, patients are spared scoliosis and respiratory muscle weakness but these may be a feature after loss of ambulation. Cognition is normal.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport. Modifier genes include SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1, and NAIP (5q13.1), encoding neuronal apoptosis inhibitory protein. Type 3 is associated with 3-4 copy numbers of SMN2.", "diagnostic_methods": "The disease is suspected based on clinical history and examination. The gold standard in diagnosis is genetic testing of SMN1 deletion/mutation. Muscle biopsy and electromyography should not be performed in a typical presentation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other disorders of the peripheral nervous system including myopathies or muscular dystrophies (dystrophinopathies, limb girdle muscular dystrophy, metabolic myopathies, or inflammatory myopathies), inflammatory neuropathies (Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome), neuromuscular junction disorders (myasthenia gravis or congenital myasthenic syndromes), and other motor neuron disorders (non-5q form of SMA or late onset hexosaminidase A deficiency).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible through molecular analysis of amniocytes or chorionic villus samples.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive but around 2% of cases are caused by de novo mutations. Genetic counseling should be offered to patients and their families.", "management_and_treatment": "Symptomatic management is multidisciplinary and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended and include exercise programs. Clinical evaluations should include timed function tests including the six-minute walk test. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. Real world data following commercial availability of the drug suggest efficacy in type 3 children and adult patients.", "prognosis": "A wheelchair may be required during childhood for some patients (more commonly those with type 3a), whilst others retain the ability to walk into adulthood. Progression is slow and life expectancy is typically normal. Data on long-term outcomes with nusinersen treatment are not currently available."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, proximale, Typ 4", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:300.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die SMA4 beginnt in der Regel im zweiten oder dritten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic proximal spinal muscular atrophy characterized by degeneration of alpha motor neurons in the anterior horns of the spinal cord and lower brain stem manifesting with adult onset, slowly progressive, mild proximal muscle weakness.", "synonyms": "SMA type 4, SMA type IV, SMA-IV, SMA4, Spinal muscular atrophy, adult form, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "271150", "umls": "C1838230", "epidemiology": "The average prevalence at birth of proximal spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is estimated between 1/12,000 of which approximately 1% account for type 4.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset is typically in the second or third decade of life. The muscle weakness predominantly affects the legs and hip muscles and then progresses to the shoulders and arms. Waddling gait is common. Finger trembling, fasciculation and calf hypertrophy may occur. The clinical picture is similar to that seen in SMA type 3 but the motor weakness is less severe. Cognition is unaffected.", "etiology": "The disease is a result of degeneration and loss of the lower motor neurons in the spinal cord and the brain stem nuclei. Causal homozygous mutations/deletions in the SMN1 gene (5q12.2-q13.3) are responsible. SMN1 encodes the survival motor neuron protein (SMN) which is known to participate in critical pathways related to RNA processing and transport, and it is believed that motor neurons are particularly vulnerable to impairments in these processes. The disease is modified by the gene SMN2 (5q13.2), a homologous centromeric copy of SMN1 (5q13.1), the copy number of which is inversely correlated to disease severity.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical history and examination. In patients with SMN1 anomalies, the diagnosis may be confirmed by genetic testing. Electromyography and muscle biopsy may be necessary.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include the amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, primary lateral sclerosis, Kennedy disease, myasthenia gravis, and carbohydrate metabolism disorders.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible for families in which the mutations in the SMN1 gene have been identified.", "genetic_counseling": "The SMN1 gene deletions are transmitted in an autosomal recessive manner. Genetic counseling should be provided.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptomatic, involves a multidisciplinary approach, and aims to improve quality of life. Physiotherapy and occupational therapies are recommended. Walking aids may be required as the disease progresses. Documenting functional status in SMA is important, since all patients show limitations in daily functioning. Nusinersen, an antisense oligonucleotide, is now approved for treatment of SMA in Europe and the USA. There is no data currently available concerning treatment in SMA type 4; however, it is believed that nusinersen may be most effective when started as soon as possible after diagnosis. Other clinical trials are ongoing to identify other potential treatments.", "prognosis": "Affected individuals have a normal life expectancy. The greatest morbidity is on quality of life, with impairment of daily activities. Some patients may lose the ability to walk."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie Typ Jokela", "sub_name": "Untere Vorderhornerkrankung mit Beginn im sp\u00e4ten Erwachsenenalter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, motor neuron disease characterized by slowly progressive, predominantly proximal, muscular weakness and atrophy which typically manifests with muscle cramps, fasciculations, decreased/absent deep tendon reflexes, hand tremor, and elevated serum creatine kinase at onset and later associates with reduced walking ability and impaired vibration sensation.", "synonyms": "LOSMoN, Late-onset spinal motor neuronopathy, SMAJ, Spinal muscular atrophy, Jokela type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "615048", "epidemiology": "More than 97 patients have been described with Lower motor neuron syndrome with late-adult onset to date, all originating from Finland, where the point prevalence estimate rises to 1/8,000 in northern Karelia.", "clinical_description": "The main early signs generally present after 30 to 40 years of age, and usually include muscle cramps, fasciculations, decreased/absent deep tendon reflexes, elevated serum creatine kinase, and hand tremor. Disease progresses slowly and leads to muscular weakness and mild to moderate atrophy (predominantly affecting the proximal lower limbs, although occasional distal upper limb and abdominal involvement has also been reported). Impaired vibration sensation in the lower limbs may occur later in life, and some patients may develop mild dysphagia. Additional signs and symptoms include myalgia, and fatty degenerative replacement predominantly in the calves and hamstrings muscles. Respiratory functions are usually normal and there are no upper motor neuron signs.", "etiology": "The disease is caused by a pathogenic mutation (p.G66V) in the CHCHD10 gene (22q11.2), encoding a mitochondrial, coiled-coil-helix-coiled-coil-helix protein of unknown function. CHCHD10 is involved in oxidative phosphorylation and possibly takes part in mitochondrial complex function (particularly complex IV), and in maintaining mitochondrial DNA. The exact pathogenic mechanism of this mutation remains poorly understood.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and electromyographic evaluation showing prominent fasciculations and chronic denervation in all limbs and possibly in the trunk, as well as evidence of neurogenic changes on muscle biopsy. Diagnosis is confirmed by identification of a causative mutation on the CHCHD10 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "The disorder must be differentiated from other neuromuscular diseases, including autosomal dominant adult-onset proximal spinal muscular atrophy and amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), due to significant genetic and/or clinical overlap.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known disease causing mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease follows an autosomal dominant pattern of inheritance. Genetic counseling should be provided to affected families, informing them of the 50% risk of transmission in future pregnancies.", "management_and_treatment": "Disease management is mainly symptomatic, as no specific treatment is available to date.", "prognosis": "The disease has a relatively mild course, as most patients remain ambulatory for several decades after disease onset and present a normal life expectancy."}, {"name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, X-chromosomale, Typ 2", "sub_name": "Spinale Muskelatrophie, infantile, X-chromosomale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "X-linked distal arthrogryposis multiplex congenital (SMAX2) is a rare form of spinal muscular atrophy characterized by the neonatal onset of severe hypotonia, areflexia, profound weakness, multiple congenital contractures, facial dysmorphic features (myopathic face with open, tent-shaped mouth), cryptorchidism, and mild skeletal abnormalities (i.e. kyphosis, scoliosis), that is often preceded by polyhydramnios and reduced fetal movements in utero and followed by bone fractures shortly after birth. SMAX2 patients often have a limited life span, often succumbing to the disease within 2 years, as muscle weakness is progressive and chest muscle involvement eventually leads to ventilatory insufficiency and respiratory failure.", "synonyms": "SMAX2, Spinal muscular atrophy with arthrogryposis, X-linked distal arthrogryposis multiplex congenita, X-linked spinal muscular atrophy type 2, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "301830", "umls": "C1844934", "mesh": "C535380", "gard": "8521"}, {"name": "Spinale Osteochondrose, famili\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Scheuermann-Krankheit, famili\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial Scheuermann disease is characterized by kyphotic deformity of the spine that develops in adolescence. The spinal deformity includes irregularities of the vertebral endplates, the presence of Schmorl's nodes, disk-space narrowing, and vertebral wedging and is diagnosed using lateral radiographs of the spine. The thoracic spine is most often affected, but the lumbar spine may also be involved. Analysis of the mode of inheritance in a sample of 90 pedigrees derived from the Siberian population supported an autosomal dominant mode of inheritance with complete penetrance in boys and incomplete penetrance in girls.", "synonyms": "Familial Scheuermann juvenile kyphosis, Familial spinal osteochondrosis, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent", "icd_10": "M42.0", "omim": "181440", "umls": "C0036310", "gard": "7610"}, {"name": "Spinales arterioven\u00f6ses metameres Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Angiomatose, kutaneomeningospinale, Cobb-Syndrom, SAMS 1-31, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "Q27.3", "UMLS": "C0346068", "GARD": "11892", "MedDRA": "10068841", "summary": "Das Cobb-Syndrom ist definiert als die Assoziation von ven\u00f6sen oder arterio-ven\u00f6sen Gef\u00e4\u00dfl\u00e4sionen der Haut und arterio-ven\u00f6sen L\u00e4sionen der Muskeln, Knochen und Medulla, alle diese im gleichen Metamer oder spinalen Segment. Diese segmentale Verteilung kann sich auf eines oder auch mehrere der 31 beim Menschen vorhandenen Metamere erstrecken. Nur 16% der medull\u00e4ren L\u00e4sionen sind vielfach und haben eine klare metamere Verteilung. Bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich h\u00e4ufig betroffen. Weniger als 15% der arterio-ven\u00f6sen Fehlbildungen des R\u00fcckenmarks treten im Rahmen eines Cobb-Syndroms auf. Die neurologischen Symptome sind \u00e4hnlich wie bei akuten h\u00e4morrhagischen Ereignissen oder bei chronischer ven\u00f6ser Stauung des R\u00fcckenmarks. Das Ausma\u00df der begleitenden Ausf\u00e4lle h\u00e4ngt vom Ort der Gef\u00e4\u00dffehlbildung (zervikal, thorakal, lumbal, sakral) ab. Am h\u00e4ufigsten sind die unteren Extremit\u00e4ten betroffen, mit beidseitigen unsymmetrischen motorischen und sensorischen Ausf\u00e4llen, zusammen mit Sphinkter-St\u00f6rungen. Die morphologischen Ver\u00e4nderungen erscheinen evtl. unvollst\u00e4ndig, wenn einige Lokalilasionen im gleichen Metamer nicht betroffen sind. Die h\u00e4ufigsten kutanen Manifestationen des Syndroms sind flache Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien (Portwein-N\u00e4vi), m\u00f6glich sind aber auch Angiokeratome, Angiolipome und Lymphangiome. Bei den medull\u00e4ren L\u00e4sionen handelt es sich um arterio-ven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen. Die Gef\u00e4\u00dfl\u00e4sionen in Muskel und Knochen verursachen nicht- mechanisch verursachte \u00f6rtlich begrenzte Schmerzen, sind oft aber auch symptomlos. Das Syndrom ist in den Familien Betroffener nicht geh\u00e4uft, Chromosomenanomalien wurden nicht beschrieben. Die Anf\u00e4nge der Krankheit liegen in der fr\u00fchen Embryogenese, vor der Migration von Gef\u00e4\u00df-Vorl\u00e4uferzellen zu ihren definitiven Territorien (Haut, Knochen, periphere Nerven, R\u00fcckenmark). Wenn zwei aufeinander folgende Territorien betroffen sind, resultiert eine multimetamere Form der Krankheit. In einer k\u00fcrzlichen Analyse des Syndroms wurde die Bezeichnung Spinales Arterio-ven\u00f6ses Metameres Syndrom 1-31 (SAMS 1-31) eingef\u00fchrt, in Analogie zu den Zerebro-fazialen Arterio-ven\u00f6sen Metameren Syndromen (CAMS 1-3) und den Zerebro-fazialen Ven\u00f6sen Metameren Syndromen (CVMS1-3). Die Diagnose wird durch MRI und zus\u00e4tzliche medull\u00e4re Angiographie gestellt. Die Malformationen in Muskel und Knochen werden durch Embolisation (endovaskul\u00e4re Navigation und Verschluss der zur Malformation f\u00fchrenden Arterien mit einem biologischen Kleber) und/oder chirurgisch behandelt. Oberfl\u00e4chliche kutane L\u00e4sionen werden mit Laser behandelt. Radikul\u00e4re und medull\u00e4re Malformationen werden embolisiert. Klassische chirurgische Verfahren bleiben wenigen Lokalisationen und oberfl\u00e4chlichen L\u00e4sionen vorbehalten. Wenn das endovaskul\u00e4re Verfahren nicht gelingt, k\u00f6nnen epidurale und paraspinale Injektionen angewendet werden. Eine Strahlentherapie ist nicht indiziert. Durch fr\u00fche Diagnose wird das Ausma\u00df neurologischer. Komplikationen, besonders von L\u00e4hmungen, in Grenzen gehalten. Der Verlauf der Krankheit kann nicht vorausgesagt werden, die L\u00e4sionen bleiben evtl. lange Zeit symptomfrei."}, {"name": "Spindelzellh\u00e4mangioendotheliom", "sub_name": "Spindelzellh\u00e4mangiom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Spindelzell-H\u00e4mangiom (SCH), auch Spindelzell-H\u00e4mangio-Endotheliom genannt, ist ein seltener gutartiger, entweder solit\u00e4r oder multipel auftretender Gef\u00e4\u00dftumor der Dermis und Subkutis mit kavern\u00f6sen Blutgef\u00e4\u00dfen, die durch Spindelzellen, \u00e4hnlich denen des Kaposi-Sarkoms, getrennt sind", "synonyms": "Spindelzellh\u00e4mangioendotheliom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "D18.0", "UMLS": "C1304508"}, {"name": "Spindelzellh\u00e4mangiom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Spindelzell-H\u00e4mangiom (SCH), auch Spindelzell-H\u00e4mangio-Endotheliom genannt, ist ein seltener gutartiger, entweder solit\u00e4r oder multipel auftretender Gef\u00e4\u00dftumor der Dermis und Subkutis mit kavern\u00f6sen Blutgef\u00e4\u00dfen, die durch Spindelzellen, \u00e4hnlich denen des Kaposi-Sarkoms, getrennt sind", "synonyms": "Spindelzellh\u00e4mangioendotheliom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "D18.0", "UMLS": "C1304508"}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-dominante", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominante zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie (ADCA) beschreibt eine klinisch und genetisch heterogene Gruppe von neurodegenerativen Erkrankungen, welche durch eine langsam progrediente Gang-, Stand- und Extremit\u00e4tenataxie, Dysarthrie und/oder okulomotorische St\u00f6rungen bei zerebell\u00e4rer Degeneration ohne andere koexistierende Erkrankungen charakterisiert sind. Der degenerative Prozess kann auf das Cerebellum (ADCA Typ 3) begrenzt sein oder kann zus\u00e4tzlich die Retina (ADCA Typ 2), Sehnerven, ponto-medull\u00e4re Systeme, Basalganglien, zerebralen Kortex, spinale Bahnen oder periphere Nerven (ADCA Typ 1) (siehe jeweils dort) betreffen. Bei der ADCA Typ 4 (siehe dort) ist ein zerebell\u00e4res Syndrom mit Epilepsie assoziiert.", "synonyms": "ADCA, Kleinhirnataxie, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.8"}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 16", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, durch STUB1-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hereditary ataxia characterized by progressive truncal and limb ataxia resulting in gait instability. Dysarthria, dysphagia, nystagmus, spasticity of the lower limbs, mild peripheral sensory neuropathy, cognitive impairment and accelerated ageing have also been associated.", "synonyms": "SCAR16, Spinocerebellar ataxia autosomal recessive type 16, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "615768"}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Dysmorphie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Patienten mit dem Spino-zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie-Dysmorphie-Syndrom haben ein charakteristisches Gesicht, eine Dysarthrie, verz\u00f6gerte psychomotorische Entwicklung, Ataxie, Skoliose und Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten. Bisher wurden drei F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Vererbung scheint autosomal-rezessiv zu sein. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hereditary ataxia characterized by unusual facies (i. e. gross, rough and abundant hair, mild palpebral ptosis, thick lips, and down-curved corners of the mouth), dysarthria, delayed psychomotor development, scoliosis, foot deformities, and ataxia. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1985.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "271270", "umls": "C1849088", "gard": "4958"}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit axonaler Neuropathie Typ 2", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal recessive cerebellar ataxia (ARCA), characterized by progressive cerebellar ataxia associated with frequent oculomotor apraxia, severe neuropathy and an elevated serum alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) level.", "synonyms": "AOA2, Ataxia-oculomotor apraxia type 2, SCAN 2, SCAR1, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Childhood", "icd_10": "G60.2", "omim": "606002\u00a0 615217", "gard": "12860", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of AOA2 in France is estimated to be 1/900,000.", "clinical_description": "AOA2 is mostly an adolescent onset disorder (age at onset ranges between 10 and 25 years), with a mean age of 14-15 years, that manifests as progressive cerebellar ataxia associated with peripheral neuropathy (98%), cerebellar atrophy (96%), occasional oculomotor apraxia (OMA; 51%; inability to coordinate eyes \u00b1 head movements: when the head turns toward a lateral target; the head reaches the target before the eyes), pyramidal signs (21%), head tremor (14%), dystonia (14%), strabismus (12%), chorea (10%) and saccadic pursuit without OMA (4.5%).", "etiology": "AOA2 results from mutations in SETX gene (9q34), encoding senataxin protein, a DNA/RNA helicase localized in nucleus which is implicated in DNA break repair. Some correlations between genotype and phenotype have been established for example deletions and nonsense mutations are correlated to more severe phenotypes than missense mutations. Mutations in the gene PIK3R5 (17p13.1) have also been implicated in the pathogenesis of AOA2. PIK3R5 encodes a regulatory subunit that interacts with class 1B phosphoinositide-3-kinase (key enzymes in various signal transduction pathways that regulate cell survival and growth, metabolism, immune, and cardiac functions).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical features, progressive evolution leading to important motor handicap, absence of extra-neurologic findings and family history. Laboratory findings show an elevated AFP serum level (above 7 \u00b5g/L). Electromyography findings reveal axonal sensory-motor neuropathy. Oculographic recordings can demonstrate OMA. Cerebral magnetic resonance imagery displays cerebellar atrophy. Diagnosis is confirmed by molecular analysis of the pathogenic gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Friedreich ataxia, ataxia with vitamin E deficiency, AOA1, ataxia-telangiectasia, ataxia-telangiectasia-like disorder, autosomal recessive spastic ataxia of Charlevoix-Saguenay.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Carrier testing for at-risk family members and prenatal testing are possible if the disease-causing alleles in a family are known.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission of AOA2 is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling is recommended as each sib of an affected individual has 25% risk of being affected, 50% risk of being an asymptomatic carrier, and 25% risk of being neither affected nor a carrier.", "management_and_treatment": "No specific treatment exists for AOA2 and management is mainly supportive. It includes physical therapy for cerebellar ataxia and disabilities resulting from peripheral neuropathy; educational support for reading and writing difficulties, speech therapy for dysarthria and cognitive impairment. Routine follow-up with a neurologist or a neurogenetician is recommended.", "prognosis": "AOA2 is a progressive neurodegenerative disorder and most patients will become wheelchair bound at a mean age of 29.9 years \u00b1 3.84 after a mean disease duration of 15.3 years \u00b1 3.52."}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Beginn im Kindesalter und psychomotorischer Retardierung", "sub_name": "Zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, autosomal-rezessive, Spectrin-assoziierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive Kleinhirnataxie ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte neurologische Erkrankung, die auf SPTBN2-Mutationen zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren ist. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung im S\u00e4uglingsalter, gefolgt von einer im Kindesalter auftretenden Gangataxie mit Dysmetrie der Gliedma\u00dfen und Dysdiadochokinese, leichte bis schwere Intelligenzminderung, Entwicklung einer Kleinhirnatrophie und abnorme Augenbewegungen (einschlie\u00dflich eines konvergenten Schielens, hypometrischer Sakkaden, ruckartiger Verfolgungsbewegungen und unvollst\u00e4ndigem Bewegungsumfang).", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, autosomal-rezessive, Typ 14, Autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie - kognitive St\u00f6rung, SCAR14, SPARCA, SPARCA1, Spectrin-assoziierte autosomal-rezessive zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 1, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Beginn im Kindesalter und psychomotorischer Retardierung, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "G11.1", "OMIM": "615386"}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit Epilepsie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinocerebellar ataxia with epilepsy is a rare, mitochondrial DNA maintenance syndrome characterized by cerebellar ataxia, sensory peripheral neuropathy, myoclonus, epilepsy, progressive cognitive impairment, late-onset ptosis and external ophthalmoplegia. Liver failure may also occur, most often in association with the use of antiepileptic drug sodium valproate.", "synonyms": "MSCAE, Mitochondrial spinocerebellar ataxia with epilepsy, SCAE, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Childhood", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "607459", "umls": "C1843851\u00a0 C1843852"}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie mit ver\u00e4nderten vertikalen Augenbewegungen", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 37", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type 1 that is characterized by a cerebellar syndrome along with altered vertical eye movements.", "synonyms": "SCA37, Spinocerebellar ataxia with altered vertical eye movements, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G11.8", "omim": "615945", "gard": "12368", "epidemiology": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 37 (SCA37) has been reported in nine members of a Spanish kindred to date.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs in adulthood (from the ages of 38-64). Clinical manifestations of SCA37 patients are characterized by slowly progressive cerebellar ataxia (starting with falls, dysarthria and clumsiness followed by other cerebellar signs) along with altered vertical eye movements. Generalized cerebellar atrophy is visible with magnetic resonance imaging.", "etiology": "SCA37 is due to a pathogenic pentanucleotide ATTTC insertion within the 1p32 5' non-coding regulatory region of the DAB1 gene (1p32.2).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the characteristic clinical findings and molecular genetic testing. As the manifestations of SCA37 are not specific, diagnosis is only confirmed with the finding of a pathogenic mutation in the DAB1 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other types of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is not possible.", "genetic_counseling": "SCA37 is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SCA37 and treatment is supportive. Physical therapy, as well as the use of canes and walkers, should be offered in order to maximize strength and maintain activity. Wheelchairs are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices may be useful to those with dysarthria. Annual neurological examinations are recommended to monitor disease progression.", "prognosis": "Precise prognosis is unknown due to small number of patients reported, but disease progression is slow and the patients generally need wheelchair from 10 and 30 years after the disease onset."}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 3 vom Joseph-Typ", "sub_name": "Machado-Joseph-Krankheit Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 1 der Machado-Joseph-Krankheit (MJD1), ein seltener, in der Regel schwerer Subtyp der Machado-Joseph-Krankheit (SCA3/MJD; s.dort), ist gekennzeichnet durch ausgepr\u00e4gte pyramidale und extrapyramidale Zeichen.", "synonyms": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 3, vom Joseph Typ, SCA3, Typ Joseph, Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 3 vom Joseph-Typ, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G11.8", "UMLS": "C0751668", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt, sie ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr 13% aller F\u00e4lle von SCA3.", "clinical_description": "In der Regel beginnt die Krankheit fr\u00fch (mittleres Erkrankungsalter: 24 Jahre). Patienten mit MJD1 kommen meist mit Kleinhirnsymptomen und externer progressiver Ophthalmoplegie, und mit unterschiedlich schweren pyramidale Symptomen (Spastik, Hyperreflexie). Daneben haben die Patienten auch extrapyramidale Symptome (Dystonie).", "etiology": "Ursache der Krankheit ist eine CAG-Repeat-Expansion im ATXN3-Gen (14q21). Patienten mit MJD1 haben eher gr\u00f6\u00dfere CAG-Repeatl\u00e4ngen als die beiden anderen MJD-Subtypen. Die MJD wird autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Form ist nicht bekannt, sie ist verantwortlich f\u00fcr 13% aller F\u00e4lle von SCA3."}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie Typ 43", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spinocerebellar ataxia type 43 is a rare autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type I disorder characterized by late adult-onset of slowly progressive cerebellar ataxia, typically presenting with balance and gait disturbances, in association with axonal peripheral neuropathy resulting in reduced/absent deep tendon reflexes and sensory impairment. Lower limb pain and amyotrophy may be present, as well as various cerebellar signs, including dysarthria, nystagmus, hypometric saccades and tremor.", "synonyms": "SCA43, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "G11.2", "omim": "617017"}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Ataxie und Erythrokeratoderm", "sub_name": "Ataxie, spinozerebell\u00e4re, Typ 34", "german_description": "Bis heute wurde die SCA34 bei 25 Mitgliedern einer Franz\u00f6sisch-Kanadischen Familie nachgewiesen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia type I that is characterized by papulosquamous, ichthyosiform plaques on the limbs appearing shortly after birth and later manifestations including progressive ataxia, dysarthria, nystagmus and decreased reflexes.", "synonyms": "Erythrokeratodermia with ataxia, SCA34, Spinocerebellar ataxia and erythrokeratodermia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "133190", "umls": "C1851481\u00a0 C2930921", "mesh": "C535514\u00a0 C535738", "gard": "59", "epidemiology": "To date the disorder has been reported in 45 patients including 4 asymptomatic carriers, from one French-Canadian family and three Japanese families.", "clinical_description": "Disease onset occurs from shortly after birth to adolescence with the appearance of papulosquamous, ichthyosiform plaques on the limbs, which are often only present in the winter. After the age of 25 years they tend to disappear completely. Progressive ataxia, dysarthria, decreased reflexes, and nystagmus are further clinical signs of the disease that occur after the onset of skin manifestations, generally from the third to fifth decade of life. Patients occasionally present with autonomic dysfunction and pyramidal signs. Cerebellar and pontine atrophy is visible with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in individuals who develop cerebellar ataxia.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to a mutation in the ELOVL4 gene (6q14).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on characteristic clinical findings (skin lesions occurring shortly after birth and adult-onset slowly progressive cerebellar ataxia), and on the molecular genetic testing. Mutations in the ELOVL4 gene confirms diagnosis of SCA34. Magnetic resonance imaging usually shows marked atrophy of the cerebellum and pontine which is sometimes accompanied by Hot Cross Bun sign that is common in cerebellar type of multiple system atrophy.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include other forms of autosomal dominant cerebellar ataxia. From the view point of radiological findings, multiple system atrophy is important in differential diagnosis, especially in patients who also develop autonomic dysfunction.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is possible in families with a known ELOVL4 mutation.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner and genetic counseling is possible. Genetic counseling should be proposed to individuals having the disease-causing mutation informing them that there is 50% risk of passing the mutation to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is only supportive. Physical activity should be maintained as much as possible with the help of prosthetic devices. Motorized chairs/scooters are eventually necessary. Speech therapy and communication devices should be offered to those with severe dysarthria.", "prognosis": "Disease progression is slow; the patients require cane or walker in their late 60s, and wheelchair in their 70s."}, {"name": "Spinozerebell\u00e4re Degeneration-Hornhautdystrophie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Kornea-Kleinhirn-Sydrom ist charakterisiert durch die ungew\u00f6hnliche Kombination von spinozerebell\u00e4rer Degeneration und Hornhautdystrophie. Beschrieben wurden 3 Schwestern mit klinisch unauff\u00e4lligen blutsverwandten Eltern. Eines der M\u00e4dchen hatte nur geringe spinozerebell\u00e4re Zeichen und keine Augensymptome. Dieses autosomal-rezessiv vererbte Syndrom unterscheidet sich vom Mousa-Al Din-Al Nassar-Syndrom (s. dort) durch unternormale intellektuelle Entwicklung und durch die Lokalisierung der Hornhautdystrophie im Epithel (und nicht im Stroma). Durch penetrierende Keratoplastik konnte der Visus verbessert werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, neurological disorder characterized by the association of slowly progressive spinocerebellar degeneration and corneal dystrophy, manifesting with bilateral corneal opacities (which lead to severe visual impairment), mild intellectual disability, ataxia, gait disturbances, and tremor. Additional manifestations include facial dysmorphism (i.e. triangular face, ptosis, low-set, posteriorly angulated ears, and micrognathia), as well as mild upper motor neuron involvement with hypertonia, lower limb hyperreflexia and extensor plantar responses. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1985.", "synonyms": "Der Kaloustian-Jarudi-Khoury syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G11.1", "omim": "271310", "umls": "C1849087", "mesh": "C535472", "gard": "1525"}, {"name": "Spirillen-Rattenbissfieber", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A25.0", "UMLS": "C0152062", "summary": "Das Spirill\u00e4re Rattenbiss-Fieber (RBF), in Japan auch Sodoku (Rattengift) benannt, ist durch den gramnegativen Bazillus Spirillum minus verursacht und wird durch durch Biss oder Kratzen von Ratten auf den Menschen \u00fcbertragen. Die Krankheit tritt vor allem in Asien auf, die H\u00e4ufigkeit ist aber nicht genau bekannt. Die Bisse sind oft nur klein und heilen schnell. Nach einer Inkubationszeit von 14-18 Tagen tritt an der Stelle des Bisses eine schmerzhafte, indurierte, \u00f6demat\u00f6se Entz\u00fcndung auf, die ulzerieren kann. Es folgen Fieber, Erbrechen und Sch\u00fcttelfrost und eine \u00f6rtliche Lymphknoten-schwellung. In der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle entwickelt sich ein makul\u00e4res Exanthem, und selten entsteht eine schmerzhafte Schwellung und R\u00f6tung der Gelenke. Gelegentliche Symptome sind Diarrhoe, Erbrechen, Neuralgien und Komplikationen wir Endo- und Myokarditis, Hepatitis und Meningitis. Spirillum minus wohnt im Speichel der Ratten und wird nur durch Bei\u00dfen und Kratzen \u00fcbertragen. Einige wenige F\u00e4lle mit \u00dcbertragung durch Affen und M\u00e4use wurden beschrieben. Ohne erkennbaren Biss kann die Diagnose nur durch den Erregernachweis gestellt werden. Wegen seines schlechten Wachstums in Kulturmedien ist das aber schwierig. Differentialdiagnosen sind das Streptobacill\u00e4re RBF und das Haverhill-Fieber (sh. diese Termini), sowie verschiedene bakterielle und virale Infektionen (Borelliose, Leptospirose, Brucellose, Rocky-Mountain-Fleckfieber, Malaria, Typhus (sh. diese Termini), durch S.pyogenes verursachte oder mit S.pyogenes assoziierte Krankheiten, Infektionen mit S.aureus, disseminierte Gonorrhoe, Meningokokken-Sepsis, virale Exantheme, das Sekund\u00e4rstadium der Syphilis, Epstein-Barr-Virus und Coxsackieviren. Die Betreuung beinhaltet prophylaktische (Vermeidung eines direkten oder indirekten Kontaktes mit Vektoren) und therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen (lokale Behandlung und Antibiose). Die antibiotische Behandlung dieser Form des Rattenbiss-Fiebers ist prim\u00e4r die Verabreichung von Penicillin G, da \u00fcber die Emfindlichkeit des Erregers gegen\u00fcber anderen Antibiotika wenig bekannt ist. Ohne Behandlung sistieren die Symptome in 3-4 Tagen, aber nach weiteren 3-10 Tagen kommt es regelm\u00e4\u00dfig zum R\u00fcckfall. Die anf\u00e4ngliche L\u00e4sion kann vereitern und desquamieren. Der R\u00fcckfall kann bis zu 1 Jahr andauern, am h\u00e4ufigsten aber enden die Symptome ohne Behandlung innerhalb von 2 Monaten. Ohne Therapie versterben 6,5% der Patienten im Gefolge von Komplikationen."}, {"name": "Spitzer-Weinstein-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Pseudohypoaldosteronismus Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene genetische Form der Hypertonie, die durch Hyperkali\u00e4mie, milde hyperchlor\u00e4mische metabolische Azidose, normales oder erh\u00f6htes Aldosteron, niedriges Renin, bei normaler glomerul\u00e4rer Filtrationsrate (GFR) der Nieren gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Chlorid-Shunt-Syndrom, Hyperkali\u00e4mie - Hypertension, Typ Gordon, Hyperkali\u00e4mie, Mineralocorticoid-resistente, Hyperkali\u00e4mie, hypertensive, Hypertonie, hyperkali\u00e4mische famili\u00e4re, PHA2, PHAII, Spitzer-Weinstein-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "I15.1", "OMIM": "145260\u00a0 614491\u00a0 614492\u00a0 614495\u00a0 614496", "UMLS": "C1449844", "GARD": "4553", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der St\u00f6rung ist unbekannt. Bis heute wurden mehr als 180 betroffene Personen und Familien in der Litratur beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten entwickeln in der Regel im Erwachsenenalter eine Hypertonie. Hyperkali\u00e4mie, milde hyperchlor\u00e4mische Azidose und niedriges Renin sind bereits in jungen Jahren vorhanden und sind konstante Befunde. Die Aldosteronwerte k\u00f6nnen normal bis hoch sein. Eine Hypervol\u00e4mie wird h\u00e4ufig beobachtet. In einigen F\u00e4llen wurde ein Wachstumsversagen beschrieben. Die Patienten weisen kein Nierenversagen auf. Es wird angenommen, dass das Spitzer-Weinstein-Syndrom die fr\u00fche Pr\u00e4sentation des Pseudohypoaldosteronismus Typ 2 (PHA2) mit Hypertonie in Verbindung mit anderen klinischen Befunden wie Kleinwuchs, Muskelschw\u00e4che, periodischen L\u00e4hmungen und Zahnanomalien darstellt.", "etiology": "Es gibt f\u00fcnf \u00e4tiologische Subtypen: PHA Typ 2A wurde auf Chromosom 1q31-q42 kartiert, aber bisher wurde kein spezifisches Gen identifiziert. PHA Typ 2B ist auf Mutationen in WNK4-Gen (17q21.2) zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, PHA Typ 2C auf Mutationen in WNK1-Gen (12p13.33), PHA Typ 2D auf Mutationen in KLHL3-Gen (5q31.2) und PHA Typ 2E auf Mutationen in CUL3-Gen (2q36.2). WNK1 und WNK4 kodieren die Serin/Threonin-Protein-Kinase WNK1 bzw. WNK4, die die Natrium- und Kalium-R\u00fcckresorption im distalen Nierentubulus regulieren. Krankheitsverursachende Mutationen in diesen Genen f\u00fchren zu erh\u00f6hter Natriumr\u00fcckresorption und verminderter Kaliumsekretion. Die Proteinprodukte von CUL3 und KLHL3 fungieren zusammen als Teil des Cullin-RING-basierten E3-Ubiquitin-Ligase-Komplexes, der eine Rolle bei der Ubiquitin-vermittelten Proteindegradation von WNK1 und WINK4 innehat.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch die typische Konstellation von klinischen und biochemischen Befunden wie Hypertonie, Hyperkali\u00e4mie (bei normaler GFR) mit unangemessen niedriger Kaliumausscheidung im Urin, Hyperchlor\u00e4mie, metabolische Azidose, niedrige oder unterdr\u00fcckte Plasma-Renin-Aktivit\u00e4t, Hyperkalziurie und entsprechender Familienanamnese gestellt. Die Diagnose kann durch einen Gentest best\u00e4tigt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst andere Ursachen f\u00fcr Hyperkali\u00e4mie, insbesondere chronische Nierenerkrankungen. Wenn die GFR normal ist, geh\u00f6ren zu den Differentialdiagnosen die hyperkali\u00e4mische renale tubul\u00e4re Azidose, wie sie bei PHA1 gesehen wird, Hypoaldosteronismus, prim\u00e4re Nebenniereninsuffizienz und medikament\u00f6s bedingte Hyperkali\u00e4mie (z. B. kaliumsparende Diuretika, nicht-steroidale entz\u00fcndungshemmende Medikamente, Angiotensin-Hemmer, Trimethoprim). Diese Formen der hyperkali\u00e4mischen RTA sind typischerweise mit Hypovol\u00e4mie und niedrigem Blutdruck verbunden. Eine erworbene Form der PHA2 kann mit Calcineurin-Inhibitoren, insbesondere Tacrolimus, gesehen werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannter Mutation in der Familie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Das Vererbungsmuster f\u00fcr PHA2 ist typischerweise autosomal-dominant; PHA2 aufgrund von KLHL3-Mutationen kann jedoch autosomal-rezessiv oder dominant vererbt werden. Das Risiko f\u00fcr die Nachkommen, die Mutation von einem betroffenen Elternteil zu erben, betr\u00e4gt bei der autosomal-dominanten Form 50%. Nachkommen eines Individuums mit autosomal-rezessivem PHA2 sind obligate Tr\u00e4ger und typischerweise asymptomatisch. Pathogenetische Varianten, die de novo entstehen, sind m\u00f6glich. PHA2 aufgrund des CUL3-Gens ist typischerweise die schwerste Form. Der Ph\u00e4notyp von PHA Typ II aufgrund des WNK1 ist typischerweise weniger schwer als PHA2 aufgrund von WNK4 oder einer dominanten oder rezessiven Mutation im KLHL3-Gen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung basiert auf niedrig dosierten Thiazid-Diuretika, die bei der Korrektur von Bluthochdruck (wichtig zur Vermeidung von Sekund\u00e4rkomplikationen), Hyperkali\u00e4mie und Hyperkalziurie sehr effektiv sind. Exogene Mineralokortikoide verbessern die biochemischen Anomalien nicht und verschlimmern wahrscheinlich die Hypertonie.", "prognosis": "Bei lebenslanger Therapie ist die Prognose g\u00fcnstig. Nephrolithiasis ist eine Komplikation der Hyperkalziurie.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der St\u00f6rung ist unbekannt. Bis heute wurden mehr als 180 betroffene Personen und Familien in der Litratur beschrieben."}, {"name": "Splenisches diffuses kleinzelliges B-Zell-Lymphom der roten Pulpa", "sub_name": "B-Zell-Lymphom der roten Pulpa, diffuses splenisches", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das diffuse kleine B-Zell-Lymphom der Milz ist ein seltenes, indolentes B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom, das durch eine abnorme Proliferation kleiner, monomorpher, basophiler B-Lymphozyten mit vill\u00f6sem Zytoplasma in der roten Pulpa der Milz, im Knochenmark und im peripheren Blut gekennzeichnet ist. Sie pr\u00e4sentiert sich typischerweise in den sp\u00e4ten klinischen Stadien mit Splenomegalie und moderater Lymphozytose. Zytopenien sind selten und sind vermutlich mit Hypersplenismus assoziiert.", "synonyms": "SDRPL, Splenisches diffuses kleinzelliges B-Zell-Lymphom der roten Pulpa, ", "ICD-10": "C83.0"}, {"name": "Splenisches Marginalzonen-Lymphom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das splenisches Marginalzonen-Lymphom ist ein seltenes, indolentes B-Zell-Non-Hodgkin-Lymphom, das durch eine abnorme klonale Proliferation reifer B-Lymphozyten mit Beteiligung der Milz, des Knochenmarks und h\u00e4ufig auch des Blutes gekennzeichnet ist. Es pr\u00e4sentiert sich gew\u00f6hnlich mit Splenomegalie, Lymphozytose, An\u00e4mie und/oder Thrombozytopenie. Hepatitis-C-Virus und Autoimmunmanifestationen, wie autoimmune h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie und autoimmune Thrombozytopenie, k\u00f6nnen assoziiert sein.", "synonyms": "SMZL, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C83.0", "UMLS": "C0349632", "MedDRA": "10062113"}, {"name": "Splenogonadale Fusion-Extremit\u00e4tenfehlbildung-Mikrognathie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Dysostose-Syndrom, das durch eine abnorme Fusion der Milz mit der Gonade (oder seltener mit Resten des Mesonephros), Gliedma\u00dfenanomalien (bestehend aus Amelie oder schweren Reduktionsdefekten, die zu rudiment\u00e4ren oberen und/oder unteren Gliedma\u00dfen f\u00fchren) und orofaziale Anomalien wie Gaumenspalte, bifides Z\u00e4pfchen, Mikroglossie und Unterkieferhypoplasie gekennzeichnet ist. Es kann auch mit anderen Fehlbildungen wie Kryptorchismus, Analstenose/atresie, hypoplastischen Lungen und kardialen Fehlbildungen einhergehen.", "synonyms": "SGFLD-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "183300", "UMLS": "C1866745", "GARD": "4963"}, {"name": "Splenogonadale Fusion, isolierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, nicht-syndromale viszerale Fehlbildung, die durch eine abnorme, kontinuierliche oder diskontinuierliche Anheftung der Milz an die Gonade, den Nebenhoden oder des Vas deferens gekennzeichnet ist. Beim kontinuierlichen Typ besteht eine direkte Verbindung zwischen Milz und Gonade, w\u00e4hrend beim diskontinuierlichen Typ Gonadengewebe mit einer akzessorischen Milz oder ektopem Milzgewebe ohne Verbindung zur Hauptmilz verschmolzen ist. M\u00e4nner pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise mit einer skrotalen Masse oder als Zufallsbefund bei der Behandlung von Kryptorchismus, Hodentumoren oder Leistenbr\u00fcchen. Bei Frauen ist dies meist ein Zufallsbefund bei der Laparotomie.", "synonyms": "SGF, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Keine Daten verf\u00fcgbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q89.0"}, {"name": "Splenomegalie-Neutropenie-rheumatoide Arthritis-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Felty-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Felty-Syndrom (FS), auch als 'super-rheumatoide' Krankheit bekannt, ist eine schwere Form der rheumatoiden Arthritis (RA; siehe dort) und gekennzeichnet durch die Trias RA, Splenomegalie und Neutropenie mit resultierender Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr bakterielle Infektionen.", "synonyms": "Splenomegalie-Neutropenie-rheumatoide Arthritis-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M05.0", "OMIM": "134750", "UMLS": "C0015773", "MeSH": "D005258", "GARD": "8234", "MedDRA": "10016386", "epidemiology": "Gesch\u00e4tzt etwa 1-3% der RA-Patienten haben 10-15 Jahre nach Krankheitsbeginn ein FS. Das FS ist in der afro-amerikanischen Bev\u00f6lkerung selten.", "clinical_description": "Das FS ist etwa dreimal h\u00e4ufiger bei Frauen im 3.-5. Lebensjahrzehnt (M\u00e4nner erkranken fr\u00fcher). Charakteristisch ist eine chronische Arthritis mit schwerer Destruktion der Gelenke, bei nur moderater oder ganz fehlender Gelenksentz\u00fcndung und schweren extra-artikul\u00e4ren Ver\u00e4nderungen. Am h\u00e4ufigsten betroffen sind Knie, Hand- und Fu\u00dfgelenk und die metakarpo-phalangealen und proximalen interphalangealen Gelenke. Weniger h\u00e4ufig sind den Gelenke der K\u00f6rperachse betroffen. Ein charakteristisches Merkmal der Krankheit ist die symmetrische Beteiligung der Gelenke. Hepato-Splenomegalie und Lymphadenopathie sind h\u00e4ufig. Andere extra-artikul\u00e4re Symptome des FS sind Episkleritis, Vaskulitis, Pleuritis, Lungenfibrose, Rheuma-Kn\u00f6tchen, Neuropathie, Ulcera cruris, hypopigmentierte Haut (meist an der Streckseite der Beine), An\u00e4mie und Gewichtsverlust. Das ung\u00fcnstigste Symptom des FS ist die Neutropenie, die zu vermehrten bakteriellen Infektionen (am h\u00e4ufigsten Haut, Mund und obere und untere Atemwege) pr\u00e4disponiert. Selten wird das FS durch Neutropenie bei einem RA-Patienten erkannt. Das FS kann in Verbindung mit anderen Autoimmun-Krankheiten auftreten: Sj\u00f6gren-Syndrom, Vaskulitis und systemischer Lupus erythematodes (SLE) (siehe diese Termini).", "etiology": "Die Pathophysiologie des FS ist noch wenig gekl\u00e4rt. Als zugrundeliegender Mechanismus wird eine Autoimmun-Antwort gegen Antigene der Neutrophilen vermutet: Die h\u00e4ufigen Infektionen stimulieren eventuell eine Antwort der Neutrophilen mit De-Iminierung der Histone und Aussto\u00dfung von Chromatin aus der Zelle. Dieses extrazellul\u00e4re Chromatin-Fibrillemnetz der Neutrophilen (neutrophil extracellular chromatin traps; NETs) enth\u00e4lt de-iminierte Histone in einem Komplex mit bakteriellen Adjuvantien und l\u00f6st sehr wahrscheinlich die Produktion von Autoantik\u00f6rpern gegen de-iminierte Histone aus. Diese Autoantik\u00f6rper oder ihre Immunkomplexe stimulieren die Neutrophilen zus\u00e4tzlich und schlie\u00dfen dadurch einen sich selbst erhaltenden Zirkel, der die Verarmung an reifen Neutrophilen vorantreibt. Besonders bei FS-Patienten treten solche Autoantik\u00f6rper gegen de-iminierte Histone geh\u00e4uft auf. Etwa 95 % der FS-Patienten tragen das Klasse II-MHC-Allel HLA-DR4. Dieses Allel ist bei Afro-Amerikanern selten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose des FS f\u00fchren die k\u00f6rperliche Untersuchung, ein vollst\u00e4ndiges Blutbild mit den Befunden Leukopenie, Neutropenie und Thrombozytopenie, hohe Serumstiter von Antik\u00f6rpern gegen Rheumafaktoren, antinukle\u00e4re Antik\u00f6rper, Anti-Histon-Antik\u00f6rper und positives HLA-DR4. Die mikroskopische Analyse einer Milzbiopsie zeigt vergr\u00f6\u00dferte Keimzentren in den Follikeln und Infiltration mit Neutrophilen und Makrophagen. Radiologisch sind schwere Gelenk-Destruktionen nachweisbar.", "differential_diagnosis": "Das FS unterscheidet sich von der RA durch eine schwerere Arthritis und extra-artikul\u00e4re Symptome. Weitere Differentialdiagnosen des FS sind: Leuk\u00e4mie mit gro\u00dfen granulierten Lymphozyten (LGL; bei einer Assoziation mit RA als Pseudo-Felty bezeichnet), RA, systemischer Lupus erythematodes (SLE), Still-Krankheit (siehe diese Termini), Gelenk-Brucellose und chronische bakterielle Endokarditis.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Therapie des FS ist schwierig. Die Standardbehandlung richtet sich gegen die zugrunde liegende RA, mit dem zus\u00e4tzlichen Ziel einer Behandlung der Neutropenie und der rezidivierenden Infektionen. Anwendung finden hierbei verschiedene krankheitsmodifizierende antirheumatische Medikamente (Sulfasalazin und Hydroxychloroquin) und Methotrexat. Um die Zahl der Neutrophilen anzuheben, wurden rekombinante granulopoetische Wachstumsfaktoren (G-CSF) angewendet. Bei therapieresistenten F\u00e4llen kann an eine Splenektomie gedacht werden, als Therapie der zweiten Wahl findet Rituximab (RTX) Anwendung.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose des FS ist ung\u00fcnstig, die rezidivierenden Infektionen bedingen eine erh\u00f6hte Mortalit\u00e4t.", "summary": "Gesch\u00e4tzt etwa 1-3% der RA-Patienten haben 10-15 Jahre nach Krankheitsbeginn ein FS. Das FS ist in der afro-amerikanischen Bev\u00f6lkerung selten."}, {"name": "Split-Cord-Malformation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SCM, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Jugendalter, Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Split-Cord-Malformation Typ 2", "sub_name": "Split-Cord-Malformation Typ II", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SCM Typ 2, SCM Typ II, Split-Cord-Malformation Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Split-Cord-Malformation Typ I", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, neural tube defect characterized by localized longitudinal division of the spinal cord with an interposed osseous, cartilaginous or fibrous septum and double dural sac, typically occurring at the thoracic or lumbar level. Local vertebral segmental defects, syringomyelia, meningocele and intraspinal tumors may be associated. Variable clinical presentation includes pain, scoliosis, asymmetry and weakness of the lower limbs, neurological deficits, sphincter dysfunction, and various cutaneous abnormalities overlying the spine, such as hypertrichosis, dimple, hemangioma, subcutaneous mass or pigmented nevus.", "synonyms": "SCM type 1, SCM type I, Split cord malformation type 1, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "Q06.2", "omim": "222500", "umls": "C0011999", "gard": "1851", "meddra": "10012750"}, {"name": "Split-Cord-Malformation Typ II", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SCM Typ 2, SCM Typ II, Split-Cord-Malformation Typ 2, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Split notochord-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Duplikation, kaudale", "german_description": "Das Syndrom der Kaudalen Duplikation ist eine seltene Entit\u00e4t, bei der die Strukturen, die sich von der embryonalen Kloake und vom Notochord herleiten, in unterschiedlichem Ausma\u00df dupliziert sind. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt liegt unter 1:100.000. Der Terminus 'Kaudale Duplikation' umfasst ein ganzes Spektrum von Anomalien und wird oft benutzt, um die unvollst\u00e4ndige Trennung eineiiger Zwillinge zu bezeichnen, oder er bezieht sich auf einen Teil der Anomalien bei siamesischen Zwillingen. Einige beschriebene F\u00e4lle hatten einen nicht betroffenen eineiigen Zwilling. Die kaudale Duplikation beinhaltet in der Regel mehrere seltene Fehlbildungen und Duplikationen distaler Organe, die sich vom Enddarm, dem Neuralrohr und dem kaudalen Mesoderm herleiten. Fehlbildungen der Wirbels\u00e4ule sind: Duplikation der distalen Wirbels\u00e4ule, Diplomyelie (gespaltene Medulla), Spina bifida mit Myelomeningozele, Stei\u00dfbein-Duplikation und/oder Hemivertebrae. Duplikationen oder Fehlbildungen der \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitalien manifestieren sich im weiblichen Geschlecht als septierter Uterus mit Zervix-Duplikation und longitudinalem Vaginaseptum. Symptome im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht sind verdoppelter Penis (Diphallie), manchmal mit peno-skrotaler Transposition. Auch Duplikationen von Teilen der Harnwege (Ureteren, Blase, Urethra) kommen vor, und verdoppelte Enddarmstrukturen. Duplikation des distalen Darms mit zwei D\u00fcnnd\u00e4rmen, Appendices und Dickd\u00e4rmen (mit oder ohne Hypoganglionose des Kolons) und Anus imperforatus mit Rektum-Urethra-Fistel. Manchmal wird auch eine Omphalozele gesehen. Noch seltener wurde \u00fcber zus\u00e4tzliche, mehr oder weniger vollst\u00e4ndige untere Gliedma\u00dfen berichtet, die am Beckenkamm oder in der sub-pubischen Region angeheftet sind. Da die Mausmutanten 'fused' und 'disorganization' eine gewisse \u00c4hnlichkeit mit der Kaudalen Duplikation haben, wurde bei einem Patienten und seiner Familie eine DNA-Analyse des AXIN1-Gens durchgef\u00fchrt. Eine urs\u00e4chliche Mutation wurde aber bisher nicht gefunden. Es wurde vermutet, dass die Krankheit durch falsche Expression der mehr distalen HOX-Gene, vor allem HOX10 und HOX11, bedingt ist, mit der Folge einer abnormen Induktion und Proliferation des kaudalen Mesenchyms. Die Fehlbildungen werden meist im zweiten Trimenon durch Ultraschall diagnostiziert. Beim Neugeborenen sollten immer die Harnwege und der Magen-Darm-Kanal untersucht werden. Abh\u00e4ngig vom Schweregrad der Fehlbildung ist oft eine chirurgische Korrektur m\u00f6glich. In ei Es wurde vermutet, dass die Krankheit durch falsche Expression der mehr distalen HOX-Gene, vor allem HOX10 und HOX11, bedingt ist, mit der Folge einer abnormen Induktion und Proliferation des kaudalen Mesenchyms. Die Fehlbildungen werden meist im zweiten Trimenon durch Ultraschall diagnostiziert. Beim Neugeborenen sollten immer die Harnwege und der Magen-Darm-Kanal untersucht werden. Abh\u00e4ngig vom Schweregrad der Fehlbildung ist oft eine chirurgische Korrektur m\u00f6glich. In einigen F\u00e4llen von verdoppelter Blase konnte auf eine Blasenresektion verzichtet werden. Eine Omphalozele wird in der Regel klassisch versorgt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Caudal duplication (CD) is a rare developmental anomaly in which structures derived from the embryonic cloaca and notochord are duplicated to varying extents.", "synonyms": "Dipygus, Split notochord syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "607864", "umls": "C0266688\u00a0 C1842884", "gard": "1164"}, {"name": "S. pneumoniae-bedingtes HUS", "sub_name": "Streptococcus pneumoniae-assoziiertes h\u00e4molytisch-ur\u00e4misches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "S. pneumoniae-bedingtes HUS, SP-HUS, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D58.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "SPOAN", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Optikusatrophie-Neuropathie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das spastische Paraplegie-Sehnervatrophie-Neuropathie-Syndrom ist eine seltene, komplexe Form der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie, die durch progressive spastische Paraplegie beginnend im Kleinkindalter zusammen mit einer Sehnervatrophie und Fixationsnystagmus gekennzeichnet ist. Ab der sp\u00e4ten Kindheit/fr\u00fchen Jugend tritt h\u00e4ufig eine Polyneuropathie hinzu, welche dann zu schweren motorischen Einschr\u00e4nkungen, progressiven Gelenkskontrakturen und Skoliose f\u00fchrt.", "synonyms": "SPOAN, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "OMIM": "609541", "UMLS": "C1836010"}, {"name": "SPOAN und SPOAN-verwandte Krankheiten", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie-Optikusatrophie-Neuropathie und verwandte Krankheiten", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine Gruppe seltener, genetisch bedingter, neurodegenerativer Erkrankungen, die durch eine im S\u00e4uglings- bis Kindesalter einsetzende progressive spastische Paraplegie (mit verz\u00f6gerten motorischen Meilensteinen, Gangst\u00f6rungen, Hyperreflexie und extensorem Plantarreflex), Optikusatrophie (die mit Nystagmus und Sehverlust einhergehen kann) und progressive periphere Neuropathie (mit sensorischen Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen und distaler Muskelschw\u00e4che/-atrophie in den oberen und unteren Extremit\u00e4ten) gekennzeichnet sind. Weitere Anzeichen k\u00f6nnen Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten, Wirbels\u00e4ulendefekte (Skoliose, Kyphose), Gelenkkontrakturen, \u00fcbertriebene Schreckreaktion, Sprachst\u00f6rungen, Hyperhidrose, extrapyramidale Zeichen und Intelligenzminderung sein. In sehr seltenen F\u00e4llen kann ein abweichender Ph\u00e4notyp mit weniger ausgepr\u00e4gter oder fehlender Optikusatrophie und/oder Neuropathie beobachtet werden.", "synonyms": "SPOAN und SPOAN-verwandte Krankheiten, "}, {"name": "SPONASTRIME-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia disease characterized by short-limbed short stature (more pronounced in lower limbs) associated with characterisitic facial dysmorphism (i.e. relative macrocephaly, frontal bossing, midface hypoplasia, depressed nasal root, small upturned nose, prognathism) and abnormal radiological findings, which include abnormal vertebral bodies (particularly in the lumbar region), striated metaphyses, generalized mild osteoporosis, and delayed ossification of the carpal bones. Progressive coxa vara, short dental roots, hypogammaglobulinemia and cataracts may be occasionally associated.", "synonyms": "Spondylar and nasal changes with striations of the metaphyses (SPONASTRIME) dysplasia, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia, Sponastrime type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "271510", "umls": "C1300260", "gard": "4970"}, {"name": "Spondyl\u00e4re und nasale Ver\u00e4nderungen mit Striae der Metaphyse (SPONASTRIME)-Dysplasie", "sub_name": "SPONASTRIME-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia disease characterized by short-limbed short stature (more pronounced in lower limbs) associated with characterisitic facial dysmorphism (i.e. relative macrocephaly, frontal bossing, midface hypoplasia, depressed nasal root, small upturned nose, prognathism) and abnormal radiological findings, which include abnormal vertebral bodies (particularly in the lumbar region), striated metaphyses, generalized mild osteoporosis, and delayed ossification of the carpal bones. Progressive coxa vara, short dental roots, hypogammaglobulinemia and cataracts may be occasionally associated.", "synonyms": "Spondylar and nasal changes with striations of the metaphyses (SPONASTRIME) dysplasia, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia, Sponastrime type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "271510", "umls": "C1300260", "gard": "4970"}, {"name": "Spondyloenchondrodysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spondyloenchondrodysplasie (SPENCD) ist eine sehr seltene genetische Skelettdysplasie, die klinisch durch Skelettanomalien (Kleinwuchs, Platyspondylie, kurzes breites Os ilium) und Enchondrome in den R\u00f6hrenknochen oder im Becken charakterisiert ist. SPENCD kann ein heterogenes klinisches Spektrum mit neurologischen Beteiligung (Spastizit\u00e4t, Intelligenzminderung und zerebrale Verkalkungen) oder Autoimmunmanifestationen (wie immun-thrombozytopenische Purpura, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie und Thyreoiditis) aufweisen.", "synonyms": "SPENCD, Spondyloenchondromatose, Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit enchondromat\u00f6sen Ver\u00e4nderungen, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "271550", "UMLS": "C0432222", "MeSH": "C535782", "GARD": "4978"}, {"name": "Spondyloenchondromatose", "sub_name": "Spondyloenchondrodysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spondyloenchondrodysplasie (SPENCD) ist eine sehr seltene genetische Skelettdysplasie, die klinisch durch Skelettanomalien (Kleinwuchs, Platyspondylie, kurzes breites Os ilium) und Enchondrome in den R\u00f6hrenknochen oder im Becken charakterisiert ist. SPENCD kann ein heterogenes klinisches Spektrum mit neurologischen Beteiligung (Spastizit\u00e4t, Intelligenzminderung und zerebrale Verkalkungen) oder Autoimmunmanifestationen (wie immun-thrombozytopenische Purpura, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie und Thyreoiditis) aufweisen.", "synonyms": "SPENCD, Spondyloenchondromatose, Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit enchondromat\u00f6sen Ver\u00e4nderungen, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "271550", "UMLS": "C0432222", "MeSH": "C535782", "GARD": "4978"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie-gebogene Unterarme-Gesichtsdysmorphien-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondylometaphyseal dysplasia-bowed forearms-facial dysmorphism syndrome is a rare, genetic, primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by short stature, hyperlordosis, protuberant abdomen, mild bilateral genu varum, bowed and shortened forearms with limited elbow extension, and discrete facial dysmorphism (prominent forehead, hypertelorism, flat nasal bridge). Radiographically, moderate platyspondyly, including posterior wedging with anterior bullet-shaped vertebral bodies, with minimal metaphyseal abnormalities are observed.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.8", "omim": "607543", "umls": "C1843706", "mesh": "C535791", "gard": "8719"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie-Hypotrichose-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia-hypotrichosis syndrome is a rare primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by congenital hypotrichosis associated with rhizomelic short stature (more pronounced in upper limbs than lower limbs), limited hip abduction and mild genu varum. Flared and irregular metaphyses, delayed and irregular epiphiseal ossification and pear-shaped vertebral bodies are characteristic radiologic findings.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "183849", "umls": "C1866728", "mesh": "C535783", "gard": "10101"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie, MATN3-Gen-assoziierte", "german_description": "Der Matrilin-3-Typ der Spondylo-epi-metaphys\u00e4ren Dysplasie ist gekennzeichnet durch fr\u00fchen, dysproportinierten extremen Kleinwuchs, Verbiegung der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, verk\u00fcrzte, verbreiterte, st\u00e4mmige lange Knochen mit schweren Ver\u00e4nderungen der Metaphysen und Epiphysen, Lendenlordose, hypoplastisches Darmbein, flache ovoide Wirbelk\u00f6rper und normale H\u00e4nde. Das Syndrom wurde in einer gro\u00dfen arabisch-muslimischen Familie beschrieben. Ursache sind Mutationen im Matrilin-3-Gen (MATN3; 2p24-p23), das f\u00fcr ein Protein der extrazellul\u00e4ren Matrix kodiert. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary bone dysplasia due to matrilin-3 varaints and characterized by disproportionate early-onset dwarfism, bowing of the lower limbs, short, wide and stocky long bones with severe epiphyseal and metaphyseal changes, lumbar lordosis, hypoplastic iliac bones, flat ovoid vertebral bodies and normal hands.", "synonyms": "SEMD, MATN3-related, SEMD, matrilin-3 type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "608728", "umls": "C1837481", "gard": "10611"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit gest\u00f6rter Zahnentwicklung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia-abnormal dentition syndrome is a rare primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by the association of dental anomalies (oligodontia with pointed incisors) and generalized platyspondyly with epiphyseal and metaphyseal involvement. Thin tapering fingers and accentuated palmar creases are additional features.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "601668", "umls": "C1866507"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit kurzen Extremit\u00e4ten und anormaler Kalzifizierung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte prim\u00e4re Knochendysplasie, die durch eine \u00fcberproportionale Kleinw\u00fcchsigkeit mit Verk\u00fcrzung der oberen und unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, kurze und breite Finger mit kurzen H\u00e4nden, einen verengten Brustkorb mit Rippenanomalien und Pectus excavatum, abnorme Knorpelverkalkungen (incl. Kehlkopf, Luftr\u00f6hre und Rippenknorpel) und Gesichtsdysmorphien (prominente Stirn, Hypertelorismus, hervorstehende Augen, kurze flache Nase, breite Nasenl\u00f6cher, hochgew\u00f6lbter Gaumen, langes Philtrum) gekennzeichnet ist. Im R\u00f6ntgenbild zeigen sich Platyspondylie (besonders an der Halswirbels\u00e4ule) und abnorme Epiphysen und Metaphysen. Atlantoaxiale Instabilit\u00e4t, die eine Kompression der Wirbels\u00e4ule verursacht, und rezidivierende Atemwegserkrankungen sind m\u00f6gliche lebensbedrohliche Komplikationen.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "271665", "UMLS": "C1849011", "GARD": "10616"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit multiplen Luxationen vom Typ Hall", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, mit multiplen Luxationen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations is a rare genetic primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by midface hypoplasia, short stature, generalized joint laxity, multiple joint dislocations (most frequently of knees and hips), limb malalignment (genu valgum/varum) and progressive spinal deformity (e.g. kyphosis/scoliosis). Radiography reveals distinctive slender metacarpals and metatarsals, as well as small, irregular epiphyses, metaphyseal irregularities with vertical striations, constricted femoral necks and mild platyspondyly, among others.", "synonyms": "SEMD-MD, SEMDJL2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxicity, Hall type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, leptodactylic type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations, Hall type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "603546", "umls": "C1863732", "mesh": "C535784", "gard": "9866"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary bone dysplasia characterized by short stature, joint laxity, vertebral anomalies, severe progressive spinal malalignment leading to spinal cord compression, progressive kyphoscoliosis, thoracic asymmetry, and elbow and foot deformities. Additional features include mild skin hyperelasticity, spatulate terminal phalanges, cleft palate and lip, structural cardiac malformations, and mild facial dysmorphism (oval face, prominent eyes with blue sclerae, and a long upper lip).", "synonyms": "SEMD-JL, SEMDJL1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, Beighton type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "271640\u00a0 618395", "umls": "C0432243", "gard": "4982"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke Typ 1", "sub_name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary bone dysplasia characterized by short stature, joint laxity, vertebral anomalies, severe progressive spinal malalignment leading to spinal cord compression, progressive kyphoscoliosis, thoracic asymmetry, and elbow and foot deformities. Additional features include mild skin hyperelasticity, spatulate terminal phalanges, cleft palate and lip, structural cardiac malformations, and mild facial dysmorphism (oval face, prominent eyes with blue sclerae, and a long upper lip).", "synonyms": "SEMD-JL, SEMDJL1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, Beighton type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "271640\u00a0 618395", "umls": "C0432243", "gard": "4982"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke Typ 2", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, mit multiplen Luxationen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations is a rare genetic primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by midface hypoplasia, short stature, generalized joint laxity, multiple joint dislocations (most frequently of knees and hips), limb malalignment (genu valgum/varum) and progressive spinal deformity (e.g. kyphosis/scoliosis). Radiography reveals distinctive slender metacarpals and metatarsals, as well as small, irregular epiphyses, metaphyseal irregularities with vertical striations, constricted femoral necks and mild platyspondyly, among others.", "synonyms": "SEMD-MD, SEMDJL2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxicity, Hall type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, leptodactylic type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations, Hall type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "603546", "umls": "C1863732", "mesh": "C535784", "gard": "9866"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke Typ Beighton", "sub_name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary bone dysplasia characterized by short stature, joint laxity, vertebral anomalies, severe progressive spinal malalignment leading to spinal cord compression, progressive kyphoscoliosis, thoracic asymmetry, and elbow and foot deformities. Additional features include mild skin hyperelasticity, spatulate terminal phalanges, cleft palate and lip, structural cardiac malformations, and mild facial dysmorphism (oval face, prominent eyes with blue sclerae, and a long upper lip).", "synonyms": "SEMD-JL, SEMDJL1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 1, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, Beighton type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "271640\u00a0 618395", "umls": "C0432243", "gard": "4982"}, {"name": "Spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke Typ Hall", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re, mit multiplen Luxationen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations is a rare genetic primary bone dysplasia disorder characterized by midface hypoplasia, short stature, generalized joint laxity, multiple joint dislocations (most frequently of knees and hips), limb malalignment (genu valgum/varum) and progressive spinal deformity (e.g. kyphosis/scoliosis). Radiography reveals distinctive slender metacarpals and metatarsals, as well as small, irregular epiphyses, metaphyseal irregularities with vertical striations, constricted femoral necks and mild platyspondyly, among others.", "synonyms": "SEMD-MD, SEMDJL2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxicity, Hall type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity type 2, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with joint laxity, leptodactylic type, Spondyloepimetaphyseal dysplasia with multiple dislocations, Hall type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "603546", "umls": "C1863732", "mesh": "C535784", "gard": "9866"}, {"name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie-Brachydaktylie-Sprachst\u00f6rung-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie Typ Cantu ist ein extrem seltener Typ der Spondyloepiphys\u00e4ren Dysplasie (s. dort) und wurde bisher bei etwa 5 Patienten beschrieben. Charakteristische klinische Zeichen sind Kleinwuchs, auff\u00e4lliges Gesicht (Blepharophimose, schr\u00e4g aufw\u00e4rts gerichtete Lidspalten, \u00fcppige Augenbrauen und Wimpern), raue Stimme und kurze H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe (verk\u00fcrzte Metacarpalia, Metatarsalia und Phalangen).", "synonyms": "SED-BDS, Tattoo-Dysplasie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "611717", "UMLS": "C2673649", "GARD": "10629"}, {"name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie - Kraniosysnostose - Gaumenspalte - Katarakt - Intelligenzminderung", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepiphys\u00e4re, Typ Nishimura", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia Nishimura type is characterized by spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia, craniosynostosis, cataracts, cleft palate and intellectual deficit.", "synonyms": "Spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia-craniosynostosis-cleft palate-cataract-intellectual disability syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "602611\u00a0 618618", "umls": "C1865134", "epidemiology": "The syndrome has been described in four Japanese sibs (three brothers and one sister born to nonconsanguineous parents).", "clinical_description": "Most clinical manifestations are evident at birth, but skeletal changes and cataracts may become evident during early childhood.", "genetic_counseling": "Autosomal recessive inheritance has been suggested."}, {"name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit progressiver Arthropathie", "sub_name": "Arthropathie, progressive pseudorheumatoide, der Kindheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Progressive pseudorheumatoid arthropathy (dysplasia) of childhood (PPAC; PPD) presents as spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia (SED) tarda with progressive arthropathy and is described as a specific autosomal recessive subtype of SED.", "synonyms": "Spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia tarda-progressive arthropathy syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "208230", "umls": "C0432215", "mesh": "C535387", "gard": "9184", "epidemiology": "The prevalence has been estimated at 1/1,000,000 but it is likely to be higher in the Middle East and the Maghreb.", "clinical_description": "Most patients present the disease before the age of 8 years (the onset varies between 2 and 11 years). Typically, there are no symptoms in the newborn period. The most common signs at diagnosis are bowing of the legs, muscle weakness, symmetric swelling of the proximal interphalangeal joints. Motion range limitation, deformities and pain develop gradually, and spread to other joints. Many patients have spinal involvement manifesting as exaggerated lumbar lordosis, thoracic kyphosis, and/or scoliosis. Radiologically, the condition presents as SED with osteoporosis. The presence of an enlarged trigonium in the foot and synovial osteochondromatosis can be helpful for diagnosis. Extraskeletal manifestations (besides those secondary to the bony changes) have not been reported. Patients have normal facial appearance and intelligence.", "etiology": "The responsible gene WISP3 (mapping to human chromosome 6q22) encodes a secreted growth regulator.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and radiographic findings. Molecular testing is available on research basis.", "differential_diagnosis": "PPAC can be initially misdiagnosed as juvenile rheumatoid arthritis but is distinguished on radiographic analysis (especially the platyspondyly and generalised epiphyseal dysplasia) and the absence of inflammatory joint disease. PPAC must be differentiated from juvenile idiopathic arthritis to ensure optimal treatment and to avoid unnecessary exposure to immunosuppressants.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "As PPAC features are not present at birth, prenatal diagnosis based on clinical features is not possible.", "genetic_counseling": "PPAC is transmitted as an autosomal recessive trait.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific treatment for PPAC. No clear prevention, improvement or slowing the disease course with anti-inflammatory drugs has been demonstrated.", "prognosis": "PPAC does not affect life expectancy, but the progressive nature of the disease frequently requires joint replacement by early adulthood."}, {"name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie - Myopie - sensorineuraler H\u00f6rverlust", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, spondyloepiphys\u00e4re, Typ MacDermot", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie - Myopie - sensorineuraler H\u00f6rverlust, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "184000", "UMLS": "C1866719", "summary": "Der Typ MacDermot der Dysplasia spondyloepiphysaria tarda ist gekennzeichnet durch Kleinwuchs, Dysplasie der Femurepiphyse, leichte Ver\u00e4nderungen der Wirbels\u00e4ule und Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit. Das Syndrom wurde in 1 Familie bei weiblichen Patienten aus 4 aufeinander folgendenden Generationen beschrieben. Bei Erwachsenen bestanden Myopie und Netzhautabl\u00f6sung. Autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde vermutet. "}, {"name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie - nephrotisches Syndrom", "sub_name": "Knochendysplasie, immuno-oss\u00e4re, Typ Schimke", "german_description": "Die Schimkesche Immuno-oss\u00e4re Dysplasie (SIOD) ist eine Multisystemerkrankung mit spondylo-epiphys\u00e4rer Dysplasie, disproportioniertem Kleinwuchs, fazialen Dysmorphien, T-Zell-Immundefizienz, Glomerulonephritis und nephrotischem Syndrom. Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich h\u00e4ufig betroffen, ethnische und geographische H\u00e4ufigkeitsunterschiede sind nicht bekannt. Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeborenen betr\u00e4gt in Nordamerika 1: 1-3 Millionen. Die haupts\u00e4chlichen klinischen Symptome sind spondylo-epiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit Kleinwuchs, defekte zellul\u00e4re Immunit\u00e4t mit verst\u00e4rkter Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr lebensbedrohliche Infektionen und ein progredientes, steroid-resistentes nephrotisches Syndrom, das bei fast zwei Drittel der Patienten bis zur terminalen Niereninsuffizienz fortschreitet. Bluthochdruck und Proteinurie sind h\u00e4ufige Symptome der SIOD. Bei fast allen Patienten besteht ein T-Zell-Mangel mit normalem CD4/CD8-Verh\u00e4ltnis. H\u00e4ufig sind auch hyperpigmentierte Hautflecken, d\u00fcnnes Haar und faziale Dysmorphien (dreieckiges Gesicht; tiefer, breiter und flacher Nasenr\u00fccken). Folgen einer Atherosklerose sind neurologische Symptome (zerebrale Durchblutungsst\u00f6rungen mit migr\u00e4ne-\u00e4hnlichen Kopfschmerzen, zerebrale Isch\u00e4mie und kognitive St\u00f6rungen) und kardiale Funktionsst\u00f6rungen. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Hypothyreose, Enteropathie, und normo- oder mikrozyt\u00e4re An\u00e4mie. Die SIOD wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im SMARCAL1-Gen (2q35), das f\u00fcr HARP (auch SWI/SNF-related matrix-associated actin-dependent regulator of chromatin subfamily A-like protein 1 genannt), ein chromatin-remodellierendes Protein, kodiert. Die Diagnose basiert auf sorgf\u00e4ltiger klinischer und biochemischer Analyse und dem radiologischen Nachweis von Osteopenie, ovoiden und abgeflachten Wirbelk\u00f6rpern und Femurkopf- und Pfannendach-Hypoplasie. Durch molekulare Analyse kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden. Wichtigste Differentialdiagnose ist die Knorpel-Haar-Hypoplasie (s. dort). Da die Krankheit mehrere Systeme betrifft, muss die Therapie durch ein Team von Spezialisten erfolgen. Bei terminaler Niereninsuffizienz ist eine Nierentransplantation die Therapie der Wahl. Wegen der bei SIOD bestehenden Immunst\u00f6rung ist aber die immunsuppressive Therapie nach Nierentransplantation mit einem erh\u00f6hten Risiko f\u00fcr Absto\u00dfung und opportunistische Infektionen verbunden. Schlaganfall, Infektionen, Knochenmarkinsuffizienz und Nierenversagen begrenzen f\u00fcr die meisten Patienten die Lebenserwartung auf die Kindheit oder das fr\u00fche Erwachsenenalter. Patienten mit leichteren, sp\u00e4t-manifesten Formen und erfolgreicher Behandlung der renalen St\u00f6rung k\u00f6nnen das Erwachsenenalter erreichen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare a multisystem disorder characterized by spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia and disproportionate short stature, facial dysmorphism, T-cell immunodeficiency, and progressive, proteinuric steroid-resistant nephropathy.", "synonyms": "Schimke syndrome, Spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia-nephrotic syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q77.7", "omim": "242900", "umls": "C0877024", "mesh": "C536629", "gard": "4984", "meddra": "10048699", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is unknown. Data from large pediatric registries suggest that it accounts for ~1% of steroid resistant nephrotic syndrome.", "clinical_description": "The main clinical features are spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia, growth retardation both pre- and post-natal, defective cellular immunity and episodic lymphopenia with increased susceptibility to life-threatening infections, and a progressive steroid-resistant nephrotic syndrome that leads to end-stage renal failure. Almost all patients have T-cell deficiency with a normal CD4/CD8 ratio. Hyperpigmented macules, thin hair and dysmorphic facial features (a triangular-shaped face, microdontia, broad depressed nasal bridge, narrow nasal ridge and a broad nasal tip) are common. Neurologic manifestations include atherosclerosis and cerebrovascular disease, which manifest as migraine-like headaches, cerebral ischemia, cardiac dysfunction and cognitive deficiency. Additional features may include hypothyroidism, enteropathy, normocytic or microcytic anemia and thrombocytopenia.", "etiology": "The disorder is caused by biallelic pathogenic variants in the SMARCAL1 gene (2q35) which encodes the chromatin remodeling protein, SWI/SNF-related matrix-associated actin-dependent regulator of chromatin subfamily A-like protein 1.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on careful clinical, biochemical and radiologic evaluation typically demonstrating osteopenia, ovoid and flattened vertebral bodies, and hypoplastic femoral heads and acetabular roofs. Some patients with progressive proteinuria might be diagnosed incidentally through multigenic mutational screening (next generation sequencing/whole exome sequencing).", "differential_diagnosis": "Cartilage-hair hypoplasia is the main differential diagnosis.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible where the pathogenic variant has previously been identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing variants) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Therapy is largely limited to the prophylaxis and management of the various disease manifestations, such as dialysis and renal transplantation, supplementation of hematopoietic growth factors for neutropenia, orthopedic surgery as required, preventive antiviral therapies and vaccinations, anticoagulation, immunosuppressive therapy for those with autoimmune manifestations, and thyroid hormone supplementation.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is limited to childhood or early adolescence in most patients, due to stroke, infections, bone marrow failure, and renal failure. Survival into adulthood has been reported for patients with milder late-onset forms of the disease and successful management of the renal manifestations."}, {"name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie-sensorineuraler H\u00f6rverlust-Intelligenzminderung-Lebersche kongenitale Amaurose-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SHILCA-Syndrom, ", "OMIM": "619260", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spondyloepiphys\u00e4re und spondyloepimetaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SED und SEMD, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "UMLS": "C0038015", "MedDRA": "10062920", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Spondylo-Kamptodaktylie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "OMIM": "600000", "UMLS": "C1838781", "MeSH": "C535779", "GARD": "4972", "summary": "Das Spondylo-Kamptodaktylie-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Kamptodaktylie, abgeflachte Halswirbel und unterschiedlidlich stark ausgepr\u00e4gte thorakale Skoliose. Das Syndrom wurde in 1 Familie bei 5 Mitgliedern aus 3 Generationen beschrieben. Autosomal-dominante Vererbung und autosomal-rezessive Vererbung mit Pseudodominanz wurden diskutiert. "}, {"name": "Spondylo-karpo-tarsale Synostose", "german_description": "Das Syndrom der Spondylo-karpo-tarsalen Synostose, auch Kongenitaler Synspondylismus genannt, ist eine seltene Krankheit mit Verschmelzungen von Wirbelk\u00f6rpern (h\u00e4ufig in Form eines unsegmentierten Stabes) und mit Fusionen der Mittelhand- und Mittelfu\u00dfknochen. Die Krankheit ist genetisch heterogen. Ursache der autosomal-rezessiv vererbten Form sind Mutationen im FLNB-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 3p14.3, das f\u00fcr Filamin B kodiert. In einigen Familien wird die Krankheit autosomal-dominant vererbt, und Filamin-B-Mutationen wurden nicht gefunden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A spondylodysplasic dysplasia clinically characterized by postnatal progressive vertebral fusions frequently manifesting as block vertebrae, contributing to an shortened trunk and hence disproportionate short stature, scoliosis, lordosis, carpal and tarsal synostosis and infrequently, club feet.", "synonyms": "Synspondylism, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q76.4", "omim": "272460", "umls": "C1848934", "gard": "4974", "epidemiology": "Spondylocarpotarsal synostosis (SCT) is very rare. To date, less than 40 cases have been reported in the medical literature.", "clinical_description": "While the clinical onset is postnatal, the diagnosis becomes clinically evident in early in childhood. Primary clinical characteristics of SCT syndrome include progressive vertebral fusions manifesting as block vertebrae leading to a shortened trunk resulting in disproportionate short stature that becomes apparent with physical growth. Scoliosis, lordosis, carpal and tarsal synostosis are frequent with club feet being observed in a minority of cases. A mild facial dysmorphism with a round face with frontal bossing and anteverted nostrils can be evident. Midline cleft palate, conductive hearing loss, joint laxity and dental enamel hypoplasia are uncommonly reported.", "etiology": "SCT syndrome is due to biallelic mutations in FLNB (localized to 3p14.3) that encodes cytoskeletal protein filamin B. A very similar condition is caused by either monoallelic or biallelic mutations in MYH3.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is confirmed by skeletal x-rays and genetic testing. Radiographs demonstrate progressive vertebral fusions and lumbar spine, carpal and tarsal synostosis without rib anomalies. Occasionally, delayed ossification of epiphyses and bilateral epiphyseal femur dysplasia are reported.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis may include isolated Klippel-Feil syndrome and other vertebral dysplasias, such as autosomal dominant spondylocostal dysplasia and multiple synostoses syndrome.", "genetic_counseling": "SCT syndrome follows an autosomal recessive inheritance (FLNB, MYH3) or occasionally autosomal dominant inheritance (MYH3). Genetic counseling should be proposed to at risk couples informing them that there is 25% (autosomal recessive) or 50% (autosomal dominant) risk of tranmitting the disease to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Management involves ophthalmologic, audiologic and spine assessments. Scoliosis is treated medically; no effective surgical intervention has been described. The cervical spine should be evaluated for features of instability prior to general anesthesia. Pain management is indispensable as patients suffer from much continuing physical pain due to the spinal deformities and fused block vertebrae.", "prognosis": "It has not been formally evaluated if SCT syndrome affects life expectancy."}, {"name": "Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie-Hornhautdystrophie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SMD-Hornhautdystrophie-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "OMIM": "618961", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit enchondromat\u00f6sen Ver\u00e4nderungen", "sub_name": "Spondyloenchondrodysplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spondyloenchondrodysplasie (SPENCD) ist eine sehr seltene genetische Skelettdysplasie, die klinisch durch Skelettanomalien (Kleinwuchs, Platyspondylie, kurzes breites Os ilium) und Enchondrome in den R\u00f6hrenknochen oder im Becken charakterisiert ist. SPENCD kann ein heterogenes klinisches Spektrum mit neurologischen Beteiligung (Spastizit\u00e4t, Intelligenzminderung und zerebrale Verkalkungen) oder Autoimmunmanifestationen (wie immun-thrombozytopenische Purpura, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie und Thyreoiditis) aufweisen.", "synonyms": "SPENCD, Spondyloenchondromatose, Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit enchondromat\u00f6sen Ver\u00e4nderungen, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "271550", "UMLS": "C0432222", "MeSH": "C535782", "GARD": "4978"}, {"name": "Spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie mit Zapfen-St\u00e4bchendystrophie", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch spondylo-metaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie (mit Platyspondylie, verk\u00fcrzten R\u00f6hrenknochen und zunehmend sich auspr\u00e4gender Becherform der Metaphysen), postnatalen Minderwuchs und progrediente Verschlechterung des Visus durch Z\u00e4pfchen-St\u00e4bchen-Dystrophie. Das Syndrom wurde bei 8 Patienten beschrieben und wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondylometaphyseal dysplasia-cone-rod dystrophy syndrome is characterised by the association of spondylometaphyseal dysplasia (marked by platyspondyly, shortening of the tubular bones and progressive metaphyseal irregularity and cupping), with postnatal growth retardation and progressive visual impairment due to cone-rod dystrophy. So far, it has been described in eight individuals. Transmission appears to be autosomal recessive.", "synonyms": "SMD-CRD, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "icd_10": "Q77.8", "omim": "608940", "umls": "C1837073", "gard": "10647"}, {"name": "Spondylo-okul\u00e4res Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spondylo-ocular syndrome is a very rare association of spinal and ocular manifestations that is characterized by dense cataracts, and retinal detachment along with generalized osteoporosis and platyspondyly. Mild craniofacial dysphormism has been reported including short neck, large head and prominent eyebrows.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "omim": "605822", "umls": "C1853925"}, {"name": "Spondyloperiphere Dysplasie mit kurzer Ulna", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte prim\u00e4re Knochendysplasie mit sehr variablem Ph\u00e4notyp, typischerweise gekennzeichnet durch Platyspondylie, Brachydaktylie Typ E (kurze Mittelhandknochen und Mittelfu\u00dfknochen, kurze distale Phalangen in H\u00e4nden und F\u00fc\u00dfen), bilateral verk\u00fcrzte Ulna und leichte Kleinw\u00fcchsigkeit. Dar\u00fcber hinaus werden zus\u00e4tzliche Skelettbefunde (z. B. Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, degenerative Ver\u00e4nderungen der proximalen Femora, eingeschr\u00e4nkte Ellbogenstreckung, beidseitige Sakralisierung des f\u00fcnften Lendenwirbels, Klumpf\u00fc\u00dfe) sowie Kurzsichtigkeit, H\u00f6rverlust und Intelligenzminderung berichtet.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "Q77.7", "OMIM": "271700", "UMLS": "C0796173", "MeSH": "C535799", "GARD": "4994"}, {"name": "Spontane intrakranielle Hypotension", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare headache resulting from a cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) leak with subsequent lowered CSF pressure, characterized clinically by severe headaches which typically worsen upon standing up and get better when lying down. Additional features may include neck stiffness, nausea, vomiting, vertigo, tinnitus, visual disturbances, and cognitive abnormalities, among others, as sagging and displacement of the brain can lead to a variety of lesions and symptoms.", "synonyms": "Spontaneous cerebrospinal fluid leak, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "G96.0", "umls": "C0751731\u00a0 C3544264\u00a0 C3850067"}, {"name": "Spontane periodische Hypothermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Spontane periodische Hypothermie (SPH) ist eine neurologische Erkrankung mit spontaner periodischer Hypothermie und Hyperhidrose ohne hypothalamische L\u00e4sionen.", "synonyms": "Hypothermie, episodische spontane, Shapiro-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G90.8", "UMLS": "C2931542", "GARD": "4815", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weltweit mehr als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die SPH kann in jedem Alter auftreten (6 Monate bis 62 Jahre). Das klinische Bild ist gepr\u00e4gt durch rezidivierende Episoden von Hypothermie (Kerntemperatur <35 \u00b0C) mit profusem Schwitzen, \u00dcbelkeit und Erbrechen bei Fehlen einer erkennbaren infekti\u00f6sen oder endokrinen Ursache. Die Periodizit\u00e4t dieser Episoden reicht von Stunden bis zu Jahren, und die Episoden selbst k\u00f6nnen Stunden bis Wochen andauern. Die Patienten haben ein 'komisches Gef\u00fchl' im Kopf, das als m\u00e4chtig und vernichtend beschrieben wird, zusammen mit Schw\u00e4chegef\u00fchl, gest\u00f6rter Koordination und unsicherem Gang. Zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome sind Benommenheit, tiefer Schlaf, hypotherme Synkope, leichte Bradykardie und blasse k\u00fchle Haut. Meist bestehen keine zus\u00e4tzlichen Klagen \u00fcber Diarrh\u00f6e, Konfusion, Keuchen der Atmung, Ausschlag, Krampfaktivit\u00e4t, Sch\u00fcttelfrost oder Wackeligkeit. In nur einem Fall wurden Polyurie und Polydipsie w\u00e4hrend der Attacken beschrieben. Isolierte rezidivierende Hypothermie-Attacken wurden bei 2 Geschwistern beschrieben.", "etiology": "Die genauen pathophysiologische Mechanismen f\u00fcr dieses Syndrom sind bisher nicht gesichert. Vermutet werden: Hypothalamische Dysfunktion, neurochemische Anomalien, entz\u00fcndliche Prozesse und epileptische Aktivit\u00e4t.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die k\u00f6rperliche Untersuchung und systemische Befunde mit blasser kalter Haut, normaler H\u00e4matologie und unauff\u00e4lligen Elektrolytspiegeln. Durch Bildgebung werden bei einigen Patienten konfluierende L\u00e4sionen im Corpus callosum und eine umschriebenen L\u00e4sion im rechten hinteren Thalamus nachgewiesen. Im Liquor k\u00f6nnen die Spiegel von5-Hydroxyindolessigs\u00e4ure (5-HIAA) und Homovanillins\u00e4ure (HVA) erniedrigt sein.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differenzialdiagnosen der SPH sind: schwere Hypothyreose, Hypoglyk\u00e4mie oder Attacken von diabetischen Ketoazidose.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine kurative Behandlung der SPH gibt es nicht. Die Behandlung ist haupts\u00e4chlich supportiv, mit Erw\u00e4rmung unter warmen Decken. Carbamazepin, Clonidin, Cyproheptadin, Glycopyrrolat, Bromocriptin, Chlorpromazin, Beta1-Blocker oder Sympathektomie werden mit unterschiedlichem Erfolg angewendet.", "prognosis": "Die SPH ist eine benigne Erkrankung und kann spontan sistieren. Bei einigen Patienten wurden hypertherme Attacken im Verlauf der Krankheit beschrieben.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weltweit mehr als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Spontanpneumothorax, famili\u00e4rer", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der famili\u00e4re Spontanpneumothorax ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte Lungenerkrankung, die durch die ein- oder beidseitige Ansammlung von Luft in der Pleurah\u00f6hle bei Personen mit positiver Familienanamnese und ohne zugrundeliegende Lungenerkrankung oder vorheriges Thoraxtrauma gekennzeichnet ist. Die Patienten zeigen typischerweise Dyspnoe in Verbindung mit akut einsetzenden, scharfen und stetigen pleuritische Brustschmerzen unterschiedlicher Schwere (die innerhalb von 24 Stunden abklingen, obwohl der Pneumothorax noch vorhanden ist). Reflexartige Tachykardie und/oder eine Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der Atmung oder des Kreislaufs k\u00f6nnen beobachtet werden. Andere Syndrome (z. B. Birt-Hogg-Dube-, Marfan- oder Ehlers-Danlos-Syndrome) k\u00f6nnen assoziiert sein.", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "J93.1", "OMIM": "173600"}, {"name": "Sporadische Ataxie unbekannter \u00c4tiologie im Erwachsenenalter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die sporadische Ataxie unbekannter \u00c4tiologie im Erwachsenenalter beschreibt eine Gruppe nicht-erblicher degenerativer Ataxien, die durch ein langsam progredientes Kleinhirnsyndrom (mit Ataxie des Standes und des Ganges, Dysmetrie der oberen Gliedma\u00dfen und Intentionstremor, ataktischer Sprache und okulomotorischen Anomalien) gekennzeichnet ist, das im Erwachsenenalter (um das 50. Lebensjahr herum) auftritt und keine bekannte Ursache hat. Extrazerebell\u00e4re Symptome (z. B. verminderter Vibrationssinn und fehlende oder verminderte Kn\u00f6chelreflexe), Polyneuropathie und leichte autonome Dysfunktion k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls vorhanden sein. Selten wurde auch eine leichte kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung berichtet.", "synonyms": "Idiopathische sp\u00e4t-einsetzende zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, SAOA, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "G31.8"}, {"name": "Sporadische CJD", "sub_name": "Creutzfeldt-Jakob-Krankheit, sporadische", "german_description": "Die Creutzfeldt-Jakob-Krankheit (CJD) ist die h\u00e4ufigste \u00fcbertragbare spongiforme Enzephalopathie (TSE) des Menschen und hat eine Inzidenz von ca. 1-1,5 / 1 Million. Etwa 85% der F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, 10% sind genetisch bedingt und 5% sind iatrogen. Die Inkubationsperiode ist lang und symptomlos. Die Krankheit ist immer letal. Die CJD verursacht eine Degeneration des Nervensystems ohne Immunantwort oder Entz\u00fcndungsreaktion. Sie geht mit der Anh\u00e4ufung eines abnorm gefalteten Prionproteins (PrP) einher. Die sporadische CJD tritt im Alter von etwa 60 Jahren auf und f\u00fchrt im Mittel nach 6 Monaten zum Tod. Demenz und neurologische Symptome (Myoklonien, Kleinhirn-Symptome, Sehst\u00f6rungen, Pyramidenzeichen, extra-pyramidale Zeichen, akinetischer Mutismus) bestimmen den Verlauf. Die herk\u00f6mmlichen Untersuchungen sind unergiebig. Lediglich das EEG kann spezifische periodische Ver\u00e4nderungen zeigen, und im MRI wird in der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle eine vermehrte Signalintensit\u00e4t im Nucleus caudatus, im Putamen oder in der Hirn- oder Kleinhirnrinde gesehen. Von diagnostischem Wert ist der Nachweis des 14-3-3-Proteins in der Zerebrospinal-Fl\u00fcssigkeit. Die Diagnose wird durch die typischen neuropathologischen Befunde im Gehirn (Spongiose, Nervenzellverlust, Gliose) und durch den Nachweis des abnormen Prion-Proteins best\u00e4tigt. Die Ursache der sporadischen CJD ist unbekannt, Mutationen im PrP-Gen wurden nicht gefunden. Homozygotie f\u00fcr den Methionin-Valin-Polymorphismus in Kodon 129 des PrP-Gens wird bei Patienten h\u00e4ufiger als bei gesunden Kontrollen gefunden. F\u00fcr eine Risiko-Voraussage ist dieser Polymorphismus aber nicht geeignet. Die erblichen Formen der CJD haben ihre Ursache in unterschiedlichen Mutationen des PrP-Gens. In Frankreich ist eine Kodon-200-Mutation am h\u00e4ufigsten. Deren Symptome sind sehr \u00e4hnlich wie bei der sporadischen Form. Auch die iatrogene Form nach \u00dcbertragung von Dura mater verl\u00e4uft wie die sporadische Form. Verschieden ist dagegen der Verlauf der iatrogenen CJD nach Injektion von menschlichem Wachstumshormon: Das erste Symptom ist eine zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, die Demenz setzt sp\u00e4ter ein, das EEG ist selten charakteristisch, und die Progredienz ist langsamer (mittlere Krankheitsdauer 18 Monate). Im Zusammenhang mit der Bovinen Spongiformen Enzephalopathie (BSE, 'Rinderwahnsinn') steht nur die variante Form der CJD (vCJD). Die ersten F\u00e4lle von vCJD wurden in England gesehen, und dort gibt es seither auch die meisten F\u00e4lle. Anders als bei der sporadischen Form sind Patienten mit vCJD j\u00fcnger (Median: 30 Jahre), und die Krankheit dauert 15 Monate. Die ersten Symptome sind psychiatrischer Art, oft verbunden mit Schmerzen oder mehr oder weniger diffusen Dys\u00e4sthesien. Sp\u00e4ter kommen zerebell\u00e4re Symptome und Pyramidenzeichen hinzu. Eine Demenz tritt sp\u00e4t auf, und die Myoklonien sind nur schwach ausgepr\u00e4gt. Das EEG-Muster ist niemals periodisch, und das 14-3-3-Protein wird nur in der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle gefunden. Bisher waren alle F\u00e4lle im Kodon 129 homozygot f\u00fcr Methionin. Die Verdachtsdiagnose gr\u00fcndet sich auf das MRI mit Signalverst\u00e4rkung in den pulvinaren Kernen des Thalamus und durch den Nachweis von abnormem PrP in der Tonsillen-Biopsie. Die Diagnose wird gesichert durch die Neuropathologie mit CJD-spezifischen Befunden, besonders durch den Nachweis von 'floriden Plaques' in der Hirnbiopsie (Plaques, die von Vakuolen und spongiformen Ver\u00e4nderungen umgeben sind). Der pathologische Proze\u00df kann bisher therapeutisch nicht beeinflu\u00dft werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare sporadic human prion disease characterized by rapidly progressive cognitive impairment in combination with variable neurologic signs and symptoms including myoclonus, visual or cerebellar problems, pyramidal or extrapyramidal features, or akinetic mutism. Brain imaging may show high signal intensity in caudate, putamen, and/or cortical regions, and a typical EEG pattern consisting of generalized periodic sharp wave complexes is observed in many cases. The disease is invariably fatal within less than two years. Neuropathologic examination reveals deposition of abnormal prion protein in brain tissue, as well as spongiform change and massive neuronal loss and gliosis.", "synonyms": "Sporadic CJD, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "A81.0", "omim": "123400", "umls": "C0022336", "mesh": "D007562", "gard": "6956", "meddra": "10011384"}, {"name": "Sporadische Fetal-brain-disruption-Sequenz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, nicht-syndromale Fehlbildungsst\u00f6rung des Zentralnervensystems, die durch schwere Mikrozephalie (durchschnittlicher okzipitofrontaler Umfang -5,8 SD), \u00fcberlappende N\u00e4hte, kielartige okzipitale Knochenvorw\u00f6lbung, Kopfhaut-Rugae mit normalem Haarmuster und Anzeichen neurologischer Beeintr\u00e4chtigung gekennzeichnet ist. Die Bildgebung des Gehirns kann eine Ventrikulomegalie, ein kortikales Gewebedefizit und eine Hydranenzephalie zeigen.", "synonyms": "Hirnfehlbildung, fetale komplexe sporadische, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q02"}, {"name": "Sporadische IBSN", "sub_name": "Striatale Nekrose, bilaterale infantile, sporadische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sporadic infantile bilateral necrosis is the sporadic form of infantile bilateral striatal necrosis (IBSN; see this term), a syndrome of bilateral symmetric spongy degeneration of the caudate nucleaus, putamen and globus pallidus characterized by developmental regression, choreoathetosis and dystonia progressing to spastic quadriparesis.", "synonyms": "ABSN, Acute bilateral striatal necrosis, Sporadic IBSN, Sporadic infantile striatonigral degeneration, Sporadic infantile striatonigral necrosis, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G23.2", "epidemiology": "Prevalence has been estimated at 1-9/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "Sporadic IBSN can occur any time from the neonatal period through childhood and even in adolescence. Clinical features include choreoathetosis, dystonia, rigidity, spasticity, dysphagia, optic atrophy, intellectual deficit, developmental regression of motor and verbal skills, failure to thrive, myoclonus, quadriparesis, cerebellar ataxia and nystagmus.", "etiology": "The disease is associated with abrupt neurologic dysfunction following an acute systemic febrile illness such as a mycoplasma, measles or streptococcus infection.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical observation of choreoathetoid movements of the face, trunk and extremities and evidence of basal ganglia degeneration on CT and MRI images.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Wilson's disease, acute disseminated encephalomyelitis, neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation, Leigh disease, juvenile Huntington chorea, methylmalonic aciduria, guanidinoacetate methyltransferase deficiency, glutaric acidemia I (see these terms), carbon monoxide intoxication, small vessel arteritis and trauma.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is based on treatment of the causal infection.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable, with either gradual improvement in symptoms and complete recovery, observed after recovery from the infection, or severe neurological sequelae."}, {"name": "Sporadische infantile striatonigrale Degeneration", "sub_name": "Striatale Nekrose, bilaterale infantile, sporadische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sporadic infantile bilateral necrosis is the sporadic form of infantile bilateral striatal necrosis (IBSN; see this term), a syndrome of bilateral symmetric spongy degeneration of the caudate nucleaus, putamen and globus pallidus characterized by developmental regression, choreoathetosis and dystonia progressing to spastic quadriparesis.", "synonyms": "ABSN, Acute bilateral striatal necrosis, Sporadic IBSN, Sporadic infantile striatonigral degeneration, Sporadic infantile striatonigral necrosis, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G23.2", "epidemiology": "Prevalence has been estimated at 1-9/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "Sporadic IBSN can occur any time from the neonatal period through childhood and even in adolescence. Clinical features include choreoathetosis, dystonia, rigidity, spasticity, dysphagia, optic atrophy, intellectual deficit, developmental regression of motor and verbal skills, failure to thrive, myoclonus, quadriparesis, cerebellar ataxia and nystagmus.", "etiology": "The disease is associated with abrupt neurologic dysfunction following an acute systemic febrile illness such as a mycoplasma, measles or streptococcus infection.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical observation of choreoathetoid movements of the face, trunk and extremities and evidence of basal ganglia degeneration on CT and MRI images.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Wilson's disease, acute disseminated encephalomyelitis, neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation, Leigh disease, juvenile Huntington chorea, methylmalonic aciduria, guanidinoacetate methyltransferase deficiency, glutaric acidemia I (see these terms), carbon monoxide intoxication, small vessel arteritis and trauma.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is based on treatment of the causal infection.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable, with either gradual improvement in symptoms and complete recovery, observed after recovery from the infection, or severe neurological sequelae."}, {"name": "Sporadische pulmonale arterielle Hypertension", "sub_name": "Pulmonale arterielle Hypertonie, idiopathische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die idiopathische pulmonale arterielle Hypertonie (IPAH) ist eine sporadische Form der pulmonalen arteriellen Hypertonie (PAH, siehe diesen Begriff), die durch einen erh\u00f6hten pulmonal-arteriellen Widerstand gekennzeichnet ist, der zu Rechtsherzversagen f\u00fchrt. IPAH ist progressiv und potenziell t\u00f6dlich und nicht mit einer Grunderkrankung oder einer Familienanamnese von PAH verbunden.", "synonyms": "IPAH, Prim\u00e4re pulmonale arterielle Hypertension, Sporadische pulmonale arterielle Hypertension, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "I27.0", "UMLS": "C0152171\u00a0 C3203102", "MedDRA": "10065151", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der PAH, in all ihren Formen, wird auf etwa 1/67.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. IPAH ist eine der am h\u00e4ufigsten diagnostizierten Formen.", "clinical_description": "Die klinischen Manifestationen der IPAH \u00e4hneln unabh\u00e4ngig von der \u00c4tiologie den anderen Formen der PAH. IPAH entwickelt sich bei Erwachsenen und in seltenen F\u00e4llen bei Kindern; Frauen sind doppelt so h\u00e4ufig betroffen wie M\u00e4nner. Die Diagnose wird h\u00e4ufig bei Patienten in den Mittvierzigern gestellt. Zu den anf\u00e4nglichen Symptomen geh\u00f6ren Dyspnoe, M\u00fcdigkeit, Synkope, Brustschmerzen, Herzklopfen und Pedal\u00f6deme. Zu den pr\u00e4kordialen Zeichen geh\u00f6ren ein lautes und tastbares zweites Herzger\u00e4usch, ein rechtsventrikul\u00e4res Heben, ein pulmonales Auswurfger\u00e4usch und Ger\u00e4usche einer pulmonalen und trikuspidalen Regurgitation. 70 % der Patienten weisen eine Herzinsuffizienz auf ((klassifiziert nach New York Heart Association Functional Classification (NYHA FC) III oder IV). Seltener k\u00f6nnen Trommelschl\u00e4gelfinger und das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen beobachtet werden. Es wurde auch \u00fcber H\u00e4moptysen berichtet.", "etiology": "IPAH wird durch ein vaskul\u00e4res Remodeling der kleinen Lungenarterien aufgrund unbekannter Ursachen verursacht. Mutationen in PAH-pr\u00e4disponierenden Genen werden bei etwa 15 % bis 20 % der PAH-Patienten identifiziert, bei denen man zun\u00e4chst von einer idiopathischen Form der Erkrankung ausgeht. IPAH-Patienten, die Tr\u00e4ger einer Mutation in einem PAH-pr\u00e4disponierenden Gen sind, m\u00fcssen in ''heredit\u00e4re PAH'' umklassifiziert werden (siehe diesen Begriff). Der wichtigste genetische Risikofaktor f\u00fcr PAH sind Mutationen im BMPR2-Gen (2q33). In einigen wenigen F\u00e4llen wurden Mutationen in den Genen ACVRL1>(12q13), ENG>(9q34), KCNK3>(2p23),CAV1 (7q31) und TBX4(17q21) identifiziert.", "genetic_counseling": "Allen IPAH-Patienten sollte eine genetische Beratung vorgeschlagen werden und eine genetisches Screening auf Mutationen in den PAH-pr\u00e4disponierenden Genen erfolgen. Alle PAH-pr\u00e4disponierenden Gene werden autosomal-dominant mit einer unvollst\u00e4ndigen Penetranz vererbt. Im Falle der BMPR2-Mutationen wird die Penetranz bei weiblichen Mutationstr\u00e4gern auf 42 % und bei m\u00e4nnlichen Mutationstr\u00e4gern auf 14 % gesch\u00e4tzt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der PAH, in all ihren Formen, wird auf etwa 1/67.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. IPAH ist eine der am h\u00e4ufigsten diagnostizierten Formen."}, {"name": "Sporadisches Phaeochromozytom/sezernierendes Paragangliom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Sporadische Ph\u00e4ochromozytome/sezernierende Paragangliome sind isolierte, nicht-famili\u00e4re, Katecholamin-produzierende Tumoren, die von neuroendokrinen chromaffinen Zellen im Nebennierenmark bzw. im extra-adrenalen chromaffinen Gewebe ausgehen. Die Mehrzahl dieser Tumoren ist gutartig und die pr\u00e4sentierenden Symptome werden typischerweise durch die erh\u00f6hte Katecholaminproduktion des Tumors verursacht, einschlie\u00dflich Hypertonie (oft paroxysmal), Tachykardie, Angst und/oder \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfiges Schwitzen.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C74.1\u00a0 D35.0", "GARD": "7385"}, {"name": "Sporotrichose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Sporotrichose ist eine Infektion, die durch den dimorphen Pilz Sporothrix schenckii verursacht wird. Die Infektion erfolgt im Allgemeinen durch traumatische Inokulation von Pilzsporen aus kontaminierten B\u00f6den, Pflanzen und anderen organischen Substanzen. Die Sporotrichose weist ein sehr variables Krankheitsbild auf, das sich jedoch typischerweise als subkutan Mykose mit einem einzelnen sporotrichotischen Schanker manifestiert. Dieser kann ulzerieren und sich zu einer lymphokutanen Form (h\u00e4ufigste Form; sporotrichotischer Schanker an der Inokulationsstelle und eine Reihe \u00e4hnlicher Kn\u00f6tchen entlang der proximalen Lymphgef\u00e4\u00dfe), einer fixiert kutanen Form (lokalisiert asymptomatisch, erythemat\u00f6s, Papeln an der Inokulationsstelle) oder einer multifokale bzw. disseminierte kutanen Formen (seltene Form, mit drei oder mehr L\u00e4sionen an zwei verschiedenen anatomischen Stellen) entwickeln. Eine pulmonale Sporotrichose tritt nach Inhalation von Pilzen auf und manifestiert sich als chronische Pneumonitis. Es wurde auch \u00fcber extrakutane oder systemische Sporotrichosen (mit osteoartikul\u00e4re, Lungen- und Zentralnervensystem /meningealer Erkrankung) berichtet, die \u00fcblicherweise im Rahmen einer Immunsuppression auftreten.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "B42.0\u00a0 B42.1\u00a0 B42.7\u00a0 B42.8\u00a0 B42.9", "UMLS": "C0038034", "MeSH": "D013174", "GARD": "7692", "MedDRA": "10041736"}, {"name": "SPPRS-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie-schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen-Epilepsie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Spastic paraplegia-severe developmental delay-epilepsy syndrome is a rare, genetic, complex spastic paraplegia disorder characterized by an infantile-onset of psychomotor developmental delay with severe intellectual disability and poor speech acquisition, associated with seizures (mostly myoclonic), muscular hypotonia which may be noted at birth, and slowly progressive spasticity in the lower limbs leading to severe gait disturbances. Ocular abnormalities and incontinence are commonly associated. Other symptoms may include verbal dyspraxia, hypogenitalism, macrocephaly and sensorineural hearing loss, as well as dystonic movements and ataxia with upper limb involvement.", "synonyms": "SPPRS syndrome, Spastic paraplegia-psychomotor retardation-seizures syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "omim": "616756"}, {"name": "Sprachapraxie, prim\u00e4re progressive", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Primary progressive apraxia of speech is a rare neurodegenerative disease characterized by impaired planning or programming of the movements for speech, leading to phonetically and prosodically abnormal speech, in absence, at onset, of any other neurological features (such as aphasia, memory loss, pyramidal signs). Patients usually present articulatory distortions/groping, slow rate, distorted sound substitutions and/or trial and error articulatory movements which begin insiduously and worsen over time.", "synonyms": "PPAOS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G31.8"}, {"name": "Sprachentwicklung, famili\u00e4re verz\u00f6gerte", "sub_name": "Dysphasie, famili\u00e4re kongenitale", "german_description": "Die entwicklungsbedingte Dysphasie ist gepr\u00e4gt durch signifikante Probleme beim Erwerb der gesprochenen Sprache. Die Kinder sind normal intelligent und haben keine anderen Anomalien (intellektuelle Defizite, Kommunikations-St\u00f6rungen, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, nachweisbare Hirnl\u00e4sionen). Betroffen sind 2-5% sonst ungesch\u00e4digter Kinder. Seltener sind schwere Formen, die auch noch im Erwachsenenalter weiterbestehen. Diese Patienten haben mit 6 Jahren eine Sprachst\u00f6rung mit mangelhafter Wortbildung und Syntax. Mit drei Jahren sprechen sie noch gar nicht. Familien, in denen solche St\u00f6rungen erblich sind und in denen h\u00e4ufiger M\u00e4nner als Frauen betroffen sind, wurden mehrfach beschrieben. Die Analyse dieser Familien und auch Zwillingsstudien belegen die wichtige Rolle genetischer Faktoren bei der Manifestation entwicklungsbedingter St\u00f6rungen der gesprochenen Sprache. Sie lassen auch an monogene, wahrscheinlich autosomal-dominante Vererbung denken. In einer au\u00dfergew\u00f6hnlichen Familie war \u00fcber drei Generationen fast die H\u00e4lfte der Mitglieder mit einer schweren Sprech- und Sprachst\u00f6rung betroffen. Praktisch alle Bereiche der Grammatik und der Sprache waren gest\u00f6rt. Zus\u00e4tzlich hatten die betroffenen Familienmitglieder eine schwere oro-faziale Dyspraxie, und f\u00fcr Au\u00dfenstehende waren ihre sprachlichen \u00c4u\u00dferungen weitgehend unverst\u00e4ndlich. Das wiederholte Auftreten der Krankheit war mit monogener, autosomal-dominanter Vererbung vereinbar. Durch genomweite Kopplungsanalyse wurde eine Region auf Chromosom 7 gefunden, die gemeinsam mit der Sprech- und Sprachst\u00f6rung vererbt wird. Mit dieser Untersuchung wurde best\u00e4tigt, da\u00df die Krankheit autosomal-dominant mit vollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz vererbt wird. In weiteren Analysen wurde der verantwortliche SPCH1-Locus in ein 5,6 cM-Intervall der Chromosomenregion 7q31 kartiert. Ursache der Krankheit sind Mutationen im FOXP2-Gen, das in dieser Region liegt. Dies ist der erste Hinweis auf die molekulargenetischen Grundlagen eines Entwicklungsprozesses, der in Sprechen und Sprache gipfelt. Sicher ist dies nicht das einzige f\u00fcr Sprache verantwortliche Gen, und auch epigenetische Faktoren spielen wahrscheinlich eine Rolle. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial developmental dysphasia is a severe form of developmental verbal apraxia characterized by a deficit in spontaneous speech, writing, grammatical judgment and repetition, defective articulation, moderate to severe degree of dyspraxia, a reduced use of consonant clusters, and comprehension delay. Hearing and intelligence are normal.", "synonyms": "Billard-Toutain-Maheut syndrome, FOXP2-associated dysphasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "F80.1", "omim": "600117", "umls": "C1838630", "gard": "1823"}, {"name": "Sprech- und Sprachst\u00f6rungen mit orofazialer Dyspraxie", "sub_name": "Sprech- und Sprachst\u00f6rungen Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by impaired ability to execute complex coordinated movements underlying the production of speech, leading to highly unintelligible speech in the absence of muscular or sensory deficits. Initial presentation may be a severe expressive speech delay. Later, characteristic features are inconsistent errors on consonants and vowels in repeated productions of syllables or words, lengthened and disrupted coarticulatory transitions between sounds and syllables, and inappropriate prosody.", "synonyms": "Isolated CAS, Isolated developmental verbal dyspraxia, Pure CAS, Pure childhood apraxia of speech, Speech and language disorder with orofacial dyspraxia, Speech-language disorder type 1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "F80.0", "omim": "602081", "gard": "12889"}, {"name": "Sprech- und Sprachst\u00f6rungen Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by impaired ability to execute complex coordinated movements underlying the production of speech, leading to highly unintelligible speech in the absence of muscular or sensory deficits. Initial presentation may be a severe expressive speech delay. Later, characteristic features are inconsistent errors on consonants and vowels in repeated productions of syllables or words, lengthened and disrupted coarticulatory transitions between sounds and syllables, and inappropriate prosody.", "synonyms": "Isolated CAS, Isolated developmental verbal dyspraxia, Pure CAS, Pure childhood apraxia of speech, Speech and language disorder with orofacial dyspraxia, Speech-language disorder type 1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "F80.0", "omim": "602081", "gard": "12889"}, {"name": "Sprengel-Deformit\u00e4t", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare thoracic malformation characterized by an underdeveloped and abnormally high scapula due to its failure to descend to the regular position during embryonic development. The defect is in most cases unilateral and may be associated with other abnormalities, such as deformities of vertebral bodies, fused or absent ribs, or genitourinary anomalies, among others.", "synonyms": "High scapula, ", "icd_10": "Q74.0", "omim": "184400", "umls": "C0152438", "mesh": "C535802", "gard": "7693", "meddra": "10010455"}, {"name": "Sprengel-Ph\u00e4notyp", "sub_name": "Sprengel-Deformit\u00e4t", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare thoracic malformation characterized by an underdeveloped and abnormally high scapula due to its failure to descend to the regular position during embryonic development. The defect is in most cases unilateral and may be associated with other abnormalities, such as deformities of vertebral bodies, fused or absent ribs, or genitourinary anomalies, among others.", "synonyms": "High scapula, ", "icd_10": "Q74.0", "omim": "184400", "umls": "C0152438", "mesh": "C535802", "gard": "7693", "meddra": "10010455"}, {"name": "SPR-Mangel", "sub_name": "Dopa-responsive Dystonie durch Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Dopa-responsive Dystonie (DRD; siehe dort) durch Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Mangel (SRD) ist eine sehr seltene neurometabolische Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch tageszeitlich fluktuierende Dystonie, Stammhypotonie, okulogyre Krisen und verz\u00f6gerte motorische und kognitive Entwicklung.", "synonyms": "DRD durch SRD, SPR-Mangel, Sepiapterin-Reduktase-Defizienz, Sepiapterin-Reduktase-defiziente DRD, autosomal-rezessiv, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G24.1", "OMIM": "612716", "UMLS": "C0268468", "GARD": "10365", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden etwa 43 F\u00e4lle beschrieben", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit beginnt in der Regel im 1. Lebensjahr mit Symptomen von Dystonie, mit motorischer und sprachlicher Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Schw\u00e4che, Stammhypotonie, Hypotonie der Gliedmassen in tetraplegischem Muster und okulogyren Krisen mit diurnalen Fluktuationen (st\u00e4rker in der Nacht und besser am Morgen nach dem Schlaf). \u00c4ltere Kinder haben h\u00e4ufig Schlafst\u00f6rungen und psychologische Symptome (Angst, Irritabilit\u00e4t). H\u00e4ufig werden intellektuelle Defizite bemerkt, bei einigen Patienten besteht aber eventuell nur eine leichte bis moderate Lernst\u00f6rung. Weniger h\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Parkinsonismus (Tremor, Bradykinesie, Rigidit\u00e4t, Maskengesicht), Dysarthrie, Hyperreflexie, Hypertonie der Gliedmassen und vegetative Symptome. H\u00e4ufig entwickeln sich die Dystonie und die auff\u00e4lligen tageszeitlichen Schwankungen erst im Verlauf der Erkrankung, w\u00e4hrend im Kleinkindalter unspezifische Symptome wie Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und Hypotonie h\u00e4ufig sind.", "etiology": "Ursache der DRD durch SRD sind Mutationen im SPR-Gen (2p14-p12). Es kodiert f\u00fcr das Enzym Sepiapterin-Reduktase (SR). Verschiedene Mutationen in diesem Gen f\u00fchren zu verminderter SR-Aktivit\u00e4t mit der Folge einer verminderten Produktion von Monoamin-Neurotransmittenr.", "diagnostic_methods": "Charakteristische Befunde in der Zerebrospinalfl\u00fcssigkeit (CSF) sind niedrige Spiegel der 5-Hydroxyindolessigs\u00e4ure (5-HIAA) und Homovanillins\u00e4ure (HVA) und erh\u00f6hte Spiegel der Gesamt-Biopterine und des Dihydrobiopterins (BH2). Die SR-Aktivit\u00e4t in Fibroblasten ist in der Regel vermindert oder fehlt ganz. Durch den Nachweis von Mutationen im SPR-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differenzialdiagnosen sind andere Formen der DRD, wie die autosomal-rezessive DRD und die autosomal-dominante DRD (siehe diese Termini), im Kleinkindalter beginnender Parkinsonismus, im Kleinkindalter beginnende spastische Paraplegie, einige Formen von Epilepsie und Zerebralparese.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannten SPR-Mutationen ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Den Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Wie andere Formen der DRD spricht auch die DRD durch SR-Mangel dramatisch auf die Levodopa (L-Dopa)-Therapie an. L-Dopa wird oft mit peripheren Dekarboxylase-Inhibitoren wie Carbidopa oder Benserazid kombiniert. Um irreversible neurologische Sch\u00e4den zu vermeiden, sollte fr\u00fchestm\u00f6glich mit der Behandlung begonnen werden. Die Dosis von L-Dopa kann von 0,1-16,0 mg/kg/Tag reichen. H\u00e4ufig treten nach Beginn der Behandlung transiente Dyskinesien auf, die in der Regel nach Reduzierung der Dosis sistieren. Bei Patienten mit ungen\u00fcgender Besserung der Symptome unter L-Dopa-Therapie soll 5-Hydroxytrytophan (5-HTP) in einer Dosierung von 0,15-6 mg/kg/Tag zusammen mit Carbidopa (zur Reduzierung von Nebenwirkungen) gegeben werden, da die Kombinationstherapie zu einer weiteren Besserung der motorischen Symptome und der Schlafst\u00f6rungen f\u00fchren kann. Die Behandlung erfolgt lebenslang.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch den Zeitpunkt des Behandlungsbeginns und durch die Schwere der Erkrankung bestimmt. Behandelte Patienten erleben eine signifikante Besserung, w\u00e4hrend bei versp\u00e4tet begonnener Behandlung die meisten Patienten leichte motorische und manchmal schwere kognitive Symptome zeigen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden etwa 43 F\u00e4lle beschrieben"}, {"name": "SPS", "sub_name": "Stiff-person-Spektrum-Erkrankungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Stiff-man Syndrom (SMS) ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung. Ihre Symptome sind progressive und fluktuierende Muskelversteifung an Rumpf und Gliedma\u00dfen, schmerzhaft einschie\u00dfende Muskelspasmen, aufgaben-spezifische Angst frei zu gehen, gesteigerte Schreckhaftigkeit und ankylosierende Skelettdeformierungen, am h\u00e4ufigsten fixierte lumbale Hyperlordose.", "synonyms": "Moersch-Woltman-Syndrom, SMS, SPS, SPSD, Stiff-man-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "184850", "UMLS": "C0085292", "GARD": "5023", "MedDRA": "10042044", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome entwickeln sich schleichend \u00fcber Monate oder Jahre. Die Rigidit\u00e4t ist symmetrisch und macht Rumpf und H\u00fcften immobil. Der Gang wird steifbeinig und bizarr. Die \u00fcberlagernd einschiessenden schmerzhaften Spasmen k\u00f6nnen schwere St\u00fcrze verursachen. Die aufgaben-spezifische Phobie, freie Fl\u00e4chen zu betreten, kann pl\u00f6tzliche Gangblockaden, Spasmen und St\u00fcrze verursachen. Neurologische Fokalsymptome fehlen beim SMS, aber Muskelsteifigkeit und myoklonische Spasmen syndromal verkn\u00fcpft mit neurologischen Fokalsymptomen kommen bei der 'Plus-'Variante des SMS vor, der progressiven Enzephalomyelitis mit Rigidit\u00e4t und Myoklonien (PERM). Eine 'Minus'-Variante ist das Stiff limb-Syndrom (SLS), bei dem nur eine Gliedma\u00dfe betroffen ist.", "etiology": "Viele Patienten mit SMS, SLS oder PERM haben Insulin-bed\u00fcrftigen Diabetes mellitus (30%), Autoimmun-Thyreoiditis (10%), atrophische Gastritis mit pernizi\u00f6ser An\u00e4mie (5%), und einige haben Tumoren der Brust, der Lunge oder des Dickdarms. Das Vorhandensein von Autoantik\u00f6rpern (abs) gegen verschiedene Proteine inhibitorischer ZNS-Synapsen wie z.B. Glutamat-Dekarboxylase (GAD; > 70 %), Glycin Rezeptoren (ca 10 %), Amphiphysin (ca 4 %) oder DPPX legt eine autoimmun vermittelte Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der inhibitorischen Neurotransmission nahe.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert vor allem auf der klinischen Untersuchung. Sie wird unterst\u00fctzt durch den Nachweis von antineuronalen abs und durch charakteristische elektromyographische Normabweichungen. Die Untersuchung des Liquors ist einerseits notwendig zum Nachweis antineuronaler abs, andererseits um eine floride Entz\u00fcndung auszuschliessen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfa\u00dft atypische Manifestationen spinaler Erkrankungen, z.B. Multiple Sklerose oder Tumoren, axiale Dystonie, Neuromyotonie, erworbene Hyperekplexie (startle disease) und psychogene Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Benzodiazepine und Baclofen sind die Standardmedikamente f\u00fcr die symptomatische Behandlung. Immunmodulierende Therapien (Kortikosteroide, i.v. Immunglobuline und Plasmapherese) wurden mit unterschiedlichem Erfolg eingesetzt. In der Mehrzahl der Patienten mit SMS, SLS und PERM lassen sich so die Symptome beherrschen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken."}, {"name": "SPSD", "sub_name": "Stiff-person-Spektrum-Erkrankungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Stiff-man Syndrom (SMS) ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung. Ihre Symptome sind progressive und fluktuierende Muskelversteifung an Rumpf und Gliedma\u00dfen, schmerzhaft einschie\u00dfende Muskelspasmen, aufgaben-spezifische Angst frei zu gehen, gesteigerte Schreckhaftigkeit und ankylosierende Skelettdeformierungen, am h\u00e4ufigsten fixierte lumbale Hyperlordose.", "synonyms": "Moersch-Woltman-Syndrom, SMS, SPS, SPSD, Stiff-man-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "184850", "UMLS": "C0085292", "GARD": "5023", "MedDRA": "10042044", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome entwickeln sich schleichend \u00fcber Monate oder Jahre. Die Rigidit\u00e4t ist symmetrisch und macht Rumpf und H\u00fcften immobil. Der Gang wird steifbeinig und bizarr. Die \u00fcberlagernd einschiessenden schmerzhaften Spasmen k\u00f6nnen schwere St\u00fcrze verursachen. Die aufgaben-spezifische Phobie, freie Fl\u00e4chen zu betreten, kann pl\u00f6tzliche Gangblockaden, Spasmen und St\u00fcrze verursachen. Neurologische Fokalsymptome fehlen beim SMS, aber Muskelsteifigkeit und myoklonische Spasmen syndromal verkn\u00fcpft mit neurologischen Fokalsymptomen kommen bei der 'Plus-'Variante des SMS vor, der progressiven Enzephalomyelitis mit Rigidit\u00e4t und Myoklonien (PERM). Eine 'Minus'-Variante ist das Stiff limb-Syndrom (SLS), bei dem nur eine Gliedma\u00dfe betroffen ist.", "etiology": "Viele Patienten mit SMS, SLS oder PERM haben Insulin-bed\u00fcrftigen Diabetes mellitus (30%), Autoimmun-Thyreoiditis (10%), atrophische Gastritis mit pernizi\u00f6ser An\u00e4mie (5%), und einige haben Tumoren der Brust, der Lunge oder des Dickdarms. Das Vorhandensein von Autoantik\u00f6rpern (abs) gegen verschiedene Proteine inhibitorischer ZNS-Synapsen wie z.B. Glutamat-Dekarboxylase (GAD; > 70 %), Glycin Rezeptoren (ca 10 %), Amphiphysin (ca 4 %) oder DPPX legt eine autoimmun vermittelte Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der inhibitorischen Neurotransmission nahe.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert vor allem auf der klinischen Untersuchung. Sie wird unterst\u00fctzt durch den Nachweis von antineuronalen abs und durch charakteristische elektromyographische Normabweichungen. Die Untersuchung des Liquors ist einerseits notwendig zum Nachweis antineuronaler abs, andererseits um eine floride Entz\u00fcndung auszuschliessen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfa\u00dft atypische Manifestationen spinaler Erkrankungen, z.B. Multiple Sklerose oder Tumoren, axiale Dystonie, Neuromyotonie, erworbene Hyperekplexie (startle disease) und psychogene Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Benzodiazepine und Baclofen sind die Standardmedikamente f\u00fcr die symptomatische Behandlung. Immunmodulierende Therapien (Kortikosteroide, i.v. Immunglobuline und Plasmapherese) wurden mit unterschiedlichem Erfolg eingesetzt. In der Mehrzahl der Patienten mit SMS, SLS und PERM lassen sich so die Symptome beherrschen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken."}, {"name": "SPSMA", "sub_name": "Muskelatrophie, scapuloperoneale spinale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte Motoneuronenerkrankung, die durch eine vorwiegend motorische axonale periphere Neuropathie gekennzeichnet ist, die sich durch eine fortschreitende skapuloperoneale Muskelatrophie und -schw\u00e4che, Kehlkopfl\u00e4hmung, kongenitales Fehlen von Muskeln und in einigen F\u00e4llen durch Skelettanomalien manifestiert.", "synonyms": "Neurogene scapuloperoneale Amyotrophie vom New England Typ, Neuropathie, scapulo-peroneale, SPSMA, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G12.1", "OMIM": "181405", "UMLS": "C0751335", "GARD": "10314", "epidemiology": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz der skapuloperonealen spinalen Muskelatrophie (SPSMA) ist nicht bekannt. Bis heute wurden weltweit mehr als 30 betroffene Personen beschrieben. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist schwerer betroffen als das weibliche Geschlecht.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit ist in der Regel schon bei Geburt manifest oder beginnt im S\u00e4uglingsalter oder in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit. Klinische Kennzeichen der SPSMA sind eine Muskelatrophie der Schultern, der Peronealmuskeln und der kleinen Handmuskeln, die zu einer distalen Schw\u00e4che vorwiegend der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen f\u00fchrt, sowie Muskelschwund und -schw\u00e4che der Brustmuskeln. Die Patienten zeigen Schwierigkeiten beim Gehen auf den Fersen, Scapula alata und verringerte oder fehlende tiefe Sehnenreflexe. Andere h\u00e4ufig berichtete Merkmale sind Stimmbandl\u00e4hmung, Skoliose und/oder Arthrogrypose. Beschriebene Skelettanomalien umfassen kongenitale H\u00fcftdysplasie, kurze Gliedma\u00dfen/Gliedma\u00dfenl\u00e4ngendiskrepanz, bilateralen kongenitalen Klumpfu\u00df, Mittelfu\u00dfdysplasie, spondylometaphys\u00e4re Dysplasie, Platyspondylie, metatropische Dysplasie und/oder leichten Kleinwuchs. Ein geringf\u00fcgig verminderter Vibrationssinn kann ebenfalls assoziiert sein. Die Krankheit hat einen langsamen klinischen Verlauf und ein variables Auspr\u00e4gungsmuster, das von einem schweren neonatalen Beginn bis zu milden Symptomen reicht, die erst im Erwachsenenalter auftreten.", "etiology": "Das urs\u00e4chliche Gen der SPSMA ist TRPV4 (12q23-q24.1), das f\u00fcr einen nicht-selektiven Kalzium-Kationenkanal kodiert, von dem angenommen wird, dass er an der Regulation des systemischen osmotischen Drucks und der Mechanosensitivit\u00e4t beteiligt ist.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den klinischen Manifestationen, der Familienanamnese und den Biopsiebefunden, die eine ausgepr\u00e4gte Fasertypgruppierung und -atrophie, einen ausgedehnten Fetteinbau, eine verst\u00e4rkte endomysiale Fibrose, eine markante Variabilit\u00e4t der Fasergr\u00f6\u00dfe, eine Faseraufspaltung und viele Fasern mit mehreren internen Kernen zeigen. Die pathologischen Ver\u00e4nderungen sind besonders schwerwiegend im Zwillingswadenmuskel. Eine Atrophie sowohl der Typ-1- als auch der Typ-2-Fasern kann mit ATPase-F\u00e4rbung beobachtet werden. Die Elektroradiographie zeigt reduzierte zusammengesetzte motorische Aktionspotentiale (cMAPS), aber normale sensorische Aktionspotentiale und Nervenleitgeschwindigkeiten. Hirn- und R\u00fcckenmarkschnitte zeigen eine normale Anzahl von motorischen Neuronen im motorischen Komplex und im R\u00fcckenmark. Genetische Tests, die eine pathogene Mutation zeigen, best\u00e4tigen die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst die Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 2C, die kongenitale distale spinale Muskelatrophie, das neurogene skapuloperoneale Syndrom Typ Kaeser und die fazioskapulohumeralen Dystrophie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannter Mutation in der Familie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "SPSMA wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Wenn ein Elternteil eine TRPV4-Mutation tr\u00e4gt, betr\u00e4gt das Wiederholungsrisiko 50%. Eine fr\u00fchzeitige Diagnose ist entscheidend, um die schwerere kongenitale Form zu verhindern, da die Krankheit in den nachfolgenden Generationen tendenziell fortschreitender und schwerer ist.", "management_and_treatment": "Es gibt bis heute keine wirksame Behandlung.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist nicht so schlecht, auch wenn die Probleme beim Gehen zu St\u00fcrzen und zur Entwicklung von arthrotischen Problemen f\u00fchren, die zusammen mit den dysmorphen Aspekten und der distalen Schw\u00e4che zur Verschlimmerung der motorischen Probleme beitragen. Im Allgemeinen ist die Atemmuskulatur nicht betroffen.", "summary": "Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz der skapuloperonealen spinalen Muskelatrophie (SPSMA) ist nicht bekannt. Bis heute wurden weltweit mehr als 30 betroffene Personen beschrieben. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist schwerer betroffen als das weibliche Geschlecht."}, {"name": "SPTCL", "sub_name": "T-Zell-Lymphom, subkutanes Pannikulitis-\u00e4hnliches", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "SPTCL, T-Zell-Lymphom, pannikulitisches subkutanes, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "C83.6", "OMIM": "618398", "UMLS": "C0522624", "MeSH": "C537503", "GARD": "10193", "summary": "Das Subkutane Pannikulitis-artige T-Zell-Lymphom (SPTCL) ist ein seltenes zytotoxisches Lymphom der Haut. Es wurde als besonderer Subtyp peripherer T-Zell-Lymphome erkannt, die prim\u00e4r im subkutanen Fettgewebe entstehen und sich dort manifestieren. Das SPTCL ist gekennzeichnet durch solit\u00e4re oder multiple erythemat\u00f6se subkutane Kn\u00f6tchen und Plaques (Proliferation von T-Lymphozyten und Makrophagen in den subkutanen Fettl\u00e4ppchen), die an den unteren Extremit\u00e4ten oder mehr generalisiert in Vielzahl auftreten. Die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Ein leichtes \u00dcberwiegen des weiblichen Geschlechtes wurde beschrieben. Allgemeinsymptome sind Fieber, Sch\u00fcttelfrost, Unwohlsein und Gewichtsverlust. Hinzu kommen Hepatosplenomegalie, Schleimhautgeschw\u00fcre und ser\u00f6se Erg\u00fcsse. Das SPTCL ist in 30-40% der F\u00e4lle mit einem h\u00e4mophagozyt\u00e4ren Syndrom (gekennzeichnet durch Proliferation von Histiozyten und Phagozytose von Blutzellen, Hepatosplenomegalie, und Gerinnungsst\u00f6rung) vergesellschaftet, das zum Tod f\u00fchren kann. Die \u00c4tiologie ist nicht ganz gekl\u00e4rt. Einige Autoren vermuten, dass eine Beziehung zwischen dem subkutanen T-Zell-Lymphom und der zytophagisch-histiozyt\u00e4ren Pannikulitis besteht. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an andere Lymphome, an eine atypische lobul\u00e4re Pannikulitis und an die zytophagisch-histiozyt\u00e4re Pannikulitis zu denken. Zur Sicherung der Diagnose sind evtl. mehrere Biopsien erforderlich. Die meisten Patienten sprechen auf eine systemische Chemotherapie (Cyclophosphamid, Doxorubicin, Vincristin und Prednison) oder lokale Strahlentherapie an. "}, {"name": "SQTS", "sub_name": "Short-QT-Syndrom, famili\u00e4res", "german_description": "Das Famili\u00e4re Short-QT-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch ein kurzes QT-Intervall (QT und QTc 300 ms) im EKG, verbunden mit einem hohen Risiko f\u00fcr Synkopen oder pl\u00f6tzlichen Herztod durch maligne Kammerarrhythmien. Dieses au\u00dferordentlich seltene Syndrom betrifft haupts\u00e4chlich Kleinkinder und junge Erwachsene. Das sehr weite klinische Spektrum reicht von symptomlosen Tr\u00e4gern bis zur Synkope oder pl\u00f6tzlichem Herztod. H\u00e4ufig tritt auch Vorhofflimmern auf. Bei den Patienten wurden Mutationen in drei verschienen Genen (KCNQ1, KCNH2, und KCNJ2) gefunden, die alle f\u00fcr Kalium-Kan\u00e4le kodieren. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Expressionsstudien belegen eine \u00dcberfunktion der mutierten Kan\u00e4le mit verk\u00fcrzter Dauer des Aktionspotentials. Dies erkl\u00e4rt die Verk\u00fcrzung des QT-Intervalls. Bei elektrophysiologischen Untersuchungen wurde eine verk\u00fcrzte atriale und ventrikul\u00e4re Refrakt\u00e4rzeit gefunden. Bei den meisten Patienten kann ein Kammerflimmern induziert werden. Gegenw\u00e4rtig ist die Implantation von automatischen Defibrillatoren die einzig wirksame Behandlung, um beim Short-QT-Syndrom einem pl\u00f6tzlichen Herztod vorzubeugen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic cardiac rhythm disease characterized by a short QTc interval on the surface electrocardiogram (ECG) with a high risk of syncope or sudden death due to malignant ventricular arrhythmia.", "synonyms": "SQTS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I49.8", "omim": "609620\u00a0 609621\u00a0 609622", "epidemiology": "This extremely rare syndrome affects mainly young adults or infants and has been reported in nearly 80 families. The disease has been predominantly reported in males.", "clinical_description": "Whilst the disease may remain asymptomatic, the most common clinical presentation is a cardiac arrest (CA), with approximately 40% of patients suffering an episode of CA between birth and 40 years of age. Other symptoms include syncope and arrhythmias including atrial fibrillation, ventricular fibrillation (VF), supraventricular tachycardia (SVT), and polymorphic ventricular tachycardia. There is a high risk of recurrent arrhythmic events in symptomatic patients. The risk of sudden cardiac death (SDC) is highest in the first year of life and between 20 to 40 years.", "etiology": "Mutations in the genes KCNQ1 (11p15.5), KCNH2 (7q36.1), and KCNJ2 (17q24.3), encoding cardiac ionic potassium channels, and the gene encoding the calcium channel, CACNA2D1 (7q21.11), have been identified in affected patients. 40% of patients do not have a genetic cause identified.", "diagnostic_methods": "According to the European Society of Cardiology Guidelines, SQTS is diagnosed by the presence of a corrected QT (QTc) interval less than or equal to 340 ms on resting 12-lead ECG or should be considered in the presence of a QTc less than or equal 360 ms and one or more of the following: a confirmed pathogenic mutation, a family history of SQTS, a family history of sudden death at young age (less than 40 years of age), or history of ventricular tachyarrhythmia/ventricular fibrillation (VT/VF) in the absence of heart disease. When a patient is diagnosed, clinical assessment is recommended in all family members, including an ECG in newborns.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other repolarizing disorders such as Brugada syndrome and early repolarization syndrome. Of note, a few rare patients with Brugada syndrome have been reported to have a short QTc.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal dominant. Genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. First-degree relatives of an affected individual have a 50% risk of being affected. Sporadic cases have also been reported.", "management_and_treatment": "Currently, an automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator (ICD) is recommended for patients who have experienced a sustained VT/VF episode or have survived an aborted cardiac arrest. However, ICD is complicated by a high probability of inappropriate ICD shocks, particularly in pediatric patients, and requires appropriate programming to prevent T-wave oversensing. Quinidine prophylaxis may be considered in patients where ICD is contraindicated/refused or in asymptomatic SQTS patients with a family history of SDC. Patients on quinidine should be carefully monitored for QT prolongation and possible pro-arrhythmic events.", "prognosis": "The risk of sudden cardiac death is high, and a history of survived cardiac arrest at the initial presentation is a strong predictor of recurrent ventricular arrhythmias over the course of time."}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom der Gallenblase und extrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom der Gallenblase und extrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Plattenepithelkarzinom der Gallenblase und der extrahepatischen Gallenwege ist ein seltener Leber- und Gallenwegtumor. Es entsteht entweder in der Gallenblase selbst oder im Epithel, das den extrahepatischen Gallenbaum, den Ductus cysticus und die peribili\u00e4ren Dr\u00fcsen auskleidet. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch eine starke Keratinisierung mit reichlich Keratohyalingranula und zentraler Ablagerung von dichtem Keratinmaterial innerhalb infiltrativer Nester und lokal aggressiver Natur. In den fr\u00fchen Stadien der Erkrankung sind die Symptome vage und unspezifisch (Bauchschmerzen, Gelbsucht und Erbrechen). In den fortgeschrittenen Stadien kann es sich um einen volumin\u00f6sen Tumor und Symptome einer Beteiligung benachbarter Organe handeln.", "synonyms": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom der Gallenblase und extrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C23\u00a0 C24.0\u00a0 C24.1\u00a0 C24.8\u00a0 C24.9"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom der Leber und intrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom der Leber und intrahepatischen Galleng\u00e4nge", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Squamous cell carcinoma of liver and intrahepatic biliary tract is an extremely rare, primary, malignant liver and biliray tract epithelial tumor originating in the intrahepatic bile duct epithelium histologically characterized by the presence of keratinization and/or intracellular bridges. Patients typically present abdominal pain in the right upper quadrant, jaundice, nausea, vomiting, anorexia, weight loss, fever and/or dyspepsia.", "synonyms": "Squamous cell carcinoma of liver and IBT, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C22.0\u00a0 C22.1"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Analkanals", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom des Analkanals", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Plattenepithelkarzinom des Analkanals ist ein seltene epitheliale intestinale Neoplasie, die von Plattenepithelzellen im Analkanal ausgeht und ein variables makroskopisches Erscheinungsbild aufweist, das von kleinen, gutartigen L\u00e4sionen (die Fissuren, H\u00e4morrhoiden oder anorektale Fisteln imitieren) bis hin zu einem gro\u00dfen, exophytischen oder ulzerierenden Tumor reicht, der im Analkanal lokalisiert ist. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen asymptomatisch sein oder Schwierigkeiten bei der Def\u00e4kation, anale Blutungen, Schmerzen und/oder Ausfluss aufweisen und haben oft eine Vorgeschichte mit chronischen Analfisteln und -abszessen, Morbus Crohn, H\u00e4morrhoiden oder, besonders bei j\u00fcngeren Patienten, eine Immunsuppression (z. B. HIV-Infektion). Ein Zusammenhang mit einer HPV-Infektion wird h\u00e4ufig berichtet.", "synonyms": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Analkanals, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C21.1"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des D\u00fcnndarms", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom des D\u00fcnndarms", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Plattenepithelkarzinom des D\u00fcnndarms ist ein extrem seltener, b\u00f6sartiger, epithelialer Tumor des D\u00fcnndarms (am h\u00e4ufigsten im Zw\u00f6lffingerdarm lokalisiert). Die Symptome sind oft unspezifisch (z. B. Gewichtsverlust, epigastrische Schmerzen, Anorexie, Schw\u00e4che, M\u00fcdigkeit, Erbrechen und Bl\u00e4hbauch) und variieren je nach Lokalisation des Tumors. In fortgeschrittenen F\u00e4llen k\u00f6nnen gastrointestinale Blutungen und Perforationen auftreten.", "synonyms": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des D\u00fcnndarms, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "C17.0\u00a0 C17.1\u00a0 C17.2\u00a0 C17.3\u00a0 C17.8"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Kolons", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom des Dickdarms", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Plattenepithelkarzinom (SCC) des Kolons ist ein seltener Epitheltumor des Kolons, der aus Plattenepithelzellen des kolorektalen Epithels entsteht, ohne dass Plattenepithel-gef\u00fctterte Fistelg\u00e4nge oder eine proximale Ausdehnung eines analen SCC vorhanden sind. Es pr\u00e4sentiert sich in der Regel mit unspezifischen Symptomen, wie Anorexie, Gewichtsverlust, Bauchschmerzen, Ver\u00e4nderungen der Stuhlgewohnheiten, H\u00e4matochezie oder Mel\u00e4na. Es wurden F\u00e4lle von schwerer, symptomatischer Hyperkalz\u00e4mie berichtet.", "synonyms": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Kolons, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C18.0\u00a0 C18.2\u00a0 C18.3\u00a0 C18.4\u00a0 C18.5\u00a0 C18.6\u00a0 C18.7\u00a0 C18.8\u00a0 C18.9"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Magens", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom des Magens", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Plattenepithelkarzinom des Magens ist ein seltener epithelialer Tumor des Magens, histopathologisch definiert als keratinisierende Zellmassen mit Perlenbildung, mosaikartige Zellanordnung, interzellul\u00e4ren Br\u00fccken und hohen Konzentrationen von Sulfhydryl- oder Disulfidbindungen, die direkt von der Magenschleimhaut ausgehen, ohne Beteiligung des \u00d6sophagus. Es tritt bevorzugt im oberen Drittel des Magens auf und zeigt eine hohe Wahrscheinlichkeit einer lymphovaskul\u00e4ren und serosalen Invasion. Die klinischen Symptome treten typischerweise sp\u00e4t auf und sind mit einer schlechten Prognose verbunden. Unspezifische Symptome sind Bauchschmerzen, Dysphagie, Erbrechen, Mel\u00e4na oder H\u00e4matochezie, H\u00e4matemesis und Gewichtsverlust.", "synonyms": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Magens, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "C16.0\u00a0 C16.1\u00a0 C16.2\u00a0 C16.3\u00a0 C16.4\u00a0 C16.5\u00a0 C16.8"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Pankreas", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom des Pankreas", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Squamous cell carcinoma of the pancreas is a rare epithelial tumor of the exocrine pancreas, histologically characterized by presence of keratinization and/or intracellular bridges and lymphovascular and perineural invasion, as well as high metastatic potential. Patients present with upper abdominal and back pain, anorexia, weight loss, nausea, vomiting and jaundice.", "synonyms": "Pancreatic squamous cell carcinoma, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C25.0\u00a0 C25.1\u00a0 C25.2\u00a0 C25.7\u00a0 C25.8"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Penis", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom des Penis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare urogenital tumor characterized by origin from squamous epithelial cells of the penis, most commonly the glans or inner surface of the prepuce. Macroscopically, the tumors can appear either papillary or flat and ulcerating. Histological subtypes include usual squamous cell carcinoma as the most common type, as well as basaloid, warty, verrucous, papillary, and mixed carcinomas. Patients may initially be asymptomatic but present with itching, bleeding, discharge, foul odor, and pain, as the disease progresses. Regional lymph node involvement is common, while distant metastases occur only late in the disease. Risk factors include HPV infection, smoking, poor hygiene, and HIV infection. Neonatal circumcision is implicated as strongly protective.", "synonyms": "Penile squamous cell carcinoma, ", "age_of_onset": "Elderly", "icd_10": "C60.0\u00a0 C60.1\u00a0 C60.2\u00a0 C60.8\u00a0 C60.9", "umls": "C0238348"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Rektums", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom des Rektums", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Plattenepithelkarzinom (SCC) des Rektums ist ein seltener Epitheltumor, der aus Plattenepithelzellen des Rektumepithels entsteht, ohne das Vorhandensein von mit Plattenepithel ausgekleideten Fistelg\u00e4ngen im Rektum oder eine proximale Ausdehnung des SCC analen oder gyn\u00e4kologischen Ursprungs. Die berichteten Symptome sind oft unspezifisch, wie z. B. Anorexie, Gewichtsverlust, Unterbauchschmerzen, rektale Blutungen und Ver\u00e4nderungen der Stuhlgewohnheiten.", "synonyms": "Squam\u00f6ses Karzinom des Rektums, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C20", "UMLS": "C1335690"}, {"name": "Squam\u00f6ses Zellkarzinom der Vulva", "sub_name": "Plattenepithelkarzinom der Vulva", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare vulvar carcinoma characterized by an ulcer, nodule, macule, or pedunculated mass which is histologically composed of infiltrating islands of malignant squamous cells. Histological subtypes include keratinizing, non-keratinizing, basaloid, warty, and verrucous carcinomas. Some tumors are associated with human papilloma virus, smoking, high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, chronic vulvar inflammatory disorders, or differentiated vulvar intraepithelial neoplasia. Patients may present with discharge, bleeding, or pain. Most important prognostic features are tumor depth and lymph node status.", "synonyms": "Squamous cell carcinoma of the vulva, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult, Elderly", "icd_10": "C51.8"}, {"name": "SRD5A3-CDG", "english": 0, "defenition": "SRD5A3-CDG ist eine seltene, nicht kongenitale Glykosylierungsst\u00f6rung, die auf einem Steroid-5-alpha-Reduktase-Typ-3-Mangel beruht. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch einen sehr variablen Ph\u00e4notyp, der sich typischerweise in einer schweren Sehbehinderung \u00e4u\u00dfert und variable Augenanomalien (wie Hypoplasie/Atrophie des Sehnervs, Iris- und Sehnervkolobom, kongenitaler Katarakt, Glaukom), Intelligenzminderung, Kleinhirnanomalien, Nystagmus, Hypotonie, Ataxie und/oder ichthyosiforme Hautver\u00e4nderungen umfasst. Andere gemeldete Manifestationen umfassen Retinitis pigmentosa, Kyphose, kongenitale Herzfehler, Hypertrichose und Gerinnungsst\u00f6rungen.", "synonyms": "CDG (Congenital Disorder of Glycosylation) Typ Iq, CDG-Iq, CDG-Syndrom Iq, CDG1Q, Kohlenhydrat-defizientes Glykoprotein-Syndrom Iq, Kongenitaler Defekt der Glycoproteinbiosynthese Typ Iq, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "OMIM": "612379", "UMLS": "C3150191", "GARD": "12397"}, {"name": "SREAT", "sub_name": "Steroid-responsive Enzephalopathie mit assoziierter Autoimmun-Thyroiditis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Steroid-responsive encephalopathy associated with autoimmune thyroiditis (SREAT) is a rare, acquired, neurological disease characterized by encephalopathy associated with elevated antithyroid antibodies, in the absence of other causes. Clinical presentation varies from minor cognitive impairment to status epilepticus and coma, and frequently includes seizures, confusion, speech disorder, memory impairment, ataxia and psychiatric manifestations.", "synonyms": "Hashimoto encephalitis, SREAT, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G04.8", "umls": "C0393639", "gard": "8570"}, {"name": "SRP", "sub_name": "Ziliopathie mit vorwiegend skelettaler Beteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Kurzrippen-Dysplasie, SRP, ", "ICD-10": "Q77.2", "OMIM": "617405", "UMLS": "C0432195", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "SSADH-Mangel", "sub_name": "Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase (SSADH)-Mangel ist eine seltene neurometabolische St\u00f6rung des Gamma-Aminobutters\u00e4ure (GABA)-Stoffwechsels mit einer unspezifischen klinischen Pr\u00e4sentation (von leicht bis schwer). Die h\u00e4ufigsten Symptome sind kognitive Einschr\u00e4nkung mit ausgepr\u00e4gtem Defizit der expressiven Sprache, Hypotonie, Ataxie, Epilepsie und Verhaltensst\u00f6rung.", "synonyms": "4-Hydroxybutyrazidurie, Bernsteins\u00e4ure-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase-Mangel, Gamma-Hydroxybutyrazidurie, SSADH-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E72.8", "OMIM": "271980", "UMLS": "C0268631", "GARD": "7695", "epidemiology": "In der Literatur sind bisher ungef\u00e4hr 450 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das durchschnittliche Alter bei Krankheitsbeginn betr\u00e4gt 11 Monate. Im Gegensatz zu vielen anderen metabolischen Enzephalopathien zeigen Patienten keine Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Hyperammon\u00e4mie oder intermittierende Lethargie. S\u00e4uglinge zeigen f\u00fcr gew\u00f6hnlich eine langsam progrediente oder statische Enzephalopathie, welche sich in Hypotonie, Hyporeflexie, Ataxie und verz\u00f6gertem Erreichens von Meilensteinen der motorischen und Sprachentwicklung in den ersten beiden Lebensjahren \u00e4u\u00dfert. Krampfanf\u00e4lle treten bei mehr als der H\u00e4lfte aller Betroffenen auf; \u00fcblicherweise als tonisch-klonische Anf\u00e4lle oder atypische Absencen. Geistige Behinderung, psychiatrische Manifestationen (z. B. Aufmerksamkeitsdefizit-Hyperaktivit\u00e4tssyndrom und Aggressivit\u00e4t im Kindesalter, Zwangs- und Angstst\u00f6rungen im Jugend- und Erwachsenenalter) und Schlafst\u00f6rungen werden h\u00e4ufig beobachtet. Hyperkinetisches Verhalten, selbstverletzendes Verhalten und Halluzinationen werden bei der H\u00e4lfte aller Patienten beschrieben. Eine pl\u00f6tzlich auftretende und fr\u00fch beginnende Variante der Erkrankung findet sich bei bis zu 10 % der Patienten und ist durch extrapyramidale Zeichen und einem mitunter progredienten Verlauf gekennzeichnet.", "etiology": "Ursache f\u00fcr SSADH-Mangel sind Mutationen im ALDH5A1-Gen (6p22), welches f\u00fcr die mitochondriale Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase kodiert, ein am Aminos\u00e4ureabbau beteiligtes Protein. Eine mangelhafte SSADH-Enzymaktivit\u00e4t hemmt den Abbau von GABA, des wichtigsten inhibitorischen Transmitters im Gehirn. Dies f\u00fchrt zu erh\u00f6hten Konzentrationen eines vermutlich toxischen Metabolitens, Gamma-Hydroxybutyrat (GHB), welches sich in K\u00f6rperfl\u00fcssigkeiten einschlie\u00dflich Blut, Urin und Liquor nachweisen l\u00e4sst.", "diagnostic_methods": "Der wichtigste laborchemische diagnostische Hinweis auf einen SSADH-Mangel ist der Nachweis erh\u00f6hter GHB bei der Bestimmung organischer S\u00e4uren im Urin. Im Plasma ist GHB erh\u00f6ht, Lymphozyten zeigen eine verringerte SSADH-Enzymaktivit\u00e4t. Im Liquor sind GHB und GABA erh\u00f6ht. Die kraniale MR-Bildgebung zeigt in der T2-Wichtung bilaterale oft symmetrische Signalverst\u00e4rkungen im Globus Pallidus, den zerebell\u00e4ren Nuclei dentati und den subthalamischen Nuclei. Das Elektroenzephalogramm zeigt vor allem eine Grundaktivit\u00e4tsverlangsamung und Spike-Entladungen. Der molekulargenetische Nachweis einer Mutation im ALDH5A1-Gen best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen beinhalten Gamma-Aminobutters\u00e4ure-Transaminase-Mangel und Homocarnosinose (siehe dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine Pr\u00e4natal-Diagnostik in Familien mit bekannter krankheitsverursachender Mutation ist m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "SSADH-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung wird empfohlen.", "management_and_treatment": "Da es bislang noch keine effektive kausale Behandlung gibt, zielt die Langzeitbehandlung auf die pharmakologische Kontrolle der Begleiterkrankungen (typischerweise Krampfanf\u00e4lle und neuropsychiatrische St\u00f6rungen). Carbamazepin und Lamotrigin sind effektive Mittel zur Kontrolle der Krampfanf\u00e4lle. Angstst\u00f6rungen, Aggressivit\u00e4t, Unaufmerksamkeit und Halluzinationen k\u00f6nnen mit Benzodiazepinen, Methylphenidat, Thioridazin, Risperidon oder Fluoxetin behandelt werden. Physio- und Ergotherapie, sensorische Integrationstherapie und/oder Logop\u00e4die k\u00f6nnen den Verlauf g\u00fcnstig beeinflussen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist variabel. Die meisten Patienten erreichen das Erwachsenenalter. Einschr\u00e4nkend k\u00f6nnen neuropsychiatrische Symptome und geringe Lebensqualit\u00e4t sein. Fr\u00fche Mortalit\u00e4t, einschlie\u00dflich pl\u00f6tzlichem unerwarteten Tod bei Epilepsiepatienten (sudden unexpected death in epilepsy patients, SUDEP), sind beschrieben.", "summary": "In der Literatur sind bisher ungef\u00e4hr 450 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "SSM-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kr\u00e4mpfe-Skoliose-Makrozephalie-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Seizures-scoliosis-macrocephaly syndrome is a rare, genetic neurometabolic disorder characterized by seizures, macrocephaly, delayed motor milestones, moderate intellectual disability, scoliosis with no exostoses, muscular hypotonia present since birth, as well as renal dysfunction. Coarse facial features (including hypertelorism and long hypoplastic philtrum) and bilateral cryptorchidism (in males) are also commonly reported. Additional manifestations include abnormal gastrointestinal motility (resulting in constipation, diarrhea, gastroesophageal reflux and dysphagia), gait disturbances, strabismus and ventricular septal defects.", "synonyms": "SSM syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "616682"}, {"name": "SSPS", "sub_name": "Sch\u00f6pf-Schulz-Passarge-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Sch\u00f6pf-Schulz-Passarge-Syndrom (SSPS) ist eine seltene, autosomal-rezessiv vererbte ektodermale Dysplasie mit multiplen Hydrokystomen der apokrinen Dr\u00fcsen der Augenlider, mit palmoplantarer Keratodermie, Hypotrichose, Hypodontie und Nageldystrophie.", "synonyms": "Ekkrine Tumore - ektodermale Dysplasie, Palmoplantarkeratose-zystische Augenlider-Hypodontie-Hypotrichose-Syndrom, SSPS, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "Q82.8", "OMIM": "224750", "UMLS": "C1857069", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden mehr als 25 F\u00e4lle mit SSPS beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das SSPS bezeichnet einen abgegrenzten Ph\u00e4notyp von ektodermaler Dysplasie mit relativ gutartigen Verlauf und deshalb sp\u00e4t (oft erst im Erwachsenenalter) gestellter Diagnose. Die Symptome beginnen im Kindesalter und fr\u00fcher Adoleszenz. Die Symptome sind jedoch relativ unspezifisch, mit unterschiedlich ausgepr\u00e4gter Hypodontie, Hypotrichose, palmoplantarer Keratodermie und Nageldystrophie. Ein weiteres, relativ h\u00e4ufiges Symptom ist die teleangieektatische Rosacea. Im sp\u00e4ten Erwachsenenalter treten apokrine Hydrokystome der Augenlider auf. Bei etwa der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle wird eine palmo-plantare Keratodermie mit histologischen Merkmalen eines ekkrinen Syringofibroadenoms gesehen, die gelegentlich ein malignes Potenzial entwickelt. Andere Tumoren der Haut-Adnexen sind: Basalzell-Karzinom, ekkrines Porom, benignes Akanthom und follikul\u00e4rer Infundibulum-Tumor. Einige Patienten haben ein vogelartiges Gesicht. Innerhalb des WNT10A-Mutationsspektrums werden die Odonto-onycho-dermale Dysplasie (siehe dort) und das SSPS als diskrete Entit\u00e4ten angesehen, wobei eine wachsende Zahl von Patienten mit unvollst\u00e4ndigen Ph\u00e4notypen (odonto-onychiale, tricho-odontale und tricho-odonto-onychiale Typen) beschrieben werden", "etiology": "Ursache des SSPS sind homozygote oder compound-heterozygote Mutationen im WNT10A-Gen (2q35). Unvollst\u00e4ndige oder \u00f6rtlich begrenzte Expression der Krankheit bei heterozygotem und mehrfachem Auftreten von Konsanguinit\u00e4t f\u00fchren gelegentlich zu pseudodominanter Vererbung.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Bisher wurden mehr als 25 F\u00e4lle mit SSPS beschrieben."}, {"name": "SSR4-CDG", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "SSR4-CDG is a form of congenital disorders of N-linked glycosylation characterized by neurologic abnormalities (global developmental delay in language, social skills and fine and gross motor development, intellectual disability, hypotonia, microcephaly, seizures/epilepsy), facial dysmorphism (deep set eyes, large ears, hypoplastic vermillion of upper lip, large mouth with widely spaced teeth), feeding problems often due to chewing difficulties and aversion to food with certain textures, failure to thrive, gastrointestinal abnormalities (reflux or vomiting) and strabismus. The disease is caused by mutations in the gene  SSR4 (Xq28).", "synonyms": "CDG syndrome type Iy, CDG-Iy, CDG1Y, Carbohydrate deficient glycoprotein syndrome type Iy, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type 1y, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type Iy, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "300934", "gard": "12405"}, {"name": "SSS", "sub_name": "Sanjad-Sakati-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Sanjad-Sakati-Syndrom (SSS) ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitalen Hypoparathyreoidismus, Kleinwuchs, geistige Retardierung, zerebrale Krampfanf\u00e4lle, Mikrozephalie, Dysmorphien (Anomalien der Fazies, der Augen und der Z\u00e4hne) und kurze H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Das Syndrom steht mit seinen Symptomen der autosomal-rezessiven Form des Kenny-Caffey-Syndroms (KCS, s. dort) sehr nahe. Anders als beim KCS fehlen beim SSS jedoch Osteosklerose und rezidivierende bakterielle Infekte. Durch Kopplungsanalyse wurde gezeigt, da\u00df SSS- und KCS-Locus den gleichen anzestralen Haplotyp in der Chromosomenregion 1q42-q43 aufweisen liegen, sodass eine gemeinsame Gr\u00fcndermutation anzunehmen ist. Tats\u00e4chlich sind sowohl das SSS als auch das ebenfalls autosomal-rezessiv vererbte KCS durch Mutationen (Deletionen und Kettenabbruch-Mutationen) im TBCE-Gen f\u00fcr das Tubulin-spezifische Chaperon E bedingt. Dieses Protein ist am Aufbau der Tubulin-Strukturen beteiligt. Durch den Defekt k\u00f6nnen Proteintransport, Signaltransduktion und/oder Zellmotilit\u00e4t beeintr\u00e4chtigt werden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sanjad-Sakati syndrome (SSS), also known as hypoparathyroidism - intellectual disability-dysmorphism, is a rare multiple congenital anomaly syndrome, mainly occurring in the Middle East and the Arabian Gulf countries, characterized by intrauterine growth restriction at birth, microcephaly, congenital hypoparathyroidism (that can cause hypocalcemic tetany or seizures in infancy), severe growth retardation, typical facial features (long narrow face, deep-set eyes, beaked nose, floppy and large ears, long philtrum, thin lips and micrognathia), and mild to moderate intellectual deficiency. Ocular findings (i.e. nanophthalmos, retinal vascular tortuosity and corneal opacification/clouding) and superior mesenteric artery syndrome have also been reported. Although SSS shares the same locus with the autosomal recessive form of Kenny-Caffey syndrome (see this term), the latter differs from SSS by its normal intelligence and skeletal features.", "synonyms": "HRD syndrome, Hypoparathyroidism-intellectual disability-dysmorphism syndrome, Hypoparathyroidism-short stature-intellectual disability-seizures syndrome, Richardson-Kirk syndrome, SSS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.1", "omim": "241410", "umls": "C1855840", "gard": "411"}, {"name": "SSSS", "sub_name": "Staphylococcal-Scalded-Skin-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare staphylococcal toxemia caused by epidermolytic toxins of Staphylococcus aureus and characterized by the appearance of widespread erythematous patches, on which large blisters develop. Upon rupture of these blisters, the skin appears reddish and scalded. The lesions typically begin in the face and rapidly expand to other parts of the body. The disease may be complicated by pneumonia and sepsis. It most commonly affects newborns and infants.", "synonyms": "Generalized exfoliative disease, SSSS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L00", "umls": "C0038165", "mesh": "D013206", "meddra": "10041929"}, {"name": "SSS-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Staphylococcal-Scalded-Skin-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare staphylococcal toxemia caused by epidermolytic toxins of Staphylococcus aureus and characterized by the appearance of widespread erythematous patches, on which large blisters develop. Upon rupture of these blisters, the skin appears reddish and scalded. The lesions typically begin in the face and rapidly expand to other parts of the body. The disease may be complicated by pneumonia and sepsis. It most commonly affects newborns and infants.", "synonyms": "Generalized exfoliative disease, SSSS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L00", "umls": "C0038165", "mesh": "D013206", "meddra": "10041929"}, {"name": "ST3GAL5-CDG", "sub_name": "GM3-Synthase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "GM3-Synthase-Mangel ist eine seltene angeborene St\u00f6rung der Glykosylierung aufgrund einer gest\u00f6rten Synthese komplexer Gangliosid-Spezies, die zun\u00e4chst durch Reizbarkeit, schlechte Ern\u00e4hrung, Gedeihst\u00f6rung und fr\u00fch einsetzende refrakt\u00e4re Epilepsie gekennzeichnet ist, gefolgt von postnataler Wachstumsst\u00f6rung, schwerer Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung oder Entwicklungsregression, schwerer Intelligenzminderung, Taubheit und Anomalien der Hautpigmentierung (meist sommersprossenartige hyperpigmentierte und depigmentierte Makula). Sehst\u00f6rungen durch kortikale Atrophie (sichtbar in der Magnetresonanztomographie), Choreoathetose und hypotone Tetraparese treten meist schleichend auf. Dysmorphe Gesichtsz\u00fcge k\u00f6nnen assoziiert sein.", "synonyms": "ST3GAL5-CDG, ", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "OMIM": "609056"}, {"name": "St\u00e4bchenmonochromasie", "sub_name": "Achromatopsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Achromatopsie (ACHM) ist eine seltene autosomal-rezessiv vererbte Netzhautst\u00f6rung mit Farbenblindheit, Nystagmus, Photophobie und stark reduzierter Sehsch\u00e4rfe, verursacht durch fehlende oder eingeschr\u00e4nkte Zapfenfunktion.", "synonyms": "ACHM, Farbenblindheit, komplette oder inkomplette, Farbenblindheit, totale, Pingelapesische Blindheit, St\u00e4bchenmonochromasie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "H53.5", "OMIM": "216900\u00a0 262300\u00a0 610024\u00a0 613093\u00a0 613856\u00a0 616517", "UMLS": "C0152200", "MedDRA": "10000454", "epidemiology": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen weltweit bei 1/30,000-1/50,000.", "clinical_description": "Die ACHM ist gekennzeichnet durch verminderte Sehsch\u00e4rfe, Pendelnystagmus, erh\u00f6hte Lichtempfindlichkeit (Photophobie), ein kleines Zentralskotom und verminderte oder ganz fehlende Farbdiskriminierung. Die meisten Betroffenen haben eine vollst\u00e4ndige ACHM mit Funktionsverlust aller drei Zapfentypen. Die unvollst\u00e4ndige ACHM mit \u00e4hnlichen, jedoch weniger schwer ausgepr\u00e4gten Symptomen ist selten.", "etiology": "F\u00fcnf Gene (GNAT2 (1p13), PDE6C (10q24), PDE6H (12p13), CNGA3 (2q11.2) und CNGB3 (8q21.3)) wurden mit ACHM in Verbindung gebracht. Sie alle kodieren Komponenten der visuellen Transduktionskaskade (G-Protein GNAT2 > Phosphodiesterase PDE6C/PDE6H > ", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose der ACHM f\u00fchren die klinisch-ophthalmologische Untersuchung, psychophysische Tests (z.B. Farbensehen) und elektrophysiologische Untersuchungen (Elektroretinoraphie; ERG). Die skotopischen Antworten sind normal, die photopischen Antworten fehlen. Die optische Koh\u00e4renz-Tomographie dokumentiert eine fortschreitende Zerst\u00f6rung und/oder Verlust der Junktion des inneren/\u00e4u\u00dferen Segmentes der Photorezeptoren und eine Ausd\u00fcnnung des Pigmentepithels (RPE) im Bereich der Makula. Durch Mutationsanalyse im urs\u00e4chlich beteiligten Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Blauzapfenmonochromasie (BCM), kongenitale Amaurose Leber, andere Zapfendystrophien (siehe diese Termini) und zerebrale Achromatopsie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Vorgeburtliche Diagnostik wird von Speziallabors angeboten.", "genetic_counseling": "Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden. Die ACHM wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Das Wiederholungsrisiko f\u00fcr ein weiteres betroffenes Kind betr\u00e4gt 25 %. Wenn in einer Familie die urs\u00e4chlichen Mutationen bekannt sind, k\u00f6nnen bei Verwandten der Eltern Heterozygotentests durchgef\u00fchrt werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Blauzapfenmonochromasie (BCM), kongenitale Amaurose Leber, andere Zapfendystrophien (siehe diese Termini) und zerebrale Achromatopsie. Eine spezifische Therapie gibt es nicht. Die Patienten werden symptomatisch behandelt und im Verlauf regelm\u00e4\u00dfig ophthalmologisch kontrolliert. Die Patienten werden \u00fcber die Anwendung von Filtergl\u00e4sern und Kontaktlinsen (rot- oder braunget\u00f6nt) informiert mit dem Ziel verminderter Photophobie und verbesserter Wahrnehmung von Kontrasten. Stark vergr\u00f6\u00dfernde Sehhilfen unterst\u00fctzen das Lesen.", "prognosis": "Die ACHM ist in der Regel station\u00e4r, es kann aber eine Makuladegeneration auftreten.", "summary": "Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen weltweit bei 1/30,000-1/50,000."}, {"name": "Stammzell-Lymphom/Leuk\u00e4mie", "sub_name": "Myeloische/lymphatische Neoplasie mit assoziiertem FGFR1-Gen-Rearrangement", "english": 0, "defenition": "Myeloische/lymphatische Neoplasie mit FGFR1-Rearrangement ist eine seltene, maligne, neoplastische Erkrankung, die durch klonale Proliferation von myeloischen und/oder lymphoiden Vorstufen mit Translokationen oder Insertionen, die die Chromosomengruppe 8p11 und das FGFR1-Gen betreffen, im Blut, Knochenmark und oft auch in anderen Geweben (Milz, Leber, Lymphknoten, Brust usw.) gekennzeichnet ist. Sie zeigt sich in der Regel als myeloproliferative Neoplasie mit Eosinophilie, T-lymphoblastisches Lymphom mit Eosinophilie oder, seltener, als akute myeloische Leuk\u00e4mie. Zu den klinischen Zeichen und Symptomen geh\u00f6ren Eosinophilie, Leukozytose mit leuk\u00e4mischer Reaktion, Monozytose, M\u00fcdigkeit, Schwitzen, Gewichtsverlust, Lymphadenopathie, Splenomegalie und/oder Hepatomegalie. Eine extranodale Beteiligung kann die Tonsillen, die Lunge und die Br\u00fcste umfassen.", "synonyms": "8p11-myeloproliferatives Syndrom, Stammzell-Lymphom/Leuk\u00e4mie, ", "ICD-10": "D47.1", "OMIM": "613523"}, {"name": "Stanescu-Osteosklerose", "sub_name": "Dysostose Typ Stanescu", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Kraniofaziale Dysostose - diaphys\u00e4re Hyperplasie, Osteosklerose, autosomal-dominante, Typ Stanescu, Stanescu-Osteosklerose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q78.8", "OMIM": "122900", "UMLS": "C0432263", "GARD": "2016", "summary": "Die Dysostose-Typ Stanescu ist eine seltene Form von Osteosklerose. Bisher wurde sie bei 30 Patienten aus 3 Familien beschrieben. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch kraniofaziale Dysostose mit kleinem Sch\u00e4del, d\u00fcnnen Sch\u00e4delknochen, Depressionen \u00fcber den fronto-parietalen und occipito-parietalen N\u00e4hten, erheblich hypoplastische Mandibula, Exophthalmus, kortikale Sklerose der langen Knochen und normale Intelligenz. Die langen Knochen sind kurz und gebogen. Die Verdickung der Knochenkortex beginnt in der Pubert\u00e4t oder nach der Pubert\u00e4t und nimmt mit steigendem Alter zu. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. "}, {"name": "Stapesankylose mit breiten Daumen und Zehen", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch die Assoziation von angeborener Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit bei Stapes-Ankylose, von breiten Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen und Hyperopie. Bisher wurde es in 6 Familien bei jeweils mehreren Mitgliedern beschrieben. Als zus\u00e4tzliche Anomalien des Skeletts wurden kurze Endphalangen und Syndaktylie und selten auch Symphalangie beschrieben. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im NOG-Gen (17q22). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Stapes ankylosis with broad thumbs and toes is a very rare genetic bone disorder characterized by ankylosis of stapes, broad thumbs and halluces, conductive hearing loss and hyperopia.", "synonyms": "Teunissen-Cremers syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "184460", "umls": "C1866656"}, {"name": "Staphylococcal-Scalded-Skin-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare staphylococcal toxemia caused by epidermolytic toxins of Staphylococcus aureus and characterized by the appearance of widespread erythematous patches, on which large blisters develop. Upon rupture of these blisters, the skin appears reddish and scalded. The lesions typically begin in the face and rapidly expand to other parts of the body. The disease may be complicated by pneumonia and sepsis. It most commonly affects newborns and infants.", "synonyms": "Generalized exfoliative disease, SSSS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L00", "umls": "C0038165", "mesh": "D013206", "meddra": "10041929"}, {"name": "Staphylogenes Lyell-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Staphylococcal-Scalded-Skin-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare staphylococcal toxemia caused by epidermolytic toxins of Staphylococcus aureus and characterized by the appearance of widespread erythematous patches, on which large blisters develop. Upon rupture of these blisters, the skin appears reddish and scalded. The lesions typically begin in the face and rapidly expand to other parts of the body. The disease may be complicated by pneumonia and sepsis. It most commonly affects newborns and infants.", "synonyms": "Generalized exfoliative disease, SSSS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L00", "umls": "C0038165", "mesh": "D013206", "meddra": "10041929"}, {"name": "Staphylogene toxische epidermale Nekrolyse", "sub_name": "Staphylococcal-Scalded-Skin-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare staphylococcal toxemia caused by epidermolytic toxins of Staphylococcus aureus and characterized by the appearance of widespread erythematous patches, on which large blisters develop. Upon rupture of these blisters, the skin appears reddish and scalded. The lesions typically begin in the face and rapidly expand to other parts of the body. The disease may be complicated by pneumonia and sepsis. It most commonly affects newborns and infants.", "synonyms": "Generalized exfoliative disease, SSSS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L00", "umls": "C0038165", "mesh": "D013206", "meddra": "10041929"}, {"name": "Staphylokokken-bedingte Tox\u00e4mie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "UMLS": "C0854511", "MedDRA": "10041932", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Staphylokokken-TSS", "sub_name": "Toxisches Schock-Syndrom, Staphylokokken-induziertes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das durch Staphylokokken verursachte toxische Schocksyndrom (Staphylokokken-TSS) ist eine akute Erkrankung, die durch die Produktion von Superantigen-Toxinen ausgel\u00f6st wird und durch hohes Fieber, Hautausschlag gefolgt von Haut-Peeling, Hypotonie, Erbrechen, Durchfall gekennzeichnet ist. Diese Infektion kann potenziell zu einem Multiorganversagen f\u00fchren.", "synonyms": "Staphylokokken-TSS, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A48.3", "UMLS": "C3714602", "MedDRA": "10044250", "epidemiology": "Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz des Staphylokokken-TSS wird mit 1: 192,000- 1: 156,000 in den USA angegeben. Die Ver\u00e4nderungen im Tampon-Einsatz in den letzten Jahren haben dazu gef\u00fchrt, dass mittlerweile 50% der Staphylokokken-TSS nicht durch Tampon-Benutzung bedingt sind.", "clinical_description": "Das Staphylokokken-TSS tritt in der Regel bei ansonsten gesunden, erwachsenen Frauen auf. Es kann jedoch auch bei M\u00e4nnern und Kindern auftreten. Der Beginn ist pl\u00f6tzlich und beinhaltet hohes Fieber (> 38.9\u00b0C), Durchfall, Erbrechen, Muskel-, Bauch- und Halsschmerzen. Im Gegensatz zum Streptokokken-TSS ist das Staphylokokken-TSS in den meisten F\u00e4llen mit einem generalisierten Hautausschlag verbunden, der innerhalb der ersten zwei Tage nach Symptombeginn auftritt und die Schleimh\u00e4ute und die Haut betrifft. W\u00e4hrend der Heilungsphase kann es auch zum Sch\u00e4len der Haut kommen. Schwerwiegendere Manifestationen sind Verwirrung, Schock, Nieren- und Herzversagen sowie ein akutes Atemnotsyndrom (ARDS). ARDS ist die h\u00e4ufigste Todesursache bei Patienten mit Staphylokokken-TSS.", "etiology": "Das Staphylokokken-TSS wird durch eine Infektion mit Staphylococcus aureus hervorgerufen. In Folge einer bakteriellen Toxinaussch\u00fcttung wird eine heftige Immunreaktion, ausgel\u00f6st, die insbesondere Zytokine und Chemokine involviert. Diese Reaktion h\u00e4ngt mit einer T-Zellaktivierung durch die Produktion von Superantigenen zusammen, die den \u00fcblichen Weg der Antigenpr\u00e4sentation umgehen. Urspr\u00fcnglich wurde es h\u00e4ufiger im Zusammenhang mit der Benutzung von Tampons mit hoher Saugf\u00e4higkeit beschrieben, aber auch durch Verwendung intravaginaler Barrieren (Diaphragma oder Menstruationstassen) oder bei Infektionen nach operativen Eingriffen auf. Heutzutage treten mehr F\u00e4lle des Staphylokokken-TSS als Komplikationen eitriger Infektionen oder der Besiedlung der oberen Atemwege auf.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Verdachtsdiagnose eines Staphylokokken-TSS sollte bei Hautausschlag gefolgt von Sch\u00e4len der Haut, Schock und klinischer Beteiligung von mindestens drei Organsystemen gestellt werden. Zur Best\u00e4tigung der Diagnose sollten laborchemische Kontrollen der Staphylokokken-Superantigene (wie toxic shock syndrome toxin 1) in Urin oder Serum erfolgen. Blutkulturen sind nur selten positiv f\u00fcr Staphylokokken.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen stellen das Streptokokken-TSS, Rocky Mountain-Fleckfieber, Leptospirose, Dengue-Fieber, Typhus-Fieber, Peritonitis, Pneumonie, pelvine Infektion, Perikarditis, akuter Myokardinfarkt, Menigokokk\u00e4mie, viraler/ toxischer/ allergischer Ausschlag und der septische Schock dar.", "management_and_treatment": "Der Beginn des Staphylokokken-TSS ist pl\u00f6tzlich und bedarf umgehende intensivmedizinische Versorgung. Therapieoptionen bei Staphylokokken-TSS stellen Antibiotika (Clindamycin), unterst\u00fctzende Ma\u00dfnahmen (Fl\u00fcssigkeit, Inotrope Substanzen, Vassopressoren) und intraven\u00f6se Immunglobulin-Gaben (IVIGs), die die Antigene blockieren. Kortikoide und rekombinantes aktiviertes Protein C (Derotrecogin-Alpha) k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls zur Besserung f\u00fchren. Bei renaler Dysfunktion kann es zu Dialysebed\u00fcrftigkeit und bei akutem Atemnotsyndrom zu k\u00fcnstlicher Beatmungspflicht mit Sauerstoffbedarf kommen. Vancomycin und Linezolid kann bei Penicillin-Allergie oder bei Methicillin-resistenten Bakterienst\u00e4mmen verwendet werden. Frauen sollten m\u00f6glichst auf intravaginale Vorrichtungen verzichten, um das Risiko f\u00fcr eine Menstruations-assoziiertes Staphylokoken-TSS zu minimieren.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut. Staphylokokken-TSS hat eine Mortalit\u00e4t von 1-6%.", "summary": "Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz des Staphylokokken-TSS wird mit 1: 192,000- 1: 156,000 in den USA angegeben. Die Ver\u00e4nderungen im Tampon-Einsatz in den letzten Jahren haben dazu gef\u00fchrt, dass mittlerweile 50% der Staphylokokken-TSS nicht durch Tampon-Benutzung bedingt sind."}, {"name": "Stargardt-Krankheit", "german_description": "Die Stargardt-Krankheit ist eine Form von juveniler heredit\u00e4rer Makuladegeneration. Charakteristisch sind diskrete gelbliche runde oder fischf\u00f6rmige Flecken um die Macula herum, auf der Ebene des Pigmentepithels (rpe). Die Stargardt-Krankheit ist die h\u00e4ufigste erblich Makuladystrophie. Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1/8.000 und 1/10.000. In typischen F\u00e4llen beginnt die Krankheit im ersten oder zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt mit verminderter Sehsch\u00e4rfe. Im fr\u00fchen Stadium sind um die Macula herum nur diskrete Ver\u00e4nderungen des rpe erkennbar. Sp\u00e4ter bilden sich horizontal ovoide atrophische Zonen ('geh\u00e4mmerte Bronze'). Im Endstadium ist die Macula von einem zentralen Hof mit dystropher Aderhaut umgeben. Die Fluorescein-Angiographie zeigt, wahrscheinlich als Folge einer Anh\u00e4ufung von Lipofuscin im rpe, eine charakteristisch dunkle Aderhaut ('schweigende Choroidea'). Meist wird die Krankheit autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, es wurden aber auch Stammb\u00e4ume mit dominanter Vererbung beschrieben. Ursache des autosomalen Typs sind Mutationen im ABCR-Gen. Es kodiert f\u00fcr ein transmembran\u00f6ses Transporterprotein der \u00e4u\u00dferen Segmente der St\u00e4bchen. Eine Behandlung gibt es bisher nicht. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ophthalmic disorder that is usually characterized by a progressive loss of central vision associated with irregular macular and perimacular yellow-white fundus flecks, and a so-called ''beaten bronze'' atrophic central macular lesion.", "synonyms": "Fundus flavimaculatus, Stargardt 1, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Elderly, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "H35.5", "omim": "248200\u00a0 600110\u00a0 603786", "umls": "C0271093\u00a0 C1855465", "gard": "181", "meddra": "10062766", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is estimated at 1/8,000 - 1/10,000. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "The disease typically presents within the first two decades of life, even though symptoms can also appear during adulthood and as late as the seventh decade. Although disease progression and severity varies widely, Stargardt disease (STGD1) is usually characterized by a progressive loss of central vision causing blurry vision and, occasionally, an increasing difficulty to adapt in the dark. Peripheral vision is usually normal. Most affected individuals also have impaired color vision. Photophobia may be present.", "etiology": "The disorder has been linked to mutations in the ABCA4 gene, which encodes an adenosine triphosphate (ATP)-binding cassette transporter (ABCR) expressed specifically in the cones and rods of the retina. Defects in ABCR function cause the accumulation of all-trans-retinal and its cytotoxic derivatives, mainly lipofuscin pigments (e.g., diretinoid-pyridinium-ethanolamine) in photoreceptors and retinal pigment epithelial (RPE) cells, ultimately causing RPE cell death and the subsequent loss of photoreceptors. Mutations in ABCA4 have been linked to a spectrum of phenotypes ranging from STGD1 to cone rod dystrophy and severe early-onset retinal dystrophy.", "diagnostic_methods": "The clinical diagnosis is based on ophthalmological examinations consisting of visual acuity and visual field testing, ophthalmoscopy, electroretinography (ERG), fluorescein angiography (FA), fundus autofluorescence (FAF), and optical coherence tomography (OCT), revealing macular anomalies (progressive atrophy often in a 'beaten bronze pattern') and yellow-white fishtail flecks that may present only in the central macula but may also extend beyond the vascular arcades. These flecks are hyper autofluorescent on FAF images. Fluorescein angiography reveals the characteristic dark choroid (''silence choroidien'') in aproximately 85% of the patients. Diagnosis can be confirmed by genetic testing of the ABCA4 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes multifocal pattern dystrophy simulating STGD1 and retinal and/ or macular dystrophies such as central areolar choroidal dystrophy (CACD), achromatopsia, cone dystrophy (CD) and cone rod dystrophy (CRD). In addition, two autosomal dominant types of macular dystrophy exist that resemble STGD1: STGD3 caused by mutations in the ELOVL4 gene and STGD4 associated with mutations in PROM1.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is technically possible by means of genetic testing of the ABCA4 gene, but is not used in clinical practice.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is transmitted in an autosomal recessive or an autosomal dominant mode of inheritance. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples informing them that there is 25% or 50% risk, respectively, of transmitting the disease to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Preventive measures for slowing down the progression of the disease include avoidance of overexposure to visible light with sunglasses and no intake of vitamin A supplements. Regular ophthalmologic evaluations are recommended. Currently, various treatment options are being developed. Different oral medical treatments that prevent the accumulation of lipofuscin in Stargardt disease are being tested in phase II/III clinical trials. These medical treatments inhibit the visual cycle by blocking the action of certain enzymes in the retina (RPE65/RBP4/LRAT/RDH5), replace vitamin A with a deuterated form of vitamin A (ALK001) or aid in the removal of lipofuscine by breaking down the lipofuscin (Soraprazan).", "prognosis": "Due to the high clinical variability, prognosis depends on certain parameters (notably age of onset and electroretinographic findings) that may help the clinician provide the patient with an indication of the course of the disease. STGD1 may progress rapidly over a few months or gradually over several years leading to a severe decrease in visual acuity. Typically, peripheral vision is not affected, although certain patients may progress to a cone-rod phenotype that does affect the peripheral retinal function."}, {"name": "Stargardt Makuladystrophie", "sub_name": "Stargardt-Krankheit", "german_description": "Die Stargardt-Krankheit ist eine Form von juveniler heredit\u00e4rer Makuladegeneration. Charakteristisch sind diskrete gelbliche runde oder fischf\u00f6rmige Flecken um die Macula herum, auf der Ebene des Pigmentepithels (rpe). Die Stargardt-Krankheit ist die h\u00e4ufigste erblich Makuladystrophie. Sch\u00e4tzungen der Pr\u00e4valenz liegen zwischen 1/8.000 und 1/10.000. In typischen F\u00e4llen beginnt die Krankheit im ersten oder zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt mit verminderter Sehsch\u00e4rfe. Im fr\u00fchen Stadium sind um die Macula herum nur diskrete Ver\u00e4nderungen des rpe erkennbar. Sp\u00e4ter bilden sich horizontal ovoide atrophische Zonen ('geh\u00e4mmerte Bronze'). Im Endstadium ist die Macula von einem zentralen Hof mit dystropher Aderhaut umgeben. Die Fluorescein-Angiographie zeigt, wahrscheinlich als Folge einer Anh\u00e4ufung von Lipofuscin im rpe, eine charakteristisch dunkle Aderhaut ('schweigende Choroidea'). Meist wird die Krankheit autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, es wurden aber auch Stammb\u00e4ume mit dominanter Vererbung beschrieben. Ursache des autosomalen Typs sind Mutationen im ABCR-Gen. Es kodiert f\u00fcr ein transmembran\u00f6ses Transporterprotein der \u00e4u\u00dferen Segmente der St\u00e4bchen. Eine Behandlung gibt es bisher nicht. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ophthalmic disorder that is usually characterized by a progressive loss of central vision associated with irregular macular and perimacular yellow-white fundus flecks, and a so-called ''beaten bronze'' atrophic central macular lesion.", "synonyms": "Fundus flavimaculatus, Stargardt 1, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Elderly, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "H35.5", "omim": "248200\u00a0 600110\u00a0 603786", "umls": "C0271093\u00a0 C1855465", "gard": "181", "meddra": "10062766", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is estimated at 1/8,000 - 1/10,000. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "The disease typically presents within the first two decades of life, even though symptoms can also appear during adulthood and as late as the seventh decade. Although disease progression and severity varies widely, Stargardt disease (STGD1) is usually characterized by a progressive loss of central vision causing blurry vision and, occasionally, an increasing difficulty to adapt in the dark. Peripheral vision is usually normal. Most affected individuals also have impaired color vision. Photophobia may be present.", "etiology": "The disorder has been linked to mutations in the ABCA4 gene, which encodes an adenosine triphosphate (ATP)-binding cassette transporter (ABCR) expressed specifically in the cones and rods of the retina. Defects in ABCR function cause the accumulation of all-trans-retinal and its cytotoxic derivatives, mainly lipofuscin pigments (e.g., diretinoid-pyridinium-ethanolamine) in photoreceptors and retinal pigment epithelial (RPE) cells, ultimately causing RPE cell death and the subsequent loss of photoreceptors. Mutations in ABCA4 have been linked to a spectrum of phenotypes ranging from STGD1 to cone rod dystrophy and severe early-onset retinal dystrophy.", "diagnostic_methods": "The clinical diagnosis is based on ophthalmological examinations consisting of visual acuity and visual field testing, ophthalmoscopy, electroretinography (ERG), fluorescein angiography (FA), fundus autofluorescence (FAF), and optical coherence tomography (OCT), revealing macular anomalies (progressive atrophy often in a 'beaten bronze pattern') and yellow-white fishtail flecks that may present only in the central macula but may also extend beyond the vascular arcades. These flecks are hyper autofluorescent on FAF images. Fluorescein angiography reveals the characteristic dark choroid (''silence choroidien'') in aproximately 85% of the patients. Diagnosis can be confirmed by genetic testing of the ABCA4 gene.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes multifocal pattern dystrophy simulating STGD1 and retinal and/ or macular dystrophies such as central areolar choroidal dystrophy (CACD), achromatopsia, cone dystrophy (CD) and cone rod dystrophy (CRD). In addition, two autosomal dominant types of macular dystrophy exist that resemble STGD1: STGD3 caused by mutations in the ELOVL4 gene and STGD4 associated with mutations in PROM1.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is technically possible by means of genetic testing of the ABCA4 gene, but is not used in clinical practice.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is transmitted in an autosomal recessive or an autosomal dominant mode of inheritance. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples informing them that there is 25% or 50% risk, respectively, of transmitting the disease to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Preventive measures for slowing down the progression of the disease include avoidance of overexposure to visible light with sunglasses and no intake of vitamin A supplements. Regular ophthalmologic evaluations are recommended. Currently, various treatment options are being developed. Different oral medical treatments that prevent the accumulation of lipofuscin in Stargardt disease are being tested in phase II/III clinical trials. These medical treatments inhibit the visual cycle by blocking the action of certain enzymes in the retina (RPE65/RBP4/LRAT/RDH5), replace vitamin A with a deuterated form of vitamin A (ALK001) or aid in the removal of lipofuscine by breaking down the lipofuscin (Soraprazan).", "prognosis": "Due to the high clinical variability, prognosis depends on certain parameters (notably age of onset and electroretinographic findings) that may help the clinician provide the patient with an indication of the course of the disease. STGD1 may progress rapidly over a few months or gradually over several years leading to a severe decrease in visual acuity. Typically, peripheral vision is not affected, although certain patients may progress to a cone-rod phenotype that does affect the peripheral retinal function."}, {"name": "Stark-Kaeser-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Neurogenes scapulo-peroneales Syndrom Typ Kaeser", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, neuromuscular disease characterized by adult-onset muscle weakness and atrophy in a scapuloperoneal distribution, mild involvement of the facial muscles, dysphagia, and gynecomastia. Elevated serum CK levels and mixed myopathic and neurogenic abnormalities are associated clinical findings.", "synonyms": "Kaeser syndrome, Stark-Kaeser syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G12.1", "omim": "181400", "umls": "C1867005", "gard": "10312"}, {"name": "STAR-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Syndaktylie-Telekanthus-anogenitale und renale Fehlbildungen-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch eine Assoziation von Syndaktylie der Zehen, fazialen Dysmorphien (z.B. Telekanthus (weiter Abstand der inneren Augenwinkel) und breite Nasenspitze), sowie anogenitalen (Analatresie) und renalen Fehlbildungen. Ursache des Syndroms sind Mutationen im FAM58A-Gen. Das Gen liegt auf dem X-Chromosom (Xq28) und kodiert f\u00fcr ein Protein unbekannter Funktion. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare malformation syndrome characterized by the association of toe syndactyly, facial dysmorphism including telecanthus (abnormal distance between the eyes) and a broad nasal tip, urogenital malformations and anal atresia.", "synonyms": "STAR syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "300707", "umls": "C2678045", "gard": "10295"}, {"name": "Startle-Epilepsie", "sub_name": "Schreckepilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Schreckepilepsie ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch h\u00e4ufige und spontane epileptische Anf\u00e4lle (h\u00e4ufig mit symmetrischen oder asymmetrischen tonischen Merkmalen) gekennzeichnet ist, ausgel\u00f6st durch einen normalen Schreck als Reaktion auf einen pl\u00f6tzlichen und unerwarteten somatosensorischen (meist auditiven) Reiz. St\u00fcrze sind h\u00e4ufig und k\u00f6nnen traumatisch sein. In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit mit spastischer Hemi-, Di- oder Tetraplegie und Intelligenzminderung verbunden.", "synonyms": "Startle-Epilepsie, ", "ICD-10": "G40.5"}, {"name": "Startle-Krankheit, famili\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Hyperekplexie, heredit\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie ist eine erbliche neurologische Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch exzessive Schreckreaktionen.", "synonyms": "Kok-Krankheit, Startle-Krankheit, famili\u00e4re, Stiff-Baby-Syndrom, Stiff-Man-Syndrom, kongenitales, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "149400\u00a0 614618\u00a0 614619\u00a0 618011", "UMLS": "C1835614", "GARD": "3129", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie manifestiert sich schon kurz nach der Geburt mit ausfahrenden Schleuderbewegungen des K\u00f6rpers als Reaktion auf Ger\u00e4usche und Ber\u00fchrung und massive und anhaltende Versteifung des Stamms und der Gliedma\u00dfen, Ballen der F\u00e4uste und Attacken von hochfrequentem Zittern. F\u00fcr Neugeborene besteht das Risiko eines pl\u00f6tzlichen Kindstodes durch Laryngospasmus und Versagen der Herz- und Atmungsfunktion. Die Attacken von Versteifung k\u00f6nnen epileptischen Anf\u00e4llen \u00e4hneln, jedoch nehmen Steifheit und K\u00f6rperbewegungen im Schlaf ab oder verschwinden ganz, und das EEG ist normal. In den Monaten nach der Geburt nimmt die Muskelsteifheit ab, aber exzessive Schleuderbewegungen nach \u00e4u\u00dferer Stimulation oder Aufregung bleiben bestehen. Die motorischen Meilensteine sind oft leicht versp\u00e4tet, aber die intellektuelle Entwicklung ist in der Regel normal. Betroffene Kinder gehen schwankend und suchen oft Hilfe oder einen Halt. Die Gangst\u00f6rung nimmt zu, wenn die Kinder in Eile sind, wenn sie sich in einer Menschenmenge befinden oder wenn sie gedr\u00e4ngt werden. Stolpern oder ein unerwarteter Sto\u00df kann zu nicht kontrollierbaren St\u00fcrzen ('Wie ein Stock') mit dem Risiko schwerer Verletzungen f\u00fchren.", "etiology": "Mutationen im GLRA1-Gen (5q32) werden bei 30 % der F\u00e4lle mit Heredit\u00e4rer Hyperekplexie (und bei einer gr\u00f6\u00dferen Zahl von Patienten ohne offenbar betroffene Eltern) gefunden. Diese Mutationen werden autosomal-dominant oder rezessiv vererbt. Das GLRA1-Gen kodiert f\u00fcr die Alpha1-Untereinheit des juvenilen neuronalen Rezeptors f\u00fcr den inhibitorischen Neurotransmitter Glycin. Mutationen dieser Untereinheit verursachen verschiedene Funktionsst\u00f6rungen des neuronalen Chlorid (Cl-)-Kanals, weshalb die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie als eine 'Channelopathy' angesehen wird. Auch Mutationen in den Genen GLRB, GPHN und SLC6A5 (4q31.3, 14q24 und 11p15.2-p15.1) sind beobachtet worden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose beruht auf den klinischen Zeichen, auf den Ergebnissen der molekularen genetischen Tests und der elektrophphysiologischen Untersuchung.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die symptomatische Hyperekplexie und Spastizit\u00e4t sowie Epilepsie bei perinatalem Hirnschaden und metabolischen Hirnkrankheiten, die durch ein normales EEG und durch das Aussetzen der Steifheit und der K\u00f6rperbewegung im Schlaf ausgeschlossen werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die symptomatische Behandlung bei Erwachsenen erfolgt mit Clonazepam (1 mg/Tag). Vigabatrin ist wirkungslos. Bei Kindern sind niedrigere Dosen erforderlich. Die Kinder profitieren von wiederholten Versuchen k\u00f6rperlicher \u00dcbungen und weniger von etablierten Methoden der Physiotherapie oder von resolutem oder forderndem Training. Ausgiebige Aktivit\u00e4ten auf weichem oder sandigem Grund sind besonders wirksam. Eventuell ist es notwendig, gegen fehlendes Verst\u00e4ndnis, Sp\u00f6ttelei oder Druck von nicht informierten Lehrern, Verwandten und Freunden einzuschreiten.", "prognosis": "Bei den meisten Patienten geht in der Adoleszenz die Furcht vorm Fallen zur\u00fcck und der schwankende Gang normalisiert sich. Die starken Schreckreaktionen und die ruckartigen Bewegungen nach unerwarteten Reizen bleiben jedoch lebenslang bestehen und eine Minderzahl von Patienten leidet unter phobischer Angst vor dem \u00dcberqueren leerer Pl\u00e4tze und unter einem unsicheren und z\u00f6gerlichen Gang.", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "STAT1-Mangel", "sub_name": "Empf\u00e4nglichkeit f\u00fcr virale und mykobakterielle Infektionen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Susceptibility to viral and mycobacterial infections is a rare, genetic, primary immunodeficiency due to a defect in innate immunity disorder characterized by impaired intracellular signaling from both type I and type II interferons, leading to early-onset, severe, life-threatening intracellular bacterial (typically mycobacteria) and viral (mainly herpes viruses) infections.", "synonyms": "Predisposition to severe viral infection due to STAT1 deficiency, STAT1 deficiency, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "icd_10": "D84.8", "omim": "613796"}, {"name": "STAT3-assoziierte fr\u00fch beginnende multisystemische Autoimmunkrankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisch bedingtes, lypmhoproliferatives Syndrom, das durch fr\u00fch einsetzende wiederkehrende Infektionen, Lymphadenopathie mit Hepatosplenomegalie und variablen Autoimmunerkrankungen, einschlie\u00dflich h\u00e4molytischer An\u00e4mie, Thrombozytopenie, Neutropenie, Enteropathie, Typ-I-Diabetes, Sklerodermie, Arthritis, atopische Dermatitis und entz\u00fcndlichen Lungenerkrankungen gekennzeichnet ist. Die Patienten zeigen in der Regel Gedeihst\u00f6rungen. Zu den variablen immunologischen Befunden geh\u00f6ren verminderte regulatorische T-Zellen, Hypogammaglobulin\u00e4mie und eine Reduktion der B-Ged\u00e4chtniszellen.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "M35.8", "OMIM": "615952"}, {"name": "STAT3-Mangel", "sub_name": "Hyper-IgE-Syndrom, autosomal-dominantes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Autosomal-dominante Hyper-IgE-Syndrom (AD-HIES) ist ein sehr seltener prim\u00e4rer Immundefekt und klinisch gekennzeichnet durch die Trias hohes Serum-IGE (>2000 IU/ml), rezidivierende Staphylokokken-Hautabszesse und rezidivierende Pneumonien mit Bildung von Pneumatozelen.", "synonyms": "AD-HIES, Buckley-Syndrom, HIES, autosomal-dominantes, Hyperimmunoglobulin\u00e4mie E -Infektions-Syndrom, rekurrentes, Hyperimmunoglobulin\u00e4mie E-Syndrom Typ 1, Hyperimmunoglobulin\u00e4mie E-Syndrom, autosomal-dominantes, Job-Syndrom, STAT3-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D82.4", "OMIM": "147060", "UMLS": "C2936739\u00a0 C3489795\u00a0 C3887645", "GARD": "6800", "epidemiology": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Jahres-Inzidenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/1.000.000. Das Syndrom betrifft beide Geschlechter in gleicher Weise.", "clinical_description": "Das AD-HIES beginnt in typischen F\u00e4llen mit Neugeborenen-Ekzem. Betroffen sind aber auch in unterschiedlichem Schweregrad Immunsystem, Bindegewebe, Skelett und Zahnentwicklung. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Zeichen der Immunschw\u00e4che/-dysregulation sind Ekzem, rezidivierende Hautabszesse, Pneumonie mit Bildung von Pneumatozelen, mukokutane Candidiasis, erh\u00f6hte IgE-Serumspiegel und Eosinophilie. Schwere rezidivierende Atemwegsinfektionen, die zu chronischer Ateminsuffizienz f\u00fchren k\u00f6nnen, sind h\u00e4ufig. Zusammen mit Mittellinien-Anomalien wurde ein distinktes Aussehen des Gesichtes beschrieben (rauhe Haut, Gesichtsasymmetrie, prominente Stirn, tiefliegende Augen, breiter Nasenr\u00fccken, volle Nasenspitze, Progenie). Bei etwa der H\u00e4lfte der Patienten treten geh\u00e4uft pathologische Frakturen der langen Knochen und Rippen auf. Bei mehr als 60% besteht eine Skoliose unterschiedlichen Schweregrades. Anomalien der Zahnentwicklung sind ein regelm\u00e4\u00dfiges Merkmal: Die mangelhafte Resorption der prim\u00e4ren Zahnwurzeln kann zu verl\u00e4ngerter Retention der prim\u00e4ren Z\u00e4hne f\u00fchren, wodurch wiederum ein regelhafter Durchbruch der permanenten Z\u00e4hne verhindert wird. Beschrieben wurden auch Gef\u00e4\u00dfver\u00e4nderungen (Aneurysma der Herzkranzgef\u00e4\u00dfe und der Aorta, Thrombose der Kleinhirn-Arterie und ein angeboren offener Ductus venosus). Symptome von Seiten der Augen sind Xanthelasmen,\u00fcbergro\u00dfes Chalazion, Lidkn\u00f6tchen, Strabismus, Netzhautabl\u00f6sung und komplizierte Katarakt. Es besteht ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko f\u00fcr Autoimmunkrankheiten und lymphoproliferative Krankheiten.", "etiology": "Bei 70 % der Patienten ist der Ph\u00e4notyp mit heterozygoten Mutationen im STAT-Gen (17q21.31) assoziiert. STAT3 hat eine Schl\u00fcsselrolle bei der Signaltransduktion einer gro\u00dfen Zahl von Zytokinen (Kontrolle von Infektionen mit Pilzen und extrazellul\u00e4ren Bakterien). Die \u00c4tiologie der \u00fcbrigen 30% ist nicht bekannt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostisches Hauptmerkmal ist eine erh\u00f6hter Serumspiegel des Immunglobulins E (IgE) mit > 2000 U/ml, und oft > 5000 U/ml. Um die Wahrscheinlichkeit der Diagnose beurteilen zu k\u00f6nnen, wurde ein klinischer Score entwickelt. IgE-Gesamtkonzentration > 1000 IU/ml und ein gewichteter Score der klinischen Symptome >30 spricht f\u00fcr AD-HIES durch STAT3-Mangel. Der Nachweis einer dominant-negativen heterozygoten Mutation im STAT3-Gen sichert die Diagnose definitiv.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Zystische Fibrose und Chronisch-granulomat\u00f6se Krankheit (s. diese Termini), sowie schwere atopische Dermatitis und HIV-Infektion. Beschrieben wurde auch ein klinisch distinktes autosomal-rezessives Hyper-IgE-Syndrom (AR-HIES; s. dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, wenn in der Familie die krankheitsverursachende Mutation bekannt ist.", "genetic_counseling": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle von AD-HIES sind durch Neumutationen verursacht und deshalb sporadisch, die STAT3-Mutationen werden autosomal-dominant vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Zur Therapie geh\u00f6ren die Verh\u00fctung und Versorgung von Infektionen mit langzeitiger Anwendung systemischer Antibiotika und Antimykotika. Lungenabszesse m\u00fcssen eventuell chirurgisch behandelt werden, m\u00f6gliche Komplikationen erfordern jedoch eine strenge Indikation. Die Rolle der Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen (HSCT) muss weiter untersucht werden.", "prognosis": "Obwohl HIES mit signifikanter Morbidit\u00e4t und Mortalit\u00e4t verbunden ist, verbessern angemessene Pflege, enge \u00dcberwachung und Compliance des Patienten die Prognose. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen dann 50 Jahre alt oder \u00e4lter werden.", "summary": "Die gesch\u00e4tzte Jahres-Inzidenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/1.000.000. Das Syndrom betrifft beide Geschlechter in gleicher Weise."}, {"name": "Station\u00e4re Nachtblindheit, kongenitale, Typ Oguchi", "sub_name": "Oguchi-Krankheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Oguchi-Krankheit ist eine autosomal-rezessiv vererbte Netzhaut-Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale station\u00e4re Nachtblindheit (CSNB; s. dort) und das Mizuo-Nakamura-Ph\u00e4nomen.", "synonyms": "Morbus Oguchi, Oguchi-Syndrom, Station\u00e4re Nachtblindheit, kongenitale, Typ Oguchi, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "H53.6", "OMIM": "258100\u00a0 613411", "UMLS": "C1306122", "MeSH": "C537743", "GARD": "10118", "epidemiology": "Die Oguchi-Krankheit ist sehr selten, bisher wurden in der Literatur nur etwa 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Sie wurde zuerst in Japan beschrieben wo die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Krankheit auch am h\u00f6chsten ist. Einzelne F\u00e4lle wurden bei europ\u00e4ischen, amerikanischen, pakistanischen und indischen Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch kongenitale station\u00e4re Nachtblindheit und das Mizuo-Nakamura-Ph\u00e4nomen, einer einzigartigen morphologischen und funktionellen Anomalie der Retina: Eine typische goldgelbe oder silbergraue F\u00e4rbung des Fundus im Licht, die nach Dunkeladaptation verschwindet und unter Licht wiederkehrt. Die Patienten haben von fr\u00fcher Kindheit an eine nicht-progrediente Nachtblindheit mit normalem Visus am Tag. Oft berichten sie, dass sich ihre Lichtempfindlichkeit bessert, wenn sie sich eine lange Zeit in dunkler Umgebung aufhalten. Der einzige Befund am Augenhintergrund ist das Mizuo-Nakamura-Ph\u00e4nomen. Eine verl\u00e4ngerte Dunkel Adaptation von drei oder mehr Stunden f\u00fchrt am Augenhintergrund zum Verschwinden des Mizuo-Nakamura-Ph\u00e4nomens. Hinweise auf \u201aKnochenk\u00f6rperchen', Makulaver\u00e4nderungen oder chorioretinale Atrophie werden nicht gefunden. Normale Sehsch\u00e4rfe, normales Kaliber der Blutgef\u00e4\u00dfe in der Netzhaut und eine in der Regel normale Z\u00e4pfchen-Antwort im Elektroretinogramm (ERG) deuten an, dass es sich um eine Dysfunktion und nicht um eine Degeneration der Retina handelt.", "etiology": "Ursache der Oguchi-Krankheit sind Mutationen im SAG-Gen (2q37), das f\u00fcr Arrestin kodiert (Oguchi Typ 1) oder durch Mutationen im GRK-Gen (13q34), das f\u00fcr die Rhodopsin-Kinase kodiert (Oguchi Typ 2). Interessanterweise sind einige Mutationen im SAG-Gen in der gleichen Familie mit Oguchi-Krankheit und Retinitis pigmentosa (RP) verbunden, w\u00e4hrend andere Mutationen in diesem Gen lediglich zu RP f\u00fchren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Es handelt sich um eine klinische Diagnose, die auf dem Befund der Nachtblindheit, der Beobachtung des Mizuo-Nakamura-Ph\u00e4nomens in der Funduskopie und den Befunden des Elektroretinogramms beruht. Durch genetische Analyse wird die klinische Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Stargardt-Krankheit, RP bei weiblichen \u00dcbertr\u00e4gerinnen, juvenile Retinoschisis und progressive Z\u00e4pfchen-Dystrophie (s. diese Termini). Bei allen diesen Krankheiten k\u00f6nnen Ver\u00e4nderungen am Augenhintergrund bestehen, aber kein Mizuo-Nakamura-Ph\u00e4nomen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Oguchi-Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Die Geschwister (m, w) haben einen 25 %iges Risiko, ebenfalls betroffen zu sein.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine spezifische Behandlung f\u00fcr die Oguchi-Krankheit gibt es bisher nicht.", "prognosis": "Bei fehlender Progredienz der Symptome hat die Oguchi-Krankheit eine gute Visus-Prognose. Obwohl die Krankheit als station\u00e4rer Zustand beschrieben wird, kann es besonders bei \u00e4lteren Patienten zu verminderter Sehsch\u00e4rfe oder zur Einengung des Gesichtsfeldes kommen.", "summary": "Die Oguchi-Krankheit ist sehr selten, bisher wurden in der Literatur nur etwa 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Sie wurde zuerst in Japan beschrieben wo die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Krankheit auch am h\u00f6chsten ist. Einzelne F\u00e4lle wurden bei europ\u00e4ischen, amerikanischen, pakistanischen und indischen Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "Statische Enzephalopathie der Kindheit mit Neurodegeneration im Erwachsenenalter", "sub_name": "Beta-propeller-Protein-assoziierte Neurodegeneration", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Beta-propeller protein-associated neurodegeneration (BPAN), also known as static encephalopathy of childhood with neurodegeneration in adulthood, is a rare form of neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation (NBIA) characterized by early-onset developmental delay and further neurological deterioration in early adulthood.", "synonyms": "BPAN, NBIA5, Neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation type 5, SENDA, Static encephalopathy of childhood with neurodegeneration in adulthood, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "G23.0", "omim": "300894", "gard": "12570"}, {"name": "Steatocystoma multiplex", "sub_name": "Sebozystomatose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Steatocystoma multiplex, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "L72.2", "OMIM": "184500", "UMLS": "C0259771\u00a0 C3671377", "GARD": "4780\u00a0 5003", "summary": "Die Sebokystomatose ist gekennzeichnet durch multiple (100 bis 2.000) asymptomatische Hautzysten, die meist im Bereich des Sternums, im oberen Anteil des R\u00fcckens, in den Axillen und an den proximalen Bereichen der Gliedma\u00dfen auftreten. Mindestens 30 F\u00e4lle aus nicht miteinander verwandten Familien \u00fcber 3 bis 5 Generationen und eine Reihe sporadischer F\u00e4lle wurden beschrieben. In der Regel treten die Symptome der Sebokystomatose im ersten oder zweiten Lebensjahrzehnt auf. Beide Geschlechter sind betroffen, in einigen Studien die M\u00e4nner etwas h\u00e4ufiger. Ursache sind Mutationen im Keratin-17-Gen (KRT17, 17q12-q21). Vorgeschlagen wurde autosomal-dominante Vererbung. "}, {"name": "Steatokystoma multiplex - neonatale Z\u00e4hne", "german_description": "Es wurde in 1 chinesischen Familie bei mindestens 21 Betroffenen aus 5 Generationen und bei einem zus\u00e4tzlichen sporadischen Fall beschrieben. Vorgeschlagen wurde autosomal-dominante Vererbung.", "english": 1, "defenition": "The syndrome steatocystoma multiplex and natal teeth is characterized by generalized multiple steatocystomas and natal teeth.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "L72.2", "omim": "184510", "umls": "C1866650", "mesh": "C537487", "gard": "5004", "epidemiology": "It has been described a five-generation Chinese family with at least 21 affected patients.", "genetic_counseling": "The same condition has been reported in one additional sporadic case. Autosomal dominant inheritance has been suggested."}, {"name": "STEC-HUS", "sub_name": "Shiga-\u00e4hnliches Toxin-assoziiertes H\u00e4molytisch-ur\u00e4misches Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Typical hemolytic-uremic syndrome (typical HUS) is a thrombotic microangiopathy characterized by mechanical hemolytic anemia, thrombocytopenia, and renal dysfunction that is usually associated with prodromal enteritis caused by Shigella dysentriae type 1 or E. Coli.", "synonyms": "D+ HUS, EHEC-HUS, Hemolytic uremic syndrome associated with Shiga toxin-producing Escherichia coli, Hemolytic uremic syndrome with diarrhea, STEC-HUS, Shiga-like toxin-associated HUS, Stx-HUS, Typical HUS, Typical hemolytic uremic syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D58.8", "omim": "235400"}, {"name": "Steele-Richardson-Olszewski-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Progressive supranukle\u00e4re Blickparese, klassische", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird konservativ auf etwa 1:16.600 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A classical form of progressive supranuclear palsy (PSP), a rare late-onset neurodegenerative disease, characterized by slowing of vertical saccadic eye movements, falls due to postural instability, axial akinetic-rigid syndrome, and cognitive impairment. Difficulties in speech and swallowing may develop.", "synonyms": "Classic PSP syndrome, Richardson syndrome, Steele-Richardson-Olszewski disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G23.1", "omim": "601104\u00a0 609454\u00a0 610898", "umls": "C0038868"}, {"name": "Steel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic bone disease characterized by short stature, bilateral congenital hip dislocation, radial head dislocation, carpal coalition, scoliosis, pes cavus, and atlantoaxial subluxation. Dysmorphic facial features include broad forehead, broad nasal bridge, hypertelorism, and mild midface hypoplasia. Association with bilateral sensorineural hearing loss has also been described.", "synonyms": "Bilateral hip and radial head dislocations-short stature-scoliosis-carpal coalitions-pes cavus-facial dysmorphism syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "omim": "615155"}, {"name": "Steifer Daumen-Brachydaktylie-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Symptome dieses Syndroms sind Minderbegabung, leichte Dysmorphien, Brachydaktylie Typ A, Adipositas und Ankylose beider Daumen. Es wurde bei mehreren weiblichen Mitgliedern einer Familie (ein M\u00e4dchen, seine Mutter und Gro\u00dfmutter und wahrscheinlich auch ihre Schwester und Gro\u00dftante) und in einem isolierten Fall beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation syndrome characterized by bilateral thumb ankylosis, type A brachydactyly and mild to moderate intellectual disability. Patients present thumb stiffness and abnormalities of the metacarpal bones, frequently associated with mild facial dysmorphism and signs of obesity. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1990.", "synonyms": "Piussan-Lenaerts-Mathieu syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "188201", "umls": "C2931515", "mesh": "C537511", "gard": "4375"}, {"name": "Steinert-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Myotone Dystrophie Steinert", "german_description": "Die Steinert-Krankheit, auch Myotone Dystrophie Typ 1 (DM1) genannt, ist eine Muskelkrankheit mit Myotonie und Funktionsst\u00f6rungen einer Vielzahl von Organen. Symptome sind Muskelschw\u00e4che, Reizleitungsst\u00f6rungen des Herzens, Katarakt, endokrine St\u00f6rungen, Schlafst\u00f6rungen und Stirnglatze. Es ist die h\u00e4ufigste der im Erwachsenenalter beginnenden Muskeldystrophien. Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:20.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Krankheit ist verbunden mit Anomalien in einem Gen in der Chromosomenregion 19q13.2-q13.3. Deren Nachweis mit molekulargenetischen Methoden sichert die Diagnose. Die DM1 wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Antizipation, d.h. Vorverlagerung des Erkrankungsalters in aufeinander folgenden Generationen, ist m\u00f6glich. Wegen der gro\u00dfen Variabilit\u00e4t des klinischen Bildes auch innerhalb einer Familie kann die genetische Beratung schwierig sein. Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist zu empfehlen, wegen der Schwere der neonatalen Formen besonders bei m\u00fctterlicher Erkrankung. Zur Behandlung geh\u00f6ren multidisziplin\u00e4re j\u00e4hrliche Kontrollen. Die Krankheit verl\u00e4uft meist langsam progredient, aber gelegentlich werden auch rapide Verschlechterungen gesehen. Wegen der erh\u00f6hten Mortalit\u00e4t pulmonaler und kardialer Komplikationen ist die Lebenserwartung reduziert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic multi-system disorder characterized by a wide range of muscle-related manifestations (muscle weakness, myotonia, early onset cataracts (before age 50) and systemic manifestations (cerebral, endocrine, cardiac, gastrointestinal tract, uterus, skin and immunologic involvement) that vary depending on the age of onset. The very wide clinical spectrum ranges from lethal presentations in infancy to mild, late-onset disease.", "synonyms": "Myotonic dystrophy type 1, Steinert disease, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Neonatal, Adult", "icd_10": "G71.1", "omim": "160900", "umls": "C2931688", "mesh": "C538008", "gard": "8310", "epidemiology": "It is the most frequent adult muscular dystrophy and has an estimated prevalence ranging from 1/215,000 in Taiwan to 1/5,500 in Croatia. It appears to be more prevalent in the Saguenay-Lac-St-Jean region-Quebec, Canada (1/600), suggesting a founder effect. The disease occurs worldwide.", "clinical_description": "The age of onset is highly variable, from prenatal to adulthood. The clinical manifestations also cover a wide range and may differ within and between affected families. Five forms are currently recognized: congenital, early childhood, juvenile, adult-onset and late-onset. Congenital disease (15% of cases) is the most severe form and includes severe generalized weakness at birth with respiratory distress, hypotonia, and feeding difficulty. Patients subsequently develop delayed cognitive and motor milestones intellectual disability, and autism spectrum disorder. The course may be fatal in congenital cases (30-40%). In childhood onset cases (with the age of onset between 1 and 10 years of age), the main clinical manifestations involve muscle weakness (including both proximal and distal muscle group, facial weakness, respiratory and gastrointestinal complications such as respiratory distress, aspiration, dysphagia, constipation and speech disturbances), myotonia, sleep breathing disorders, recurrent infections, cognitive impairment, psychiatric disorders (phobia, depression, anxiety, attention deficit-hyperactivity). The juvenile form with the age of onset between 11 and 20 years of age, is characterized by scholar and behavioral problems and is often under recognized. The classic adult form (75% of cases), which develops between 20 and 40 years of age, is characterized by progressive distal muscle weakness, pain, myotonia and multiorgan involvement (irritable bowel disease, conduction and other cardiac disorders, cataracts, ophthalmoplegia, diabetes mellitus, hypogonadism, hypotestosteronism, and thyroid dysfunction). Intellectual deficit is also present in adult cases. Balding may occur in affected males and females and infertility may be present. Late-onset disease after 40 years of age involves mild myotonia and weakness, daytime sleepiness, and cataracts. A higher cancer risk has been reported in affected patients.", "etiology": "The disease is due to abnormal CTG expansion in the non-translating region of the DMPKgene (19q13.3). Disease severity generally correlates with the number of DNA repeats. More than 2000 CTG repeats may be found. The expansion is unstable, which may explain the clinical variability.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on the characteristic clinical manifestations and a consistent family history, and confirmed by molecular genetic testing of the causative gene expansion. Muscle biopsy is not anymore necessary for the diagnosis and is has been replaced by genetic testing, which represents the gold standard.", "differential_diagnosis": "There are several overlapping features with myotonic dystrophy type 2; however, the diseases are distinct genetically and have different courses and management requirements.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Early-onset cases may be identified prenatally with polyhydramnios and reduced fetal movements.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal dominant. Genetic counselling should be provided to affected families. Whilst there is a 50% risk of disease transmission from an affected parent to their offspring, the disease shows variable penetrance.", "management_and_treatment": "No specific targeted treatment is currently available. Management primarily includes monitoring for complications and supportive care (assistive devices, hormone therapy, pain medication).", "prognosis": "Some cases are severe and may have an impact on life expectancy, particularly early-onset cases caused by massive gene expansions. The prognosis in adult-onset cases is mainly dependent on the severity of cardiac manifestations. Causes of death include respiratory failure, cardiovascular disease, arrhythmia, and neoplasms."}, {"name": "Steinert-Krankheit, adulte", "sub_name": "Myotone Dystrophie Steinert mit Beginn im Erwachsenenalter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Myotone Dystrophie Typ 1 des Erwachsenen, Steinert-Krankheit, adulte, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G71.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Myotone Dystrophie Steinert"}, {"name": "Steinert-Krankheit, im Kindesalter beginnend", "sub_name": "Myotone Dystrophie Steinert mit Beginn im Kindesalter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Myotone Dystrophie Typ 1 des Kindes, Steinert-Krankheit, im Kindesalter beginnend, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G71.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Myotone Dystrophie Steinert"}, {"name": "Steinert-Krankheit, juvenile", "sub_name": "Myotone Dystrophie Steinert, juvenile Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Myotone Dystrophie Typ 1 des Jugendlichen, Steinert-Krankheit, juvenile, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G71.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Myotone Dystrophie Steinert"}, {"name": "Steinert-Krankheit, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Myotone Dystrophie Steinert, kongenitale Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Myotone Dystrophie Typ 1, kongenitale Form, Steinert-Krankheit, kongenitale, ", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G71.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Myotone Dystrophie Steinert"}, {"name": "Steinert-Krankheit, sp\u00e4t-beginnende", "sub_name": "Myotone Dystrophie Steinert mit sp\u00e4tem Beginn", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Myotone Dystrophie Steinert, sp\u00e4t-beginnend, Steinert-Krankheit, sp\u00e4t-beginnende, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "\u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "G71.1", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Myotone Dystrophie Steinert"}, {"name": "Steinfeld-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Holoprosenzephalie, Reduktionsfehlbildungen der Gliedma\u00dfen mit \u00fcberwiegend radialer Auspr\u00e4gung (fehlende Daumen, Phokomelie), Herzfehler, Nierenfehlbildungen und Fehlen der Gallenblase. Es wurde in 2 Familien mit mindestens 7 Betroffenen beschrieben. Fakultative Symptome sind: Wirbelanomalien, Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte, Mikrophthalmie, fehlende Nase, dysplastische Ohren, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Iris- und Retinakolobome und/oder Uvula bifida. Wahrscheinlich wird das Syndrom autosomal-dominant mit variabler Expressivit\u00e4t vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterised by holoprosencephaly, predominantly radial limb deficiency (absent thumbs, phocomelia), heart defects, kidney malformations and absence of gallbladder. Variable manifestations include vertebral anomalies, cleft lip/palate, microphthalmia, absent nose, dysplastic ears, hearing loss, colobomas of the iris and retina and/or bifid uvula.", "synonyms": "Steinfeld syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "184705", "umls": "C1866649", "gard": "2727"}, {"name": "Stenose der Apertura piriformis, kongenitale, isolierte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare otorhinolaryngological malformation characterized by narrowing of the pyriform aperture (i. e. < 8 to 10 mm in a full-term infant) due to an overgrowth of the nasal process of the maxilla, resulting in potentially lethal nasal airway obstruction in the newborn. Depending on the degree of obstruction, clinical signs and symptoms include inspiratory stridor, respiratory distress, cyanosis, sternal retraction, ribcage asymmetry, and feeding difficulties.", "synonyms": "Isolated apertura pyriformis stenosis, Isolated nasal pyriform aperture hypoplasia, ", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q30.8"}, {"name": "Stenose der Halswirbels\u00e4ule, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Zervikale Spinalkanalstenose, kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Congenital cervical spinal stenosis is a rare neurological disease characterized by a congenital narrowing of the bony anatomy of the cervical spinal canal (saggital diameter <14mm), predisposing the individual to symptomatic neural compression, such as cramps, paresthesias, pain, muscle hypertonia and weakness, myelopathy and sphincter disturbances.", "synonyms": "Congenital narrowing of cervical spinal canal, Congenital stenosis of the cervical spine, ", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "Q06.8"}, {"name": "Stenose der Pulmonalarterien\u00e4ste", "sub_name": "Periphere Pulmonalstenose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Peripheral pulmonary stenosis is a rare congenital anomaly of the great arteries that may occur at single or multiple sites, in isolation or in association with other congenital heart defects (valvular pulmonary stenosis, atrial, or ventricular septal defects or tetralogy of Fallot) and genetic syndromes (Williams, Alagile syndrome). Clinical presentation is variable and includes heart murmurs, dyspnea, syncope, chest pain and pulmonary hypertension-associated symptoms.", "synonyms": "Branch pulmonary artery stenosis, Pulmonary branch stenosis, ", "icd_10": "Q25.6", "gard": "4589"}, {"name": "Stenose, subpulmonale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "Q24.3", "UMLS": "C3165028", "GARD": "5051", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Valvul\u00e4re Pulmonalstenose, kongenitale"}, {"name": "Sterile multifokale Osteomyelitis mit Periostitis und Pustulose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sterile multifocal osteomyelitis with periostitis and pustulosis is a rare, severe, genetic autoinflammatory syndrome characterized by usually neonatal onset of generalized neutrophilic cutaneous pustulosis and severe, recurrent, multifocal, aseptic osteomyelitis with marked periostitis, typically affecting distal ribs, long bones and vertebral bodies. High levels of acute-phase reactants (with no fever associated) and onychosis are frequently observed additional features.", "synonyms": "Autoinflammatory disease due to interleukin-1 receptor antagonist deficiency, DIRA, Interleukin-1 receptor antagonist deficiency, OMPP, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D84.8", "omim": "612852", "umls": "C2748507", "gard": "10516"}, {"name": "Stern-Lubinsky-Durrie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Korneo-dermato-oss\u00e4res-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Ver\u00e4nderungen des Hornhautepithels (mit Lichtscheu und Brennen und Laufen der Augen), diffuse palmo-plantare Hyperkeratose, distale Onycholyse, Brachydaktylie, Minderwuchs, Zahnprobleme und Fr\u00fchgeburtlichkeit. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei 7 Angeh\u00f6rigen aus 3 Generationen beschrieben. Die Vererbung ist autosomal-dominant. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, ectodermal dysplasia syndrome characterized by corneal epithelial changes (ranging from roughening to nodular irregularities), diffuse palmoplantar hyperkeratosis with thickened, erythematous, scaly lesions affecting the elbows, knees and knuckles, distal onycholysis, brachydactyly accompanied by a single transverse palmar crease, short stature, premature birth, and increased susceptibility to tooth decay. Ocular symptoms include photophobia, reduced night vision, burning and watery eyes, and varying visual acuity. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1984.", "synonyms": "CDO syndrome, Stern-Lubinsky-Durrie syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "H18.5", "omim": "122440", "umls": "C1852542\u00a0 C2931506", "mesh": "C536444\u00a0 C537488", "gard": "1531"}, {"name": "Sternum bifidum", "sub_name": "Sternum-Spalte", "german_description": "Die Sternum-Spalte ist eine seltene Fehlbildung mit unbekannter Ursache. Sie resultiert aus einer St\u00f6rung der Fusion der Sternumanteile, die normal ab der 9. Woche des intrauterinen Lebens von kranial nach kaudal voranschreitet. Die Diagnose erfolgt bei der Geburt oder sp\u00e4ter. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:50.000. Die Spalte kann auf jeder H\u00f6he des Sternums auftreten. In der Literatur wurden etwas mehr als 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Meist treten die Sternum-Spalten isoliert auf. Sie wurden aber auch in Assoziation mit H\u00e4mangiom des Gesichtes, Fl\u00fcgelfell des Halses, Fehlbildungen des Zentralnervensystems und Augen-Kolobom beschrieben. Eine Sternum-Spalte kann auch als Teil der Cantrell-Pentalogie auftreten. Die Prognose wird dann durch die begleitenden Fehlbildungen bestimmt. Die Spalte ist in beiden Geschlechtern gleich h\u00e4ufig. Die seltenen famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4lle hatten immer begleitende Fehlbildungen. Die Behandlung besteht in prim\u00e4rem Verschlu\u00df der Sternum-Spalte schon im fr\u00fchen Kleinkindalter, um Verletzungen von Herz und gro\u00dfen Gef\u00e4\u00dfen vorzubeugen, um die Atemexkursionen zu verbessern, und aus \u00e4sthetischen Gr\u00fcnden, denn langfristig kann eine leichtgradige Trichterbrust entstehen. Bei Neugeborenen k\u00f6nnen die Sternumleisten einander durch einfache Naht angen\u00e4hert werden, da der knorpelige Thorax noch flexibel ist. Bei fr\u00fcher Reparatur besteht auch kaum ein Risiko f\u00fcr eine Kompression des Herzens. Wird aber die Rekonstruktion hinausgez\u00f6gert, dann ist, wegen der erh\u00f6hten Rigidit\u00e4t der Thoraxwand und der physiologischen Anpassung der Thoraxorgane an den Umfang des Thorax, eine Ann\u00e4herung der Sternumleisten ohne Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Herzens und der Lungen nicht mehr m\u00f6glich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare idiopathic congenital thoracic malformation characterized by a sternal fusion defect, that can be complete or partial (either superior or inferior), that is usually asymptomatic in the neonatal period (apart from a paradoxical midline thoracic bulging) but that can lead to dyspnea, cough, frequent respiratory infections and increased risk of trauma-related injury to the heart, lungs and major vessels if left untreated.", "synonyms": "Cleft sternum, Sternum bifidum, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q76.7", "umls": "C0265696\u00a0 C2931507", "mesh": "C537489", "gard": "5012"}, {"name": "Sternum-Spalte", "german_description": "Die Sternum-Spalte ist eine seltene Fehlbildung mit unbekannter Ursache. Sie resultiert aus einer St\u00f6rung der Fusion der Sternumanteile, die normal ab der 9. Woche des intrauterinen Lebens von kranial nach kaudal voranschreitet. Die Diagnose erfolgt bei der Geburt oder sp\u00e4ter. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:50.000. Die Spalte kann auf jeder H\u00f6he des Sternums auftreten. In der Literatur wurden etwas mehr als 100 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Meist treten die Sternum-Spalten isoliert auf. Sie wurden aber auch in Assoziation mit H\u00e4mangiom des Gesichtes, Fl\u00fcgelfell des Halses, Fehlbildungen des Zentralnervensystems und Augen-Kolobom beschrieben. Eine Sternum-Spalte kann auch als Teil der Cantrell-Pentalogie auftreten. Die Prognose wird dann durch die begleitenden Fehlbildungen bestimmt. Die Spalte ist in beiden Geschlechtern gleich h\u00e4ufig. Die seltenen famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4lle hatten immer begleitende Fehlbildungen. Die Behandlung besteht in prim\u00e4rem Verschlu\u00df der Sternum-Spalte schon im fr\u00fchen Kleinkindalter, um Verletzungen von Herz und gro\u00dfen Gef\u00e4\u00dfen vorzubeugen, um die Atemexkursionen zu verbessern, und aus \u00e4sthetischen Gr\u00fcnden, denn langfristig kann eine leichtgradige Trichterbrust entstehen. Bei Neugeborenen k\u00f6nnen die Sternumleisten einander durch einfache Naht angen\u00e4hert werden, da der knorpelige Thorax noch flexibel ist. Bei fr\u00fcher Reparatur besteht auch kaum ein Risiko f\u00fcr eine Kompression des Herzens. Wird aber die Rekonstruktion hinausgez\u00f6gert, dann ist, wegen der erh\u00f6hten Rigidit\u00e4t der Thoraxwand und der physiologischen Anpassung der Thoraxorgane an den Umfang des Thorax, eine Ann\u00e4herung der Sternumleisten ohne Beeintr\u00e4chtigung des Herzens und der Lungen nicht mehr m\u00f6glich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare idiopathic congenital thoracic malformation characterized by a sternal fusion defect, that can be complete or partial (either superior or inferior), that is usually asymptomatic in the neonatal period (apart from a paradoxical midline thoracic bulging) but that can lead to dyspnea, cough, frequent respiratory infections and increased risk of trauma-related injury to the heart, lungs and major vessels if left untreated.", "synonyms": "Cleft sternum, Sternum bifidum, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q76.7", "umls": "C0265696\u00a0 C2931507", "mesh": "C537489", "gard": "5012"}, {"name": "Steroid-5-Alpha-Reduktase 2-Mangel", "sub_name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch 5-Alpha-Reduktase 2-Mangel", "german_description": "Der Steroid-5-Alpha-Reduktase-Mangel ist selten, wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt und verursacht einen m\u00e4nnlichen Pseudohermaphroditismus. Es handelt sich um eine unvollst\u00e4ndige Differenzierung der m\u00e4nnlichen Genitalien bei M\u00e4nnern mit normalem m\u00e4nnlichen Karyotyp 46, XY. Das Enzym 5-Alpha-Reduktase 2 wird durch das SRD5A2-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 2p23 kodiert und katalysiert die Umwandlung von Testosteron (T) in Dihydrotestosteron (DHT), das f\u00fcr die normale Differenzierung des \u00e4u\u00dferen m\u00e4nnlichen Genitales und die Entwicklung des Urogenitalsinus unentbehrlich ist. Das klassische Syndrom der Pseudovaginalen Perineoskrotalen Hypospadie manifestiert sich bei der Geburt mit intermedi\u00e4rem \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitale, klitorisartigem Phallus, Hypospadie, Scrotum bifidum und persistierendem Urogenitalsinus mit blind endender perinealer Vaginaltasche. Es kann jedoch der Aspekt des \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitales von vollst\u00e4ndig weiblich bis zu m\u00e4nnlich mit Hypospadie und / oder Mikropenis reichen. Die Testes liegen in den Labioskrotalfalten oder in den Leistenkan\u00e4len. Der innere Urogenitaltrakt ist gut entwickelt, und Derivate des M\u00fcllerschen Ganges fehlen. Wenn die Gonaden nicht entfernt wurden, kommt es in der Pubert\u00e4t durch Wirkung des Testosterons zu einer ausgepr\u00e4gten Virilisierung, aber ohne Gyn\u00e4komastie. Die meisten Patienten sind infertil. Basal und nach Stimulation mit hCG (menschlichem Choriongonadotropin) sind die Spiegel von Testosteron normal oder erh\u00f6ht. Gleichzeitig sind die DHT-Spiegel niedrig und die T/DHT-Ratio auf > 20 erh\u00f6ht. Die Umwandlung von T in DHT kann in kultivierten Fibroblasten aus Genitalhaut untersucht werden, h\u00e4ufig jedoch sind die Ergebnisse falsch negativ. In den 5 Exons des SRD5A2-Gens sind mehr als 40 verschiedene Mutationen gefunden worden. Bei den meisten handelt es sich um Aminos\u00e4ure-Substitutionen. Es wurden aber auch vollst\u00e4ndige Deletionen des Gens, kleinere Deletionen, sowie Nonsense- und Splice-Mutationen nachgewiesen. Es herrscht noch keine Einigkeit dar\u00fcber, nach welchen Kriterien die Zuweisung zu einem bestimmten Geschlecht erfolgen soll. Abh\u00e4ngig davon, welche Resultate ggf. mit einer verm\u00e4nnlichenden Genitalplastik zu erreichen sind, mu\u00df die Frage bei jedem Patienten sorgf\u00e4ltig gepr\u00fcft werden. F\u00e4llt die Entscheidung zugunsten einer weiblichen Zuweisung, dann sind eine verweiblichende Genitalplastik und eine Gonadektomie angezeigt. Bei Kenntnis der Mutation kann in weiteren Schwangerschaften der Mutter eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durchgef\u00fchrt werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare disorder of sex development (DSD) due to a defect in metabolizing testosterone to dihydrotestosterone and characterized by incomplete intrauterine masculinization which ranges from a female genitalia with a blind vaginal pouch to a fully male phenotype with pseudovaginal posterior hypospadias and micropenis.", "synonyms": "46,XY DSD due to 5-alpha-reductase 2 deficiency, Pseudovaginal perineoscrotal hypospadias, Steroid 5-alpha-reductase 2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Neonatal, Infancy, Adolescent", "icd_10": "E29.1", "omim": "264600", "umls": "C0268297\u00a0 C3669122", "gard": "5680", "meddra": "10000029", "epidemiology": "The disease has been described in large pedigrees from the Dominican Republic, Southern Lebanon and the Eastern Highlands Province of Papua New Guinea. It is relatively rare among Caucasians, but is recognized as a significant cause of DSD and mutational analysis is part of initial investigations.", "clinical_description": "Patients present at birth with characteristics of dihydrotestosterone (DHT) deficiency, such as posterior hypospadias, micropenis/clitoris-like phallus, bifid scrotum, cryptorchid testes (with normal or reduced spermatogenesis), and rudimentary prostate. The clinical spectrum is heterogeneous, ranging from a female with a blind vaginal pouch to a fully male phenotype with hypospadias and micropenis. Two-thirds of patients are initially assigned female gender, and thus clinical presentation maybe later during childhood with abnormal genitalia or during puberty with scarce facial and body hair (with normal sebum production) and virilization without breast development. Wolffian duct differentiation (testosterone-dependent) and regression of M\u00fcllerian structures (AMH-dependent) are not involved.", "etiology": "The disease is caused by mutations in the SRD5A2-gene (2p23.1) leading to a reduced or absent function of the steroid 5 alpha-reductase type 2 enzyme which converts testosterone into DHT in the external genitalia. As a result, male differentiation fails to occur during fetal development, despite high circulating testosterone levels. Manifestations at birth vary according to the levels of residual enzymatic function.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostic criteria include genital ambiguity, a family history of DSD, and genital/karyotype discordance. Biochemical findings reveal increase in the testosterone/DHT ratio after human chorionic gonadotropin stimulation and normal testosterone and anti-M\u00fcllerian hormone concentration. Diagnosis also relies on 5-alpha-reductase activity assessment using the urinary steroid profiling (ratio of androsterone to etiocholanolone and 5-alpha-tetrahydrocortisol/tetrahydrocortisol and 5-alpha-tetrahydrocorticosterone to tetrahydrocorticosterone below the lower limit of normal). Nowadays, the diagnosis is most commonly determined directly by genetic screening.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes many other causes of severe hypospadias like partial androgen insensitivity syndrome, 17-beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase 3 deficiency and Leydig cell hypoplasia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis with ultrasound is uncommon but may occur in families with a previously diagnosed child.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples. The parents are almost always carriers and without symptoms, but 25% of their boys will be affected. Girls with 46,XX karyotype and who are homozygous for mutations in the gene, will have no symptoms, but will transmit the mutation to their children.", "management_and_treatment": "For patients raised as male, the main concern is to keep the testis for later hormone production. Topical DHT cream on the pubic area can be applied neonatally after diagnosis at least during the minipuberty. Surgical repair of hypospadias (chordee correction, urethral reconstruction and orchidopexia with or without scrotalplasty,) should be performed at 6-18 months of age. For patients raised as female, management may include surgical correction of the external genitalia (vaginal opening into the perineum with early separation of the vagina and urethra), early removal of gonadal tissue to prevent masculinization before puberty, clitoral reduction (if severe masculinization) and cyclic hormonal therapy at puberty for development of secondary sexual characteristics. Choosing a female sex is nowadays only an option in XY children with a total deficiency.", "prognosis": "The risk of gonadal tumors in individuals with SRD5A2 mutations is quite low. Prostate diseases (prostate cancer, benign prostate hyperplasia) have not been reported in affected males. Most men are infertile due to the small prostate gland causing diminished semen volume and lack of spontaneous fertility; however, artificial reproductive techniques are a possibility."}, {"name": "Steroid-Dehydrogenase-Mangel - Zahnanomalien", "german_description": "Der Mangel der Steroid-Dehydrogenase ist eine autosomal-rezessiv vererbte Lebererkrankung, die in einer saudi-arabischen Familie mit blutsverwandten Eltern gemeinsam mit abnormer Zahl der Z\u00e4hne auftrat. Diese Assoziation l\u00e4sst daran denken, da\u00df zwei benachbarte Gene gleichzeitig durch eine Mutation (z.B. eine Deletion) ver\u00e4ndert sind (sog. 'contiguous gene syndrome'). Die allgemeine Hypomineralisation und die Schmelzhypoplasie wurde mit einer Malabsorption im Gefolge des Enzymdefektes und der gest\u00f6rten Leberfunktion erkl\u00e4rt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare metabolic liver disease characterized by progressive liver disease and early cirrhosis due to accumulation of toxic cholesterol metabolites, which are detectable in bile, plasma, and urine, in association with dental abnormalities such as general hypomineralization and enamel hypoplasia, as well as occurrence of supernumerary teeth. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1996.", "synonyms": "Lyngstadaas syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "K76.8", "umls": "C2931508", "gard": "5015"}, {"name": "Steroid-produzierender maligner Thekazelltumor, nicht klassifizierter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Malignant steroid cell tumor of the ovary, not otherwise specified is a rare malignant sex cord stromal tumor of ovary (see this term) of unknown histological lineage, occurring in adult women, characterized, in most cases, by manifestations of androgen excess (hirsutism, hair loss, amenorrhea, or oligomenorrhea) and, occasionally, Cushing syndrome (see this term).", "synonyms": "Theca (steroid-producing) cell cancer, not further specified, ", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "C56"}, {"name": "Steroid-responsive Enzephalopathie mit assoziierter Autoimmun-Thyroiditis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Steroid-responsive encephalopathy associated with autoimmune thyroiditis (SREAT) is a rare, acquired, neurological disease characterized by encephalopathy associated with elevated antithyroid antibodies, in the absence of other causes. Clinical presentation varies from minor cognitive impairment to status epilepticus and coma, and frequently includes seizures, confusion, speech disorder, memory impairment, ataxia and psychiatric manifestations.", "synonyms": "Hashimoto encephalitis, SREAT, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G04.8", "umls": "C0393639", "gard": "8570"}, {"name": "Steroidsulfatase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Ichthyose, X-chromosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die X-chromosomal-rezessive Ichthyose (RXLI) ist eine Genodermatose aus der Gruppe der nach den Mendelschen Regeln vererbten Verhornungsst\u00f6rungen (MeDOC). Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch generalisierte Hyperkeratose und Schuppung der Haut.", "synonyms": "RXLI, Steroidsulfatase-Mangel, XLI, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q80.1", "OMIM": "300001\u00a0 308100", "UMLS": "C0079588\u00a0 C2717836\u00a0 C2720163", "MeSH": "D016114", "GARD": "7904", "MedDRA": "10048063", "epidemiology": "Von RXLI ist fast ausschlie\u00dflich das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht betroffen. Sie ist die zweith\u00e4ufigste Form von Ichthyose und hat unter M\u00e4nnern eine Pr\u00e4valenz von 1:2.000 - 1:6.000.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome k\u00f6nnen schon in den ersten Lebenstagen auftreten, mit der Entwicklung nicht- erythemat\u00f6ser, polygonaler, locker adh\u00e4renter Schuppen. Diese Schuppen entwickeln sich sp\u00e4ter in graue oder schmerzliche anhaftende Schuppen, die besonders am Stamm, an den Streck- und Beugeseiten der Extremit\u00e4ten und am Hals (mit dem Aussehen eines 'schmutzigen Halses') betont sind. Die Hautfalten, Handfl\u00e4chen und Fu\u00dfsohlen bleiben normal ausgespart. Die Bildung von Schuppen nimmt mit zunehmendem Alter und im Sommer ab. Die Entbindung kann (ungen\u00fcgende Erweiterung der Zervix) verz\u00f6gert ablaufen. Extrakutane Manifestationen, z.B.Maldescensus testis, treten bei etwa 20% der F\u00e4lle treten auf, f\u00fchren jedoch selten zum Hypogonadismus. Hornhauttr\u00fcbungen sind h\u00e4ufig, aber beeintr\u00e4chtigen das Sehverm\u00f6gen i.d.R. nicht. Bei etwa 40% der Knaben tritt eine Aufmerksamkeitsdefizit-Hyperaktivit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung auf, zumeist vom vorwiegend unaufmerksamen Subtyp. Ca. 25% der Patienten erf\u00fcllen die Kriterien f\u00fcr eine Autismus-Spektrum-St\u00f6rung oder einem verwandten Sprach/Kommunikationsdefizit. In seltenen F\u00e4llen, wenn die Ichthyose Teil eines Syndroms ist, treten schwerwiegende extrakutane Manifestationen auf, z.B Anosmie oder unilaterale Nierenaplasie (syndromale RXLI).", "etiology": "Die X-chromosomale Ichthyose ist eine Anomalie des epidermalen Lipidstoffwechsels. Ursache sind inaktivierende Mutationen oder Deletionen im Steroid-Sulfatase-Gen (STS;(Xp22.3). Die Steroid-Sulfatase (STS), eine Lipid-Hydrolase des Stratum corneum, ist \u00fcber die Hydrolyse der Steroidsulfate (z.B. Cholesterolsulfat (CSO4), sulfatierte Steroidhormone) an der Regulation der Permeabilit\u00e4tsschranke und der Desquamation der Haut beteiligt. Der STS-Mangel f\u00fchrt zu erh\u00f6hten Konzentrationen von CSO4, wodurch die epidermalen Serin-Proteasen gehemmt werden, mit der Folge verminderter Desquamation der Korneozyten und Retentions-Hyperkeratose. Syndromale RXLI-F\u00e4lle sind verursacht durch Contiguous-gene-Deletionen von Genen, die dem STS-Gen benachbart liegen. Dies ist beim Kallman-Syndrom, bei hypergonadotropem Hypogonadismus, okul\u00e4rem Albinismus Typ 1 oder bei Hypertropher Pylorusstenose m\u00f6glich.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Befunde und die Familiengeschichte. Sie wird best\u00e4tigt durch biochemische (Serumprotein-Elektrophorese, SPS-Aktivit\u00e4t in Fibroblasten oder Leukozyten) und molekulare/zytogenetische Analysen. Histologie oder Ultrastruktur der Haut sind hilfreich f\u00fcr die Abgrenzung der Ichthyosis vulgaris.", "differential_diagnosis": "DD sind Ichthyosis vulgaris, autosomal-rezessive kongenitale Ichthyose (ARCI), besonders die lamell\u00e4re Ichthyose, die syndromale RLXI und der multiple Sulfatase-Mangel.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Im m\u00fctterlichen Urin und Serum ergeben Messungen der Steroide einen verminderten \u00d6strogenspiegel. Deshalb kann die RXLI in utero erkannt werden, wenn der m\u00fctterliche \u00d6striolspiegel im Rahmen eines pr\u00e4natalen Screenings f\u00fcr andere Krankheiten bestimmt wird.", "genetic_counseling": "Die XLRI wird X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbt: Betroffen ist das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht, die Vererbung erfolgt durch weibliche \u00dcbertr\u00e4gerinnen. \u00dcber weibl. Patienten wurde selten berichtet.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung besteht in Feucht- und Weichhaltung der Haut mit fettenden Bade\u00f6len und Emollientien, die Feuchtigkeitsspender und Keratolytika enthalten. F\u00fcr erwachsene Patienten sind systemisch angewendete Retinoide eine Option, z.B. im Winter, wenn die Ichthyose oft schwerer ausgepr\u00e4gt ist.", "prognosis": "Die RXLI ist eine benigne Ichthyose-Form. Die Lebenserwartung ist normal.", "summary": "Von RXLI ist fast ausschlie\u00dflich das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht betroffen. Sie ist die zweith\u00e4ufigste Form von Ichthyose und hat unter M\u00e4nnern eine Pr\u00e4valenz von 1:2.000 - 1:6.000."}, {"name": "Sterol-27-Hydroxylase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Xanthomatose, zerebrotendin\u00f6se", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Zerebro-tendin\u00f6se Xanthomatose (CTX) ist eine Anomalie der Gallens\u00e4uren-Synthese und gekennzeichnet durch neonatale Cholestase, im Kindesalter beginnende Katarakt, bei Adoleszenten oder jungen Erwachsenen auftretende tendin\u00f6se Xanthome und Xanthome des Hirns mit im Erwachsenenalter einsetzenden neurologischen Funktionsst\u00f6rungen.", "synonyms": "Sterol-27-Hydroxylase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E75.5", "OMIM": "213700", "UMLS": "C0238052", "MeSH": "D019294", "GARD": "5622", "epidemiology": "Weltweit wurden mehr als 300 Patienten beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Menschen mit europ\u00e4ischer Herkunft wird auf 1:50.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Das initiale klinische Symptom ist die neonatale Cholestase oder eine chronische Diarrhoe im S\u00e4uglingsalter. In 75% der F\u00e4lle ist der erste Befund eine Katarakt, die oft im Kindesalter auftritt. S\u00e4uglinge k\u00f6nnen mit Cholestase und Leberfunktionsst\u00f6rung auffallen. Xanthome treten im zweiten bis dritten Lebensjahrzehnt in der Achillessehne und in anderen Sehnen (Ellenbogen, Hand, Patella, Hals) auf. Einige Patienten sind vom Kleinkindalter an intellektuell eingeschr\u00e4nkt, bei den meisten Patienten ist die Intelligenz bis zur Pubert\u00e4t normal oder subnormal. Im Erwachsenenalter kommt es progredient zu neurologischen Funktionsst\u00f6rungen, darunter Demenz, psychiatrische Auff\u00e4lligkeiten, Pyramiden- und/oder Kleinhirnzeichen, Krampfanf\u00e4lle und Neuropathie. Bei mehr als der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle tritt in den 20ern eine Demenz auf. Neuropsychiatrische Symptome, wie ver\u00e4ndertes Verhalten, Halluzinationen, Agitiertheit, Aggression, Depression und Suizidalit\u00e4t k\u00f6nnen stark ausgepr\u00e4gt sein. In den 20ern und 30ern entwickeln sich Pyramidenzeichen und/oder zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie. Auch extrapyramidale Symptome und periphere Neuropathie sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome.", "etiology": "Ursache der CTX sind Mutationen im CYP27A1-Gen (2q33-qter), das f\u00fcr die Sterol-27-Hydroxylase kodiert. Dieses Enzym katalysiert bei der Gallens\u00e4uren-Synthese (BAS) den ersten Schritt der Seitenketten-Oxidation der Sterolintermedi\u00e4ren. Der Enzymdefekt unterbricht die Synthese, Cholesterin und Cholestanol werden abgelagert und degenerative Prozesse ausgel\u00f6st.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die massenspektrometrische Analyse des Urins erm\u00f6glicht eine fr\u00fche Diagnose im Kindesalter. Die Diagnose bei Erwachsenen erfordert zwei von vier klinischen Kriterien (therapieresistente Diarrhoe, pr\u00e4senile Katarakt, tendin\u00f6se Xanthome, neurologische St\u00f6rungen) sowie den Nachweis abnorm erh\u00f6hter Konzentrationen von Cholestanol im Serum und in Sehnen. Die Plasmakonzentration von Cholesterin ist niedrig oder normal. Das MRI zeigt beiderseits eine Hyperintensit\u00e4t der Nuclei dentati und der wei\u00dfen Substanz des Hirns und des Kleinhirns. Durch molekulargenetische Analyse kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere Ursachen von Xanthomen, wie Sitosterol\u00e4mie und Hyperlipid\u00e4mie und bei S\u00e4uglingen mit Cholestase alle anderen Ursachen neonataler Cholestase.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik in embryonalem Gewebe ist m\u00f6glich, wenn bei einem vorangegangenen Kind die Krankheit gesichert wurde.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv, den Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Therapie der ersten Wahl ist der Ersatz von Chenodesoxychols\u00e4ure (CDCA). Dadurch werden der BAS und die Cholestanol-Konzentrationen normalisiert und die neurologische Symptomatik verbessert. Auch Inhibitoren der HMG-CoA-Reduktase k\u00f6nnen, allein oder in Kombination mit CDCA, gegeben werden. Im Alter von 50 Jahren ist in typischen F\u00e4llen eine Katarakt-Operation erforderlich. Auch mit Chols\u00e4ure wird behandelt. Zwar normalisiert sie den BAS und die Cholestanol-Konzentrationen nicht so wirkungsvoll wie CDCA, ist aber, anders als CDCA, nicht lebertoxisch.", "prognosis": "Eine fr\u00fche Diagnose und Therapie sind entscheidend, um einer zunehmenden Anh\u00e4ufung von Cholestanol und Cholesterin vorzubeugen. Durch die Therapie kann das Fortschreiten der Krankheit angehalten und in einigen F\u00e4llen sogar umgekehrt werden. Behandelte Patienten haben eine normale Lebenserwartung, die Lebenserwartung unbehandelter Patienten betr\u00e4gt 50-60 Jahre. \u00dcber fr\u00fchen Tod im Neugeborenenalter wurde in einigen F\u00e4llen berichtet.", "summary": "Weltweit wurden mehr als 300 Patienten beschrieben. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Menschen mit europ\u00e4ischer Herkunft wird auf 1:50.000 gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "Sterolbiosynthesedefekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sterol C5-Desaturase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Lathosterolose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Lathosterolose ist ein extrem seltener angeborener Fehler in der Sterolbiosynthese, der durch Gesichtsdysmorphien, kongenitale Anomalien (einschlie\u00dflich Gliedma\u00dfen- und Nierenanomalien), Gedeihst\u00f6rungen, Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerungen und Lebererkrankungen gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Sterol C5-Desaturase-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "607330", "UMLS": "C1846421", "MeSH": "C537880", "GARD": "9711", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur nur 4 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Bei Geburt liegen folgenden Merkmale vor: Mikrozephalie zusammen mit Hypotonie, Gedeihst\u00f6rung und dysmorphen Gesichtsmerkmalen wie bitemporale Verengung, Ptosis, geschwollene Wangen und Mikrognathie. Zu den genannten Extremit\u00e4tenanomalien geh\u00f6ren eine postaxiale Polydaktylie der oberen oder unteren Extremit\u00e4ten (haupts\u00e4chlich F\u00fc\u00dfe), bilaterale Syndaktylie zwischen den Zehen 2 und 3 oder 2 und 4 sowie bilaterale Klumpf\u00fc\u00dfe. Entwicklungsr\u00fcckst\u00e4nde und Lernschw\u00e4chen sind ab fr\u00fcher Kindheit in allen beobachteten Patienten manifest. Weitere Anomalien wurden ebenfalls berichtet, darunter Hornhauttr\u00fcbung, Katarakt, Schallleitungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Zahnfleischhypertrophie, mehrdeutige Genitalien, Hufeisenniere (siehe diesen Begriff) und neurologische Manifestationen (z.B. Myoklonus). Die Lebererkrankung bei Patienten reicht von Hypertransaminas\u00e4mie bis zur progressiven Cholestase und kann im Kindesalter zu Lebererkrankungen im Endstadium f\u00fchren.", "etiology": "Lathosterolose ist auf Mutationen im SC5D Gen (11q23.3) zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren. Eine Mutation in diesem Gen f\u00fchrt zu einem Mangel des Enzyms 3-beta-Hydroxysteroid-delta-5-Desaturase, das bei der Umwandlung von Lathosterin in 7-Dehydrocholesterin notwendig ist. Dadurch wird die Synthese von Cholesterin verhindert, das unter anderem als strukturelles Lipid, Vorl\u00e4ufer f\u00fcr Gallens\u00e4uren und Steroidhormone, dient und f\u00fcr die Reifung von Hedgehog-Morphogenen w\u00e4hrend der Embryonalentwicklung notwendig ist.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf klinischen und biochemischen Befunden. Durch Gaschromatographie/Massenspektroskopie (GC/MS) kann eine Erh\u00f6hung des Lathosterins sowohl in Hautfibroblasten als auch im Plasma festgestellt werden. Die Werte von 7-Dehydrocholesterin und Cholesterin sind normal oder niedrig. Der molekulargenetische Nachweis von Mutationen im SC5D-Gen best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die wichtigste Differentialdiagnose ist das Smith-Lemli-Opitz-Syndrom (siehe diesen Begriff), das viele klinische Merkmale mit der Lathosterolose teilt, aber mit biochemischen und genetischen Tests ausgeschlossen werden kann.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine Pr\u00e4nataldiagnostik bei bekannter Mutation ist m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Lathosterolose wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Die Eltern eines betroffenen Kindes sind obligat heterozygot und haben somit eine Chance von 25%, mit jeder Schwangerschaft ein betroffenes Kind zu bekommen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung beinhaltet die Erg\u00e4nzung des Cholesterins und die Reduzierung des 7-Hydrocholesterols. Bei einem Patienten konnte Simvastin, ein 3-Hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl-Coenzym A (HMG-CoA) Reduktase-Inhibitor, dazu beitragen den Lathosterolspiegel normalisieren. Die Lebertransplantation war erfolgreich bei der Normalisierung der Leberfunktion und des Cholesterinspiegels bei einem Patienten, der eine Lebererkrankung im Endstadium entwickelt hatte. Dar\u00fcber hinaus schien es die neurokognitiven Funktionen zu verbessern. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige opthalmologische Untersuchungen und Ultraschalluntersuchungen der Leber werden empfohlen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist schlecht, aber eine Behandlung scheint das Leben zu verl\u00e4ngern und das Fortschreiten der neurologischen Sch\u00e4den zu stoppen.", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur nur 4 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Sterol-Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Sterol-Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung mit Epilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom ist eine limitierte Form der Toxischen epidermalen Nekrolyse (s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Destruktion und Abl\u00f6sung con Haut- und Schleimhautepithel in weniger als 10% der K\u00f6rperoberfl\u00e4che. Die Jahres-Inzidenz des Stevens-Johnson-Syndroms ist weniger als 1:1.000.000. Ausl\u00f6ser sind eine Medikamenten-Allergie und selten eine Infektion oder Knochenmarktransplantation. In 25-30% der F\u00e4lle ist die Ursache unklar. Schon wenn die Diagnose vermutet wird, sollen die Patienten in eine intensivmedizinische Einrichtung oder in eine Einrichtung f\u00fcr Verbrennungspatienten \u00fcberwiesen werden. Die Reepithelialisation erfolgt schnell (2-3 Wochen). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A limited form of Stevens-Johnson syndrome/toxic epidermal necrolysis spectrum characterized by destruction and detachment of the skin epithelium and mucous membranes involving less than 10% of the body surface area.", "synonyms": "Dermatostomatitis, Stevens Johnson type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L51.1", "omim": "608579", "umls": "C0038325", "mesh": "D013262", "gard": "7700", "meddra": "10042033"}, {"name": "Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse-Spektrum", "german_description": "Die Epidermale Nekrolyse (Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom, Toxische epidermale Nekrolyse) ist eine akute, schwere Hautkrankheit im Rahmen einer Medikamentenallergie. Merkmal ist eine Destruktion des Epithels der Haut und der Schleimh\u00e4ute. Die Krankheit ist ganz au\u00dferordentlich selten, etwa 2 F\u00e4lle pro 1 Million Menschen und Jahr. Es handelt sich um einen lebensbedrohlichen Notfall. Blasenbildung und Abl\u00f6sung der Haut k\u00f6nnen einen hohen Anteil der K\u00f6rperoberfl\u00e4che und mehrere Schleimh\u00e4ute betreffen. Viszerale Komplikationen sind h\u00e4ufig. Die klinische Diagnose sollte durch eine Hautbiopsie mit dem Nachweis einer durch alle Hautschichten gehenden Nekrose best\u00e4tigt werden. Ein Dutzend 'Hochrisiko'-Medikamente verursachen die H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle. Unerl\u00e4sslich ist ist eine symptomatische Behandlung in Spezialzentren. Die Mortalit\u00e4tsrate ist hoch (20-25%), und etwa die H\u00e4lfte der \u00dcberlebenden behalten Restsch\u00e4den, besonders an den Augen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Toxic epidermal necrolysis (TEN) is an acute and severe skin disease with clinical and histological features characterized by the destruction and detachment of the skin epithelium and mucous membranes.", "synonyms": "SJS-TEN, Toxic epidermolysis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L51.2", "omim": "608579", "umls": "C0014518", "mesh": "D004816", "gard": "7743", "meddra": "10044223", "epidemiology": "Annual incidence is around 1/500,000. Females are more often affected than males.", "clinical_description": "Onset may occur at any age, but the risk increases after 40 years. Three subforms have been described according to the percentage of the body surface area affected: Stevens-Johnson syndrome (<10%; see this term), Lyell syndrome (>=30%; see this term) and an intermediate form (10-29%). The initial manifestations are nonspecific: a seemingly banal rash, fever, and a burning sensation involving the eyes, mouth and genitalia. The rash rapidly progresses to become vesicular and bullous on the face and body. The cutaneous vesicles aggregate and rupture under mild friction, revealing denuded red skin with seeping and pain. Mucous membrane lesions are present in 85 to 95% of patients with involvement, in order of frequency, of the oropharynx, eyes, genitalia and anus. Lesions are painful and lead to hypersalivation, feeding problems, photophobia, and burns following urination. High fever is a constant feature. Visceral manifestations are also frequent with hematological, respiratory and digestive involvement.", "etiology": "In two thirds of cases, TEN is triggered by a clearly identifiable drug allergy. A dozen high risk drugs have been identified: allopurinol, anti-infective sulphonamide agents, lamotrigine, nevirapine, carbamazepine, phenobarbital, phenytoin, and oxicam-derived nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs. In rare cases, the disease is associated with infections (in particular, Mycoplasma pneumonia) or bone marrow transplantation. The remaining 25-30% of cases are classed as idiopathic, but some of these cases may be associated with failure to identify the causative drug. The clinical diagnosis should be confirmed by skin biopsy, which will reveal epidermal necrosis and the absence of antibody deposits.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis should include chicken pox during the early stages of the disease, staphylococcal epidermolysis, staphylococcal scalded skin syndrome (associated with superficial skin peeling caused by a specific staphylococcal toxin and usually occurring in neonates), and, more rarely, autoimmune bullous diseases (excluded by examination of skin biopsies). In addition, the more limited forms of TEN are still often misdiagnosed as erythema multiforme major.", "management_and_treatment": "Patients should be admitted to an intensive care or burns unit as soon as the diagnosis is suspected. The causative drug, together with any related compounds should be contraindicated for the patient and their close relatives (in case a genetic predisposition). No disease-modifying drugs have been shown be efficient in the treatment of TEN. The benefits of general corticotherapy and cyclosporine administration are still under evaluation. High-dose intravenous immunoglobulins are costly and appear to be of limited efficacy. Intensive symptomatic management is essential: a heated environment, analgesia, daily dressing changes, prevention of infections, and symptomatic intensive care measures (hydration, nutrition, and hyperbaric oxygen therapy).", "prognosis": "Reepithelialization is rapid (2-3 weeks). However, the prognosis for patients with extensive forms of TEN is poor (mortality rate: 20-25%). Sequelae are reported in over 80% of surviving patients with ocular sequelae being the most problematic as they tend to be severe and progressive. Other sequelae (cutaneous, genital, buccal/dental or bronchial problems) are generally easier to detect and treat."}, {"name": "Stevens-Johnson/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse-\u00dcberlappungs-Syndrom", "sub_name": "SJS/TEN-\u00dcbergangsform", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "SJS mit \u00dcbergang in toxisch-epidermale Nekrolyse, SJS/TEN-Overlap-Syndrom, Stevens-Johnson/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse-\u00dcberlappungs-Syndrom, \u00dcbergangsform Stevens-Johnson-Syndrom/toxische epidermale Nekrolyse, ", "ICD-10": "L51.2", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Stewart-Morel-Morgagni-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist charakterisiert durch eine Verdickung der Facies cerebralis des Stirnbeins, manchmal assoziiert mit Adipositas und Hypertrichose. Betroffen sind vorwiegend Frauen in einem Alter \u00fcber 35 Jahre. Die Pr\u00e4valenz und die klinische Bedeutung der Hyperostosis frontalis interna ist nicht bekannt. Die Vererbung ist entweder X-chromosomal- oder autosomal-dominant. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare cranial malformation characterized by hyperostosis frontalis interna, variably associated with metabolic and endocrine disorders (such as obesity, diabetes mellitus, and hirsutism, among others). Compression by calvarial thickening may lead to cerebral atrophy and present with cognitive impairment, neuropsychiatric symptoms, headaches, and epilepsy. The condition predominantly affects women.", "synonyms": "Hyperostosis frontalis interna, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "M85.2", "omim": "144800", "umls": "C0020494", "gard": "8593"}, {"name": "Stickler-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Stickler-Syndrom ist eine erbliche Vitreoretinopathie, bei der Augensymptome mit mehr oder weniger stark ausgepr\u00e4gter Pierre-Robin-Sequenz, Knochenanomalien und (in 10% der F\u00e4lle) Schallempfindungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit assoziiert sind. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wurde zu etwa 1 :7.500 bestimmt. Augensymptome sind juvenile Katarakt, Myopie, Strabismus, vitreoretinale oder chorioretinale Degeneration, Netzhautabl\u00f6sung und chronische Uveitis. Knochensymptome sind eine leichte Platyspondylie und vergr\u00f6\u00dferte, oft abnorme Epiphysen. Der \u00dcberstreckbarkeit der Gelenke im jugendlichen Alter folgen arthrotische Ver\u00e4nderungen. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-dominant vererbt und ist genetisch heterogen. Der Typ 1 des Stickler-Syndroms ist verursacht durch Mutationen im COL2A1-Gen (12q13.11-q13.2) f\u00fcr die Alpha-1-Kette des Kollagens Typ II. Der Typ 2 des Stickler-Syndroms ist verursacht durch Mutationen im COL11A1-Gen (1p21) f\u00fcr die Alpha1-Kette des Kollagens Typ XI, und Ursache des Typs 3 des Stickler-Syndroms (ohne Augensymptome) sind Mutationen im COL11A2-Gen (6p21.3) f\u00fcr die Alpha2-Kette des Kollagens Typ XI. Eine autosomal-rezessive Form des Stickler-Syndroms wurde in einer marokkanischen Familie beschrieben. Ursache sind Mutationen im COL9A1-Gen (6q12-q14). Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Befunde, eine molekulare Diagnostik kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen. Bei bekannter urs\u00e4chlicher Mutation in der Familie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich. Die medizinische Betreuung soll durch ein multidisziplin\u00e4res Team erfolgen und muss die Besonderheiten eines jeden Falles ber\u00fccksichtigen, da die klinische Auspr\u00e4gung sehr verschieden ist. Der Schweregrad der vorhandenen Symptome bestimmt die Prognose. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare group of genetic connective tissue disorders characterized by ophthalmic, auditory, orofacial and articular manifestations. The two main clinical forms are clinically distinguished by the vitreous phenotype; stickler type 1 by a vestigial vitreous gel in the immediate retrolental space, bordered by a distinct folded membrane, and Stickler type 2 by sparse and irregularly thickened bundles of \ufb01bers throughout the vitreous cavity.", "synonyms": "Hereditary progressive arthroophthalmopathy, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "108300\u00a0 604841\u00a0 609508\u00a0 614134\u00a0 614284", "umls": "C0265253", "mesh": "C537492", "gard": "10782", "meddra": "10063402", "epidemiology": "Prevalence at birth has been estimated at around 1/7,500 to 1/9,000.", "clinical_description": "Ocular manifestations include a high risk of retinal detachment, congenital abnormalities of vitreous development, congenital myopia and congenital cataract. Retinal paravascular lattice degeneration may develop in adulthood. Orofacial features include Pierre Robin sequence (PRS), cleft palate and midfacial hypoplasia. In addition, congenital high-frequency sensorineural deficit is common and variable conductive hearing loss may also occur. Musculoskeletal problems include spinal abnormalities, hypermobility, epiphyseal dysplasia and premature osteoarthritis. Two other forms are characterized by the ocular-only (autosomal dominant rhegmatogenous retinal detachment) or systemic-only (Stickler syndrome type 3) manifestations.", "etiology": "Stickler syndrome is an inherited connective tissue disorder most commonly caused by mutations in the genes encoding collagen types II (COL2A1, 12q13.11), IX (COL9A1, 6q13; COL9A2, 1p34.2; COL9A3, 20q13.33), and XI (COL11A1, 1p21.1), but rarer non-collagen gene variants have been reported.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is made on the basis of clinical and ophthalmic examination and confirmed by molecular genetic analysis. Vitreous phenotyping is helpful in segregating sub-types as many of the other shared clinical features are similar.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses includes spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia congenita, spondyloperipheral dysplasia, Kniest dysplasia, Wagner syndrome, Knobloch syndrome, multiple epiphyseal dysplasia, metatropic dysplasia, Marfan syndrome and Marshall syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis may be possible. First trimester prenatal diagnosis based on the analysis of linked markers may be possible. In second trimester, ultrasound may be helpful in detecting features such as micrognathia or cleft palate, but their absence does not exclude the diagnosis.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance for Stickler syndrome type 1 and 2 is autosomal dominant; the risk of disease transmission to offspring is 50%. Autosomal recessive inheritance is rarely observed but should be considered if there is a history of consanguinity. However, there is wide variation in clinical expression of the disease. The disease is highly penetrant but with wide variability in its extraocular phenotype. Affected family members in the high risk sub-groups should be offered prophylactic treatment to reduce the risk of retinal detachment and be offered genetic counselling.", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be multidisciplinary and as clinical expression is very variable, treatment needs to be adapted to each case. Patients with PRS or cleft palate will require referral to a specialist MDT cleft team for assessment and management. This may also include speech therapy for patients with sub-clinical or soft palate cleft. Any refractive error should be corrected and prophylactic retinopexy discussed for the high risk variants. For type 1 Stickler syndrome, retinopexy substantially reduces the risk of giant retinal tear detachment. Patients should be warned of the signs and symptoms of retinal detachment and have rapid access to specialist vitreoretinal expertise in the event of such a development. Cataract is common and the surgical management, particularly in the pediatric sub-group requires specialist care. All affected patients should be referred for specialist audiology assessment if this has not already been undertaken by the cleft team. Patients may be unaware of sub-clinical hearing loss, particularly if present from birth. Although intellect is normal, pre-verbal children may need additional educational support with respect to their auditory and visual impairment. Specialist rheumatology and orthopedic management may be required for the associated arthropathy.", "prognosis": "Prognosis of the disease is generally good. There is no direct reduction on life expectancy. The quality of life will differ depending on clinical expression, age of diagnosis and degree (if any) of associated visual loss, deafness, speech impairment and arthropathy."}, {"name": "Stickler-Syndrom, autosomal-rezessives", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das autosomal-rezessive Stickler-Syndrom ist eine seltene Form des Stickler-Syndroms (s. dort), das bisher nur in 1 Familie beschrieben wurde. Ursache ist eine Mutation im COL9A1-Gen. Wie bei den anderen, dominant vererbten Formen der Erkrankung bestehen Symptome an Augen (Myopie, Netzhautabl\u00f6sung, Katarakt), Mund und Gesicht (Mikrogenie, Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, Gaumenspalte), Geh\u00f6r (Schallempfindungsschwerh\u00f6rigkeit) und Gelenken (epiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie).", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "OMIM": "614134\u00a0 614284"}, {"name": "Stickler-Syndrom, nicht-okul\u00e4rer Typ", "sub_name": "Oto-spondylo-megaepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie, autosomal-dominante", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Stickler syndrome type 3 is a rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by craniofacial dysmorphism (midface hypoplasia, depressed nasal bridge, small nose with upturned tip, cleft palate, Pierre Robin sequence), bilateral, pronounced sensorineural hearing loss, and skeletal/joint anomalies (including spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia, arthralgia/arthropathy), in the absence of ocular abnormalities.", "synonyms": "AD OSMED, Stickler syndrome type 3, Stickler syndrome, non-ocular type, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "184840", "umls": "C1861481", "mesh": "C537494", "gard": "5021"}, {"name": "Stickler-Syndrom Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "OMIM": "108300\u00a0 609508", "UMLS": "C2020284", "MeSH": "C537492", "GARD": "5018", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Stickler-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Stickler-Syndrom Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "OMIM": "604841", "UMLS": "C1858084", "MeSH": "C537493", "GARD": "5020", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Stickler-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Stickler-Syndrom Typ 3", "sub_name": "Oto-spondylo-megaepiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie, autosomal-dominante", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Stickler syndrome type 3 is a rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by craniofacial dysmorphism (midface hypoplasia, depressed nasal bridge, small nose with upturned tip, cleft palate, Pierre Robin sequence), bilateral, pronounced sensorineural hearing loss, and skeletal/joint anomalies (including spondyloepiphyseal dysplasia, arthralgia/arthropathy), in the absence of ocular abnormalities.", "synonyms": "AD OSMED, Stickler syndrome type 3, Stickler syndrome, non-ocular type, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "184840", "umls": "C1861481", "mesh": "C537494", "gard": "5021"}, {"name": "Stiff-Baby-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Hyperekplexie, heredit\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie ist eine erbliche neurologische Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch exzessive Schreckreaktionen.", "synonyms": "Kok-Krankheit, Startle-Krankheit, famili\u00e4re, Stiff-Baby-Syndrom, Stiff-Man-Syndrom, kongenitales, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "149400\u00a0 614618\u00a0 614619\u00a0 618011", "UMLS": "C1835614", "GARD": "3129", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie manifestiert sich schon kurz nach der Geburt mit ausfahrenden Schleuderbewegungen des K\u00f6rpers als Reaktion auf Ger\u00e4usche und Ber\u00fchrung und massive und anhaltende Versteifung des Stamms und der Gliedma\u00dfen, Ballen der F\u00e4uste und Attacken von hochfrequentem Zittern. F\u00fcr Neugeborene besteht das Risiko eines pl\u00f6tzlichen Kindstodes durch Laryngospasmus und Versagen der Herz- und Atmungsfunktion. Die Attacken von Versteifung k\u00f6nnen epileptischen Anf\u00e4llen \u00e4hneln, jedoch nehmen Steifheit und K\u00f6rperbewegungen im Schlaf ab oder verschwinden ganz, und das EEG ist normal. In den Monaten nach der Geburt nimmt die Muskelsteifheit ab, aber exzessive Schleuderbewegungen nach \u00e4u\u00dferer Stimulation oder Aufregung bleiben bestehen. Die motorischen Meilensteine sind oft leicht versp\u00e4tet, aber die intellektuelle Entwicklung ist in der Regel normal. Betroffene Kinder gehen schwankend und suchen oft Hilfe oder einen Halt. Die Gangst\u00f6rung nimmt zu, wenn die Kinder in Eile sind, wenn sie sich in einer Menschenmenge befinden oder wenn sie gedr\u00e4ngt werden. Stolpern oder ein unerwarteter Sto\u00df kann zu nicht kontrollierbaren St\u00fcrzen ('Wie ein Stock') mit dem Risiko schwerer Verletzungen f\u00fchren.", "etiology": "Mutationen im GLRA1-Gen (5q32) werden bei 30 % der F\u00e4lle mit Heredit\u00e4rer Hyperekplexie (und bei einer gr\u00f6\u00dferen Zahl von Patienten ohne offenbar betroffene Eltern) gefunden. Diese Mutationen werden autosomal-dominant oder rezessiv vererbt. Das GLRA1-Gen kodiert f\u00fcr die Alpha1-Untereinheit des juvenilen neuronalen Rezeptors f\u00fcr den inhibitorischen Neurotransmitter Glycin. Mutationen dieser Untereinheit verursachen verschiedene Funktionsst\u00f6rungen des neuronalen Chlorid (Cl-)-Kanals, weshalb die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie als eine 'Channelopathy' angesehen wird. Auch Mutationen in den Genen GLRB, GPHN und SLC6A5 (4q31.3, 14q24 und 11p15.2-p15.1) sind beobachtet worden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose beruht auf den klinischen Zeichen, auf den Ergebnissen der molekularen genetischen Tests und der elektrophphysiologischen Untersuchung.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die symptomatische Hyperekplexie und Spastizit\u00e4t sowie Epilepsie bei perinatalem Hirnschaden und metabolischen Hirnkrankheiten, die durch ein normales EEG und durch das Aussetzen der Steifheit und der K\u00f6rperbewegung im Schlaf ausgeschlossen werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die symptomatische Behandlung bei Erwachsenen erfolgt mit Clonazepam (1 mg/Tag). Vigabatrin ist wirkungslos. Bei Kindern sind niedrigere Dosen erforderlich. Die Kinder profitieren von wiederholten Versuchen k\u00f6rperlicher \u00dcbungen und weniger von etablierten Methoden der Physiotherapie oder von resolutem oder forderndem Training. Ausgiebige Aktivit\u00e4ten auf weichem oder sandigem Grund sind besonders wirksam. Eventuell ist es notwendig, gegen fehlendes Verst\u00e4ndnis, Sp\u00f6ttelei oder Druck von nicht informierten Lehrern, Verwandten und Freunden einzuschreiten.", "prognosis": "Bei den meisten Patienten geht in der Adoleszenz die Furcht vorm Fallen zur\u00fcck und der schwankende Gang normalisiert sich. Die starken Schreckreaktionen und die ruckartigen Bewegungen nach unerwarteten Reizen bleiben jedoch lebenslang bestehen und eine Minderzahl von Patienten leidet unter phobischer Angst vor dem \u00dcberqueren leerer Pl\u00e4tze und unter einem unsicheren und z\u00f6gerlichen Gang.", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Stiff-Leg-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Fokales Stiff-Limb-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Fokales Stiff-Person-Syndrom, Stiff-Leg-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "184850", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Stiff-man-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Stiff-person-Spektrum-Erkrankungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Stiff-man Syndrom (SMS) ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung. Ihre Symptome sind progressive und fluktuierende Muskelversteifung an Rumpf und Gliedma\u00dfen, schmerzhaft einschie\u00dfende Muskelspasmen, aufgaben-spezifische Angst frei zu gehen, gesteigerte Schreckhaftigkeit und ankylosierende Skelettdeformierungen, am h\u00e4ufigsten fixierte lumbale Hyperlordose.", "synonyms": "Moersch-Woltman-Syndrom, SMS, SPS, SPSD, Stiff-man-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "184850", "UMLS": "C0085292", "GARD": "5023", "MedDRA": "10042044", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome entwickeln sich schleichend \u00fcber Monate oder Jahre. Die Rigidit\u00e4t ist symmetrisch und macht Rumpf und H\u00fcften immobil. Der Gang wird steifbeinig und bizarr. Die \u00fcberlagernd einschiessenden schmerzhaften Spasmen k\u00f6nnen schwere St\u00fcrze verursachen. Die aufgaben-spezifische Phobie, freie Fl\u00e4chen zu betreten, kann pl\u00f6tzliche Gangblockaden, Spasmen und St\u00fcrze verursachen. Neurologische Fokalsymptome fehlen beim SMS, aber Muskelsteifigkeit und myoklonische Spasmen syndromal verkn\u00fcpft mit neurologischen Fokalsymptomen kommen bei der 'Plus-'Variante des SMS vor, der progressiven Enzephalomyelitis mit Rigidit\u00e4t und Myoklonien (PERM). Eine 'Minus'-Variante ist das Stiff limb-Syndrom (SLS), bei dem nur eine Gliedma\u00dfe betroffen ist.", "etiology": "Viele Patienten mit SMS, SLS oder PERM haben Insulin-bed\u00fcrftigen Diabetes mellitus (30%), Autoimmun-Thyreoiditis (10%), atrophische Gastritis mit pernizi\u00f6ser An\u00e4mie (5%), und einige haben Tumoren der Brust, der Lunge oder des Dickdarms. Das Vorhandensein von Autoantik\u00f6rpern (abs) gegen verschiedene Proteine inhibitorischer ZNS-Synapsen wie z.B. Glutamat-Dekarboxylase (GAD; > 70 %), Glycin Rezeptoren (ca 10 %), Amphiphysin (ca 4 %) oder DPPX legt eine autoimmun vermittelte Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der inhibitorischen Neurotransmission nahe.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert vor allem auf der klinischen Untersuchung. Sie wird unterst\u00fctzt durch den Nachweis von antineuronalen abs und durch charakteristische elektromyographische Normabweichungen. Die Untersuchung des Liquors ist einerseits notwendig zum Nachweis antineuronaler abs, andererseits um eine floride Entz\u00fcndung auszuschliessen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfa\u00dft atypische Manifestationen spinaler Erkrankungen, z.B. Multiple Sklerose oder Tumoren, axiale Dystonie, Neuromyotonie, erworbene Hyperekplexie (startle disease) und psychogene Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Benzodiazepine und Baclofen sind die Standardmedikamente f\u00fcr die symptomatische Behandlung. Immunmodulierende Therapien (Kortikosteroide, i.v. Immunglobuline und Plasmapherese) wurden mit unterschiedlichem Erfolg eingesetzt. In der Mehrzahl der Patienten mit SMS, SLS und PERM lassen sich so die Symptome beherrschen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken."}, {"name": "Stiff-Man-Syndrom, kongenitales", "sub_name": "Hyperekplexie, heredit\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie ist eine erbliche neurologische Erkrankung und gekennzeichnet durch exzessive Schreckreaktionen.", "synonyms": "Kok-Krankheit, Startle-Krankheit, famili\u00e4re, Stiff-Baby-Syndrom, Stiff-Man-Syndrom, kongenitales, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "149400\u00a0 614618\u00a0 614619\u00a0 618011", "UMLS": "C1835614", "GARD": "3129", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie manifestiert sich schon kurz nach der Geburt mit ausfahrenden Schleuderbewegungen des K\u00f6rpers als Reaktion auf Ger\u00e4usche und Ber\u00fchrung und massive und anhaltende Versteifung des Stamms und der Gliedma\u00dfen, Ballen der F\u00e4uste und Attacken von hochfrequentem Zittern. F\u00fcr Neugeborene besteht das Risiko eines pl\u00f6tzlichen Kindstodes durch Laryngospasmus und Versagen der Herz- und Atmungsfunktion. Die Attacken von Versteifung k\u00f6nnen epileptischen Anf\u00e4llen \u00e4hneln, jedoch nehmen Steifheit und K\u00f6rperbewegungen im Schlaf ab oder verschwinden ganz, und das EEG ist normal. In den Monaten nach der Geburt nimmt die Muskelsteifheit ab, aber exzessive Schleuderbewegungen nach \u00e4u\u00dferer Stimulation oder Aufregung bleiben bestehen. Die motorischen Meilensteine sind oft leicht versp\u00e4tet, aber die intellektuelle Entwicklung ist in der Regel normal. Betroffene Kinder gehen schwankend und suchen oft Hilfe oder einen Halt. Die Gangst\u00f6rung nimmt zu, wenn die Kinder in Eile sind, wenn sie sich in einer Menschenmenge befinden oder wenn sie gedr\u00e4ngt werden. Stolpern oder ein unerwarteter Sto\u00df kann zu nicht kontrollierbaren St\u00fcrzen ('Wie ein Stock') mit dem Risiko schwerer Verletzungen f\u00fchren.", "etiology": "Mutationen im GLRA1-Gen (5q32) werden bei 30 % der F\u00e4lle mit Heredit\u00e4rer Hyperekplexie (und bei einer gr\u00f6\u00dferen Zahl von Patienten ohne offenbar betroffene Eltern) gefunden. Diese Mutationen werden autosomal-dominant oder rezessiv vererbt. Das GLRA1-Gen kodiert f\u00fcr die Alpha1-Untereinheit des juvenilen neuronalen Rezeptors f\u00fcr den inhibitorischen Neurotransmitter Glycin. Mutationen dieser Untereinheit verursachen verschiedene Funktionsst\u00f6rungen des neuronalen Chlorid (Cl-)-Kanals, weshalb die Heredit\u00e4re Hyperekplexie als eine 'Channelopathy' angesehen wird. Auch Mutationen in den Genen GLRB, GPHN und SLC6A5 (4q31.3, 14q24 und 11p15.2-p15.1) sind beobachtet worden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose beruht auf den klinischen Zeichen, auf den Ergebnissen der molekularen genetischen Tests und der elektrophphysiologischen Untersuchung.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die symptomatische Hyperekplexie und Spastizit\u00e4t sowie Epilepsie bei perinatalem Hirnschaden und metabolischen Hirnkrankheiten, die durch ein normales EEG und durch das Aussetzen der Steifheit und der K\u00f6rperbewegung im Schlaf ausgeschlossen werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Die symptomatische Behandlung bei Erwachsenen erfolgt mit Clonazepam (1 mg/Tag). Vigabatrin ist wirkungslos. Bei Kindern sind niedrigere Dosen erforderlich. Die Kinder profitieren von wiederholten Versuchen k\u00f6rperlicher \u00dcbungen und weniger von etablierten Methoden der Physiotherapie oder von resolutem oder forderndem Training. Ausgiebige Aktivit\u00e4ten auf weichem oder sandigem Grund sind besonders wirksam. Eventuell ist es notwendig, gegen fehlendes Verst\u00e4ndnis, Sp\u00f6ttelei oder Druck von nicht informierten Lehrern, Verwandten und Freunden einzuschreiten.", "prognosis": "Bei den meisten Patienten geht in der Adoleszenz die Furcht vorm Fallen zur\u00fcck und der schwankende Gang normalisiert sich. Die starken Schreckreaktionen und die ruckartigen Bewegungen nach unerwarteten Reizen bleiben jedoch lebenslang bestehen und eine Minderzahl von Patienten leidet unter phobischer Angst vor dem \u00dcberqueren leerer Pl\u00e4tze und unter einem unsicheren und z\u00f6gerlichen Gang.", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur etwa 150 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Stiff-person-Spektrum-Erkrankungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Stiff-man Syndrom (SMS) ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung. Ihre Symptome sind progressive und fluktuierende Muskelversteifung an Rumpf und Gliedma\u00dfen, schmerzhaft einschie\u00dfende Muskelspasmen, aufgaben-spezifische Angst frei zu gehen, gesteigerte Schreckhaftigkeit und ankylosierende Skelettdeformierungen, am h\u00e4ufigsten fixierte lumbale Hyperlordose.", "synonyms": "Moersch-Woltman-Syndrom, SMS, SPS, SPSD, Stiff-man-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "184850", "UMLS": "C0085292", "GARD": "5023", "MedDRA": "10042044", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome entwickeln sich schleichend \u00fcber Monate oder Jahre. Die Rigidit\u00e4t ist symmetrisch und macht Rumpf und H\u00fcften immobil. Der Gang wird steifbeinig und bizarr. Die \u00fcberlagernd einschiessenden schmerzhaften Spasmen k\u00f6nnen schwere St\u00fcrze verursachen. Die aufgaben-spezifische Phobie, freie Fl\u00e4chen zu betreten, kann pl\u00f6tzliche Gangblockaden, Spasmen und St\u00fcrze verursachen. Neurologische Fokalsymptome fehlen beim SMS, aber Muskelsteifigkeit und myoklonische Spasmen syndromal verkn\u00fcpft mit neurologischen Fokalsymptomen kommen bei der 'Plus-'Variante des SMS vor, der progressiven Enzephalomyelitis mit Rigidit\u00e4t und Myoklonien (PERM). Eine 'Minus'-Variante ist das Stiff limb-Syndrom (SLS), bei dem nur eine Gliedma\u00dfe betroffen ist.", "etiology": "Viele Patienten mit SMS, SLS oder PERM haben Insulin-bed\u00fcrftigen Diabetes mellitus (30%), Autoimmun-Thyreoiditis (10%), atrophische Gastritis mit pernizi\u00f6ser An\u00e4mie (5%), und einige haben Tumoren der Brust, der Lunge oder des Dickdarms. Das Vorhandensein von Autoantik\u00f6rpern (abs) gegen verschiedene Proteine inhibitorischer ZNS-Synapsen wie z.B. Glutamat-Dekarboxylase (GAD; > 70 %), Glycin Rezeptoren (ca 10 %), Amphiphysin (ca 4 %) oder DPPX legt eine autoimmun vermittelte Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der inhibitorischen Neurotransmission nahe.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert vor allem auf der klinischen Untersuchung. Sie wird unterst\u00fctzt durch den Nachweis von antineuronalen abs und durch charakteristische elektromyographische Normabweichungen. Die Untersuchung des Liquors ist einerseits notwendig zum Nachweis antineuronaler abs, andererseits um eine floride Entz\u00fcndung auszuschliessen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfa\u00dft atypische Manifestationen spinaler Erkrankungen, z.B. Multiple Sklerose oder Tumoren, axiale Dystonie, Neuromyotonie, erworbene Hyperekplexie (startle disease) und psychogene Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Benzodiazepine und Baclofen sind die Standardmedikamente f\u00fcr die symptomatische Behandlung. Immunmodulierende Therapien (Kortikosteroide, i.v. Immunglobuline und Plasmapherese) wurden mit unterschiedlichem Erfolg eingesetzt. In der Mehrzahl der Patienten mit SMS, SLS und PERM lassen sich so die Symptome beherrschen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird mit 1/1,000,000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Etwa 2/3 der Patienten sind weiblich. Das mittlere Manifestationsalter liegt bei 45 Jahren, aber schon Kinder k\u00f6nnen erkranken."}, {"name": "Stiff-person-Syndrom, klassisches", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Klassisches SPS, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "184850", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Stiff-skin-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Stiff-Skin-Syndrom ist eine seltene, langsam fortschreitende Hauterkrankung, die gekennzeichnet ist durch steinharte, fest mit dem darunter liegenden Gewebe verbundene Haut (vor allem an den Schultern, dem unteren R\u00fccken, dem Ges\u00e4\u00df und den Oberschenkeln), milde Hypertrichose und Hyperpigmentierung \u00fcber den betroffenen Hautarealen sowie eine eingeschr\u00e4nkte Gelenkbeweglichkeit (vor allem der gro\u00dfen Gelenke) mit Beugekontrakturen. Kutane Kn\u00f6tchen, die meist die distalen Interphalangealgelenke betreffen, sowie extrakutane Manifestationen, einschlie\u00dflich diffuser Entrapment-Neuropathie, Skoliose, Zehenspitzengang und ein schmaler Thorax, k\u00f6nnen assoziiert sein. Restriktive pulmonale Ver\u00e4nderungen, Muskelschw\u00e4che, Kleinwuchs und Wachstumsverz\u00f6gerung wurden ebenfalls berichtet. Eine vaskul\u00e4re Hyperreaktivit\u00e4t, immunologische Anomalien oder eine viszerale, muskul\u00e4re oder kn\u00f6cherne Beteiligung wurden nicht beschrieben.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "L98.8", "OMIM": "184900\u00a0 228020", "UMLS": "C1861456", "GARD": "5025"}, {"name": "Stilling-Turk-Duane-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Duane-Retraktionssyndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des DRS betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/10.000 und macht etwa ein bis 5 % aller F\u00e4lle von Strabismus aus. Frauen sind h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als M\u00e4nner.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, ocular congenital cranial dysinnervation disorder characterized by limited horizontal eye movement accompanied by globe retraction and palpebral fissure narrowing on attempted adduction.", "synonyms": "DRS, DURS, Duane syndrome, Stilling-Turk-Duane syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "H50.8", "omim": "126800\u00a0 604356\u00a0 616219\u00a0 617041", "umls": "C0013261", "mesh": "D004370", "gard": "6288", "meddra": "10013799", "epidemiology": "Duane retraction syndrome (DRS) prevalence is estimated at between 1/1000 and 1/10,000 in the general population, representing approximately 1-5% of all strabismus cases. Females are more frequently affected than males.", "clinical_description": "DRS is a congenital disorder, characterized by non-progressive horizontal ophthalmoplegia without ptosis. Vertical eye movement abnormalities may be observed, including upshoot or downshoot on adduction. Isolated, simplex DRS is usually unilateral and the left eye is more commonly affected. At birth, affected infants have restricted abduction and/or adduction, though it may not be appreciated immediately. Most individuals with DRS have strabismus in primary gaze but can use a compensatory head position to align the eyes, avoiding diplopia. Development of amblyopia is possible. The majority of DRS cases (70%) are not associated with other anomalies. DRS can be classified based on the extent of abduction and adduction: limited or absent abduction with normal or slightly limited adduction (type I) , normal or mildly restricted abduction with limited or absent adduction (type II), absent or limited abduction and adduction (type III). In all types, there is globe retraction with narrowing of palpebral fissure on attempted adduction.", "etiology": "DRS results from abnormal development of the pontine abducens nucleus or nerve, unilaterally or bilaterally, leading to failure of the normal innervation of the lateral rectus muscle on the affected side. This results in limited abduction and horizontal gaze palsy. Globe retraction and fissure narrowing are due to co-contraction of the medial and lateral rectus muscles on attempted adduction, which is itself secondary to aberrant innervation of the lateral rectus by the oculomotor nerve. Identified genetic pathogenic variants include CHN1 or MAFB and rarely, SALL4.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis of DRS is based on clinical features. Magnetic resonance imaging of the brainstem reveals small or absent abducens nerves (CNVI). In individuals with DRS due to CHN1 mutations, the optic (CNII), oculomotor (CNIII) and/or trochlear (CNIV) nerves may also be hypoplastic.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis of isolated DRS includes syndromic forms of DRS such as Duane-radial ray syndrome (Okihiro syndrome), Townes-Brocks syndrome, acro-renal-ocular syndrome, Bosley-Salih-Alorainy and Athabaskan brainstem dysgenesis-related disorders, Wildervanck syndrome, and oculo-auriculo-vertebral spectrum. Syndromic DRS can also arise from chromosomal anomalies and copy number variants, primarily on chromosome 8. Differential diagnosis of DRS also includes Moebius syndrome, congenital fibrosis of extraocular muscles, and isolated horizontal gaze palsy without globe retraction with or without progressive scoliosis (HGPPS).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal and preimplantation genetic testing for at-risk pregnancies is possible if a pathogenic variant has been identified in a family.", "genetic_counseling": "Most cases are sporadic, but up to 10% of patients have affected relatives. When inherited, isolated DRS most commonly segregates in families as an autosomal dominant trait but autosomal recessive inheritance is also possible. In familial forms, DRS is often bilateral; however, incomplete penetrance and variable expressivity can complicate assessments.", "management_and_treatment": "Management of DRS is mainly supportive and involves wearing spectacles or contact lenses to correct refractive errors, occlusion or penalization of the better-seeing eye for treatment of amblyopia, or prisms to correct for abnormal head posture. Eye muscle surgery may be indicated to correct abnormal head position, to align the eyes in primary gaze, or to correct for upshoot or downshoot on adduction. However, surgery does not restore full normal eye movements. Surveillance is necessary to detect and prevent amblyopia. Vision therapy is advised for secondary convergence insufficiency.", "prognosis": "Isolated DRS is a benign disorder that, if managed appropriately, results in excellent long-term prognosis for vision. In some cases, amblyopia or loss of binocular single vision might develop."}, {"name": "Still-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Arthritis, idiopathische juvenile, systemische", "german_description": "Die juvenile idiopathische Arthritis mit systemischem Beginn ist gekennzeichnet durch schwere Begleitsymptome (Fieber, kutane Effloreszenzen) und ein Geschlechtsverh\u00e4ltnis um 1. Sie macht 10-11% der F\u00e4lle von juveniler idiopathischer Arthritis (JIA) aus. Die Pr\u00e4valenz wurde auf 1-10/30.000 Kinder gesch\u00e4tzt, die Jahres-Inzidenz auf 1-20/900.000 Kinder. Die Krankheit beginnt in der Regel in einem Alter zwischen 3 und 5 Jahren. Zu den Symptomen geh\u00f6rt Fieber, das \u00fcber den gesamten Tages- und Nachtverlauf oszilliert, mit Spitzentemperaturen um und \u00fcber 39\u00b0C. Diese Fieberspitzen sind assoziiert mit passageren kutanen Effloreszenzen und und diffusen erythemat\u00f6sen oder urtikariaartigen L\u00e4sionen. Eine Arthritis ist Voraussetzung f\u00fcr die Diagnose, obwohl sie auch erst sp\u00e4ter im Verlauf der Krankheit auftreten kann. Die Zahl der betroffenen Gelenke ist unterschiedlich (Mono-, Oligo- oder Polyarthritis). In fast symmetrischer Anordnung sind sowohl kleine als auch gro\u00dfe Gelenke betroffen. Diese charakteristische diagnostische Trias kann mit vergr\u00f6\u00dferten Lymphknoten und Hepatosplenomegalie erweitert sein. M\u00f6glich sind auch innere Komplikationen (Perikarditis, Pleuraerguss, oder ser\u00f6se Peritonitis mit Leibschmerzen). Spezifische Laborparameter sind nicht bekannt, aber die Entz\u00fcndung ist schwer, mit starkem Anstieg des Ferritinspiegels bei erniedrigtem Anteil des glykosylierten Ferritins. Pathogenetische Mechanismen und ausl\u00f6sende Faktoren sind noch nicht bekannt, aber die Krankheit kann deutlich von anderen Formen der JIA unterschieden werden. Wahrscheinlich handelt es sich eher um eine Autoimmun-Krankheit als um ein autoentz\u00fcndliches Geschehen (wie periodisches Fieber und CINCA/NOMID). Die diagnostischen Kriterien wurden auf dem internationalen Meeting von 2001 in Edmonton erarbeitet. Danach ist die klinische Trias von t\u00e4glichem Fieber (\u00fcber mehr als 2 Wochen), Arthritis und passageren kutanen Effloreszenzen das wichtigste diagnostische Kriterium. Wenn aber Hauteffloreszenzen fehlen, k\u00f6nnen auch Lymphadenopathie, Hepatosplenomegalie oder ser\u00f6se Erg\u00fcsse die Diagnose sichern. Ausschlusskriterien sind: Patient mit systemischer Arthritis oder Psoriasis, Psoriasis bei einem Elternteil oder Geschwister, ein HLA-B27-positiver m\u00e4nnlicher Patient mit Beginn der Arthritis nach dem 6. Lebensjahr, sowie der Nachweis von IgM-Rheumafaktoren in zwei Proben mit dreimonatigem Abstand. Weitere Ausschlusskriterien sind: Ankylosierende Spondylitis, Arthritis mit Enthesitis, Sakroiliitis mit entz\u00fcndlicher Enteropathie, akute anteriore Uveitis beim Patienten oder eines dieser Zeichen bei einem Elternteil oder Geschwister. Differentialdiagnostisch zu erw\u00e4gen sind Fieber in Verbindung mit Infektionen, Bindegewebskrankheiten (besonders Lupus), akute Leuk\u00e4mie und andere autoinflammatorische Erkrankungen. Die Behandlung sollte in einem spezialisierten Zentrum erfolgen. Therapie der ersten Wahl sind hochdosiertes Aspirin oder nichtsteroidale Antirheumatika (NSAIDs). Bei Therapieresistenz \u00fcber 2-6 Wochen sollten hochdosiert Kortikoide gegeben werden. Krankheitsmodifizierende antirheumatische Medikamente (Methotrexat, Biotherapeutika) k\u00f6nnen bei Kortikoidresistenz empfohlen werden, obwohl deren Wirksamkeit von Fall zu Fall verschieden ist. Andere Medikamente f\u00fcr kortikoidresistente Patienten (Thalidomid, Interleukin-1-Rezeptor-Antagonisten (Anakinra) und monoklonale Anti-Interleukin-6-Antik\u00f6rper (MRA)) sind verf\u00fcgbar oder werden z.Zt. f\u00fcr diese Anwendung evaluiert. In einigen F\u00e4llen k\u00f6nnen intraartikul\u00e4re Injektionen empfohlen werden. In etwa der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle bilden sich die Symptome vor Erreichen des Erwachsenenalters zur\u00fcck. In den \u00fcbrigen F\u00e4llen besteht die Arthritis, mit oder ohne Fieber und Hautsymptome, weiter. Schwere Folgest\u00f6rungen bestehen in 20% der F\u00e4lle: Verz\u00f6gertes Wachstum, Knochen- und Knorpelerosionen mit funktionellen Einschr\u00e4nkungen und das Risiko einer Osteopenie.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare pediatric rheumatological disease characterized by the variable occurrence of chronic arthritis, intermittently high spiking fever, maculopapular rash during fever episodes, hepatomegaly and/or splenomegaly, lymphadenopathy, and serositis.", "synonyms": "Still disease, Systemic-onset JIA, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0or\u00a0Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "M08.2", "omim": "604302\u00a0 618795", "umls": "C0087031\u00a0 C1384600", "gard": "10966", "epidemiology": "Juvenile idiopathic arthritis (JIA) is one of the most common pediatric chronic diseases, with a yearly incidence between 1.6 and 23 new cases per 100,000 children. Systemic-onset JIA accounts for roughly 10-20% of all JIA patients, with incidence estimated at 1/166,000 and prevalence at 1/32,000 in the prediatric population. Frequency is higher in some countries; for example in parts of Asia, sytemic-onset JIA may account for up to 30-40% of all JIA cases.", "clinical_description": "Onset usually occurs between 3 and 5 years of age. The clinical signs include fever with oscillating temperatures over a 24-hour period and peaks of over 39\u00b0C or more. The fever peaks are associated with the transient occurrence of an evanescent macular rash. Any joint, small or large, may be affected at disease onset, and involvement is nearly symmetrical and may be oligo- or polyarticular. Arthritis tends to increase in severity over time, and thus may not appear until later in the disease course. The course of the disease varies between individuals, ranging from a monocyclic disease course, to recurrent predominantly systemic disease course, to a progressive polyarthritis that could lead to severe and destructive joint disease.", "etiology": "Whilst the underlying mechanisms and triggering factors are not fully understood, IL-1 and IL-6 play a major role in the pathogenesis of the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical and biological findings in a child under the age of 16 presenting with fever for at least 3 consecutive days and 2 major criteria (arthritis and evanescent rash) or 1 major and 2 minor criteria ((1) generalized lymph node enlargement and or hepatomegaly or splenomegaly (2) serositis (3) arthralgias lasting 2 weeks or longer (4) leukocytosis > 15.000/mm3 with neutrophilia) A confirmed diagnosis requires exclusion of other causes of the symptoms.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnoses is extensive and includes bacterial infections (including occult bacterial infection, brucellosis, Lyme disease, cat scratch disease, tuberculosis, and infectious mononucleosis), malaria, malignancies (such as leukemia, lymphoma, and neuroblastoma), viral infections, hereditary recurrent fever syndromes, other inflammatory diseases (such as systemic lupus erythematosus, systemic vasculitis, Kawasaki disease, Beh\u00e7et disease, inflammatory bowel disease, Sweet syndrome, PFAPA, Takayasu syndrome, Castleman syndrome, rheumatic fever, and polyarteritis nodosa), connective tissue diseases, and periodic fever syndromes.", "management_and_treatment": "Management by a specialized multidisciplinary team is required. Treatment is typically first with non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) and, if the inflammation is not controlled, followed by high dose corticosteroids. Treatment with cytokine inhibitors (anakinra, canakinumab, and tocilizumab) has shown to be highly effective. Furthermore, these drugs can help mitigate damage caused by the inflammatory process. Generally, complications such as macrophage activation syndrome, limitations in functional outcome by arthritis and long-term damage from chronic inflammation continue to be a major issue in patients' care, but have decreased since the use of biological treatment.", "prognosis": "The disease course is long with major impact on quality of life. The risk of complications due to the illness or medication has been significantly reduced by the early use of biological treatment. Currently, osteopenia and osteoporosis, growth impairment, erosive arthritis, and secondary or reactive amyloidosis have almost disappeared. Macrophage activation syndrome is little influenced by recent therapeutic strategies and requires rapid care in the intensive care unit."}, {"name": "Still-Syndrom des Erwachsenen", "german_description": "Das Adulte Still-Syndrom ist eine rheumatische Erkrankung. Zum Ph\u00e4notyp z\u00e4hlen neben weiteren Symptomen vor allem hohes Fieber (\u00fcber 39\u00b0C), Hautausschlag w\u00e4hrend der Fieberspitzen, Gelenk- oder Muskelschmerzen, Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung der Lymphknoten, Leukozytose (besonders polymorphkernige Neutrophile) und ver\u00e4nderter Leberstoffwechsel. Keines dieser Zeichen gestattet die Diagnose, da vor allem infekti\u00f6se und neoplastische Erkrankungen \u00e4hnliche Symptome erzeugen k\u00f6nnen. Die Diagnose eines Adulten Still-Syndroms wird deshalb h\u00e4ufig 'per exclusionem' gestellt, wenn andere m\u00f6gliche Erkrankungen sicher ausgeschlossen wurden. Der Verlauf der Erkrankung ist nur schwer voraussagbar. Sie kann aus einem einzigen Aufflackern bestehen, sich aber auch \u00fcber Monate oder Jahre hinziehen. Etwa jeder dritte Patient entwickelt eine Arthropathie mit Knorpelerosionen. Die Behandlung hat 2 Ziele:  -Linderung der Symptome; Hierf\u00fcr werden meist Aspirin und NSAIDs gegeben und sind zu Beginn der Erkrankung auch dann n\u00fctzlich, wenn die Diagnose noch nicht endg\u00fcltig gesichert wurde. -Kontrolle des Krankheitsverlaufes; Hierf\u00fcr werden verwendet: Corticosteroide, Methotrexat, Cyclosporin A, manchmal auch intraven\u00f6s Immunglobuline oder die Gabe der TNF-alpha-Inhibitoren Etanercept und Infliximab. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare inflammatory multisystem disorder characterized clinically by four cardinal signs: fever of unknown origin, arthralgia or arthritis, hyperleucocytosis, and typical skin rash.", "synonyms": "AOSD, Wissler-Fanconi syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Elderly, Adult", "icd_10": "M06.1", "umls": "C0043195\u00a0 C0085253", "mesh": "D014924\u00a0 D016706", "gard": "436", "meddra": "10058493\u00a0 10064056", "epidemiology": "Prevalence and incidence data are difficult to determine given the broad, non-specific clinical presentation of adult-onset Still disease (AOSD). The estimated prevalence of AOSD is more than 1/100,000 population. There is a slightly higher number of affected women than affected men.", "clinical_description": "AOSD primarily affects young adults, although older patients have been reported. The presenting features are variable and may include high fever (>39\u00b0C) with daily spikes, sore throat or pharyngitis, arthralgia or arthritis (>65% of patients), transient maculopapular rash, and more rarely myalgia, lymphadenopathy, hepatosplenomegaly, and serositis. Arthritis may involve any joint and can migrate in early disease and then stabilize with time. Arthralgia is usually correlated with fever spikes. Rash mostly consists of transient, small, discrete, salmon-pink, non-pruritic macules or maculopapules that often occur concomitantly with fever and generally spare the face, palms and soles of the feet. Pleuritis or pericarditis are commonly found. Patients may lose weight and have a generally poor overall health status. Three different disease courses have been described: self-limited, systemic course with a single flare and complete remission within 2 to 4 weeks, intermittent course with recurrence of systemic or articular flares after remission of 2 weeks to 2years, and a primarily articular chronic course (with erosions in a 1/3 patients). Some affected individuals have a history of systemic juvenile idiopathic arthritis.", "etiology": "The etiology of AOSD and its underlying pathogenetic mechanisms are not known. No risk factors for the disease have been identified so far, but environmental factors are suspected. Several infectious conditions have been reported to be associated with onset of the disease (e.g. Epstein-Barr virus, cytomegalovirus, human immunodeficiency virus, Coxsackie virus, hepatitis A, B, and C viruses, and Mycoplasma pneumoniae).", "diagnostic_methods": "The non-specific clinical features of AOSD make diagnosis difficult. No serological marker is currently available. AOSD is a diagnosis of exclusion. Two sets of classification criteria, Yamaguchi and Fautrel, exist. Major diagnostic criteria include arthralgia for more than 2 weeks, intermittent high fever for more than 1 week, characteristic rash, and white blood cell count above 10,000. Minor criteria include sore throat, lymphadenopathy and/or splenomegaly, abnormal liver function tests, and negative rheumatoid factor and ANA. Elevated ferritin is often found and may assist in diagnosis, especially if it is associated with a low level of glycosylated ferritin.", "differential_diagnosis": "Many other inflammatory, neoplastic, and infectious conditions with a similar presentation must be ruled out in order to diagnose AOSD. Differential diagnoses include infections (endocarditis, occult infections, secondary syphilis, viral rash), malignancies (lymphoma) or autoimmune diseases (such as polyarteritis nodosa, vasculitis, or polymyositis).", "genetic_counseling": "AOSD is a sporadic non-inheritable disease and genetic counseling is therefore not needed.", "management_and_treatment": "The aim is to achieve complete remission and prevent joint damage through treatment. Treatment-free remission is possible but the risk of relapse remains present throughout life Multidisciplinary rounds in contact with a reference center are highly recommended. The mainstay of first-line treatment is prednisone, and most guidelines tend to recommend an early association with biologic therapies (anti-IL1 agents (anakinra, canakinumab), and anti-IL-6 agents (tocilizumab)), in order to allow a rapid tapering of prednisone and hence prevent steroid-induced complications. Methotrexate and tumor necrosis factor blockers may be used in chronic articular forms, but have limited efficacy in systemic forms. Regular clinical and biological monitoring (initially tight) is necessary.", "prognosis": "The overall prognosis is generally good, but acute life-threatening manifestations may occur in rare cases. The most classical complication is macrophage activation syndrome but blood coagulation disorders, fulminant hepatitis, cardiac and pulmonary complications may occur. Some patients with chronic disease and major joint involvement may have significantly altered quality of life, but this tends to disappear thanks to a better and earlier management with biologics."}, {"name": "Stimmbanddysfunktion, famili\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Kehlkopfmuskulatur, L\u00e4hmung der", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Abduktorenl\u00e4hmung, laryngeale, Gerhardt-Syndrom, Stimmbanddysfunktion, famili\u00e4re, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "J38.0", "OMIM": "150260", "UMLS": "C0396059", "GARD": "5509", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Stimmler-Syndrom", "german_description": "Symptome des Stimmler-Syndroms sind Mikrozephalie, niedriges Geburtsgewicht, schwere Intelligenzminderung, Kleinwuchs, kleine Z\u00e4hne und Diabetes mellitus. Laborbefunde sind hohe Alanin-Konzentrationen im Urin und erh\u00f6hte Blutspiegel von Alanin, Pyruvat und Laktat. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Stimmler syndrome is characterised by the association of microcephaly, low birth weight and severe intellectual deficit with dwarfism, small teeth and diabetes mellitus. Two cases have been described. Biochemical tests reveal the presence of high levels of alanine in the urine and elevated alanine, pyruvate and lactate levels in the blood.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "omim": "202900", "gard": "5026"}, {"name": "STING-assoziierte Vaskulopathie mit Beginn in der Kindheit", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die STING-assoziierte Vaskulopathie mit Beginn in der Kindheit (SAVI) ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte autoinflammatorische Erkrankung, die aufgrund einer konstitutiven STING-Aktivierung (STimulator of INterferon Genes) zu den Typ-1-Interferonopathien gez\u00e4hlt wird. Die Krankheit ist gekennzeichnet durch eine neonatale oder im S\u00e4uglingsalter einsetzende systemische Entz\u00fcndung und eine Vaskulopathie der kleinen Gef\u00e4\u00dfe, die zu schweren Haut-, Lungen- und Gelenkl\u00e4sionen f\u00fchrt. Die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich mit intermittierendem niedrigem Fieber, rezidivierendem Husten und Gedeihst\u00f6rung in Verbindung mit fortschreitender interstitieller Lungenerkrankung, Polyarthritis und violetten schuppenden L\u00e4sionen an Fingern, Zehen, Nase, Wangen und Ohren (die sich durch K\u00e4lteeinwirkung verschlimmern), die oft zu chronischen Akrenulzerationen, Nekrosen und Autoamputation fortschreiten.", "synonyms": "SAVI, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "M35.8", "OMIM": "615934", "GARD": "12357"}, {"name": "St.-Louis-Enzephalitis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "An acute arboviral infection caused by a virus of the Flaviviridae family transmitted by an infected mosquito, and characterized by the onset of flulike symptoms such as fever, malaise, headache, cough, and sore throat that can progress to meningitis or encephalitis with symptoms like nausea, vomiting, confusion, stiff neck, disorientation, irritability, tremors, and convulsions. Photophobia, cranial nerve palsies, and even coma may occur.", "synonyms": "Saint Louis encephalitis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A83.3", "umls": "C0014060", "mesh": "D004674", "meddra": "10041896"}, {"name": "Stoelinga-de-Koomen-Davis-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Fehlender Zahndurchbruch-Maxillahypoplasie-Genu valgum-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Fehlender Zahndurchbruch mit Maxillahypoplasie und Genu valgum ist ein extrem seltenes Syndrom. Merkmale sind: Mehrere retinierte Z\u00e4hne des Dauergebisses, Hypoplasie des Alveolarfortsatzes und der Maxilla-Jochbein-Region, schweres Genu valgum, malformierte Ohren.", "synonyms": "Stoelinga-de-Koomen-Davis-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Keine Daten verf\u00fcgbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "OMIM": "273050", "UMLS": "C1848903\u00a0 C2931509", "MeSH": "C536952\u00a0 C537496", "GARD": "5027"}, {"name": "Stoffwechselkrankheit durch Fetts\u00e4ureoxidationsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E71.3", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Stoffwechselkrankheit mit Darmbeteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Stoffwechselkrankheit mit Demenz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung mit Epilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C1299598", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung, sonstige", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Stoll-Alembik-Finck-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Arthrogrypose mit ektodermaler Dysplasie und anderen Anomalien", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic developmental defect during embryogenesis syndrome characterized by camptodactyly, joint contractures with amyotrophy, and ectodermal anomalies (oligodontia, enamel abnormalities, longitudinally broken nails, hypohidrotic skin with tendency to excessive bruising and scarring after injuries and scratching), as well as growth retardation, kyphoscoliosis, mild facial dysmorphism, and microcephaly. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1992.", "synonyms": "Stoll-Alembik-Finck syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "omim": "601701", "umls": "C1866427", "gard": "5029"}, {"name": "Stoll-Geraudel-Chauvin-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Intelligenzminderung-Kleinwuchs-Hypertelorismus-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Intellectual disability-short stature-hypertelorism syndrome is a rare genetic syndromic intellectual disability characterized by short stature, mild to moderate intellectual disability, craniofacial dysmorphism (prominent broad 'square' forehead, hypertelorism, depressed nasal bridge, broad nasal tip and anteverted nares) and early hypotonia, typically present until infancy. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1991.", "synonyms": "Stoll-G\u00e9raudel-Chauvin syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "gard": "3514"}, {"name": "Stoll-Kieny-Dott-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Ventrikul\u00e4re Extrasystolen mit synkopalen Episoden - Perodaktylie - Pierre-Robin-Sequenz", "german_description": "Es wurde zuerst in 1 Familie mit 6 Betroffenen aus 3 Generationen beschrieben. K\u00fcrzlich wurde eine weitere Familie mit 4 klinisch \u00e4hnlich Betroffenen beschrieben. Ein m\u00f6gliches zus\u00e4tzliches Symptom sind anti-mongoloide Lidachsen. Die Ursache des Syndroms ist nicht bekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "This syndrome is characterized by cardiac arrhythmias (ventricular extrasystoles manifesting as bigeminy or multifocal tachycardia with syncopal episodes), perodactyly (hypoplasia and/or agenesis of the distal phalanges of the toes) and Pierre-Robin sequence (see this term).", "synonyms": "Stoll-Kieny-Dott syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "192445", "umls": "C1860471\u00a0 C2931232", "gard": "5472", "epidemiology": "It has initially been reported in six patients from three generations of one family. Four affected members of another family manifesting a similar constellation of clinical features have recently been reported.", "clinical_description": "An additional feature may be an antimongoloid slant of the palpebral fissures.", "etiology": "Etiology remains unknown."}, {"name": "Stoll-L\u00e9vy-Francfort-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Phokomelie - Ektrodaktylie - Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit - Sinusarrhythmie", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Phokomelie (die Arme sind schwerer betroffen), Ektrodaktylie, malformierte Ohren, Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, faziale Dysmorphien (langes und prominentes Philtrum, leichte Hypoplasie der Maxilla) und Sinusarrhythmie. Bisher wurden in 2 nicht miteinander Familien 4 Patienten (Vater und Sohn, Mutter und Tochter) beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Phocomelia-ectrodactyly-deafness-sinus arrhythmia syndrome is characterised by phocomelia (involving arms more severely), ectrodactyly, ear anomalies (bilateral anomalies of the pinnae), conductive deafness, dysmorphism (long and prominent philtrum, mild maxillary hypoplasia) and sinus arrhythmia. It has been described in four patients (a father and his son and a mother and her daughter) from two unrelated families.", "synonyms": "Phocomelia-ectrodactyly-hearing loss-sinus arrhythmia syndrome, Stoll-L\u00e9vy-Francfort syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "171480", "umls": "C1868390", "gard": "4323"}, {"name": "Stomatodynie", "sub_name": "Zungen- und Schleimhautbrennen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare neurologic disease characterized by an unremitting bilateral symmetrical burning sensation of the oral mucosa without clinical evidence of causative lesions. It most frequently occurs in postmenopausal women and typically affects the tongue, less often the palate, lips, or buccal mucosa. It is often associated with dysgeusia and xerostomia.", "synonyms": "BMS, Oral dysesthesia, Orodynia, Stomatodynia, Stomatopyrosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "K14.6", "umls": "C0006430\u00a0 C2930806", "gard": "5974"}, {"name": "Stomatozytische heredit\u00e4re Elliptozytose", "sub_name": "Ovalozytose, s\u00fcdostasiatische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die S\u00fcdostasiatische Ovalozytose (SAO) ist eine seltene St\u00f6rung der Erythrozytenmembran, die durch ovale rote Blutk\u00f6rperchen gekennzeichnet ist. Die meisten Patienten sind symptomlos oder zeigen gelegentlich milde Symptome wie z. B. Bl\u00e4sse, Gelbsucht, An\u00e4mie and Gallensteine.", "synonyms": "Melanesische Ovalozytose, SAO, Stomatozytische heredit\u00e4re Elliptozytose, S\u00fcdasiatische Elliptozytose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D58.1", "OMIM": "166900", "epidemiology": "Die SAO ist verbreitet in S\u00fcdostasien und L\u00e4ndern des westlichen Pazifikraums (z. B. Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesien, Philippinen und Papua-Neuguinea). Die SAO ist sehr h\u00e4ufig in Gebieten, in denen Malaria endemisch ist (Pr\u00e4valenz 1:20-1:4), aber in Europa sehr selten.", "clinical_description": "Eine SAO kann mit jedem Alter auftreten. Neugeborene mit SAO k\u00f6nnen symptomatisch sein mit H\u00e4molyse bei Geburt, die zu An\u00e4mie, Bl\u00e4sse oder Gelbsucht f\u00fchrt. An\u00e4mie und Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie bei Neugeborenen tritt oft gemeinsam mit milder Splenomegalie and Gallensteinen auf. Eine H\u00e4molyse tritt f\u00fcr gew\u00f6hnlich in den ersten drei Lebensjahren auf. Erwachsene sind asymptomatisch oder haben nur eine minimale h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie. Eine erh\u00f6hte Malariaresistenz wird ebenfalls beobachtet.", "etiology": "Die SAO wird durch eine 27 bp-Deletion im SLC4A1-Gen verursacht, das auf Chromosom 17q2.31 lokalisiert ist (SLC4A1del27- Mutation). Dieses Gen kodiert f\u00fcr ein Bande 3-Anionen-Transportprotein, den Bicarbonat-Chlorid-Austauscher in den Membranen roter Blutk\u00f6rperchen. Mutationen in diesem Protein verursachen Membransteifigkeit. In fast allen F\u00e4llen kann die Deletion heterozygot nachgewiesen werden, wobei Homozygotie als lethal f\u00fcr den sich entwickelnden Embryo angesehen wird. Unl\u00e4ngst wurde in einem SAO-Fall eine homozygote Mutation nachgewiesen, die zu einer extrem schweren dyserythropoietischen An\u00e4mie mit distaler tubul\u00e4rer Azidose der Nieren (s. diese Termini) f\u00fchrt. Diese w\u00e4re t\u00f6dlich gewesen, wenn der Fet nicht in-utero Bluttransfusionen bekommen h\u00e4tte. Das gleichzeitige Vorkommen der SLC4A1del27-Mutation mit anderen Mutationen im SLC4A1-Gen kann eine distale tubul\u00e4re Azidose der Niere verursachen, die in einigen F\u00e4llen mit einer SAO assoziiert ist.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Nachweis von Makro-Ovalozyten im peripheren Blutausstrich, wobei einige der Zellen Stomatozyten \u00e4hneln mit mehreren charakteristischen schlitz- oder mundf\u00f6rmigen Aufhellungen ohne H\u00e4molyse. Zus\u00e4tzlich kann eine genetische Diagnostik zum Nachweis der SLC4A1-Genmutation herangezogen werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen beinhalten alle Formen der heredit\u00e4ren Elliptozytose und Sph\u00e4rozytose sowie der dehydrierten heredit\u00e4ren Stomatozytose (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, wird aber aufgrund der milden Symptomatik der Erkrankung nicht angeboten.", "genetic_counseling": "Die SAO folgt einem autosomal-dominantem Erbgang. Eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die meisten SAO-F\u00e4lle sind asymptomatisch, und eine Behandlung ist nicht erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Eine SAO ist nicht lebensbedrohlich.", "summary": "Die SAO ist verbreitet in S\u00fcdostasien und L\u00e4ndern des westlichen Pazifikraums (z. B. Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesien, Philippinen und Papua-Neuguinea). Die SAO ist sehr h\u00e4ufig in Gebieten, in denen Malaria endemisch ist (Pr\u00e4valenz 1:20-1:4), aber in Europa sehr selten."}, {"name": "Stomatozytose, heredit\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Heredit\u00e4re stomatozytische Krankheit, ", "ICD-10": "D58.8", "UMLS": "C1262483", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Stomatozytose, heredit\u00e4re mit Hyperhydrierung der Erythrozyten", "german_description": "Die '\u00dcberhydrierte' Heredit\u00e4re Stomatozytose (OHS) ist eine kongenitale h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie, von der bisher in der Literatur kaum mehr als 20 Familien beschrieben wurden. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-dominant vererbt, Neumutationen sind h\u00e4ufig. Die An\u00e4mie kann so stark sein, da\u00df gelegentlich auch Bluttransfusionen notwendig werden. Im Blutausstrich sind in hohem Prozentsatz voll ausgebildete Stomatozyten zu sehen. Es besteht eine Makrozytose mit reduziertem MCHC. Die Langzeit-Prognose wird durch die \u00fcblichen Komplikationen einer verst\u00e4rkten H\u00e4molyse (Gallensteine und Eisen\u00fcberladung) getr\u00fcbt. Gesichert wird die Diagnose durch den Befund einer Rechtsverschiebung der ektazytometrischen Kurve im Osmosegradienten und durch die besondere Temperaturabh\u00e4ngigkeit des in vitro gemessenen, strophantin- und bumetanid-resistenten Ausstroms monovalenter Kationen. Cave: Eine Splenektomie ist bei OHS absolut kontraindiziert, da sie in einigen Familien nahezu regelm\u00e4\u00dfig zu thrombo-embolischen Komplikationen f\u00fchrt. Der Ionenverlust ist am st\u00e4rksten bei Temperaturen nahe dem Gefrierpunkt (Kryo-OHS). Die Elektrophorese der Erythozytenmembran-Proteine und Western-Blots zeigen eine starke Verminderung des Proteins 7.2b, das auch Stomatin genannt wird. Es handelt sich hierbei aber um einen sekund\u00e4ren Befund, der nur auf die Reduktion eines anderen, noch nicht identifizierten Proteins hinweist. Geringe Familiengr\u00f6\u00dfe und h\u00e4ufige Neumutationen haben bisher eine Kartierung und Positionsklonierung des urs\u00e4chlich beteiligten Gens verhindert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Overhydrated hereditary stomatocytosis (OHSt) is a disorder of red cell membrane permeability to monovalent cations and is characterized clinically by hemolytic anemia.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D58.8", "omim": "185000", "gard": "4183", "epidemiology": "OHSt is very rare with only seven cases described in the literature so far.", "clinical_description": "Onset occurs during the neonatal period or infancy with hemolytic anemia that may require occasional blood transfusions. Splenomegaly or hepatosplenomegaly are present. The disease course is marked by the usual complications of hemolytic anemia (biliary lithiasis) and, remarkably, by a strong tendency for iron overload.", "etiology": "In the majority of cases, OHSt is caused by mutations in the RHAG gene (6p21-qter) encoding the Rh-associated glycoprotein component of the Rh complex.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on a massive right shift of the osmotic gradient ektacytometry curve indicating overhydrated red cells and decreased osmotic resistance, together with a substantial increase in the monovalent cation leak compared to controls, and a sharp decrease of the leak as a function of decreasing temperature. Blood smears show an elevated percentage of well formed stomatocytes. There is macrocytosis, a low mean cell hemoglobin concentration (MCHC) and a high reticulocyte count. Electrophoresis reveals that the membrane protein stomatin is absent or present at only low levels.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis should include the most common form of hereditary stomatocytosis, dehydrated hereditary stomatocytosis, as well as hereditary cryohydrocytosis with reduced stomatin (see these terms).", "genetic_counseling": "OHSt is transmitted as an autosomal dominant trait but de novo mutations are quite common.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment involves blood transfusions, when necessary, together with management of biliary lithiasis and iron overload. Splenectomy is contraindicated in OHSt patients as it may induce venous thromboembolic complications.", "prognosis": "With correct management of the complications, the prognosis is good."}, {"name": "Stormorken-Sjaastad-Langslet-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Thrombozytopathie, Asplenie, Miosis (Verengung der Pupillen), leichte Muskelerm\u00fcdung, Migraine, Dyslexie und Ichthyose. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei 6 Angeh\u00f6rigen beschrieben und wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Stormorken-Sjaastad-Langslet syndrome is characterized by thrombocytopathy, asplenia, miosis, muscle fatigue, migraine, dyslexia, and ichthyosis. It has been described in six members of one family. It is transmitted as an autosomal dominant trait.", "synonyms": "Stormorken syndrome, Thrombocytopathy-asplenia-miosis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D69.8", "omim": "185070", "umls": "C1861451", "gard": "5188"}, {"name": "Stormorken-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Stormorken-Sjaastad-Langslet-Syndrom", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Thrombozytopathie, Asplenie, Miosis (Verengung der Pupillen), leichte Muskelerm\u00fcdung, Migraine, Dyslexie und Ichthyose. Es wurde in 1 Familie bei 6 Angeh\u00f6rigen beschrieben und wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Stormorken-Sjaastad-Langslet syndrome is characterized by thrombocytopathy, asplenia, miosis, muscle fatigue, migraine, dyslexia, and ichthyosis. It has been described in six members of one family. It is transmitted as an autosomal dominant trait.", "synonyms": "Stormorken syndrome, Thrombocytopathy-asplenia-miosis syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D69.8", "omim": "185070", "umls": "C1861451", "gard": "5188"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Fetts\u00e4ureoxidation und Ketogenese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E71.3", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Fukosyl-Glykosan-Synthese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklun 46,XY", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD, ", "UMLS": "C2751824", "MeSH": "D058490", "GARD": "8538", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "DSD, ", "UMLS": "C0036875", "MeSH": "D012734", "MedDRA": "10070597", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, Androgen-induziert, maternal", "sub_name": "46,XX-DSD, Androgen-induzierter, maternalen Ursprungs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, Androgen-induziert, maternal, ", "ICD-10": "Q56.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, durch Androgenexzess", "sub_name": "46,XX-DSD induziert durch Androgenexzess", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, durch Androgenexzess, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, durch fetalen Androgenexzess", "sub_name": "46,XX-DSD induziert durch fetalen Androgenexzess", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, durch fetalen Androgenexzess, ", "ICD-10": "E25.0", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XX-DSD, genetisch bedingte, ", "UMLS": "C2936403", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, induziert durch endogenes Androgen maternalen Ursprungs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XX-DSD induziert durch endogenes Androgen maternalen Ursprungs, ", "ICD-10": "Q56.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, induziert durch exogenes Androgen maternalen Ursprungs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XX-DSD induziert durch exogenes Androgen maternalen Ursprungs, ", "ICD-10": "Q56.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, induziert durch fetoplazentalen Androgenexzess", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "46,XX-DSD induziert durch fetoplazentalen Androgenexzess, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX, ovotestikul\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung ((disorder of sex development, DSD), die gekennzeichnet ist durch histologisch gesichertes Testis- und Ovarialgewebe bei einem Individuum mit dem Karyotyp 46, XX.", "synonyms": "46,XX-DSD, ovotestikul\u00e4re, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q56.0", "OMIM": "400045", "UMLS": "C0266361\u00a0 C2748895", "MeSH": "D050090", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/20,000. Diese St\u00f6rung macht etwa 3-10 % aller F\u00e4lle von DSD aus.", "clinical_description": "Etwa 20 % aller Betroffenen werden vor dem 5. Lebensjahr diagnostiziert. In der Regel erfolgt die Diagnose in der Neugeborenenzeit wegen atypischer Genitalien. Einige F\u00e4lle werden sp\u00e4ter bei abnormer Pubert\u00e4ts-Entwicklung diagnostiziert. Klinische Symptome sind: Unterleibschmerzen, Gyn\u00e4komastie, Leistenhernie, Leistenshoden, Kryptorchismus oder Amenorrhoe/periodische H\u00e4maturie (je nach zugewiesenen Geschlecht). Die meisten Betroffenen haben weibliche innere Genitalien (Uterus, Hemi-Uterus oder rudiment\u00e4rer Uterus). Die Entwicklung der \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitalien reicht von scheinbar weiblichen bis hin zu m\u00e4nnlichen Genitalien mit Hypospadie oder isolierten beidseitig undeszendierten Ovotestes (Gonaden, die Eierstock- und Hodenelemente enthalten). Unfruchtbarkeit ist bei M\u00e4nnern h\u00e4ufig, w\u00e4hrend bei Frauen ein gewisses Potential an Fruchtbarkeit besteht. B\u00f6sartige Gonadentumore sind selten (weniger als 3% der F\u00e4lle).", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der 46, XX-ovo-testikul\u00e4ren DSD ist f\u00fcr die Mehrheit der F\u00e4lle nicht gekl\u00e4rt. Ein kleiner Anteil der Individuen hat eine Translokation eines Y-Chromosomen-Fragments, einschlie\u00dflich des SRY-Gens, auf ein X- oder ein anderes Chromosom, aber die meisten Individuen (65 %) sind SRY-negativ. Kopienzahlvariationen, die zur Duplikation oder Deletion von regulatorischen Genen f\u00fchren, wurden f\u00fcr die Gene SOX9 (4 Familien), SOX3 (1 Individuum) und NR0B1 (1 Individuum) beschrieben. Eine wiederkehrende NR5A1Gen-Variante wurde bei einer Reihe von nicht verwandten Individuen berichtet. Einige Individuen k\u00f6nnen ein chromosomales Mosaik oder einen Chim\u00e4rismus aufweisen, die zum Vorhandensein von Y-Chromosom-haltigen Zellen in den Keimdr\u00fcsen f\u00fchren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Beurteilung und Diagnose von DSD ist komplex. Konsensus-Leitlinien empfehlen die \u00dcberweisung an ein spezialisiertes Zentrum zur Untersuchung und Behandlung. Erste Untersuchungen umfassen eine Chromosomenanalyse und eine Ultraschalluntersuchung zur \u00dcberpr\u00fcfung der inneren Reproduktionsorgane. Patienten, die sich sp\u00e4ter im Leben vorstellen, haben eine h\u00f6here Differenzierung der Genitalien. Die Diagnose erfordert eine sorgf\u00e4ltige anatomische Beurteilung mittels bildgebender Verfahren und/oder Laparoskopie. Biochemische endokrine Untersuchungen, zytogenetische und molekulargenetische Tests sind erforderlich. Die definitive Diagnose basiert auf der gonadalen Histologie (Hoden- und Ovarialgewebe).", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren andere Formen der DSD, einschlie\u00dflich gemischter gonadaler Dysgenese und 46,XX testikul\u00e4rer DSD. NR2F2-Genvarianten wurden bei Individuen mit einem 46,XX testikul\u00e4ren / ovotestikul\u00e4ren DSD-Ph\u00e4notyp beschrieben, der mit kardialen Defekten assoziiert ist. Auch selten sind Patienten mit dem Syndrom aus Palmoplantarer Keratodermie, XX-Geschlechtsumkehr (sex reversal) und Pr\u00e4disposition zum Plattenepithelkarzinomen mit Mutationen im RSPO1-Gen und Patienten mit SERKAL-Syndrom und Mutationen im WNT4-Gen (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik erscheint m\u00f6glich beim Nachweis eines abnormen Genitales im Ultraschall, wenn nach Amniozentese ein XX-Karyotyp gefunden wird.", "genetic_counseling": "Den Eltern betroffener Kinder soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden. Das Wiederholungsrisiko wird durch die Art der genetischen Ver\u00e4nderung bestimmt. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind Folge von Neumutationen.", "management_and_treatment": "Der Patient und die Familie m\u00fcssen psychologisch unterst\u00fctzt werden. Andere Behandlungen beinhalten haupts\u00e4chlich Hormonersatz. Die Notwendigkeit und der Zeitpunkt einer chirurgischen Behandlung sind komplex und h\u00e4ngen von der Geschlechtszuordnung und der Gonadenkonfiguration ab. Nutzen und Risiken einer Gonadektomie und rekonstruktiven Chirurgie m\u00fcssen sorgf\u00e4ltig abgewogen werden.", "prognosis": "Die Patienten haben in der Regel eine normale Lebenserwartung.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei der Geburt betr\u00e4gt etwa 1/20,000. Diese St\u00f6rung macht etwa 3-10 % aller F\u00e4lle von DSD aus."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX - Skelettanomalien", "german_description": "Charakterisierende Symptome sind prim\u00e4re Amenorrhoe, intersexuelles Genitale und Skelettanomalien (u.a. hypoplastische Mandibula-Kondylen, hypoplastische Maxilla, ulnare Dislokation der Radiusk\u00f6pfchen). Das Syndrom wurde bei 2 Schwestern mit konsanguinen Eltern beschrieben. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare disorder of sex development characterized by primary amenorrhea and ambiguous external genitalia (enlarged clitoris with marked fusion of the labioscrotal folds) in association with skeletal anomalies (such as hypoplasia of the mandibular condyles and the maxilla, and ulnar dislocation of the radial heads), in the presence of a 46,XX karyotype and regular ovaries, fallopian tubes, and uterus. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1972.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "icd_10": "Q56.2", "omim": "264270", "umls": "C1849696"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, bei gest\u00f6rter Androgenproduktion", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD durch St\u00f6rung der Androgenproduktion, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, bei LHB-Mangel", "sub_name": "Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch LHB-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY DSD durch Mangel der beta-Untereinheit des luteinisierenden Hormons, 46,XY-DSD durch LHB-Mangel, Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch Mangel der beta-Untereinheit des luteinisierenden Hormons, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, bei LHB-Mangel, ", "ICD-10": "Q56.1", "OMIM": "228300", "GARD": "10127", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY bei partieller Androgen-Insensivit\u00e4t", "sub_name": "Androgen-Insensivit\u00e4ts-Syndrom, partielles", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des PAIS in der Normalbev\u00f6lkerung ist nicht bekannt, aber Androgen-Resistenz ist die h\u00e4ufigste Ursache der XY-DSD.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A disorder of sex development (DSD) distinct from complete AIS (CAIS) characterized by the presence of abnormal genital development in a 46,XY individual with normal testis development and partial responsiveness to age-appropriate levels of androgens.", "synonyms": "PAIS, Partial androgen resistance syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "E34.5", "omim": "312300", "umls": "C0268301\u00a0 C0860159", "gard": "5692", "epidemiology": "There are no available data on the prevalence of PAIS in the general population. Nevertheless, resistance to androgens is the most frequent cause of XY DSD.", "clinical_description": "Patients have a highly variable genital appearance. The prototypic form of presentation is severe hypospadias, micropenis, and bifid scrotum in which the testes may or may not be descended. In the more severe form of PAIS, patients have female external genitalia with clitoromegaly, partial labial fusion and labial swellings comprising testes. A mild end of the spectrum, labeled MAIS (mild or minimal AIS), is a male with gynecomastia at puberty or an adult presenting with male factor infertility.", "etiology": "The condition is due to missense mutations in the androgen receptor (AR) gene (Xq11-12) coding for the AR nuclear transcription factor, and results in variable degrees of AR function. An AR mutation is found in only approximately 20% of patients with PAIS.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on clinical and biochemical findings in XY patients with varying degrees of under-masculinization. The typical hormone profile is increased luteinizing hormone (LH) and testosterone levels, which is used as a screening test for MAIS with male factor infertility. Serum anti-Mullerian hormone (AMH) levels may be normal or increased. A pelvic ultrasound, MRI or cysto-urethroscopy confirm the presence of Wolffian duct structures and the absence of M\u00fcllerian structures. A utriculus or vaginal remnant is often visualized on urethroscopy. Positive mutation analysis of the AR gene and the mutant AR confirmed to be pathogenic in a reporter gene assay confirms the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) stimulation should be performed to exclude an androgen biosynthetic defect. A urinary steroid profile is reliable to exclude 5-alpha-reductase deficiency (see this term) after six months of age. Other differential diagnoses include 46,XY partial gonadal dysgenesis, congenital adrenal hyperplasia due to cytochrome P450 oxidoreductase deficiency, Denys-Drash syndrome, Smith-Lemli-Opitz syndrome (see these terms), and PAIS with a normal AR. The latter condition is strongly associated with low birth weight due to fetal growth restriction.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis is seldom indicated.", "genetic_counseling": "The condition is X-linked recessive. Affected families should be offered genetic counseling only when an AR gene mutation has been identified and shown to be pathogenic. Counseling should be based on the variable expression of the same AR mutation between, and even within, affected families.", "management_and_treatment": "Management depends on the sex of rearing that the parents and healthcare professionals should assign as early as possible in infancy. Those raised as male require hypospadias repair (two procedures or more) and orchiopexy for undescended testes. Those raised as female need gonadectomy before puberty and puberty induction with estrogen. The onset of puberty in PAIS patients raised male is unpredictable and large doses of androgens may be required to induce adequate virilization. Gynecomastia is treated by reduction mammoplasty. High dose androgens can rarely restore fertility in MAIS patients. Psychological support from birth to adulthood is necessary.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable in terms of sexual function and quality of life in those raised male. Infertility is invariable. There is an increased risk of gonadal tumor, particularly if the testis remains undescended."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, des gyn\u00e4kologischen Formenkreises", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD des gyn\u00e4kologischen Fachbereichs, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch 17-beta-Hydroxysteroid-Dehydrogenase 3-Mangel", "german_description": "Der Mangel des Isoenzyms 3 der 17-Beta-Hydroxysteroid-Dehydrogenase (17betaHSD III) wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt und bedingt einen m\u00e4nnlichen Pseudohermaphroditismus. Es handelt sich um eine unvollst\u00e4ndige Differenzierung der m\u00e4nnlichen Genitalien bei M\u00e4nnern mit normalem m\u00e4nnlichen Karyotyp 46, XY. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit der Erkrankung wird in den Niederlanden auf 1/147.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die 17betaHSD III katalysiert in den Testes die Umwandlung von Androstendion in Testosteron. Das Fehlen von Testosteron in den fetalen Testes f\u00fchrt im chromosomal m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht zu weiblichen \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitalien. Bei Geburt haben die Patienten ein weibliches oder intermedi\u00e4res \u00e4u\u00dferes Genitale mit Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung der Klitoris, hinterer Labioskrotalfusion, und einer blind endenden perinealen Vaginatasche. Die Testes liegen in der Leiste oder in der Labioskrotalfalte. Der innere Urogenitaltrakt (Epididymis, Vas deferens, Samenbl\u00e4schen, Samenleiter) ist gut entwickelt. Es fehlen die Prostata und Derivate des M\u00fcllerschen Ganges. Betroffene mit weniger schweren Defekten werden gelegentlich als Knaben aufgezogen, die meisten jedoch als M\u00e4dchen. W\u00e4hrend der Pubert\u00e4t zeigen diese dann aber Zeichen einer Virilisierung (Phallus-Vergr\u00f6\u00dferung, sekund\u00e4re m\u00e4nnliche Geschlechtsmerkmale) und eine Gyn\u00e4komastie. Ursache ist die Synthese von Testosteron aus Androstendion durch extra-gonadale 17betaHSD-Isoenzyme mit Anstieg des Serumspiegels von Testosteron. Alle Betroffenen sind infertil. Basal und nach Stimulation mit hCG (menschliches Choriongonadotropin) sind die Spiegel von Androstendion erh\u00f6ht und von Testosteron erniedrigt. Entsprechend ist das Verh\u00e4ltnis Androstendion / Testosteron erh\u00f6ht. Vor der Pubert\u00e4t bedarf es f\u00fcr die Diagnosestellung oft einer hCG-Belastung, da die basalen Hormonspiegel evtl. nicht aussagekr\u00e4ftig sind. Das HSD17B3-Gen f\u00fcr die 17betaHSD III liegt in der Chromosomenregion 9q22. Mindestens 20 Mutationen wurden bisher beschrieben. Die meisten sind Missense- oder Nonsense-Mutationen. Eine Korrelation von Genotyp und Ph\u00e4notyp konnte nicht gesichert werden. Der Mangel der 17-Ketosteroid-Reduktase wird in der Kindheit oft \u00fcbersehen und erst in der Pubert\u00e4t diagnostiziert, wenn chromosomal m\u00e4nnliche Jugendliche, die als M\u00e4dchen aufgezogen wurden, wegen Hirsutismus und prim\u00e4rer Amenorrhoe zum Arzt kommen, oder wenn Betroffene, die als Knabe aufgezogen wurden, eine Gyn\u00e4komastie entwickeln und ein intermedi\u00e4res Genitale aufweisen. Wenn die Diagnose schon bei Geburt gestellt wird, muss vor der Zuweisung eines Geschlechtes zuerst gekl\u00e4rt werden, welche Resultate ggf. mit einer verm\u00e4nnlichenden Genitalplastik zu erreichen sind. F\u00e4llt die Entscheidung zugunsten einer weiblichen Zuweisung, dann sind eine verweiblichende Genitalplastik und eine Gonadektomie angezeigt. Bei Kenntnis der Mutation kann in weiteren Schwangerschaften der Mutter eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durchgef\u00fchrt werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "17-beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase isozyme 3 (17betaHSD III) deficiency is a rare disorder leading to male pseudohermaphroditism (MPH), a condition characterized by incomplete differentiation of the male genitalia in 46X,Y males.", "synonyms": "17-beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase 3 deficiency, 17-ketoreductase deficiency, 17-ketosteroidreductase deficiency, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Adolescent", "icd_10": "E29.1", "omim": "264300", "umls": "C0268296", "gard": "5659", "epidemiology": "The estimated incidence of this disease is 1 in 147 000 in The Netherlands.", "clinical_description": "The 17betaHSD III enzyme catalyzes the conversion of androstenedione to testosterone in the testis. Lack of testosterone in the fetal testis leads to genetic males with female external genitalia. Patients usually present at birth with female or ambiguous external genitalia, characterized by clitoromegaly, posterior labioscrotal fusion and perineal blind vaginal pouch. Testes are inguinal or in the labioscrotal folds. The internal urogenital tract (epididymides, vasa deferentia, seminal vesicles, ejaculatory ducts) is well developed; prostate and M\u00fcllerian structures are absent. Although some patients with less severe defects are brought up as males, affected males are usually brought up as females. However, at puberty they develop signs of virilization (phallic enlargement, male secondary sexual characteristics) and gynecomastia as the result of increases in serum testosterone, due to the conversion of androstenedione to testosterone by extra-gonadal 17b-HSD isoenzymes. All affected individuals are infertile.", "etiology": "At least 20 mutations have been reported in the 17-beta-HSD type 3 isozyme gene (HSD17B3), localized to 9q22. These are mainly missense/nonsense mutations, without significant genotypic/phenotypic correlation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Baseline and post-hCG (human chorionic gonadotropin) stimulation hormonal evaluation demonstrates increased androstenedione and low testosterone levels, with an elevated androstenedione/testosterone ratio. Before puberty, a hCG stimulation test is often necessary for diagnosis, since basal levels may be uninformative. Deficiency of 17-ketosteroid reductase is often misdiagnosed in infancy and detected at puberty in genetic males who have been either raised as females and develop hirsutism and primary amenorrhoea, or raised as males and have gynecomastia and incomplete male genital development.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is available for the kindred of affected patients if causal mutations have been characterized.", "genetic_counseling": "The disorder is transmitted as an autosomal recessive trait.", "management_and_treatment": "If the diagnosis is made at birth, gender assignment must be discussed, depending on the expected results of masculinizing genitoplasty. If female assignment is selected, feminizing genitoplasty and gonadectomy must be performed."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch 5-Alpha-Reduktase 2-Mangel", "german_description": "Der Steroid-5-Alpha-Reduktase-Mangel ist selten, wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt und verursacht einen m\u00e4nnlichen Pseudohermaphroditismus. Es handelt sich um eine unvollst\u00e4ndige Differenzierung der m\u00e4nnlichen Genitalien bei M\u00e4nnern mit normalem m\u00e4nnlichen Karyotyp 46, XY. Das Enzym 5-Alpha-Reduktase 2 wird durch das SRD5A2-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 2p23 kodiert und katalysiert die Umwandlung von Testosteron (T) in Dihydrotestosteron (DHT), das f\u00fcr die normale Differenzierung des \u00e4u\u00dferen m\u00e4nnlichen Genitales und die Entwicklung des Urogenitalsinus unentbehrlich ist. Das klassische Syndrom der Pseudovaginalen Perineoskrotalen Hypospadie manifestiert sich bei der Geburt mit intermedi\u00e4rem \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitale, klitorisartigem Phallus, Hypospadie, Scrotum bifidum und persistierendem Urogenitalsinus mit blind endender perinealer Vaginaltasche. Es kann jedoch der Aspekt des \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitales von vollst\u00e4ndig weiblich bis zu m\u00e4nnlich mit Hypospadie und / oder Mikropenis reichen. Die Testes liegen in den Labioskrotalfalten oder in den Leistenkan\u00e4len. Der innere Urogenitaltrakt ist gut entwickelt, und Derivate des M\u00fcllerschen Ganges fehlen. Wenn die Gonaden nicht entfernt wurden, kommt es in der Pubert\u00e4t durch Wirkung des Testosterons zu einer ausgepr\u00e4gten Virilisierung, aber ohne Gyn\u00e4komastie. Die meisten Patienten sind infertil. Basal und nach Stimulation mit hCG (menschlichem Choriongonadotropin) sind die Spiegel von Testosteron normal oder erh\u00f6ht. Gleichzeitig sind die DHT-Spiegel niedrig und die T/DHT-Ratio auf > 20 erh\u00f6ht. Die Umwandlung von T in DHT kann in kultivierten Fibroblasten aus Genitalhaut untersucht werden, h\u00e4ufig jedoch sind die Ergebnisse falsch negativ. In den 5 Exons des SRD5A2-Gens sind mehr als 40 verschiedene Mutationen gefunden worden. Bei den meisten handelt es sich um Aminos\u00e4ure-Substitutionen. Es wurden aber auch vollst\u00e4ndige Deletionen des Gens, kleinere Deletionen, sowie Nonsense- und Splice-Mutationen nachgewiesen. Es herrscht noch keine Einigkeit dar\u00fcber, nach welchen Kriterien die Zuweisung zu einem bestimmten Geschlecht erfolgen soll. Abh\u00e4ngig davon, welche Resultate ggf. mit einer verm\u00e4nnlichenden Genitalplastik zu erreichen sind, mu\u00df die Frage bei jedem Patienten sorgf\u00e4ltig gepr\u00fcft werden. F\u00e4llt die Entscheidung zugunsten einer weiblichen Zuweisung, dann sind eine verweiblichende Genitalplastik und eine Gonadektomie angezeigt. Bei Kenntnis der Mutation kann in weiteren Schwangerschaften der Mutter eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durchgef\u00fchrt werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare disorder of sex development (DSD) due to a defect in metabolizing testosterone to dihydrotestosterone and characterized by incomplete intrauterine masculinization which ranges from a female genitalia with a blind vaginal pouch to a fully male phenotype with pseudovaginal posterior hypospadias and micropenis.", "synonyms": "46,XY DSD due to 5-alpha-reductase 2 deficiency, Pseudovaginal perineoscrotal hypospadias, Steroid 5-alpha-reductase 2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Neonatal, Infancy, Adolescent", "icd_10": "E29.1", "omim": "264600", "umls": "C0268297\u00a0 C3669122", "gard": "5680", "meddra": "10000029", "epidemiology": "The disease has been described in large pedigrees from the Dominican Republic, Southern Lebanon and the Eastern Highlands Province of Papua New Guinea. It is relatively rare among Caucasians, but is recognized as a significant cause of DSD and mutational analysis is part of initial investigations.", "clinical_description": "Patients present at birth with characteristics of dihydrotestosterone (DHT) deficiency, such as posterior hypospadias, micropenis/clitoris-like phallus, bifid scrotum, cryptorchid testes (with normal or reduced spermatogenesis), and rudimentary prostate. The clinical spectrum is heterogeneous, ranging from a female with a blind vaginal pouch to a fully male phenotype with hypospadias and micropenis. Two-thirds of patients are initially assigned female gender, and thus clinical presentation maybe later during childhood with abnormal genitalia or during puberty with scarce facial and body hair (with normal sebum production) and virilization without breast development. Wolffian duct differentiation (testosterone-dependent) and regression of M\u00fcllerian structures (AMH-dependent) are not involved.", "etiology": "The disease is caused by mutations in the SRD5A2-gene (2p23.1) leading to a reduced or absent function of the steroid 5 alpha-reductase type 2 enzyme which converts testosterone into DHT in the external genitalia. As a result, male differentiation fails to occur during fetal development, despite high circulating testosterone levels. Manifestations at birth vary according to the levels of residual enzymatic function.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnostic criteria include genital ambiguity, a family history of DSD, and genital/karyotype discordance. Biochemical findings reveal increase in the testosterone/DHT ratio after human chorionic gonadotropin stimulation and normal testosterone and anti-M\u00fcllerian hormone concentration. Diagnosis also relies on 5-alpha-reductase activity assessment using the urinary steroid profiling (ratio of androsterone to etiocholanolone and 5-alpha-tetrahydrocortisol/tetrahydrocortisol and 5-alpha-tetrahydrocorticosterone to tetrahydrocorticosterone below the lower limit of normal). Nowadays, the diagnosis is most commonly determined directly by genetic screening.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes many other causes of severe hypospadias like partial androgen insensitivity syndrome, 17-beta-hydroxysteroid dehydrogenase 3 deficiency and Leydig cell hypoplasia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis with ultrasound is uncommon but may occur in families with a previously diagnosed child.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples. The parents are almost always carriers and without symptoms, but 25% of their boys will be affected. Girls with 46,XX karyotype and who are homozygous for mutations in the gene, will have no symptoms, but will transmit the mutation to their children.", "management_and_treatment": "For patients raised as male, the main concern is to keep the testis for later hormone production. Topical DHT cream on the pubic area can be applied neonatally after diagnosis at least during the minipuberty. Surgical repair of hypospadias (chordee correction, urethral reconstruction and orchidopexia with or without scrotalplasty,) should be performed at 6-18 months of age. For patients raised as female, management may include surgical correction of the external genitalia (vaginal opening into the perineum with early separation of the vagina and urethra), early removal of gonadal tissue to prevent masculinization before puberty, clitoral reduction (if severe masculinization) and cyclic hormonal therapy at puberty for development of secondary sexual characteristics. Choosing a female sex is nowadays only an option in XY children with a total deficiency.", "prognosis": "The risk of gonadal tumors in individuals with SRD5A2 mutations is quite low. Prostate diseases (prostate cancer, benign prostate hyperplasia) have not been reported in affected males. Most men are infertile due to the small prostate gland causing diminished semen volume and lack of spontaneous fertility; however, artificial reproductive techniques are a possibility."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch Cholesterol-Synthese-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY DSD durch Cholesterol-Synthese-Defekt, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch Defekt der adrenalen und testikul\u00e4ren Steroidogenese", "sub_name": "46,XY-DSD durch Defekt der adrenalen und testikul\u00e4ren Steroidogenese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch Defekt der adrenalen und testikul\u00e4ren Steroidogenese, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch Defekt des Testosteron-Stoffwechsels im peripheren Gewebe", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD durch Defekt des Testosteron-Stoffwechsels im peripheren Gewebe, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch Dihydrotestosteron Back-Door-Pathway-Biosynthesedefekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch isolierten 17,20-Lyase-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "46,XY disorder of sex development due to isolated 17,20-lyase deficiency is a rare disorder of sex development due to reduced 17,20-lyase activity that affects individuals with 46,XY karyotype and is characterized by ambiguous external genitalia, including micropenis, perineal hypospadias, bifid scrotum, cryptorchidism, and a blind vaginal pouch. Blood pressure and electrolytes are normal whilst hormonal investigations show normal basal and stimulated levels of cortisol, and low basal and stimulated androgen levels.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E29.1", "omim": "202110", "umls": "C0268285"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch komplette LH-Resistenz", "sub_name": "Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch komplette LH-Resistenz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD durch komplette LH-Resistenz, 46,XY-DSD durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, LH-Resistenz durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch komplette LH-Resistenz, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q56.1", "OMIM": "238320", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung", "sub_name": "Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch komplette LH-Resistenz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD durch komplette LH-Resistenz, 46,XY-DSD durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, LH-Resistenz durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch komplette LH-Resistenz, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch komplette LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q56.1", "OMIM": "238320", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch LH-Resistenz oder LHB-Mangel", "sub_name": "Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung aufgrund einer gest\u00f6rten Androgenproduktion, die zu einer Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der m\u00e4nnliche Geschlechtsentwicklung f\u00fchrt. Der Schweregrad der St\u00f6rung variiert und kann sich in der schweren Form mit vollst\u00e4ndigem m\u00e4nnlichem 46,XY-Pseudohermaphroditismus manifestieren, einschlie\u00dflich niedriger Testosteron- und hoher luteinisierender Hormonspiegel, fehlender Entwicklung sekund\u00e4rer m\u00e4nnlicher Geschlechtsmerkmale und fehlender Brustentwicklung. Patienten mit der milderen Form k\u00f6nnen ein breiteres Spektrum an Ph\u00e4notypen aufweisen, das von Mikropenis bis zu schwerer Hypospadie reicht.", "synonyms": "46,XY DSD durch LH-Resistenz oder LHB-Mangel, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch LH-Resistenz oder LHB-Mangel, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch Resistenz des luteinisierenden Hormons oder Mangel der Luteinisierendes-Hormon-beta-Untereinheit, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q56.1", "OMIM": "238320", "UMLS": "C0860158", "GARD": "3244", "MedDRA": "10024406"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch partielle LH-Resistenz", "sub_name": "Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch partielle LH-Resistenz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD durch partielle LH-Resistenz, 46,XY-DSD durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, LH-Resistenz durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch partielle LH-Resistenz, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q56.1", "OMIM": "238320", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung", "sub_name": "Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch partielle LH-Resistenz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD durch partielle LH-Resistenz, 46,XY-DSD durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, LH-Resistenz durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch partielle LH-Resistenz, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch partielle LH-Rezeptor-Inaktivierung, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q56.1", "OMIM": "238320", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch Resistenz des luteinisierenden Hormons oder Mangel der Luteinisierendes-Hormon-beta-Untereinheit", "sub_name": "Leydig-Zell-Hypoplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung aufgrund einer gest\u00f6rten Androgenproduktion, die zu einer Beeintr\u00e4chtigung der m\u00e4nnliche Geschlechtsentwicklung f\u00fchrt. Der Schweregrad der St\u00f6rung variiert und kann sich in der schweren Form mit vollst\u00e4ndigem m\u00e4nnlichem 46,XY-Pseudohermaphroditismus manifestieren, einschlie\u00dflich niedriger Testosteron- und hoher luteinisierender Hormonspiegel, fehlender Entwicklung sekund\u00e4rer m\u00e4nnlicher Geschlechtsmerkmale und fehlender Brustentwicklung. Patienten mit der milderen Form k\u00f6nnen ein breiteres Spektrum an Ph\u00e4notypen aufweisen, das von Mikropenis bis zu schwerer Hypospadie reicht.", "synonyms": "46,XY DSD durch LH-Resistenz oder LHB-Mangel, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch LH-Resistenz oder LHB-Mangel, St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch Resistenz des luteinisierenden Hormons oder Mangel der Luteinisierendes-Hormon-beta-Untereinheit, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q56.1", "OMIM": "238320", "UMLS": "C0860158", "GARD": "3244", "MedDRA": "10024406"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch St\u00f6rung der Testosteron-Biosynthese", "sub_name": "46,XY-DSD durch Testosteron-Synthese-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch St\u00f6rung der Testosteron-Biosynthese, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, durch testikul\u00e4ren 17,20-Desmolase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E29.1", "OMIM": "614279", "UMLS": "C1839840", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch testikul\u00e4ren Steroidogenese-Defekt", "sub_name": "46,XY-DSD durch testikul\u00e4ren Steroidogenese-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY durch testikul\u00e4ren Steroidogenese-Defekt, ", "ICD-10": "E29.1", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, endokrinen Ursprungs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD, endokrine, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD, genetische Formen, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, genetisch bedingte, endokrinen Ursprungs", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD, genetische Formen endokrinen Ursprungs, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, induziert durch m\u00fctterliche Exposition mit endokrinen Disruptoren", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "46,XY DSD induziert durch m\u00fctterliche Exposition mit endokrinen Disruptoren, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY - Nebenniereninsuffizienz, durch CYP11A1-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "46,XY disorder of sex development-adrenal insufficiency due to CYP11A1 deficiency is a rare, genetic, developmental defect during embryogenesis disorder characterized by severe, early-onset, salt-wasting adrenal insufficiency and ambiguous/female external genitalia (irrespective of chromosomal sex) due to mutations in the CYP11A1 gene. Milder cases may present delayed onset of adrenal gland dysfunction and genitalia phenotype may range from normal male to female in individuals with 46,XY karyotype. Imaging studies reveal hypoplastic/absent adrenal glands and biochemical findings include low serum cortisol, mineralocorticoids, androgens, and sodium, with elevated potassium levels.", "synonyms": "XY sex reversal-adrenal failure, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "Q56.1", "omim": "613743"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY, ovotestikul\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene genetische St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung, die entweder durch die Koexistenz von sowohl m\u00e4nnlichen als auch weiblichen reproduktiven Keimdr\u00fcsen oder, h\u00e4ufiger, durch das Vorhandensein einer oder beider Keimdr\u00fcsen mit einer Mischung aus Hoden- und Eierstockgewebe (Ovotestes) bei einem Individuum mit einem normalen m\u00e4nnlichen 46,XY-Karyotyp gekennzeichnet ist. Die \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitalien sind in der Regel uneindeutig, k\u00f6nnen aber von normal m\u00e4nnlich bis normal weiblich reichen. Wenn Uterus und/oder Eileiter vorhanden sind, sind sie im Allgemeinen hypoplastisch. Kryptorchismus, Hypospadie, Unfruchtbarkeit und ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko f\u00fcr gonadale Tumore sind h\u00e4ufig assoziiert.", "synonyms": "46,XY-DSD, ovotestikul\u00e4re, ", "ICD-10": "Q56.0"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung bei 46,XX Karyotyp", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "46,XX-DSD, Pseudohermaphroditismus, weiblicher, ", "ICD-10": "Q56.2", "UMLS": "C0238394\u00a0 C2936403", "MeSH": "D058489", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung des gyn\u00e4kologischen Formenkreises", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "DSD des gyn\u00e4kologischen Fachbereichs, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung des gyn\u00e4kologischen Formenkreises, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Syndrome mit DSD des gyn\u00e4kologischen Fachbereichs, genetische Formen, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "DSD, genetische Formen, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung-Intelligenzminderung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Verloes-Gillerot-Fryns-Syndrom ist ein Fehlbildungssyndrom. Es wurde nur bei drei Patienten beschrieben. Darunter waren zwei Geschwister. Der erste Patient war geistig schwer retardiert. In seinem allgemeinen Aussehen \u00e4hnelte er deutlich Patienten mit B\u00f6rjeson-Forssman-Lehmann-Syndrom, einer X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbten Krankheit. Klinische Symptome waren: Minderwuchs, vergr\u00f6berte Gesichtsz\u00fcge, tiefliegende Augen, Mikrophthalmie, gro\u00dfe Ohren, Adipositas mit weiblicher Fettverteilung, Anus imperforatus, Spina bifida des Stei\u00dfbeins, pseudovaginale perineoskrotale Hypospadie, Persistenz von Strukturen der M\u00fcllerschen G\u00e4nge und niedrige Gonadotropinspiegel. Sein genetisch m\u00e4nnliches (XY) Geschwister war als M\u00e4dchen aufgezogen worden. Sie war geistig leicht retardiert, minderw\u00fcchsig und hatte eine Mikrophthalmie und gro\u00dfe Ohren. Sie wurde mit vollst\u00e4ndigem Uterus mit Tuben und einer solit\u00e4ren intraabdominellen Gonade mit testikul\u00e4rer Organisation geboren. Im Kleinkindalter wurden beide Organe entfernt. Der dritte Patient hatte einen schweren H\u00f6rverlust, okul\u00e4re Kolobome, zentral verursachten Hypogonadismus, distinkte kraniofaziale Merkmale mit Ahnlichkeit zum B\u00f6rjeson-Forssman-Lehmann-Syndrom und Skelettanomalien (zervikale Spina bifida, Hyperkyphose und Thoraxdeformit\u00e4t). Alle Patienten hatten einen normalen m\u00e4nnlichen Karyotyp 46,XY. Die Vererbung ist entweder autosomal-rezessiv oder X-chromosomal. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndrome with 46,XY disorder of sex development characterized by variable degrees of intellectual disability, short stature, severe genital anomalies resulting in sexual ambiguity (such as pseudovaginal perineoscrotal hypospadias and persistence of M\u00fcllerian structures), and ocular anomalies (microphthalmia, coloboma). Craniofacial peculiarities (coarse features, deep set eyes), spina bifida, imperforate anus, and sensorineural hearing loss were also described. No new cases have been reported since 1994.", "synonyms": "Verloes-Gillerot-Fryns syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q56.3", "omim": "600122", "umls": "C2931233", "gard": "4550"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung mit aberranten Geschlechtschromosomen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "DSD mit Aberrationen der Geschlechtschromosomen, ", "UMLS": "C2936421", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Glykolyse", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Glykosylierung der Glykosphingolipide und des Glycosyl-Phosphatidylinositol-Ankers", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Glykosylierung-St\u00f6rung der Glykosphingolipide und GPI-Anker-Proteine, ", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Kohlenhydrataufnahme und Transport", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Lysosomen-verwandten Organellen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der multiplen Glykosylierung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der O-Mannosyl-Glykan-Synthese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der O-N-Acetylgalaktosamin-Glykan-Synthese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der oxidativen Phosphorylierung (OXPHOS) durch mtDNA-Anomalien", "sub_name": "Mitochondriale St\u00f6rungen der oxidativen Phosphorylierung durch Anomalien der mitochondrialen DNA", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "OXPHOS-Defekt durch mtDNA-Anomalien, OXPHOS-Krankheit durch mitochondriale DNA-Anomalien, St\u00f6rung der oxidativen Phosphorylierung (OXPHOS) durch mtDNA-Anomalien, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der oxidativen Phosphorylierung (OXPHOS) durch Punktmutation der mtDNA", "sub_name": "Mitochondriale St\u00f6rungen der oxidativen Phosphorylierung durch Punktmutation der mitochondrialen DNA", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "OXPHOS-Defekt durch Punktmutation der mtDNA, OXPHOS-Krankheit durch Punktmutation der mitochondrialen DNA, St\u00f6rung der oxidativen Phosphorylierung (OXPHOS) durch Punktmutation der mtDNA, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der oxidativen Phosphorylierung (OXPHOS) durch umfangreiche Einzeldeletionen der mtDNA", "sub_name": "Mitochondriale St\u00f6rungen der oxidativen Phosphorylierung durch umfangreiche Einzeldeletionen der mitochondrialen DNA", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "OXPHOS-Defekt durch umfangreiche Einzeldeletionen der mtDNA, OXPHOS-Krankheit durch umfangreiche Einzeldeletionen der mitochondrialen DANN, St\u00f6rung der oxidativen Phosphorylierung (OXPHOS) durch umfangreiche Einzeldeletionen der mtDNA, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der O-Xylosylglykan-Synthese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der O-Xylosyl/N-Acetylgalaktosamin-Glykan-Synthese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der peroxisomalen Alpha-, Beta- und Omegaoxidation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "GARD": "12476", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Phospholipid-, Sphingolipid- und Fetts\u00e4ure-Biosynthese", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Phospholipid-, Sphingolipid- und Fetts\u00e4ure-Biosynthese mit vorwiegender Beteiligung der peripheren Nerven", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Phospholipid-, Sphingolipid- und Fetts\u00e4ure-Biosynthese mit vorwiegender Beteiligung der Skelettmuskeln", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Phospholipid-, Sphingolipid- und Fetts\u00e4ure-Biosynthese mit vorwiegender Beteiligung des ZNS", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Proteasom-Funktionalit\u00e4t", "sub_name": "Proteasom-assoziiertes autoinflammatorisches Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, autosomal recessive autoinflammatory disorder characterized by early-onset erythematous popular/nodular skin eruptions, recurrent fever, possible joint contractures, lipodystrophy, erythematous inflammatory skin changes, joint and muscle involvement (joint contractures, arthralgia, muscle weakness), and hepatosplenomegaly.", "synonyms": "ALDD syndrome, Autoinflammation-lipodystrophy-dermatosis syndrome, PRAAS, Proteasome disability syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "D89.8", "omim": "256040\u00a0 617591\u00a0 618048\u00a0 619175\u00a0 619183", "epidemiology": "To date less than 50 cases have been reported in the scientific and medical literature; the distribution is worldwide.", "clinical_description": "The disease presents as spectrum with onset ranging from the neonatal period to childhood, with the majority of reported cases occurring in infancy. The principal manifestations are of pernio-like and/or erythematous lesions and periodic fever. Lesions can be annular, nodular or maculopapular involving the hands and feet or periorbital regions, and may be associated with seasonal variation. Variable skin manifestations include heliotrope-like rash on eyelids, nodular episcleritis, ear and nose chondritis, plantar hyperkeratosis, hyperhidrosis of hands and feet. Lipodystrophy is first noted in the face and upper limbs, giving a characteristic thin and angular facial appearance, and may become generalized to include the abdomen and lower limbs. Lipodystrophy is progressive and irreversible. Joint contractures affect mainly the hands and feet at first but can later spread to other joints and can cause pain and joint deformities. Fingers may appear long and clubbed. Arthralgia without arthritis may be noted. Hepatosplenomegaly is frequently reported and delayed physical development (low height and weight) is possible. Other less common manifestations include conjunctivitis, short stature, and attacks of aseptic meningitis, seizures, microcytic anemia.", "etiology": "The disease is due to loss of function variants in the gene PSMB8 (6p21.3) encoding the beta5i subunit of immunoproteasome. In all reported Japanese patients, the disease is due to the homozygous c.602G>T (p.Gly201Val) variant. The immunoproteasome is involved in proteolysis and maintenance of cell homeostasis. If proteolysis is disrupted, this can lead to an increase in interferon (IFN) signaling and cell stress. This dysregulation of the IFN pathway is thought to be responsible for the manifestations seen in this disease. Some cases remain to be genetically determined, indicating the possibility of other disease-causing genes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical presentation and family history and confirmed by genetic testing. In Japan, clinical diagnosis is established on presentation of five or more major clinical characteristics (autosomal recessive heritability, skin rash, periodic fever, nodular erythema, lipodystrophy ranging from localized to near generalized, muscular atrophy, elongated clubbed fingers or joint contractures, hepato-splenomegaly, or calcification in the basal ganglia). Histopathologic examination of skin biopsy reveals focal mononuclear cell infiltration with vasculopathy. Laboratory findings include constantly elevated serum C-reactive protein (CRP) levels and hyper-gamma-globulinemia. Autoantibody titers increase as the disease progresses in some but remain negative in others. Molecular genetic testing can identify disease causing variants, confirming diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include cryopyrin-associated periodic syndrome, mucopolysaccharidosis, familial partial lipodystrophy, systemic lupus erythematosus, lupus erythematosus panniculitis, dermatomyositis, Sj\u00f6gren syndrome, inclusion body myositis, Aicardi-Gouti\u00e8res syndrome, and Weber-Christian disease.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. Where both parents are unaffected carriers, there is a 25% risk of transmission to offspring at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no effective therapeutic regimen. Fever and skin lesions respond well to systemic steroid administration but usually reoccur after tapering. Biologics (notably tocilizumab and baricitinib) have been used to varying effect; however, randomized controlled trials are lacking. These treatments are all ineffective in halting lipodystrophy progression.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy can be compromised, with death often the result of multi-organ inflammation. Quality of life is largely affected as patients suffer from reduced activity, fever, pain and repeated episodes of severe inflammation."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Protein N-Glykosylierung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung der Protein O-Glykosylierung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des beta- und omega-Aminos\u00e4uren-Stoffwechsels", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "UMLS": "C0342707", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des Biogene Amine-Stoffwechsels/-Transports", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des exkretorischen Apparates der Tr\u00e4nenwege", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des Folat-Stoffwechsels", "sub_name": "Fols\u00e4ure-Stoffwechsel- und Transportst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung des Folat-Stoffwechsels, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des Hypophysenvorderlappens-variables Immundefekt-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte endokrine Erkrankung, die durch das Auftreten eines allgemeinen variablen Immundefekts (CVID) gekennzeichnet ist, der sich mit einer Hypogammaglobulin\u00e4mie und wiederkehrenden oder schweren, in der Kindheit auftretenden sinopulmonalen Infektionen manifestiert. In Assoziation tritt, m\u00f6glicherweise erst viele Jahre sp\u00e4ter, ein symptomatischer adrenokortikotroper Hormonmangel (ACTH) auf, der sich als Folge eines Hypophysenvorderhormonmangels entwickelt.", "synonyms": "DAVID-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "E23.0", "OMIM": "615577"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des konservierten oligomeren Golgi-Komplex", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "COG-Komplex-Defekt, ", "ICD-10": "E77.8", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des Methionin-/schwefelhaltige Aminos\u00e4uren-Stoffwechsels", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung des zytosolischen Methylgruppentransfers oder schwefelhaltige Aminos\u00e4uren-Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung, ", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des Neurotransmitter-Stoffwechsels/-Transports", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des Pentose/Polyol-Stoffwechels", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des terminalen Komplementkomplex", "sub_name": "Immundefekt durch Komplementdefekt bei St\u00f6rung einer sp\u00e4ten Komponente", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Immunodeficiency due to a late component of complement deficiency is a primary immunodeficiency due to an anomaly in either complement components C5, C6, C7, C8 or C9 and is typically characterized by meningitis due to often recurrent meningococcal infections. The prognosis is generally favorable.", "synonyms": "Immunodeficiency due to C5 to C9 component complement deficiency, Terminal complement pathway deficiency, ", "icd_10": "D84.1", "omim": "609536\u00a0 610102\u00a0 612446\u00a0 613789\u00a0 613790\u00a0 613825"}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des Vitamin D-Stoffwechels", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des zerebralen vesikul\u00e4ren Dopamin-Serotonin-Transportes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Defekt des zerebralen vesikul\u00e4ren Dopamin-Serotonin-Transportes ist eine k\u00fcrzlich erkannte neurometabolische Erkrankung mit Beginn im Kleinkindalter. Charakteristisch sind Dystonie, Parkinsonismus, Unf\u00e4higkeit zu gehen, vegetative Funktionsst\u00f6rungen, verz\u00f6gerte Entwicklung und Stimmungsschwankungen.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G25.8", "OMIM": "618049", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit wurde bisher nur in 1 Familie aus Saudi-Arabien bei 8 Patienten beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit wird im Kleinkindalter mit Muskelhypotonie, Verlust der schon erworbenen Kopfkontrolle, mit andauerndem Schreien und verdrehten Augen manifest. Die motorische Entwicklung ist verz\u00f6gert. Sp\u00e4tere Symptome sind: Schwerer Parkinsonismus, Dystonie, Ataxie, okulogyre Krisen, Schlafst\u00f6rungen und Stimmungsschwankungen, instabile K\u00f6rpertemperatur, exzessives Schwitzen, Ptose und Haltungsschw\u00e4che. Die Symptome zeigen keine tageszeitlichen Schwankungen, werden durch Einnahme von Vitamin B12 oder Fols\u00e4ure nicht gebessert und verschlechtern sich nach Gabe von L-Dopa.", "etiology": "Der Defekt des zerebralen vesikul\u00e4ren Dopamin-Serotonin-Transportes wird verursacht durch Mutationen im SLC18A2-Gen (10q25). Das Gen kodiert f\u00fcr den vesikul\u00e4ren Monoamin-Transporter 2 (VMAT2), der f\u00fcr die Aufnahme von Dopamin und Serotonin in die synaptischen Vesikel verantwortlich ist. Mutationen in diesem Gen f\u00fchren zur Funktionsst\u00f6rung von VMAT2 und damit zu den Problemen der motorischen Kontrolle, der autonomen Funktionen und der Stimmungregulation.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung soll empfohlen werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit wurde bisher nur in 1 Familie aus Saudi-Arabien bei 8 Patienten beschrieben."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung des zytosolischen Methylgruppentransfers oder schwefelhaltige Aminos\u00e4uren-Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung", "sub_name": "St\u00f6rung des Methionin-/schwefelhaltige Aminos\u00e4uren-Stoffwechsels", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "St\u00f6rung des zytosolischen Methylgruppentransfers oder schwefelhaltige Aminos\u00e4uren-Stoffwechselst\u00f6rung, ", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rungen der mitochondrialen Proteinimports", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rungen der mitochondrialen Substrat-Transporter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rungen der Mitochondrienmembran (Transport)", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rungen der oxidativen Phosphorylierung, isolierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Atmungskettenkomplex, isolierte St\u00f6rung, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rungen der Pubert\u00e4t und/oder der Menstruation", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rungen im Stoffwechsel von Metallen mit Epilepsie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "St\u00f6rung mit multisystemischer Beteiligung und prim\u00e4ren Lymph\u00f6dem", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Strabismus mit Restriktionssyndrom, selten", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Strabismus, syndromale Formen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Strahlenempfindlichkeit-Immundefekt-dysmorphologische Merkmale-Lernschwierigkeiten-Syndrom", "sub_name": "RIDDLE-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, primary immunodeficiency disorder characterized by increased radiosensitivity(R), mild immunodeficiency (ID), dysmorphic features (D), and learning difficulties (LE).", "synonyms": "RNF168 deficiency, Radiosensitivity-immunodeficiency-dysmorphic features-learning difficulties syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Adolescent", "icd_10": "D82.8", "omim": "611943", "umls": "C2677792"}, {"name": "Strahleninduzierte Erkrankung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Strahleninduzierte Plexopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare radiation-induced disorder characterized by impairment of the peripheral nervous system at the level of the brachial or lumbosacral plexus following radiation therapy. Onset of symptoms can occur between several months up to decades after the last dose of radiation. Patients with radiation-induced brachial plexopathy typically present with mostly unilateral progressive paresthesia, followed by weakness, atrophy, and pain. Symptoms in radiation-induced lumbosacral plexopathy include more variable combinations of numbness, paresthesia, pain, and weakness, and are more often bilateral.", "icd_10": "G54.0"}, {"name": "Strahlenmyelitis", "sub_name": "Myelitis, radiogene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Strahlenmyelitis ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch die Entwicklung von Par\u00e4sthesien sowie in schweren F\u00e4llen durch fortschreitende Paresen und L\u00e4hmungen nach Bestrahlung von Tumoren gekennzeichnet ist, bei denen das R\u00fcckenmark in das Strahlenfeld einbezogen ist. Die Symptome k\u00f6nnen Monate oder Jahre nach der Strahlentherapie auftreten.", "synonyms": "Strahlenmyelitis, Strahlenmyelopathie, ", "ICD-10": "G97.8"}, {"name": "Strahlenmyelopathie", "sub_name": "Myelitis, radiogene", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Strahlenmyelitis ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch die Entwicklung von Par\u00e4sthesien sowie in schweren F\u00e4llen durch fortschreitende Paresen und L\u00e4hmungen nach Bestrahlung von Tumoren gekennzeichnet ist, bei denen das R\u00fcckenmark in das Strahlenfeld einbezogen ist. Die Symptome k\u00f6nnen Monate oder Jahre nach der Strahlentherapie auftreten.", "synonyms": "Strahlenmyelitis, Strahlenmyelopathie, ", "ICD-10": "G97.8"}, {"name": "Strahlenproktitis", "sub_name": "Radiogene Proktitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Strahlenproktitis ist eine seltene Erkrankung des Rektums. Sie wird direkt durch Strahlentherapie im Bereich des Beckens ausgel\u00f6st und ist gekennzeichnet durch rektale Blutungen, ver\u00e4nderte Gewohnheiten beim Stuhlgang, Tenesmen und Sepsis.", "synonyms": "Strahlenproktitis, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "K62.7", "UMLS": "C0400827", "MedDRA": "10037766"}, {"name": "Stratton-Garcia-Young-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Brachydaktylie, mesomele, mit mentaler Retardierung und Herzfehlern", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisch bedingtes Dysmorphie-Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Intelligenzminderung, d\u00fcnnen Habitus mit schmalen Schultern, mesomele Verk\u00fcrzung der Arme, kraniofaziale Dysmorphien (z. B. langes Untergesicht, Oberkieferhypoplasie, Schnabelnase, kurze Columella, Prognathie, hochgew\u00f6lbter Gaumen, stumpfer Unterkieferwinkel), Brachydaktylie (meist an den Mittelgliedern) und kardiovaskul\u00e4re Anomalien (z. B. Aortenwurzelerweiterung, Mitralklappenprolaps).", "synonyms": "Stratton-Garcia-Young-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "GARD": "5036"}, {"name": "Stratton-Parker-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Kleinwuchs-Wormsche Knochen-Dextrokardie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Syndrom mit multiplen kongenitalen Anomalien, das durch Wormsche Knochen, Dextrokardie und Kleinwuchs aufgrund eines Wachstumshormonmangels gekennzeichnet ist. Zus\u00e4tzliche Manifestationen, \u00fcber die berichtet wurde, sind Brachykamptodaktylie, Nierenhypoplasie, bilateraler Kryptorchismus, Hypospadie in der Mitte des Schafts, imperforierter Anus/anorektale Agenesie, K\u00f6rperasymmetrie, leichte Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, Hemimegalenzephalie und Gesichtsdysmorphie (Hypotelorismus, nach unten geneigte Lidspalten, tief angesetzte und nach hinten abgewinkelte Ohren, abgesenkter Nasenr\u00fccken und Mikrostomie).", "synonyms": "Stratton-Parker-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.1", "OMIM": "185120", "UMLS": "C1861448", "GARD": "4856"}, {"name": "Streeter-Dysplasie", "sub_name": "Schn\u00fcrring-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Schn\u00fcrring-Syndrom ist eine angeborene Fehlbildung der Gliedma\u00dfen mit einer extrem variablen klinischen Pr\u00e4sentation. Es ist gekennzeichnet durch das Vorhandensein von partiellen bis vollst\u00e4ndigen, angeborenen, faserigen, umlaufenden und ringf\u00f6rmigen Einschn\u00fcrungsb\u00e4ndern/-ringen, die jedes K\u00f6rperteil betreffen k\u00f6nnen, aber besonders h\u00e4ufig an den oberen oder unteren Extremit\u00e4ten beobachtet werden. Die Ph\u00e4notypen reichen von einer nur leichten Eindellung der Haut bis hin zur vollst\u00e4ndigen Amputation von Teilen des F\u00f6tus (z. B. Zehen, distale Gliedma\u00dfe). Die Kompression durch die Ringe kann zu \u00d6demen, Skelettanomalien (z. B. Frakturen, Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten) und in seltenen F\u00e4llen zu neuralen Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen f\u00fchren.", "synonyms": "Amnion-Schn\u00fcrfurchensyndrom, Amniotisches-Band-Syndrom, Kongenitale Schn\u00fcrringe, Streeter-Dysplasie, ", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.8", "OMIM": "217100"}, {"name": "Streptobacillus-Rattenbissfieber", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A25.1", "summary": "Das Streptobazill\u00e4re Rattenbiss-Fieber (RBF) ist eine systemische, vom aeroben gramnegativen Bakterium Streptobacillus moniliformis verursachte Zoonose. Die \u00dcbertragung auf Menschen erfolgt durch Bisse und Kratzen infizierter Ratten. Die Krankheit tritt weltweit auf, ihre H\u00e4ufigkeit ist aber nicht genau bekannt. Das erste Zeichen der Infektion, 2-7 Tage nach dem Biss, ist hohes Fieber (bis zu 40\u00b0). Schnell folgen Sch\u00fcttelfrost, Kopfschmerzen, \u00dcbelkeit und Erbrechen. Das RBF geht auch mit einem morbilliformen oder purpura-\u00e4hnlichem Exanthem an den Extremit\u00e4ten (besonders Handinnenfl\u00e4chen und Fu\u00dfsohlen) einher. Gelegentlich treten an H\u00e4nden und F\u00fc\u00dfen h\u00e4morrhagische, schuppende Vesikel auf. Wechselnd lokalisierte (migratorische) Arthralgien sind m\u00f6glich und beeintr\u00e4chtigen in der Regel die Beweglichkeit der Gelenke. Die Bisswunden heilen meist schnell ab. Als seltene Komplikationen wurden Endokarditis, Perikarditis, Myokarditis, Diarrhoe und degenerative Ver\u00e4nderungen z.B. der Nieren und der Leber beschrieben. Seltener als durch den Biss infizierter Ratten wird die Krankheit durch andere mit S. moniliformis infizierte Tiere (Gerbillen, H\u00f6rnchen usw.). Ein weiterer Infektionsweg ist die Aufnahme von Wasser, Milch und Nahrungsmitteln, die mit Rattenexkrementen kontaminiert wurden. In diesen F\u00e4llen wird die Krankheit Haverhill-Fieber genannt. Streptobacillus moniliformis wird vorwiegend im Pharynx infizierter Ratten gefunden, aber auch im Blut und in Gelenk- und Hautexsudaten. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren das charakteristische Wachstum, das gaschromatographisch erstellte Fetts\u00e4ureprofil, Antik\u00f6rpertests im Blut (agglutinierende Antik\u00f6rper ab dem 10. Tag) und, weniger gebr\u00e4uchlich, der molekulare Erregernachweis. Differentialdiagnosen sind das Spirill\u00e4re RBF (Sodoku, sh.dort), verschiedene bakterielle und virale Infektionen (Borelliose, Leptospirose, Brucellose, Rocky Mountain-Fleckfieber; sh. diese Termini), durch S.pyogenes verursachte oder mit S.pyogenes assoziierte Krankheiten, Infektionen mit S.aureus, disseminierte Gonorrhoe, Meningokokken-Sepsis, virale Exantheme, das Sekund\u00e4rstadium der Syphilis, Epstein-Barr-Virus und Coxsackieviren. Die Betreuung beinhaltet prophylaktische (Vermeidung eines direkten oder indirekten Kontaktes mit Vektoren) und therapeutische Ma\u00dfnahmen (lokale Behandlung und Antibiose). Die wirkungsvollste antibiotische Behandlung bei nicht-allergischen Patienten ist die Verabreichung von Penicillin G, andernfalls von Tetrazyklin und Streptomycin. Behandelte Patienten haben eine sehr gute Prognose. Ohne Therapie versterben 13% der Patienten im Gefolge von Komplikationen."}, {"name": "Streptococcus pneumoniae-assoziiertes h\u00e4molytisch-ur\u00e4misches Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "S. pneumoniae-bedingtes HUS, SP-HUS, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D58.8", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Streptokokken-TSS", "sub_name": "Toxisches Schock-Syndrom, Streptokokken-induziertes", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das durch Streptokokken verursachte toxische Schocksyndrom (Streptokokken-TSS) ist eine akute Erkrankung, die durch die Produktion von Superantigen-Toxinen ausgel\u00f6st wird und durch einen pl\u00f6tzlichen Beginn mit Fieber, anderen fieberhaften Symptomen, Schmerzen und Multiorganbeteiligung gekennzeichnet ist. Eine Infektion mit Streptococcus pyogenes kann zum Koma, Schock und zum Tod f\u00fchren.", "synonyms": "Streptokokken-TSS, ", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "A48.3", "UMLS": "C0343532", "MedDRA": "10044251", "epidemiology": "Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz wird mit 1:300 000 - 1:1 000 000 angegeben.", "clinical_description": "Streptokokken-TSS ist in den meisten F\u00e4llen durch einen pl\u00f6tzlich einsetzenden Schmerz, h\u00e4ufig \u00e4hnlich einer Peritonitis oder an den Extremit\u00e4ten lokalisiert bei zuvor gesunden Erwachsenen. Grippe-\u00e4hnliche Symptome wie hohes Fieber, Muskelschmerzen, \u00dcbelkeit, Durchfall und Erbrechen sind Anzeichen einer Streptokokken-TSS und die meisten Patienten entwickeln eine Hypotension kurz nach der station\u00e4ren Aufnahme. Zeichen einer Weichteilinfektion wie einem scharf begrenztem Erythem und Schwellung k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls vorliegen und zu einer nekrotisierenden Fasziits f\u00fchren. Ein unscharf begrenztes scharlach-\u00e4hnliches Erythem ist in etwa 10% der F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Weitere ernsthafte Manifestationen sind Verwirrung, Schock, renale Dysfunktion, akutes Atemnotsyndrom (siehe auch ARDS) und Koma. In manchen F\u00e4llen kommt es zu einer akuten Nebenniereninsuffizienz (siehe dort).", "etiology": "Streptokokken-TSS wird durch eine Infektion mit Streptococcus pyogenes verursacht, auch bekannt als Gruppe A-Streptokokken (GAS) und ist h\u00e4ufig mit einer Hautinfektion, einer Geburt oder Operation assoziiert. Die Infektion kann als Begleiterscheinung eines Traumas oder nach einer viralen Infektion (Influenza oder Varizellen) auftreten. Streptokokken-TSS ist die Folge einer bakteriellen Toxinaussch\u00fcttung, die eine heftige Immunreaktion, insbesondere durch Zytokine und Chemokine hervorrufen kann. Diese Reaktion h\u00e4ngt mit einer T-Zellaktivierung durch die Produktion von Superantigenen zusammen, die den \u00fcblichen Weg der Antigenpr\u00e4sentation umgehen. Streptokokken der Gruppe C und G sind selten beteiligt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die klinischen Symptome in Kombination mit den laborchemischen Ergebnissen sind die Basis f\u00fcr die Diagnosestellung eines Streptokokken-TSS. Patienten mit Fieber, Multiorganversagen und Schock werden auf Gruppe A-Streptokokken im Blut oder in einer im Normalfall sterilen K\u00f6rperfl\u00fcssigkeit wie Liquor, Pleura- oder Peritonealfl\u00fcssigkeit untersucht. Bei Erregernachweis wird die Diagnose eines Streptokokken-TSS gestellt. Eine Bakteri\u00e4mie ist bei den meisten Patienten mit Streptokokken-TSS nachweisbar (etwa 60%). Bei Patienten mit Staphylokokken-TSS liegt nur in etwa 5% der F\u00e4lle eine Bakteri\u00e4mie vor.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen stellen das Staphylokokken-TSS, der septische Schock, Typhus-Fieber, Rocky Mountain-Fleckfieber, Leptospirose, Peritonitis, Pneumonie, pelvine Infektion, Perikarditis, akuter Myokardinfarkt, Menigokokk\u00e4mie und viraler/ toxischer/ allergischer Ausschlag dar.", "management_and_treatment": "Der Beginn des Streptokokken-TSS ist pl\u00f6tzlich und bedarf einer sofortigen intensivmedizinischen Versorgung. Antibiotika (Beta-Lactam-Antibiotika und Clindamycin) in Kombination mit unterst\u00fctzenden Ma\u00dfnahmen (Fl\u00fcssigkeit, Inotrope Substanzen, Vassopressoren) und intraven\u00f6se Immunglobulin-Gaben, die die Antigene blockieren, stellen die Mitter der Wahl dar. Kortikoide und rekombinantes aktiviertes Protein C (Derotrecogin-Alpha) k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls zur Besserung f\u00fchren. Bei renaler Dysfunktion kann es zu Dialysebed\u00fcrftigkeit und bei akutem Atemnotsyndrom zu k\u00fcnstlicher Beatmungspflicht mit Sauerstoffbedarf kommen. Bei V.a. nekrotisierende Fasziitis sollte ein D\u00e9bridement erwogen werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose bei Streptokokken-TSS ist abh\u00e4ngig vom Alter. Bei Erwachsenen liegt die Mortalit\u00e4t bei 30-80%, bei Kindern bei 5-8%.", "summary": "Die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz wird mit 1:300 000 - 1:1 000 000 angegeben."}, {"name": "Stress-Erythrozytose", "sub_name": "Gaisb\u00f6ck-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Stress-Erythrozytose, Stress-Polyzyth\u00e4mie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D75.1", "UMLS": "C0541719\u00a0 C2242785", "MedDRA": "10042217\u00a0 10053885", "summary": "Das Gaisb\u00f6ck-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch eine sekund\u00e4re Polyzyth\u00e4mie. Es tritt \u00fcberwiegend bei M\u00e4nnern mit sitzender Lebensweise und regelm\u00e4\u00dfig hochkalorischer Kost auf. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Das klinische Bild besteht aus leichter Adipositas, Bluthochdruck und vermindertem Plasmavolumen mit relativer Zunahme von H\u00e4matokrit, Blutviskosit\u00e4t und Serumbestandteilen (Cholesterin, Triglyzeride, Harns\u00e4ure). Ursache der Reduktion des Plasmavolumens scheint eine Erh\u00f6hung des diastolischen Blutdrucks zu sein. Die Prognose ist bei kardiovaskul\u00e4ren Komplikationen eingeschr\u00e4nkt. "}, {"name": "Stress-Kardiomyopathie", "sub_name": "Tako-Tsubo-Kardiomyopathie", "german_description": "Die Kardiomyopathie Typ Takotsubo (TC) ist eine k\u00fcrzlich beschriebene akute Erkrankung des Herzens, die unter dem Bild eines akuten Herzinfarkts verl\u00e4uft. Das Syndrom wurde zuerst in der japanischen Bev\u00f6lkerung beschrieben, dann aber auch in den USA und Europa. Am h\u00e4ufigsten betroffen sind Frauen im Alter von 55 bis 75 Jahren. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 1:36.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Patienten haben einen isch\u00e4mischen Thoraxschmerz oder sind dyspnoeisch, im EKG ist die ST-Strecke erh\u00f6ht und das QT-Intervall ist verl\u00e4ngert. Die kardialen Serumenzyme und Biomarker sind leicht bis m\u00e4\u00dfig erh\u00f6ht. Spitze und der Mittelteil des linken Ventrikels sind 'balloniert'. Im Gegensatz zu akuten Koronarsyndromen (ACS) haben Patienten mit TC keine angiographischen Zeichen einer obstruktiven Koronarkrankheit. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Komplikationen sind kardiogener Schock, Obstruktion des linksventrikul\u00e4ren Ausflusstraktes, Schlaganfall und Bildung eines apikalen Thrombus. Die Ursache ist nicht genau bekannt, aber in typischen F\u00e4llen wird das Syndrom durch akute seelische oder k\u00f6rperliche Belastung, eine Reihe von nicht-kardialen Krankheiten und chirurgische Eingriffe ausgel\u00f6st. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Angiographie der Koronararterien, Links-Ventrikulographie und Echokardiographie. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an ACS und andere passagere ventrikul\u00e4re Funktionsst\u00f6rungen zu denken. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen station\u00e4r \u00fcberwacht und behandelt (Vorhof- und Kammerarrhythmien, Herzversagen, mechanische Komplikationen) werden. Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und symptomatisch, z.B. mit Betablockern, Inhibitoren des angiotensin-konvertierenden Enzyms (ACE-Hemmer), Aspirin und Diuretika. Wenn in der akuten Phase der Erkrankung die richtigen Ma\u00dfnahmen getroffen werden, ist der kurzfristige Verlauf durch sehr gute klinische Erholung gekennzeichnet. Der weitere Verlauf ist in der Regel unauff\u00e4llig, aber eine Ventrikelruptur ist m\u00f6glich. Damit ist dieses Syndrom eine weitere Ursache eines pl\u00f6tzlichen Todes.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare cardiac disease characterized by acute occurrence of heart failure after an emotional or physical trigger however, recovery of the wall motion abnormalities are observed within months. Symptoms are similar to acute coronary syndrome (ACS).", "synonyms": "Ampulla cardiomyopathy, Apical ballooning syndrome, Ballooning cardiomyopathy, Broken heart syndrome, Stress cardiomyopathy, Tako-Tsubo syndrome, Takotsubo cardiomyopathy, Takotsubo syndrome, Transient left ventricular apical ballooning syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I42.8", "umls": "C1168291\u00a0 C1739395", "gard": "9400", "epidemiology": "Takotsubo syndrome (TTS) is found in about 1-3% of all patients with symptoms of ACS; however, the prevalence is likely underestimated. Around 90% of TTS patients are women, typically postmenopausal but male and younger patients are diagnosed increasingly due to raised awareness of the syndrome.", "clinical_description": "In the acute phase, clinical presentation, electrocardiography (ECG) and cardiac biomarkers are similar to those of ACS. Typical symptoms are acute chest pain or dyspnea. Further symptoms can arise from complications of TTS, e.g. heart failure, cardiogenic shock, or cardiac arrest. New ECG changes or elevated cardiac biomarkers may or may not be present.", "etiology": "The underlying mechanisms of this syndrome remain incompletely understood. Recent findings show that specific alterations in neurological response and sympathetic activation after emotional stimuli are present in TTS. These findings confirm the importance of brain-heart interaction in the development of this process. Microcirculatory constriction is also proposed as an underlying mechanism.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is often challenging due to the similarity with ACS. Coronary angiography with left ventriculography is considered the gold standard diagnostic tool. The InterTAK (international takotsubo) Diagnostic Criteria have been developed to improve diagnosis and include the following: 1) transient left ventricular dysfunction presenting as either apical, midventricular, basal or focal wall motion abnormalities with possible right ventricular involvement, 2) a preceding emotional, physical, or combined trigger (although not obligatory), 3) neurological disorders can be possible triggers, 4) presence of new ECG abnormalities (ST-segment elevation or depression, T-wave inversion, or QTc prolongation), 5) elevated cardiac markers (especially brain natriuretic peptide), 6) significant coronary artery disease can coexist, 7) absence of myocarditis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include AMI, myocarditis, spontaneous coronary artery dissection, or peripartum cardiomyopathy.", "management_and_treatment": "Due to difficulty in distinguishing TTS from ACS, patients should be transferred to a chest pain unit upon presentation and receive guideline based treatment of ACS. There are no randomized clinical trials to support specific acute or long term treatment recommendations in TTS. However, the consensus statement from an international TTS expert panel provides recommendations for optimal treatment of TTS patients. Electrocardiogram monitoring is essential as a prolonged QT-interval may trigger malignant ventricular arrhythmias (torsades de pointes) or atrioventricular-block. Cardiogenic shock or post cardiac arrest requires intensive care with treatment according to the presence or absence of pulmonary edema, low left ventricular ejection fraction, hypotension and bradycardia. In all cases, inotropic substances should be avoided. For long term treatment, angiotensin converting-enzyme inhibitors (ACEi) or angiotensin II receptor blockers (ARB) are recommended as they are associated with improved survival and lower recurrence rates. Echocardiography should be performed during the acute phase to exclude right ventricular involvement, left ventricular outflow tract obstruction or intraventricular thrombus. A follow-up echocardiography should be performed after discharge to confirm recovery.", "prognosis": "The spectrum of TTS is wide and ranges from low to very high risk. In-hospital mortality and long-term outcome in TTS are similar compared to ACS. Recovery of the left ventricular regional systolic dysfunction is usually observed after 4-8 weeks. The risk of recurrence is around 5%."}, {"name": "Stress-Polyzyth\u00e4mie", "sub_name": "Gaisb\u00f6ck-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Stress-Erythrozytose, Stress-Polyzyth\u00e4mie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D75.1", "UMLS": "C0541719\u00a0 C2242785", "MedDRA": "10042217\u00a0 10053885", "summary": "Das Gaisb\u00f6ck-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch eine sekund\u00e4re Polyzyth\u00e4mie. Es tritt \u00fcberwiegend bei M\u00e4nnern mit sitzender Lebensweise und regelm\u00e4\u00dfig hochkalorischer Kost auf. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Das klinische Bild besteht aus leichter Adipositas, Bluthochdruck und vermindertem Plasmavolumen mit relativer Zunahme von H\u00e4matokrit, Blutviskosit\u00e4t und Serumbestandteilen (Cholesterin, Triglyzeride, Harns\u00e4ure). Ursache der Reduktion des Plasmavolumens scheint eine Erh\u00f6hung des diastolischen Blutdrucks zu sein. Die Prognose ist bei kardiovaskul\u00e4ren Komplikationen eingeschr\u00e4nkt. "}, {"name": "Striatale Nekrose, bilaterale infantile, sporadische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sporadic infantile bilateral necrosis is the sporadic form of infantile bilateral striatal necrosis (IBSN; see this term), a syndrome of bilateral symmetric spongy degeneration of the caudate nucleaus, putamen and globus pallidus characterized by developmental regression, choreoathetosis and dystonia progressing to spastic quadriparesis.", "synonyms": "ABSN, Acute bilateral striatal necrosis, Sporadic IBSN, Sporadic infantile striatonigral degeneration, Sporadic infantile striatonigral necrosis, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G23.2", "epidemiology": "Prevalence has been estimated at 1-9/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "Sporadic IBSN can occur any time from the neonatal period through childhood and even in adolescence. Clinical features include choreoathetosis, dystonia, rigidity, spasticity, dysphagia, optic atrophy, intellectual deficit, developmental regression of motor and verbal skills, failure to thrive, myoclonus, quadriparesis, cerebellar ataxia and nystagmus.", "etiology": "The disease is associated with abrupt neurologic dysfunction following an acute systemic febrile illness such as a mycoplasma, measles or streptococcus infection.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical observation of choreoathetoid movements of the face, trunk and extremities and evidence of basal ganglia degeneration on CT and MRI images.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Wilson's disease, acute disseminated encephalomyelitis, neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation, Leigh disease, juvenile Huntington chorea, methylmalonic aciduria, guanidinoacetate methyltransferase deficiency, glutaric acidemia I (see these terms), carbon monoxide intoxication, small vessel arteritis and trauma.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is based on treatment of the causal infection.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable, with either gradual improvement in symptoms and complete recovery, observed after recovery from the infection, or severe neurological sequelae."}, {"name": "Striatale Nekrose, infantile", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Infantile bilateral striatal necrosis (IBSN) comprises several syndromes of bilateral symmetric spongy degeneration of the caudate nucleaus, putamen and globus pallidus characterized by developmental regression, choreoathetosis and dystonia progressing to spastic quadriparesis. IBSN can be familial or sporadic (see these terms).", "synonyms": "IBSN, Infantile striatonigral degeneration, Infantile striatonigral necrosis, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Mitochondrial inheritance\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G23.2", "omim": "271930\u00a0 500003", "umls": "C0795996", "gard": "5040", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of the sporadic form has been estimated at 1-9/1,000,000 and prevalence of the familial form has been estimated at less than 1/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "The age of onset of familial IBSN varies between 7 months and 15 months, whereas sporadic IBSN can occur any time from the neonatal period through childhood and even in adolescence. Clinical features include choreoathetosis, dystonia, rigidity, spasticity, dysphagia, optic atrophy, intellectual deficit, developmental regression of motor and verbal skills, failure to thrive, myoclonus, quadriparesis, cerebellar ataxia and nystagmus. The familial form has an insidious onset and a slowly progressive downhill course, while the sporadic form is associated with abrupt neurologic dysfunction following an acute systemic febrile illness such as a mycoplasma, measles or streptococcus infection.", "etiology": "Autosomal recessive IBSN is caused by mutation in the NUP62 gene (19q13.33) and mitochondrial IBSN is caused by mutation in the ATP synthase-6 gene (MTATP6).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical observation of choreoathetoid movements of the face, trunk and extremities and evidence of basal ganglia degeneration on CT and MRI images.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Wilson's disease, acute disseminated encephalomyelitis, neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation, Leigh disease, juvenile Huntington chorea, methylmalonic aciduria, guanidinoacetate methyltransferase deficiency, glutaric acidemia I (see these terms), carbon monoxide intoxication, small vessel arteritis and trauma.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis and genetic counseling is offered to families of affected patients.", "genetic_counseling": "Familial IBSN can be inherited as an autosomal recessive or mitochondrial disorder.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no standard therapy for familial IBSN. Treatment with oral biotin has been observed to slow disease progress initially. Treatment for the sporadic form is based on treatment of the causal infection.", "prognosis": "Prognosis for the familial form is usually poor with patients progressing to spastic quadriparesis followed by death, usually due to infection. For the sporadic form, prognosis is variable, with either gradual improvement in symptoms and complete recovery, observed after recovery from the infection, or severe neurological sequelae."}, {"name": "Striatale Nekrose, infantile famili\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial infantile bilateral striatal necrosis is the familial form of infantile bilateral striatal necrosis (IBSN; see this term), a syndrome of bilateral symmetric spongy degeneration of the caudate nucleaus, putamen and globus pallidus characterized by developmental regression, choreoathetosis and dystonia progressing to spastic quadriparesis.", "synonyms": "Familial IBSN, Familial infantile striatonigral degeneration, Familial infantile striatonigral necrosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Mitochondrial inheritance\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G23.2", "omim": "271930\u00a0 500003", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of familial IBSN has been estimated at less than 1/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "The age of onset varies between 7 months and 15 months. Clinical features include choreoathetosis, dystonia, rigidity, spasticity, dysphagia, optic atrophy, intellectual deficit, developmental regression of motor and verbal skills, failure to thrive, myoclonus, quadriparesis, cerebellar ataxia and nystagmus. The disease has an insidious onset and a slowly progressive downhill course.", "etiology": "Autosomal recessive infantile striatonigral degeneration is caused by mutation in the NUP62 gene (19q13.33) and mitochondrial infantile striatonigral degeneration is caused by mutation in the ATP synthase-6 gene (MTATP6).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical observation of choreoathetoid movements of the face, trunk and extremities and evidence of basal ganglia degeneration on CT and MRI images.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Wilson's disease, acute disseminated encephalomyelitis, neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation, Leigh disease, juvenile Huntington chorea, methylmalonic aciduria, guanidinoacetate methyltransferase deficiency, glutaric acidemia I (see these terms), carbon monoxide intoxication, small vessel arteritis and trauma.", "genetic_counseling": "Antenatal diagnosis and genetic counseling is offered to families of affected patients.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no standard therapy for familial IBSN. Treatment with oral biotin has been observed to slow disease progress initially.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is usually poor with patients progressing to spastic quadriparesis followed by death, usually due to infection."}, {"name": "Striatonigrale Nekrose, infantile famili\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Striatale Nekrose, infantile famili\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial infantile bilateral striatal necrosis is the familial form of infantile bilateral striatal necrosis (IBSN; see this term), a syndrome of bilateral symmetric spongy degeneration of the caudate nucleaus, putamen and globus pallidus characterized by developmental regression, choreoathetosis and dystonia progressing to spastic quadriparesis.", "synonyms": "Familial IBSN, Familial infantile striatonigral degeneration, Familial infantile striatonigral necrosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Mitochondrial inheritance\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G23.2", "omim": "271930\u00a0 500003", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of familial IBSN has been estimated at less than 1/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "The age of onset varies between 7 months and 15 months. Clinical features include choreoathetosis, dystonia, rigidity, spasticity, dysphagia, optic atrophy, intellectual deficit, developmental regression of motor and verbal skills, failure to thrive, myoclonus, quadriparesis, cerebellar ataxia and nystagmus. The disease has an insidious onset and a slowly progressive downhill course.", "etiology": "Autosomal recessive infantile striatonigral degeneration is caused by mutation in the NUP62 gene (19q13.33) and mitochondrial infantile striatonigral degeneration is caused by mutation in the ATP synthase-6 gene (MTATP6).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical observation of choreoathetoid movements of the face, trunk and extremities and evidence of basal ganglia degeneration on CT and MRI images.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Wilson's disease, acute disseminated encephalomyelitis, neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation, Leigh disease, juvenile Huntington chorea, methylmalonic aciduria, guanidinoacetate methyltransferase deficiency, glutaric acidemia I (see these terms), carbon monoxide intoxication, small vessel arteritis and trauma.", "genetic_counseling": "Antenatal diagnosis and genetic counseling is offered to families of affected patients.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no standard therapy for familial IBSN. Treatment with oral biotin has been observed to slow disease progress initially.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is usually poor with patients progressing to spastic quadriparesis followed by death, usually due to infection."}, {"name": "Striatonigrale Nekrose, infantile sporadische", "sub_name": "Striatale Nekrose, bilaterale infantile, sporadische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sporadic infantile bilateral necrosis is the sporadic form of infantile bilateral striatal necrosis (IBSN; see this term), a syndrome of bilateral symmetric spongy degeneration of the caudate nucleaus, putamen and globus pallidus characterized by developmental regression, choreoathetosis and dystonia progressing to spastic quadriparesis.", "synonyms": "ABSN, Acute bilateral striatal necrosis, Sporadic IBSN, Sporadic infantile striatonigral degeneration, Sporadic infantile striatonigral necrosis, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G23.2", "epidemiology": "Prevalence has been estimated at 1-9/1,000,000.", "clinical_description": "Sporadic IBSN can occur any time from the neonatal period through childhood and even in adolescence. Clinical features include choreoathetosis, dystonia, rigidity, spasticity, dysphagia, optic atrophy, intellectual deficit, developmental regression of motor and verbal skills, failure to thrive, myoclonus, quadriparesis, cerebellar ataxia and nystagmus.", "etiology": "The disease is associated with abrupt neurologic dysfunction following an acute systemic febrile illness such as a mycoplasma, measles or streptococcus infection.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical observation of choreoathetoid movements of the face, trunk and extremities and evidence of basal ganglia degeneration on CT and MRI images.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include Wilson's disease, acute disseminated encephalomyelitis, neurodegeneration with brain iron accumulation, Leigh disease, juvenile Huntington chorea, methylmalonic aciduria, guanidinoacetate methyltransferase deficiency, glutaric acidemia I (see these terms), carbon monoxide intoxication, small vessel arteritis and trauma.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment is based on treatment of the causal infection.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is variable, with either gradual improvement in symptoms and complete recovery, observed after recovery from the infection, or severe neurological sequelae."}, {"name": "Striopallidodentate Kalzinose, bilaterale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Bilateral striopallidodentate calcinosis (BSPDC, also erroneously called Fahr disease) is characterized by the accumulation of calcium deposits in different brain regions, particularly the basal ganglia and dentate nucleus, and is often associated with neurodegeneration.", "synonyms": "BSPDC, Cerebrovascular ferrocalcinosis, Idiopathic basal ganglia calcification, PFBC, Primary familial brain calcification, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G23.8", "omim": "213600\u00a0 615007\u00a0 615483\u00a0 616413\u00a0 618824", "umls": "C0393590", "gard": "6406", "meddra": "10059626", "epidemiology": "The prevalence of BSPDC is not known, however it is very rare and fewer than 200 cases have been reported. BSPDC is more common in men (male:female ratio 2:1).", "clinical_description": "BSPCD can be asymptomatic. Symptomatic forms usually manifest in the fourth decade of life, whereas calcification may be found in the second decade. Patients present with progressive movement disorders, including parkinsonism, chorea, tremor, dystonia, athetosis and orofacial dyskinesia, ataxia and neuropsychiatric disorders including difficultly with concentration and memory, personality and/or behavior changes, and dementia. The first manifestations often include clumsiness, fatigability, unsteady gait, slow or slurred speech, dysphagia, involuntary movements or muscle cramping. Seizures occur frequently. Urinary incontinence may occur.", "etiology": "The causative gene or genes are not known. Linkage to chromosome 14q has been established in one family. Calcium is the major element deposited on the basal ganglia and accounts for the radiologic appearance of the disease. It is thought that the calcifications observed are a marker of the disease rather than a cause of the clinical symptoms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Single proton emission computed tomography (SPECT) reveals markedly decreased perfusion to the basal ganglia bilaterally with decreased perfusion to the cerebral cortices. Diagnosis is based on CT or MRI evidence of bilateral, almost symmetric, calcifications of one or more of the following areas: basal ganglia, dentate nuclei, thalamus and cerebral white matter. Diagnosis is further based on normal childhood growth and development and the absence of parathyroid or other known neurologic disorders. Electroencephalogram, nerve conduction studies, and pattern shift visual-evoked potentials studies are usually normal and brainstem auditory-evoked potentials may vary from normal to minor abnormalities.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include hypoparathyroidism and pseudohypoparathyroidism, which can usually be excluded by normal serum levels of parathyroid hormone, Kenny-Caffey syndrome type 1, neurodegeneration with iron accumulation, Cockayne syndrome and Aicardi-Gouti\u00e8res syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Genetic counseling may be offered.However, there is currently no possibility of antenatal diagnosis.", "genetic_counseling": "It can be familial or sporadic. Over 30 families with the familial form have been reported. The familial form of idiopathic basal ganglia calcification is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no specific treatment available. Treatment based on amelioration of manifestations, including pharmacologic treatment for anxiety, depression, obsessive-compulsive behaviors and dystonia, may be attempted.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is not fully understood due to a lack of longitudinal studies. However, while asymptomatic cases have been observed in individuals younger than 25 years old, it is possible that symptoms may appear with increasing age."}, {"name": "Stroma-Hornhautdystrophie, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Hornhautdystrophie, stromale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Als Stroma-Hornhautdystrophien wird eine Gruppe von seltenen, genetisch determinierten Hornhautdystrophien (CDs) mit L\u00e4sionen im Hornhautstroma und mit je nach Dystrophietyp unterschiedlichen Auswirkungen auf den Visus bezeichnet", "synonyms": "Stroma-Hornhautdystrophie, kongenitale, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H18.5", "UMLS": "C0038457", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Gruppe von Hornhautdystrophien ist nicht bekannt, aber alle sind selten.", "clinical_description": "Das Erkrankungsalter ist unterschiedlich. Elf Subtypen der Stroma-Hornhautdystrophie wurden identifiziert: Pr\u00e4-Descemet-CD, Netz-CD Typ I und Typ II, Granul\u00e4re CD Typ I und Typ II, Makul\u00e4re CD, Schnyder-CD, Kongenitale Stroma-CD, Fleckchen-CD, Posteriore amorphe CD und Zentrale wolkige Dystrophie von Fran\u00e7ois.", "etiology": "Wie die meisten Hornhautdystrophien sind die Stroma-Formen gr\u00f6\u00dftenteils genetisch determiniert. Als urs\u00e4chlich an den Stromal\u00e4sionen beteiligt wurden die folgenden Gene identifiziert: TGFBI (5q31), CHST6 (16q22), UBIAD1 (1p36.22), DCN (12q23) und PIKFYVE (2q34).", "genetic_counseling": "Mit Ausnahme der Makul\u00e4ren CD, die autosomal-rezessiv vererbt wird, wurde bei allen Subtypen autosomal-dominante Vererbung gefunden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz dieser Gruppe von Hornhautdystrophien ist nicht bekannt, aber alle sind selten."}, {"name": "Stromakeratitis, herpetische", "sub_name": "Herpes simplex-Stromakeratitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Herpes simplex (HSV)-Stromakeratitis ist eine infekti\u00f6se Augenerkrankung und tritt in nekrotisierender oder nicht-nekrotisierender Form auf. Ursache ist eine HSV-Infektion. Merkmale sind Nekrose des Korneastromas, Entz\u00fcndung, Ulzeration und Leukozyten-Infiltrate. In schweren F\u00e4llen perforiert die Kornea, die Patienten k\u00f6nnen erblinden.", "synonyms": "HSV-Stromakeratitis, Stromakeratitis, herpetische, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H16.3", "UMLS": "C1318020"}, {"name": "Stromasarkom des Corpus uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Stromasarkom, endometriales, ", "ICD-10": "C54.1", "UMLS": "C0206630", "MeSH": "D018203", "GARD": "6339", "MedDRA": "10057649", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Stromasarkom, endometriales", "sub_name": "Stromasarkom des Corpus uteri", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Stromasarkom, endometriales, ", "ICD-10": "C54.1", "UMLS": "C0206630", "MeSH": "D018203", "GARD": "6339", "MedDRA": "10057649", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Stroma-Tumor, gastrointestinaler", "german_description": "Die Gastro-intestinalen Stroma-Tumoren (GISTs) sind definiert als mesenchymale Tumoren des Magen-Darmtraktes, die das Proto-Onkogen CD117 exprimieren. Dieses Protein wird immun-histochemisch nachgewiesen. Die GISTs sind selten und machen etwa 1-3% aller Malignome des Magen-Darmtraktes aus. In diesem Bereich sind sie aber der h\u00e4ufigste mesenchymale Tumor. Weltweit gibt es keine Angaben \u00fcber die Pr\u00e4valenz. Eine bev\u00f6lkerungsweite Studie in Finnland ermittelte die j\u00e4hrliche Inzidenz zu etwa 10-20 :1.000.000. In den USA und in West-Schweden wurde eine Inzidenz von 6,8 bzw. 14,5 neue F\u00e4lle pro 1 Million Einwohner und Jahr festgestellt. M\u00e4nner waren etwas h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als Frauen. Unterschieden werden m\u00fcssen die GISTs von den Tumoren der glatten Muskulatur und von den neuralen Tumoren des Verdauungstraktes. Die klinischen Symptome h\u00e4ngen von Gr\u00f6\u00dfe und Ort des Tumors ab. Zu ihnen z\u00e4hlen akute oder chronische Blutungen, Darmverschlu\u00df, Perforation, ver\u00e4nderter Rhythmus der Darmaktivit\u00e4t, vages abdominelles Unwohlsein, Dysphagie und von au\u00dfen tastbare Gewebsmasse im Abdomen. Vermutlich leiten sich die GISTs von den interstitiellen Cajal-Zellen oder Vorl\u00e4ufern dieser Zellen her. Die Cajal-Zellen sind gastro-intestinale Schrittmacher und kontrollieren die Darmmotilit\u00e4t. Viele GISTs haben Mutationen im KIT-Proto-Onkogen, das f\u00fcr das c-KIT/CD117-Rezeptorprotein kodiert. Die Mutationen liegen meist im Exon 11, seltener in den Exons 9, 13 oder 17 und aktivieren das Gen konstitutiv. Einige GISTs haben Mutationen im PDGFRA-Gen, das f\u00fcr den Alpha-Rezeptor des Vor Beginn der Therapie m\u00fcssen die GISTs verl\u00e4\u00dflich diagnostiziert und von anderen mesenchymalen Tumoren des Gastrointestinatraktes differenziert werden. Thrombozyten-Wachstumsfaktors kodiert. Vor Beginn der Therapie m\u00fcssen die GISTs verl\u00e4sslich diagnostiziert und von anderen mesenchymalen Tumoren des Gastrointestinatraktes differenziert werden. Die vollst\u00e4ndige chirurgische Exzision ist f\u00fcr lokalisierte GISTs die Therapie der Wahl. Die Rolle der Strahlentherapie wird eingeschr\u00e4nkt durch die m\u00f6gliche Sch\u00e4digung der Tumorumgebung. Die Entdeckung, da\u00df der Tyrosinkinase-Inhibitor Imatinib-Mesylat (Glivec) bei GISTs wirksam ist, bedeutet f\u00fcr Patienten mit inoperablen oder metastasierten Tumoren einen therapeutischen Durchbruch. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Gastrointestinal stromal tumor (GIST) is the most common mesenchymal neoplasm of the gastrointestinal (GI) tract, typically presenting in adults over the age of 40 (mean age 63), and only rarely in children, in various regions of the GI tract, most commonly the stomach or small intestine but also less commonly in the esophagus, appendix, rectum and colon. GISTs can be asymptomatic or present with various non-specific signs, depending on the location and size of tumor, such as loss of appetite, anemia, weight loss, fatigue, abdominal discomfort or fullness, nausea, vomiting, as well as an abdominal mass, blood in stool, and intestinal obstruction. GISTs can also be seen in familial syndromes such as Carney triad and neurofibromatosis type 1.", "synonyms": "GIST, Gastrointestinal stromal sarcoma, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "C26.9", "omim": "175510\u00a0 606764", "umls": "C0238198\u00a0 C3179349", "mesh": "D046152", "gard": "8598", "meddra": "10051066"}, {"name": "Stromme-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome usually characterized by microcephaly, ocular anomalies such as microphthalmia, and apple-peel intestinal atresia. Facial dysmorphism is reported in some cases and may include narrow or sloped forehead, hypertelorism, microphthalmia, dysplastic, edematous deep-set eyes, short palpebral fissures, large or low set ears, broad nasal root, anteverted or broad nasal tip, long philtrum, micrognathia, thin upper vermillion, large mouth and skin tag on the cheek. Motor delay and intellectual disability have been reported. Heart, brain, craniofacial abnormalities, renal hypoplasia and other anomalies (e.g. lower limb edema, thrombocytopenia) are variably present. Rarely, cases without intestinal atresia, microcephaly or developmental delay can be found. Severe lethal cases have also been reported.", "synonyms": "Apple-peel intestinal atresia-ocular anomalies-microcephaly syndrome, Jejunal atresia-microcephaly-ocular anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q13.8", "omim": "243605"}, {"name": "Strongyloidiasis", "sub_name": "Strongyloidose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A parasitosis caused by the intestinal nematode Strongyloides stercoralis (round worm).", "synonyms": "Anguilluliasis, Anguillulosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B78.0\u00a0 B78.1\u00a0 B78.7\u00a0 B78.9", "umls": "C0038463\u00a0 C0085810", "mesh": "D013322", "gard": "8195", "meddra": "10042254", "epidemiology": "It affects between 30 and 60 millions people worldwide and is endemic to sub-tropical zones including Africa, the West Indies, Central and South America, the Indian Ocean region, South East Asia.", "clinical_description": "Acute infection is characterized by cutaneous manifestations such as serpiginous urticarial rash, cough, dyspnea, gastrointestinal symptoms (including pain and soft stools) and allergic manifestations; however over half of infected individuals remain asymptomatic. Strongyloides hyperinfection syndrome (SHS) may occur in patients with underlying illness such as HTLV1 infection or those undergoing corticosteroids or immunosuppressive treatment and often results in sepsis, shock, and acute respiratory distress syndrome. Respiratory, gastrointestinal, cutaneous, and neurologic symptoms are observed at variable frequencies, but the hallmark of SHS is the severity of organ failure requiring ICU admission.", "etiology": "The female nematodes, which measure 2.5 mm in length, live in the small intestine of humans. Eggs laid in the small intestine hatch to release larvae that are normally excreted in the feces. On damp ground, these larvae reach their infectious stage directly or after a phase of sexual reproduction. In this infectious form they can penetrate the skin directly. Evolution towards the infectious stage may also take place within the digestive system, explaining the long duration of parasitosis (more than 30 years) observed in some cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is made by serological test, agar plate culture or stool examination, the latter of which has low sensitivity and requires a minimum of three samples.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis may include ancylostomiasis and other causes of gastritis, enteritis, bronchitis, and dysentery.", "management_and_treatment": "Access to clean water, footwear, and sanitation is fundamental to preventing new cases of strongyloidiasis. The treatment of choice is ivermectin. Disseminated infections may require intensive care.", "prognosis": "Lifelong infection is possible if left untreated. Most patients remain asymptomatic even with chronic disease, but prognosis depends on development of complications. Disseminated infection is fatal in 60-70% of cases."}, {"name": "Strongyloidose", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A parasitosis caused by the intestinal nematode Strongyloides stercoralis (round worm).", "synonyms": "Anguilluliasis, Anguillulosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "B78.0\u00a0 B78.1\u00a0 B78.7\u00a0 B78.9", "umls": "C0038463\u00a0 C0085810", "mesh": "D013322", "gard": "8195", "meddra": "10042254", "epidemiology": "It affects between 30 and 60 millions people worldwide and is endemic to sub-tropical zones including Africa, the West Indies, Central and South America, the Indian Ocean region, South East Asia.", "clinical_description": "Acute infection is characterized by cutaneous manifestations such as serpiginous urticarial rash, cough, dyspnea, gastrointestinal symptoms (including pain and soft stools) and allergic manifestations; however over half of infected individuals remain asymptomatic. Strongyloides hyperinfection syndrome (SHS) may occur in patients with underlying illness such as HTLV1 infection or those undergoing corticosteroids or immunosuppressive treatment and often results in sepsis, shock, and acute respiratory distress syndrome. Respiratory, gastrointestinal, cutaneous, and neurologic symptoms are observed at variable frequencies, but the hallmark of SHS is the severity of organ failure requiring ICU admission.", "etiology": "The female nematodes, which measure 2.5 mm in length, live in the small intestine of humans. Eggs laid in the small intestine hatch to release larvae that are normally excreted in the feces. On damp ground, these larvae reach their infectious stage directly or after a phase of sexual reproduction. In this infectious form they can penetrate the skin directly. Evolution towards the infectious stage may also take place within the digestive system, explaining the long duration of parasitosis (more than 30 years) observed in some cases.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is made by serological test, agar plate culture or stool examination, the latter of which has low sensitivity and requires a minimum of three samples.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis may include ancylostomiasis and other causes of gastritis, enteritis, bronchitis, and dysentery.", "management_and_treatment": "Access to clean water, footwear, and sanitation is fundamental to preventing new cases of strongyloidiasis. The treatment of choice is ivermectin. Disseminated infections may require intensive care.", "prognosis": "Lifelong infection is possible if left untreated. Most patients remain asymptomatic even with chronic disease, but prognosis depends on development of complications. Disseminated infection is fatal in 60-70% of cases."}, {"name": "Strukturelle Augenentwicklungsst\u00f6rung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Struma, mehrknotig - Nierenzysten - Polydaktylie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Multinodular goiter - cystic kidney - polydactyly syndrome is a very rare syndrome characterized by the association of multinodular goiter, cystic renal disease and digital anomalies.", "synonyms": "Daneman-Davy-Mancer syndrome, Thyroid-renal-digital anomalies, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "138790", "umls": "C1841853", "gard": "1671", "epidemiology": "It has been described in two sibs and one unrelated child.", "clinical_description": "The two sibs had digitalized thumbs and preaxial polydactyly, the third child had normal thumbs and postaxial polydactyly. Goiter and/or digitalized thumbs and/or polydactyly were present in other members of families.", "genetic_counseling": "This syndrome seems to be transmitted as an autosomal dominant trait with variable expression and incomplete penetrance."}, {"name": "Str\u00fcmpell-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Spastische Paraplegie, autosomal-dominante, Typ 3", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, pure or complex form of hereditary spastic paraplegia, with variable phenotype, typically characterized by childhood-onset of minimally progressive, bilateral, mainly symmetric lower limb spasticity and weakness, associated with pes cavus, scoliosis, sphincter disturbances and/or urinary bladder hyperactivity. Rare additional associated manifestations may include mild intellectual disability, axonal motor neuropathy, and seizures.", "synonyms": "Str\u00fcmpell disease, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adult", "icd_10": "G11.4", "omim": "182600", "umls": "C2931355", "mesh": "C536864", "gard": "5041"}, {"name": "Str\u00fcmpell-Lorrain-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Heredit\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine genetisch und klinisch heterogene Gruppe von langsam fortschreitenden neurologischen St\u00f6rungen. Die HSPs k\u00f6nnen in reine und komplexe Formen unterteilt werden. Die reine (unkomplizierte) Form ist gekennzeichnet durch pyramidale Zeichen (Schw\u00e4che, Spastizit\u00e4t, rege Sehnenreflexe und extensorische Plantarreflexe) vorwiegend an den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen m\u00f6glicherweise in Assoziation mit Sphinkterst\u00f6rungen und reduzierter Tiefensensibilit\u00e4t. Bei den komplexe Formen k\u00f6nnen dar\u00fcber hinaus variable neurologische oder nicht-neurologische Merkmale auftreten.", "synonyms": "Famili\u00e4re spastische Paraplegie, HSP, SPG, Spastische Spinalparalyse, heredit\u00e4re, Str\u00fcmpell-Lorrain-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G11.4", "UMLS": "C0037773\u00a0 C2931355", "GARD": "6637", "MedDRA": "10019903", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie (HSP) ist sehr unterschiedlich und liegt zwischen 1/11.000 und 77.000 in Europa.", "clinical_description": "Klinisch k\u00f6nnen HSPs in die reine und komplexe Form unterteilt werden. Reine HSPs sind durch langsam fortschreitende Spastik und Schw\u00e4che der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten, oft in Verbindung mit St\u00f6rungen des Harnverhaltens, und tiefgreifende sensorische Anomalien (Verminderung des Vibrationsempfindens der unteren Extremit\u00e4ten) gekennzeichnet. Komplexe Formen der HSP sind durch das Vorhandensein zus\u00e4tzlicher neurologischer oder nicht-neurologischer Merkmale gekennzeichnet. Die zus\u00e4tzlichen neurologische Merkmale umfassen zerebell\u00e4re Dysfunktion (Ataxie, Nystagmus, Tremor), axonale oder demyelinisierende periphere Neuropathie (sensorische und/oder motorische St\u00f6rungen), kognitive Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (dysexekutives Syndrom, Demenz), sensorische Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (optische, auditive Neuropathie), Epilepsie, myopathische Merkmale (Ptosis, Opthalmoparese), extrapyramidale Merkmale (Parkinsonismus, Chorea, Dystonie), psychiatrische St\u00f6rungen und Bildgebungsanomalien des Gehirns und der Wirbels\u00e4ule (Ver\u00e4nderungen der wei\u00dfen Substanz des Gehirns, d\u00fcnnes Corpus callosum, Eisenanreicherung im Gehirn, Kleinhirnatrophie), die auf einen genetischen Subtyp hinweisen k\u00f6nnen. Zu den nicht-neurologische Manifestationen geh\u00f6ren ophthalmologische Auff\u00e4lligkeiten (Katarakt, Retinitis pigmentosa, Makuladegeneration) und orthop\u00e4dische Anomalien (Skoliose, Gelenkverrenkungen und verschiedene Fu\u00dfdeformit\u00e4ten).", "etiology": "Die Krankheit beruht auf einer Funktionsst\u00f6rung der oberen motorischen Neuronen des kortikospinalen Trakts. Bis heute wurden mehr als 80 Gene beschrieben, die mit HSP assoziiert sind. Die kodierten Proteine sind an vielen Prozessen beteiligt, u. a. am axonalen Transport, an der Myelinisierung, am Endo-Membran-Trafficking, an Mitochondrienfunktionen, am komplexen Lipid- und Nukleotidstoffwechsel. Zu den h\u00e4ufigsten urs\u00e4chlichen Genen geh\u00f6ren SPAST (2p22.3), ATL1 (14q22.1), REEP1 (2p11.2) und KIF5A (12q.13 .3)SPG7 (16q24.3), SPG11  (15q21.1) und CYP7B1 (8q12.3) f\u00fcr autosomal-rezessive HSP-Typen. Eine signifikante Anzahl von Patienten bleibt jedoch auch nach systematischer Testung ohne genetische Diagnose.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den klinischen Symptomen, der neurologischen Untersuchung, dem progressiven Krankheitsverlauf, dem Vorliegen von Biomarkern, der MRT von Gehirn und Wirbels\u00e4ule, der Familienanamnese, der molekulargenetischen Untersuchung und dem Ausschluss der Differentialdiagnosen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Zu den Differentialdiagnosen geh\u00f6ren Multiple Sklerose, spinale Gef\u00e4\u00dfanomalien, Vitamin B12-Mangel, HTLVI-Infektion, prim\u00e4re Lateralsklerose, diplegische Zerebralparese, metabolische genetische Erkrankungen (Dopa-responsive Dystonie, Leukodystrophien, Hirnst\u00f6rungen, die mit einer Akkumulation von Metallen assoziiert sind).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannter Mutation in der Familie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die HSP wird \u00fcberwiegend autosomal-dominant, autosomal-rezessiv und seltener X-chromosomal-rezessiv oder mitochondrial vererbt. Es existieren mehrere autosomal-dominante und autosomal-rezessive Varianten f\u00fcr die Gene KIF1C (17p13.2), REEP2  (5q31.2), ALDH18A1  (10q24.1) und ERLIN2 (8p11.23). Die Gene SPAST (2p22.3), ATL1 (14q22.1), REEP1 (2p11.2) sind meist mit der reinen Form assoziiert, autosomal-rezessive Formen f\u00fchren oft zu komplizierteren Ph\u00e4notypen, w\u00e4hrend einige Gene mit beiden Ph\u00e4notypen assoziiert sind. Hohe intrafamili\u00e4re Variabilit\u00e4t und unvollst\u00e4ndige Penetranz sind h\u00e4ufig.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfolgt symptomatisch mit Physiotherapie, Medikamenten gegen Spastizit\u00e4t (Baclofen, Tizanidin, Diazepam, Botulinumtoxin) und Orthesen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose h\u00e4ngt vom Ph\u00e4notyp (reine/komplexe Form) und Genotyp ab und ist aufgrund der unvollst\u00e4ndigen Penetranz und der variablen Genexpression sehr variabel.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der heredit\u00e4ren spastischen Paraplegie (HSP) ist sehr unterschiedlich und liegt zwischen 1/11.000 und 77.000 in Europa."}, {"name": "STT3A-CDG", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "STT3A-CDG is a form of congenital disorders of N-linked glycosylation characterized by developmental delay, intellectual disability, failure to thrive, hypotonia and seizures. STT3A-CDG is caused by mutations in the gene STT3A (11q23.3).", "synonyms": "CDG syndrome type Iw, CDG-Iw, CDG1W, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type 1w, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type Iw, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "615596"}, {"name": "STT3B-CDG", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "STT3B-CDG is a form of congenital disorders of N-linked glycosylation characterized by intrauterine growth retardation, microcephaly, failure to thrive, developmental delay, intellectual disability, hypotonia, seizures, optic nerve atrophy and respiratory difficulties. Genital abnormalities (micropenis, hypoplastic scrotum, undescended testes) have also been reported. STT3B-CDG is caused by mutations in the gene STT3B (3p24.1).", "synonyms": "CDG syndrome type Ix, CDG-Ix, CDG1X, Carbohydrate deficient glycoprotein syndrome type Ix, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type 1x, Congenital disorder of glycosylation type Ix, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E77.8", "omim": "615597", "umls": "C2931007"}, {"name": "Stuart-Faktor-Mangel, kongenitaler", "sub_name": "Faktor X-Mangel, kongenitaler", "german_description": "Der Kongenitale Faktor X-Mangel ist eine erbliche Blutungsneigung mit Verminderung des Spiegels und/oder der Aktivit\u00e4t des Faktors X (FX). Kennzeichen dieses Mangels sind leichte bis schwere Blutungsereignisse. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der homozygoten Form wird aud 1:500.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich betroffen. Der Kongenitale FX-Mangel kann in jedem Alter manifest werden, schwere Formen allgemein schon im fr\u00fchen Leben. Symptome sind schwere Nabelstumpfblutungen, rezidivierendes Nasenbluten, Weichteilblutungen, Menorrhagie, leicht ausl\u00f6sbare Hauteinblutungen, H\u00e4maturie, H\u00e4marthrosen und exzessive Blutungen w\u00e4hrend oder nach Operationen und Verletzungen. Heterozygote bleiben meist symptomfrei. Ursache des Kongenitalen FX-Mangels sind Mutationen im FX-Gen F10 (13q34). Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Der Schweregrad der Blutungen korreliert mit dem FX-Spiegel. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die Verl\u00e4ngerung der Prothombinzeit, der aktivierten partiellen Thromboplastinzeit und der Russel-Schlangengift-Zeit (PT, aPTT, RVVT) und der verminderte FX-Spiegel. Eine molekulare Testung ist m\u00f6glich, aber f\u00fcr die Sicherung der Diagnose nicht erforderlich. Differentialdiagnosen sind die Mangelzust\u00e4nde der Faktoren II, V, VII, VIII, IX, XI, XIII und der erworbene FX-Mangel (Amyloidose) (s. diese Termini). H\u00e4morrhagische Episoden werden in der Regel mit Prothrombin-Komplex-Konzentraten (PCCs) behandelt, oder, wenn diese nicht verf\u00fcgbar sind, mit frisch gefrorenem Plasma. Bei korrekter Diagnose und ad\u00e4quater Behandlung ist die Prognose gut. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare inherited bleeding disorder with a decreased antigen and/or activity of factor X (FX) and characterized by mild to severe bleeding symptoms.", "synonyms": "Congenital Stuart factor deficiency, Stuart-Prower factor deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D68.2", "omim": "227600", "umls": "C0015519", "gard": "6404", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of homozygous forms is estimated at 1/1 000 000. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "Congenital FX deficiency manifests at any age but in general, severe forms of the disease manifest early in life. Patients may experience severe umbilical cord stump bleeding, recurrent epistaxis, soft-tissue hemorrhages, menorrhagia, easy bruising, intra cranial hemorrhages, hematuria, hemarthroses and excessive bleeding during or following surgery or delivery or trauma.", "etiology": "Inherited congenital FX deficiency is caused by mutations in the F10 gene (13q34) controlling the production of plasma FX. The severity of the bleeding manifestations correlates with the FX level.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on prolonged prothrombin, activated partial thromboplastin, and Russell viper venom times (PT, aPTT, RVVT), and on reduced levels of FX. Molecular testing is available, but unnecessary for diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include deficiencies of factors II, V, VII, VIII, IX, XI, XIII or acquired deficiencies in FX (amyloidosis).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy. Heterozygote patients most often remain asymptomatic.", "management_and_treatment": "Prothrombin Complex Concentrates (PCCs) or fresh frozen plasma (if PCCs are not available) are usually used to treat hemorrhagic episodes. A plasma-derived FX concentrate is now available.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good with early diagnosis and adequate treatment."}, {"name": "Stuart-Prower-Faktor-Mangel, kongenitaler", "sub_name": "Faktor X-Mangel, kongenitaler", "german_description": "Der Kongenitale Faktor X-Mangel ist eine erbliche Blutungsneigung mit Verminderung des Spiegels und/oder der Aktivit\u00e4t des Faktors X (FX). Kennzeichen dieses Mangels sind leichte bis schwere Blutungsereignisse. Die Pr\u00e4valenz der homozygoten Form wird aud 1:500.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich betroffen. Der Kongenitale FX-Mangel kann in jedem Alter manifest werden, schwere Formen allgemein schon im fr\u00fchen Leben. Symptome sind schwere Nabelstumpfblutungen, rezidivierendes Nasenbluten, Weichteilblutungen, Menorrhagie, leicht ausl\u00f6sbare Hauteinblutungen, H\u00e4maturie, H\u00e4marthrosen und exzessive Blutungen w\u00e4hrend oder nach Operationen und Verletzungen. Heterozygote bleiben meist symptomfrei. Ursache des Kongenitalen FX-Mangels sind Mutationen im FX-Gen F10 (13q34). Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Der Schweregrad der Blutungen korreliert mit dem FX-Spiegel. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die Verl\u00e4ngerung der Prothombinzeit, der aktivierten partiellen Thromboplastinzeit und der Russel-Schlangengift-Zeit (PT, aPTT, RVVT) und der verminderte FX-Spiegel. Eine molekulare Testung ist m\u00f6glich, aber f\u00fcr die Sicherung der Diagnose nicht erforderlich. Differentialdiagnosen sind die Mangelzust\u00e4nde der Faktoren II, V, VII, VIII, IX, XI, XIII und der erworbene FX-Mangel (Amyloidose) (s. diese Termini). H\u00e4morrhagische Episoden werden in der Regel mit Prothrombin-Komplex-Konzentraten (PCCs) behandelt, oder, wenn diese nicht verf\u00fcgbar sind, mit frisch gefrorenem Plasma. Bei korrekter Diagnose und ad\u00e4quater Behandlung ist die Prognose gut. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare inherited bleeding disorder with a decreased antigen and/or activity of factor X (FX) and characterized by mild to severe bleeding symptoms.", "synonyms": "Congenital Stuart factor deficiency, Stuart-Prower factor deficiency, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D68.2", "omim": "227600", "umls": "C0015519", "gard": "6404", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of homozygous forms is estimated at 1/1 000 000. Both sexes are equally affected.", "clinical_description": "Congenital FX deficiency manifests at any age but in general, severe forms of the disease manifest early in life. Patients may experience severe umbilical cord stump bleeding, recurrent epistaxis, soft-tissue hemorrhages, menorrhagia, easy bruising, intra cranial hemorrhages, hematuria, hemarthroses and excessive bleeding during or following surgery or delivery or trauma.", "etiology": "Inherited congenital FX deficiency is caused by mutations in the F10 gene (13q34) controlling the production of plasma FX. The severity of the bleeding manifestations correlates with the FX level.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on prolonged prothrombin, activated partial thromboplastin, and Russell viper venom times (PT, aPTT, RVVT), and on reduced levels of FX. Molecular testing is available, but unnecessary for diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include deficiencies of factors II, V, VII, VIII, IX, XI, XIII or acquired deficiencies in FX (amyloidosis).", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them of the 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy. Heterozygote patients most often remain asymptomatic.", "management_and_treatment": "Prothrombin Complex Concentrates (PCCs) or fresh frozen plasma (if PCCs are not available) are usually used to treat hemorrhagic episodes. A plasma-derived FX concentrate is now available.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is good with early diagnosis and adequate treatment."}, {"name": "Stuhlinkontinenz bei Ileum-pouch-anale Anastomose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "summary": "Es handelt sich bei diesem Eintrag um eine seltene Kondition, f\u00fcr dessen Behandlung ein Medikament mit europ\u00e4ischer und/oder amerikanischer Orphan-Drug-Designation existiert."}, {"name": "Stupor, idiopathischer rekurrenter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der idiopathische rezidivierende Stupor ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch eine unvorhersehbare, vor\u00fcbergehende und spontane, stunden- bis tagelange Reaktionsunf\u00e4higkeit mit einer H\u00e4ufigkeit von drei bis sieben Anf\u00e4llen pro Jahr gekennzeichnet ist, ohne dass leicht erkennbare toxische, metabolische oder strukturelle Ursachen vorliegen.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G93.8"}, {"name": "Sturge-Weber-Dimitri-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Sturge-Weber-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Geburtspr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf etwa 1/20.000 und 1/50.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital neurocutaneous syndrome defined by a facial capillary malformation or port-wine birthmark (PWB) associated with cerebral and ocular ipsilateral vascular malformations in most of the cases resulting in variable ocular and neurological complications.", "synonyms": "Encephalofacial angiomatosis, Encephalotrigeminal angiomatosis, SWS, Sturge-Weber-Dimitri syndrome, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe angiomatosis, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q85.8", "omim": "185300", "umls": "C0038505", "mesh": "D013341", "gard": "7706", "meddra": "10042265\u00a0 10057653", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence in Europe is estimated at around 1/20,000 to 1/50,000.", "clinical_description": "The facial port-wine birthmark is present at birth and covers the forehead and/or the upper eyelid (at risk zone). Glaucoma is the most common ocular complication, affecting 30 to 60% of patients with a risk of early visual impairment. Epilepsy is often the first neurological manifestation. Around 80% of patients develop seizures at a median age of 6 months. First seizures are usually focal motor. Drug resistant seizures are reported in up to 50% of patients and status epilepticus is commonly seen. Fever induced seizures are frequently reported. A pattern of seizure clustering followed by prolonged period of seizure freedom occurs in 40% of cases. The natural history is highly variable but typically marked by seizures in early childhood, stroke-like events, progressive hemiparesis and developmental impairment, glaucoma and visual field defects. Later manifestations include headaches, academic difficulties, behavioral and psychiatric disorders. An increased risk of growth hormone deficiency is reported.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by a somatic mosaic mutation in GNAQ (9q21) that codes for the protein guanine nucleotide-binding protein G(q) subunit alpha which is critical to the intracellular signaling of a large group of G protein coupled receptors important to vascular development and function. Mutations in GNAQ can also result in an isolated PWB phenotype. The phenotypic presentation is thought to be determined by the developmental time point at which the somatic mutation occurs.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected at birth in newborns presenting facial PWB in the at risk zone. The risk of cerebral involvement in such situation ranges between 15 and 40%. Diagnosis can be confirmed by a contrast-enhanced cerebral magnetic resonance imaging showing direct (angioma) and indirect (enlargement of choroid plexus unilaterally) radiological signs of the leptomeningeal angioma. A computer tomography scan can help diagnosis showing localized calcifications and atrophy, although they might develop later during the course of the disease. Electroencephalogram (EEG) recording can show decreased amplitude of the EEG signal on the side of brain involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main diagnostic concern is to separate infants with an isolated facial PWB from those with Sturge-Weber syndrome (SWS) brain involvement. Differential diagnosis includes PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndromes, especially megalencephaly-capillary malformation-polymicrogyria (MCAP) syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal ultrasounds are usually normal.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease is sporadic and due to somatic mutations.", "management_and_treatment": "A multidisciplinary approach is needed from onset to monitor disease progression in the skin, eye, and brain. Laser treatment is proposed in infancy to reduce the PWS. Regular ocular monitoring is recommended throughout life. Eye drops are used to lower intraocular pressure but surgical interventions may be required. Parental education for early seizure recognition and individualized emergency plans including the use of rescue benzodiazepine therapy is recommended. Low-dose aspirin might be useful to prevent the stroke-like episodes and possibly seizures but the risk-benefit ratio of such approach is not well established. Antiseizure medications are used to treat epilepsy. Patients with focal drug-resistant seizures should be considered early for pre-surgical evaluation at a reference center. Neuropsychological assessments and rehabilitation are needed and physiotherapy is required for functional deficits.", "prognosis": "The prognosis of SWS is highly variable. Early seizure onset, drug-resistant seizures and bilateral intracranial involvement have been associated with poor cognitive outcomes."}, {"name": "Sturge-Weber-Krabbe Angiomatose", "sub_name": "Sturge-Weber-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Geburtspr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf etwa 1/20.000 und 1/50.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital neurocutaneous syndrome defined by a facial capillary malformation or port-wine birthmark (PWB) associated with cerebral and ocular ipsilateral vascular malformations in most of the cases resulting in variable ocular and neurological complications.", "synonyms": "Encephalofacial angiomatosis, Encephalotrigeminal angiomatosis, SWS, Sturge-Weber-Dimitri syndrome, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe angiomatosis, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q85.8", "omim": "185300", "umls": "C0038505", "mesh": "D013341", "gard": "7706", "meddra": "10042265\u00a0 10057653", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence in Europe is estimated at around 1/20,000 to 1/50,000.", "clinical_description": "The facial port-wine birthmark is present at birth and covers the forehead and/or the upper eyelid (at risk zone). Glaucoma is the most common ocular complication, affecting 30 to 60% of patients with a risk of early visual impairment. Epilepsy is often the first neurological manifestation. Around 80% of patients develop seizures at a median age of 6 months. First seizures are usually focal motor. Drug resistant seizures are reported in up to 50% of patients and status epilepticus is commonly seen. Fever induced seizures are frequently reported. A pattern of seizure clustering followed by prolonged period of seizure freedom occurs in 40% of cases. The natural history is highly variable but typically marked by seizures in early childhood, stroke-like events, progressive hemiparesis and developmental impairment, glaucoma and visual field defects. Later manifestations include headaches, academic difficulties, behavioral and psychiatric disorders. An increased risk of growth hormone deficiency is reported.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by a somatic mosaic mutation in GNAQ (9q21) that codes for the protein guanine nucleotide-binding protein G(q) subunit alpha which is critical to the intracellular signaling of a large group of G protein coupled receptors important to vascular development and function. Mutations in GNAQ can also result in an isolated PWB phenotype. The phenotypic presentation is thought to be determined by the developmental time point at which the somatic mutation occurs.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected at birth in newborns presenting facial PWB in the at risk zone. The risk of cerebral involvement in such situation ranges between 15 and 40%. Diagnosis can be confirmed by a contrast-enhanced cerebral magnetic resonance imaging showing direct (angioma) and indirect (enlargement of choroid plexus unilaterally) radiological signs of the leptomeningeal angioma. A computer tomography scan can help diagnosis showing localized calcifications and atrophy, although they might develop later during the course of the disease. Electroencephalogram (EEG) recording can show decreased amplitude of the EEG signal on the side of brain involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main diagnostic concern is to separate infants with an isolated facial PWB from those with Sturge-Weber syndrome (SWS) brain involvement. Differential diagnosis includes PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndromes, especially megalencephaly-capillary malformation-polymicrogyria (MCAP) syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal ultrasounds are usually normal.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease is sporadic and due to somatic mutations.", "management_and_treatment": "A multidisciplinary approach is needed from onset to monitor disease progression in the skin, eye, and brain. Laser treatment is proposed in infancy to reduce the PWS. Regular ocular monitoring is recommended throughout life. Eye drops are used to lower intraocular pressure but surgical interventions may be required. Parental education for early seizure recognition and individualized emergency plans including the use of rescue benzodiazepine therapy is recommended. Low-dose aspirin might be useful to prevent the stroke-like episodes and possibly seizures but the risk-benefit ratio of such approach is not well established. Antiseizure medications are used to treat epilepsy. Patients with focal drug-resistant seizures should be considered early for pre-surgical evaluation at a reference center. Neuropsychological assessments and rehabilitation are needed and physiotherapy is required for functional deficits.", "prognosis": "The prognosis of SWS is highly variable. Early seizure onset, drug-resistant seizures and bilateral intracranial involvement have been associated with poor cognitive outcomes."}, {"name": "Sturge-Weber-Krabbe-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Sturge-Weber-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Geburtspr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf etwa 1/20.000 und 1/50.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital neurocutaneous syndrome defined by a facial capillary malformation or port-wine birthmark (PWB) associated with cerebral and ocular ipsilateral vascular malformations in most of the cases resulting in variable ocular and neurological complications.", "synonyms": "Encephalofacial angiomatosis, Encephalotrigeminal angiomatosis, SWS, Sturge-Weber-Dimitri syndrome, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe angiomatosis, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q85.8", "omim": "185300", "umls": "C0038505", "mesh": "D013341", "gard": "7706", "meddra": "10042265\u00a0 10057653", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence in Europe is estimated at around 1/20,000 to 1/50,000.", "clinical_description": "The facial port-wine birthmark is present at birth and covers the forehead and/or the upper eyelid (at risk zone). Glaucoma is the most common ocular complication, affecting 30 to 60% of patients with a risk of early visual impairment. Epilepsy is often the first neurological manifestation. Around 80% of patients develop seizures at a median age of 6 months. First seizures are usually focal motor. Drug resistant seizures are reported in up to 50% of patients and status epilepticus is commonly seen. Fever induced seizures are frequently reported. A pattern of seizure clustering followed by prolonged period of seizure freedom occurs in 40% of cases. The natural history is highly variable but typically marked by seizures in early childhood, stroke-like events, progressive hemiparesis and developmental impairment, glaucoma and visual field defects. Later manifestations include headaches, academic difficulties, behavioral and psychiatric disorders. An increased risk of growth hormone deficiency is reported.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by a somatic mosaic mutation in GNAQ (9q21) that codes for the protein guanine nucleotide-binding protein G(q) subunit alpha which is critical to the intracellular signaling of a large group of G protein coupled receptors important to vascular development and function. Mutations in GNAQ can also result in an isolated PWB phenotype. The phenotypic presentation is thought to be determined by the developmental time point at which the somatic mutation occurs.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected at birth in newborns presenting facial PWB in the at risk zone. The risk of cerebral involvement in such situation ranges between 15 and 40%. Diagnosis can be confirmed by a contrast-enhanced cerebral magnetic resonance imaging showing direct (angioma) and indirect (enlargement of choroid plexus unilaterally) radiological signs of the leptomeningeal angioma. A computer tomography scan can help diagnosis showing localized calcifications and atrophy, although they might develop later during the course of the disease. Electroencephalogram (EEG) recording can show decreased amplitude of the EEG signal on the side of brain involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main diagnostic concern is to separate infants with an isolated facial PWB from those with Sturge-Weber syndrome (SWS) brain involvement. Differential diagnosis includes PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndromes, especially megalencephaly-capillary malformation-polymicrogyria (MCAP) syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal ultrasounds are usually normal.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease is sporadic and due to somatic mutations.", "management_and_treatment": "A multidisciplinary approach is needed from onset to monitor disease progression in the skin, eye, and brain. Laser treatment is proposed in infancy to reduce the PWS. Regular ocular monitoring is recommended throughout life. Eye drops are used to lower intraocular pressure but surgical interventions may be required. Parental education for early seizure recognition and individualized emergency plans including the use of rescue benzodiazepine therapy is recommended. Low-dose aspirin might be useful to prevent the stroke-like episodes and possibly seizures but the risk-benefit ratio of such approach is not well established. Antiseizure medications are used to treat epilepsy. Patients with focal drug-resistant seizures should be considered early for pre-surgical evaluation at a reference center. Neuropsychological assessments and rehabilitation are needed and physiotherapy is required for functional deficits.", "prognosis": "The prognosis of SWS is highly variable. Early seizure onset, drug-resistant seizures and bilateral intracranial involvement have been associated with poor cognitive outcomes."}, {"name": "Sturge-Weber-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Geburtspr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf etwa 1/20.000 und 1/50.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital neurocutaneous syndrome defined by a facial capillary malformation or port-wine birthmark (PWB) associated with cerebral and ocular ipsilateral vascular malformations in most of the cases resulting in variable ocular and neurological complications.", "synonyms": "Encephalofacial angiomatosis, Encephalotrigeminal angiomatosis, SWS, Sturge-Weber-Dimitri syndrome, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe angiomatosis, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q85.8", "omim": "185300", "umls": "C0038505", "mesh": "D013341", "gard": "7706", "meddra": "10042265\u00a0 10057653", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence in Europe is estimated at around 1/20,000 to 1/50,000.", "clinical_description": "The facial port-wine birthmark is present at birth and covers the forehead and/or the upper eyelid (at risk zone). Glaucoma is the most common ocular complication, affecting 30 to 60% of patients with a risk of early visual impairment. Epilepsy is often the first neurological manifestation. Around 80% of patients develop seizures at a median age of 6 months. First seizures are usually focal motor. Drug resistant seizures are reported in up to 50% of patients and status epilepticus is commonly seen. Fever induced seizures are frequently reported. A pattern of seizure clustering followed by prolonged period of seizure freedom occurs in 40% of cases. The natural history is highly variable but typically marked by seizures in early childhood, stroke-like events, progressive hemiparesis and developmental impairment, glaucoma and visual field defects. Later manifestations include headaches, academic difficulties, behavioral and psychiatric disorders. An increased risk of growth hormone deficiency is reported.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by a somatic mosaic mutation in GNAQ (9q21) that codes for the protein guanine nucleotide-binding protein G(q) subunit alpha which is critical to the intracellular signaling of a large group of G protein coupled receptors important to vascular development and function. Mutations in GNAQ can also result in an isolated PWB phenotype. The phenotypic presentation is thought to be determined by the developmental time point at which the somatic mutation occurs.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected at birth in newborns presenting facial PWB in the at risk zone. The risk of cerebral involvement in such situation ranges between 15 and 40%. Diagnosis can be confirmed by a contrast-enhanced cerebral magnetic resonance imaging showing direct (angioma) and indirect (enlargement of choroid plexus unilaterally) radiological signs of the leptomeningeal angioma. A computer tomography scan can help diagnosis showing localized calcifications and atrophy, although they might develop later during the course of the disease. Electroencephalogram (EEG) recording can show decreased amplitude of the EEG signal on the side of brain involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main diagnostic concern is to separate infants with an isolated facial PWB from those with Sturge-Weber syndrome (SWS) brain involvement. Differential diagnosis includes PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndromes, especially megalencephaly-capillary malformation-polymicrogyria (MCAP) syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal ultrasounds are usually normal.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease is sporadic and due to somatic mutations.", "management_and_treatment": "A multidisciplinary approach is needed from onset to monitor disease progression in the skin, eye, and brain. Laser treatment is proposed in infancy to reduce the PWS. Regular ocular monitoring is recommended throughout life. Eye drops are used to lower intraocular pressure but surgical interventions may be required. Parental education for early seizure recognition and individualized emergency plans including the use of rescue benzodiazepine therapy is recommended. Low-dose aspirin might be useful to prevent the stroke-like episodes and possibly seizures but the risk-benefit ratio of such approach is not well established. Antiseizure medications are used to treat epilepsy. Patients with focal drug-resistant seizures should be considered early for pre-surgical evaluation at a reference center. Neuropsychological assessments and rehabilitation are needed and physiotherapy is required for functional deficits.", "prognosis": "The prognosis of SWS is highly variable. Early seizure onset, drug-resistant seizures and bilateral intracranial involvement have been associated with poor cognitive outcomes."}, {"name": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann Dysplasie", "sub_name": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom", "german_description": "SWS ist ein seltenes Syndrom und nur wenige Patienten wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben, aber die Krankheit ist in den Vereinigten Arabischen Emiraten relativ h\u00e4ufig, offenbar aufgrund einer hohen Anzahl von konsanguinen Verbindungen, mit einer berichteten Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 0,5/10.000 Geburten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann syndrome (SWS) is a rare autosomal recessive congenital primary skeletal dysplasia, characterized by small stature, bowing of the long bones, camptodactyly, hyperthermic episodes, respiratory distress/apneic episodes and feeding difficulties that usually lead to early mortality.", "synonyms": "Neonatal Schwartz-Jampel syndrome, SJS2, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 2, St\u00fcve-Wiedemann dysplasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "601559", "umls": "C0432240\u00a0 C0796176", "mesh": "C537502", "gard": "5045", "epidemiology": "SWS is a rare syndrome with few cases reported to date, but the disease is relatively common in the United Arab Emirates, apparently due to a high number of consanguineous unions, with a reported prevalence of approximately 0,5/10,000 births.", "clinical_description": "SWS is characterized by short stature, bowing of extremities that affect the lower limbs more than the upper limbs, camptodactyly, respiratory distress/apneic spells and hyperthermic episodes frequently associated with feeding/swallowing difficulties. Other clinical findings are mask-like face, pursed mouth, hypoplastic midface, osteopenia, congenital contractures and muscular hypotonia. The condition is fatal in most cases as a result of respiratory distress or hyperthermia. However, survival beyond one year have been reported in few cases, and patients develop severe spinal deformities, along with streaky osteoporosis and spontaneous fractures, bowing of the lower limbs (with prominent joints) and dysautonomia (including temperature instability, absent corneal and patellar reflexes, and smooth tongue). Motor development is generally delayed but no intellectual deficit has been reported.", "etiology": "SWS is due to missense or nonsense mutations in the leukemia inhibitory factor receptor (LIFR) gene (5p13.1). These null mutations lead to modifications in the stability of the LIFR transcripts, inhibiting synthesis of the LIFR protein and resulting in alterations in the JAK/STAT3 signaling pathway. In some patients diagnosed for SWS, LIFR mutations were not identified, suggesting that other genes may be involved in the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of SWS is mainly postnatal, based on clinical and radiological findings. Radiographic examination reveals bowed long bones with cortical thickening and rarefaction, wide metaphysis with decreased density and blurred margins, and abnormal trabecular pattern. Other features include flared iliac wings, hypoplasia of the lower ilia. Genetic molecular testing for LIFR mutation may be useful to confirm SWS diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Crisponi syndrome (cold-induced sweating syndrome) and other skeletal dysplasias, such as Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type IX, Campomelic dysplasia and autosomal dominant Larsen syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In some cases, ultrasound examination may be useful to predict the presence of SWS before birth. Prenatal symptoms can sometimes be seen in the late second- or third trimester and include oligohydramnios, intrauterine growth restriction despite normal Doppler findings about the umbilical artery, camptodactyly, bowing of the lower bones affecting the tibia more than the femur, and micromelia.", "genetic_counseling": "SWS is a congenital condition inherited as an autosomal recessive disorder.", "management_and_treatment": "To date, SWS management is only symptomatic and should include prevention of lung aspirations and chocking while eating (intubation, nasogastric tube feeding and/or gastrostomy often required during the first year of life), physiotherapy and/or surgery for bone malformations, eyes protection from damage to prevent visual loss, and osteopenia or osteoporosis treatment. Predisposition to hyperthermia necessitates caution during procedures requiring anesthesia.", "prognosis": "SWS is a life-threatening disease which is usually fatal during the neonatal period, due to respiratory distress or hyperthermic episode. However, more patients are surviving for longer (into and, in some cases, beyond adolescence), if diagnosed and monitored appropriately."}, {"name": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann/Schwartz-Jampel-Syndrom Typ 2", "sub_name": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom", "german_description": "SWS ist ein seltenes Syndrom und nur wenige Patienten wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben, aber die Krankheit ist in den Vereinigten Arabischen Emiraten relativ h\u00e4ufig, offenbar aufgrund einer hohen Anzahl von konsanguinen Verbindungen, mit einer berichteten Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 0,5/10.000 Geburten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann syndrome (SWS) is a rare autosomal recessive congenital primary skeletal dysplasia, characterized by small stature, bowing of the long bones, camptodactyly, hyperthermic episodes, respiratory distress/apneic episodes and feeding difficulties that usually lead to early mortality.", "synonyms": "Neonatal Schwartz-Jampel syndrome, SJS2, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 2, St\u00fcve-Wiedemann dysplasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "601559", "umls": "C0432240\u00a0 C0796176", "mesh": "C537502", "gard": "5045", "epidemiology": "SWS is a rare syndrome with few cases reported to date, but the disease is relatively common in the United Arab Emirates, apparently due to a high number of consanguineous unions, with a reported prevalence of approximately 0,5/10,000 births.", "clinical_description": "SWS is characterized by short stature, bowing of extremities that affect the lower limbs more than the upper limbs, camptodactyly, respiratory distress/apneic spells and hyperthermic episodes frequently associated with feeding/swallowing difficulties. Other clinical findings are mask-like face, pursed mouth, hypoplastic midface, osteopenia, congenital contractures and muscular hypotonia. The condition is fatal in most cases as a result of respiratory distress or hyperthermia. However, survival beyond one year have been reported in few cases, and patients develop severe spinal deformities, along with streaky osteoporosis and spontaneous fractures, bowing of the lower limbs (with prominent joints) and dysautonomia (including temperature instability, absent corneal and patellar reflexes, and smooth tongue). Motor development is generally delayed but no intellectual deficit has been reported.", "etiology": "SWS is due to missense or nonsense mutations in the leukemia inhibitory factor receptor (LIFR) gene (5p13.1). These null mutations lead to modifications in the stability of the LIFR transcripts, inhibiting synthesis of the LIFR protein and resulting in alterations in the JAK/STAT3 signaling pathway. In some patients diagnosed for SWS, LIFR mutations were not identified, suggesting that other genes may be involved in the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of SWS is mainly postnatal, based on clinical and radiological findings. Radiographic examination reveals bowed long bones with cortical thickening and rarefaction, wide metaphysis with decreased density and blurred margins, and abnormal trabecular pattern. Other features include flared iliac wings, hypoplasia of the lower ilia. Genetic molecular testing for LIFR mutation may be useful to confirm SWS diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Crisponi syndrome (cold-induced sweating syndrome) and other skeletal dysplasias, such as Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type IX, Campomelic dysplasia and autosomal dominant Larsen syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In some cases, ultrasound examination may be useful to predict the presence of SWS before birth. Prenatal symptoms can sometimes be seen in the late second- or third trimester and include oligohydramnios, intrauterine growth restriction despite normal Doppler findings about the umbilical artery, camptodactyly, bowing of the lower bones affecting the tibia more than the femur, and micromelia.", "genetic_counseling": "SWS is a congenital condition inherited as an autosomal recessive disorder.", "management_and_treatment": "To date, SWS management is only symptomatic and should include prevention of lung aspirations and chocking while eating (intubation, nasogastric tube feeding and/or gastrostomy often required during the first year of life), physiotherapy and/or surgery for bone malformations, eyes protection from damage to prevent visual loss, and osteopenia or osteoporosis treatment. Predisposition to hyperthermia necessitates caution during procedures requiring anesthesia.", "prognosis": "SWS is a life-threatening disease which is usually fatal during the neonatal period, due to respiratory distress or hyperthermic episode. However, more patients are surviving for longer (into and, in some cases, beyond adolescence), if diagnosed and monitored appropriately."}, {"name": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann-Syndrom", "german_description": "SWS ist ein seltenes Syndrom und nur wenige Patienten wurden bisher in der Literatur beschrieben, aber die Krankheit ist in den Vereinigten Arabischen Emiraten relativ h\u00e4ufig, offenbar aufgrund einer hohen Anzahl von konsanguinen Verbindungen, mit einer berichteten Pr\u00e4valenz von etwa 0,5/10.000 Geburten.", "english": 1, "defenition": "St\u00fcve-Wiedemann syndrome (SWS) is a rare autosomal recessive congenital primary skeletal dysplasia, characterized by small stature, bowing of the long bones, camptodactyly, hyperthermic episodes, respiratory distress/apneic episodes and feeding difficulties that usually lead to early mortality.", "synonyms": "Neonatal Schwartz-Jampel syndrome, SJS2, Schwartz-Jampel syndrome type 2, St\u00fcve-Wiedemann dysplasia, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "601559", "umls": "C0432240\u00a0 C0796176", "mesh": "C537502", "gard": "5045", "epidemiology": "SWS is a rare syndrome with few cases reported to date, but the disease is relatively common in the United Arab Emirates, apparently due to a high number of consanguineous unions, with a reported prevalence of approximately 0,5/10,000 births.", "clinical_description": "SWS is characterized by short stature, bowing of extremities that affect the lower limbs more than the upper limbs, camptodactyly, respiratory distress/apneic spells and hyperthermic episodes frequently associated with feeding/swallowing difficulties. Other clinical findings are mask-like face, pursed mouth, hypoplastic midface, osteopenia, congenital contractures and muscular hypotonia. The condition is fatal in most cases as a result of respiratory distress or hyperthermia. However, survival beyond one year have been reported in few cases, and patients develop severe spinal deformities, along with streaky osteoporosis and spontaneous fractures, bowing of the lower limbs (with prominent joints) and dysautonomia (including temperature instability, absent corneal and patellar reflexes, and smooth tongue). Motor development is generally delayed but no intellectual deficit has been reported.", "etiology": "SWS is due to missense or nonsense mutations in the leukemia inhibitory factor receptor (LIFR) gene (5p13.1). These null mutations lead to modifications in the stability of the LIFR transcripts, inhibiting synthesis of the LIFR protein and resulting in alterations in the JAK/STAT3 signaling pathway. In some patients diagnosed for SWS, LIFR mutations were not identified, suggesting that other genes may be involved in the disease.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis of SWS is mainly postnatal, based on clinical and radiological findings. Radiographic examination reveals bowed long bones with cortical thickening and rarefaction, wide metaphysis with decreased density and blurred margins, and abnormal trabecular pattern. Other features include flared iliac wings, hypoplasia of the lower ilia. Genetic molecular testing for LIFR mutation may be useful to confirm SWS diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Crisponi syndrome (cold-induced sweating syndrome) and other skeletal dysplasias, such as Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type IX, Campomelic dysplasia and autosomal dominant Larsen syndrome (see these terms).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In some cases, ultrasound examination may be useful to predict the presence of SWS before birth. Prenatal symptoms can sometimes be seen in the late second- or third trimester and include oligohydramnios, intrauterine growth restriction despite normal Doppler findings about the umbilical artery, camptodactyly, bowing of the lower bones affecting the tibia more than the femur, and micromelia.", "genetic_counseling": "SWS is a congenital condition inherited as an autosomal recessive disorder.", "management_and_treatment": "To date, SWS management is only symptomatic and should include prevention of lung aspirations and chocking while eating (intubation, nasogastric tube feeding and/or gastrostomy often required during the first year of life), physiotherapy and/or surgery for bone malformations, eyes protection from damage to prevent visual loss, and osteopenia or osteoporosis treatment. Predisposition to hyperthermia necessitates caution during procedures requiring anesthesia.", "prognosis": "SWS is a life-threatening disease which is usually fatal during the neonatal period, due to respiratory distress or hyperthermic episode. However, more patients are surviving for longer (into and, in some cases, beyond adolescence), if diagnosed and monitored appropriately."}, {"name": "STXBP1-abh\u00e4ngige Enzephalopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch bedingte neurologische St\u00f6rung, dessen ph\u00e4notypisches Spektrum eine schwere Intellektuelle Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, eine Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und in der Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle eine fr\u00fch einsetzende Epilepsie umfasst. Eepileptische Kr\u00e4mpfe sind h\u00e4ufig, aber es wurde ein breites Spektrum von Anfallsarten berichtet. Zu den motorischen St\u00f6rungen geh\u00f6ren Ataxie, Hypotonie, Dystonie, Tremor, Spastizit\u00e4t und Dyskinesie. Bei einigen Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch autismus\u00e4hnliche Z\u00fcge auftreten. Bei \u00e4lteren Patienten wurde \u00fcber Anzeichen von Parkinsonismus berichtet, einschlie\u00dflich Tremor, Bradykinesie und Antecollis.", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit"}, {"name": "Suarez-Stickler-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Skelettdysplasie mit Wormschen Knochen-multiplen Frakturen-Dentinogenesis imperfecta-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Skeletal dysplasia with wormian bone-multiple fractures-dentinogenesis imperfecta is a skeletal disorder, reported in three patients to date, characterized clinically by multiple fractures, wormian bones of the skull, dentinogenesis imperfecta and facial dysmorphism (hypertelorism, periorbital fullness). Although the signs are very similar to osteogenesis imperfecta, characteristic cortical defects in the absence of osteopenia and collagen abnormalities are considered to be distinctive. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1999.", "synonyms": "Suarez-Stickler syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "604922", "umls": "C1858032", "gard": "10290"}, {"name": "Subakute aufsteigende nekrotisierende Myelitis \u00a0", "sub_name": "Foix-Alajouanine-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Famili\u00e4re Osteosklerose mit Anomalien des Nervensystems und der Meningen, Myelomalazie, angiohypertrophische subakute, Myelopathie, angiodysgenetische nekrotisierende, Nekrotisierende Myelitis, subakute, Subakute aufsteigende nekrotisierende Myelitis \u00a0, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G37.4", "UMLS": "C0348023\u00a0 C0472347", "summary": "Das Foix-Alajouanine-Syndrom, auch Subakute aufsteigende nekrotisierende Myelitis genannt, ist die Folge einer Stauung der \u00e4u\u00dferen Pia-Venen des R\u00fcckenmarks und des intrinsischen sub-pialen Netzwerks. Charakteristisches Merkmal ist eine \u00fcber mehrere Monate oder Jahre progredient aufsteigende Myelopathie. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Am h\u00e4ufigsten sind M\u00e4nner in einem Alter von mehr als 50 Jahren betroffen. Die Krankheit beginnt mit meist symmetrischer Dysaesthesie der Beine und progredient aufsteigend gest\u00f6rten motorischen Funktionen. Die aufsteigende Paraplegie f\u00fchrt schlie\u00dflich zur Harninkontinenz. Selten beginnt die Krankheit mit einseitiger Schmerzsymptomatik. Bei der urs\u00e4chlichen L\u00e4sion handelt es sich um einen in der Dura gelegenen arterioven\u00f6sen Shunt der aus dem R\u00fcckenmark austretenden Venen. Dieser Shunt ist erworben. Er wird gespeist von \u00c4sten aus den spinalen Meningen. Das f\u00fchrt zu einem Reflux in die ven\u00f6se Strombahn des R\u00fcckenmarks, mit Stauung und chronischer medull\u00e4rer Isch\u00e4mie. Bei radiologischen Untersuchungen und mit Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung (MRI) des R\u00fcckenmarks werden erweiterte perimedull\u00e4re Venen mit gesteigerter Signalintensit\u00e4t im Zentrum der Medulla dargestellt. Bei chronischem Verlauf ist eine unterschiedlich schwere Atrophie des R\u00fcckenmarks nachweisbar. Angiographisch kann der Ort des arterioven\u00f6sen Shunts festgestellt werden. Bei etwa zwei Drittel der Patienten ist eine endovaskul\u00e4re Behandlung m\u00f6glich. In den \u00fcbrigen F\u00e4llen wird die Fistel durch Abtrennung der Emiss\u00e4rvenen vom Shunt aufgel\u00f6st. In 80% der F\u00e4lle kommt es unmittelbar zu einer Besserung, und die Symptome bilden sich in umgekehrter Reihenfolge ihres Auftretens wieder zur\u00fcck. Bei st\u00e4rker fortgeschrittenen F\u00e4llen wird keine Besserung erzielt. Selten kommt es durch die Operation zu sekund\u00e4ren Thrombosen, mit dem Ergebnis eine Verschlechterung des pr\u00e4operativen Befundes. Die fr\u00fche Diagnose erm\u00f6glicht eine wirkungsvolle Behandlung. Die schwersten Verl\u00e4ufe sind am h\u00e4ufigsten durch versp\u00e4tete Diagnose bedingt."}, {"name": "Subakute sklerosierende Panenzephalitis (SSPE)", "sub_name": "Leukoenzephalitis, sklerosierende subakute", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A chronic progressive encephalitis that develops a few years after measles infection and presents with a demyelination of the cerebral cortex.", "synonyms": "Dawson encephalitis, SSPE, Subacute inclusion body encephalitis, Subacute sclerosing panencephalitis, Van Bogaert disease, Van Bogaert encephalitis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "A81.1", "omim": "260470", "umls": "C0038522", "gard": "7708", "epidemiology": "Due to the measles immunization, nowadays cases of SSPE are very rare. In the United States, less than 10 cases/year are reported. However, in some countries like India, over 20 cases/per million people/per year are reported. Males are more often affected than females (3:1).", "clinical_description": "SSPE occurs primarily in children and young adults, approximately 2-8 years after the initial infection. Patients present with a history of measles infection (though the person seems to have fully recovered from the illness). Motor regression, cognition decline and seizures (focal, generalized tonic-clonic or myoclonic) are the major clinical manifestations. The electroencephalographic (EEG) pattern is characterized by periodic complexes that are disease-specific (generalized bisynchronous and symmetrical slow waves of high amplitude and a long repetition interval). Myoclonus, ataxia, autonomic dysfunction and dementia gradually develop. Stupor and coma precede the death. Histopathological findings in brain biopsy or autopsy include perivascular cuffing, eosinophilic cytoplasmic inclusions, neurophagia, and fibrous gliosis.", "etiology": "SSPE is caused by a mutant measles virus that provokes persistent brain inflammation (swelling and irritation).", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on a detailed history, clinical examination, typical EEG and presence of antimeasles antibodies in the cerebrospinal fluid. Computing tomography or magnetic resonance imaging are used to detect the brain lesions and help the differential diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "A wide variety of neurological conditions should be considered in the differential diagnosis of SSPE: Creutzfeldt-Jacob disease, anoxic encephalopathy, metabolic encephalopathy, hepatic failure, drug toxicity, thyrotoxicosis, progressive myoclonic epilepsy.", "management_and_treatment": "At present, no curative therapy for SSPE is available. Immunization against measles is the only known prevention. Some patients that respond to antiviral drugs (ribavirin, amantadine) need to receive this treatment for the rest of their lives.", "prognosis": "SSPE has a progressive course and results in premature death, usually within 1-4 years after disease onset."}, {"name": "Subaortenstenose, diskrete fibromuskul\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "Q24.4", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Subaortenstenose, fixierte"}, {"name": "Subaortenstenose, diskrete fixierte membran\u00f6se", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "Q24.4", "OMIM": "271950", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Subaortenstenose, fixierte"}, {"name": "Subaortenstenose, fixierte", "german_description": "Die fixierte Subaorten-Stenose (FSS) ist eine Einengung des linksventrikul\u00e4ren Ausflusstraktes unterhalb der Aortenklappe. Das anatomische Spektrum dieses Herzfehlers umfasst die fixierte membran\u00f6se Subaorten-Stenose (DMSS), die diskrete fibromuskul\u00e4re Subaorten-Stenose (DFSS) und die Tunnel-Subaorten-Stenose (TSS). Die DFSS und TSS sind h\u00e4ufig schwerwiegender als die membran\u00f6se Form. Patienten mit linksventrikul\u00e4rer Ausflu\u00dfbehinderung haben in 8-20% eine FSS. Die Subaorten-Stenose kommt gemeinsam mit anderen Herzfehlern und mit einer Obstruktion des Aortenbogens (durch Unterbrechung des Aortenbogens oder durch Coarctatio aortae) vor. Zu den assoziierten Herzfehlern geh\u00f6ren Ventrikelseptumdefekt, Verlagerung des Infundibulum-Septums in den linksventrikul\u00e4ren Ausflusskanal, Double outlet right ventricle (Taussig-Bing-Anomalie) und atrio-ventrikul\u00e4rer Septumdefekt mit falsch eingef\u00fcgter Mitralklappe. Die subvalvul\u00e4re Stenose ist eine der L\u00e4sionen des Shone-Komplexes (Coarctatio aortae, 'Fallschirm'-Mitralklappe, supravalvul\u00e4rer stenosierender Ring oberhalb der Mitralklappe). Bei mehr als 20% der Patienten ist die Aortenklappe ver\u00e4ndert (valvul\u00e4re Stenose, kleiner Aortenring, bicuspidale Klappe). Die subvalvul\u00e4re Membran h\u00e4ngt gelegentlich an einem der Klappensegel der Aorten- und Mitralklappe, interferiert dann mit der Funktion der Klappen und erzeugt so leichte Klappeninsuffizienzen. Die morphologischen Ver\u00e4nderungen im Ausflusstrakt des linken Ventrikels resultieren dort in einer Zugbelastung, die zu einer Proliferation bindegewebiger Zellen im Ausflusstrakt f\u00fchrt. Diese Proliferationen kehren nach Resektion h\u00e4ufig wieder und signalisieren so eine genetische Pr\u00e4disposition. Die Subaorten-Stenose wird am besten durch trans\u00f6sophageale Echokardiographie diagnostiziert: Der linksventrikul\u00e4re Ausflusstrakt stellt sich 110\u00b0 zur kranio-kaudalen Achse geneigt dar. Die gegenw\u00e4rtigen operativen Methoden werden allgemein als sicher und wirkungsvoll eingestuft. Es gibt aber Zweifel hinsichtlich der Langzeit-Resultate, wenn gleichzeitig auch Anomalien der Aortenklappe bestehen. F\u00fcr die Resektion der fibromuskul\u00e4ren Leiste werden weltweit die Methoden von Konno (unmodifiziert und modifiziert) und Ross-Konno verwendet.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Fixed subaortic stenosis (FSS) is a rare heart malformation characterized by the obstruction by membranous or fibromuscular tissue of the left ventricular outflow tract (LVOT) below the aortic valve, that occurs as an isolated lesion or in association with additional cardiac malformations (e.g. ventricular septal defect, patent ductus arteriosus, coarctation of the aorta), that presents in childhood with signs of LVOT obstruction (e.g. dyspnea, chest pain, syncope, palpitations) and that can potentially lead to life-threatening complications (e.g. aortic regurgitation, infective endocarditis). It comprises three anatomical subforms: discrete fixed membranous subaortic stenosis (membranous tissue encircling the LVOT), discrete fibromuscular subaortic stenosis (fibromuscular tissue encircling the LVOT) and tunnel subaortic stenosis (fibromuscular diffuse tunnel-like narrowing of the LVOT), the two latter forms being generally more severe than the membranous form.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "No data available\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q24.4", "omim": "271950", "umls": "C1848979"}, {"name": "Subaortenstenose, hypertrophe", "sub_name": "Kardiomyopathie, hypertrophe", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Kardiomyopathie, hypertrophe obstruktive, Subaortenstenose, hypertrophe, ", "UMLS": "C0007194", "MeSH": "D002312", "MedDRA": "10020871", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Subaortenstenose-Kleinwuchs-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, multiple congenital anomalies/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by the association of short stature and progressive discrete subaortic stenosis. Additional variable manifestations include upturned nose, voice and vocal cord abnormalities, obstructive lung disease, inguinal hernia, kyphoscoliosis and, occasionally, epicanthus, strabismus, microphthalmos and widely spaced teeth. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1984.", "synonyms": "Onat syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "omim": "271960", "umls": "C0795947", "gard": "405"}, {"name": "Subaortenstenose vom Tunneltyp", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "ICD-10": "Q24.4", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Subaortenstenose, fixierte"}, {"name": "Subependymom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Subependymoma is a rare and slow growing type of ependymoma (see this term), often presenting in middle-aged adults, found more commonly in men than in women, usually located in the fourth and lateral ventricles and manifesting with variable symptoms including headache, nausea, and loss of balance. In some cases it can be asymptomatic. It is usually associated with a better prognosis than other forms of ependymoma.", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "D43.2", "umls": "C0206725", "gard": "10070"}, {"name": "Subglottisstenose, kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare larynx anomaly characterized by a partial or complete narrowing of the upper airway extending from just below the vocal folds to the lower border of the cricoid cartilage. Clinical presentation is variable and includes recurrent, croup-like, upper respiratory infections, stridor, dyspnea, barking cough, and in most severe cases acute airway compromise at delivery. It may be an isolated finding, or associated with other congenital anomalies and syndromes.", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q31.1", "umls": "C0238441\u00a0 C0396051"}, {"name": "Subkorneale Pustulosis", "sub_name": "Dermatose, pustul\u00f6se subkorneale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Sneddon-Wilkinson-Syndrom, Subkorneale Pustulosis, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "L13.1", "UMLS": "C0600336", "MedDRA": "10042342", "summary": "Die Subkorneale pustul\u00f6se Dermatose ist eine seltene, gutartige, chronische Krankheit mit sterilen pustul\u00e4ren Eruptionen, mit typischer Lokalisation an den Beugeseiten des Stamms und der proximalen Extremit\u00e4ten. Weltweit wurden bisher etwa 200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die Krankheit tritt bevorzugt im Alter von 40-60 Jahren auf und ist bei M\u00e4nnern 4 Mal h\u00e4ufiger als bei Frauen. Die oberfl\u00e4chlichen, schlaffen, in Gruppen auftretenden Pusteln breiten sich ring- oder girlandenf\u00f6rmig aus. Sie treten innerhalb weniger Stunden auf und bilden sich in wenigen Tagen zur\u00fcck. Gelegentlich kommt es zu Juckreiz und Missempfindungen. Die L\u00e4sionen entwickeln sich zu feinschuppigen Arealen mit Verkrustung und selten mit leichter Hyperpigmentierung weiter. Die Ursache ist noch nicht bekannt. Beschrieben wurden Assoziationen mit monoklonaler IgA-Gammopathie, mit Multiplem Myelom und mit Pyoderma gangraenosum. Seltener sind Assoziationen mit Rheumatoider Arthritis, Lupus erythematodes, Hyperthyreose, Polyzythaemia rubra vera und SAPHO-Syndrom (s. dort). Die Diagnose wird durch die Befunde in der Hautbiopsie best\u00e4tigt: Nachweis einer sterilen, mit Neutrophilen gef\u00fcllten subkornealen Pustel, Fehlen von Akantholyse, negative Testergebnisse in der Immunfluoreszenz. Differentialdiagnostisch ist zu denken an den subkornealen Typ des IgA-Pemphigus, an Pemphigus foliaceus, Dermatitis herpetiformis, Psoriasis pustulosa, generalisierte Pustulose, generalisierte exanthematische Pustulose und an bakterielle Impetigo (s. dort). Durch die Behandlung soll Komplikationen vorgebeugt werden. Mit Dapson kann bei einigen Patienten eine dramatische Besserung erreicht werden. M\u00f6glich sind auch Behandlungen mit Sulfapyridin, oralen Kortikosteroiden, Retinoiden, Colchicinen und Phototherapy. "}, {"name": "Subkortikale Gliose Neumann", "sub_name": "Heredit\u00e4re diffuse Leukoenzephalopathie mit axonalen Sph\u00e4roiden und pigmentierter Glia", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Hereditary diffuse leukoencephalopathy with axonal spheroids and pigmented glia is a rare autosomal dominant disease characterized by a complex phenotype including progressive dementia, apraxia, apathy, impaired balance, parkinsonism, spasticity and epilepsy.", "synonyms": "ALSP, Adult-onset leukoencephalopathy with axonal spheroids and pigmented glia, Autosomal dominant leukoencephalopathy with neuroaxonal spheroids, FPSG, Familial dementia, Neumann type, Familial progressive subcortical gliosis, GPSC, HDLS, Hereditary diffuse leukoencephalopathy with spheroids, POLD, Pigmentary orthochromatic leukodystrophy, Subcortical gliosis of Neumann, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "E75.2", "omim": "221820", "umls": "C3711381", "gard": "10981"}, {"name": "Subkortikale laminare Heterotopie (SCLH)", "sub_name": "Bandheterotopie, subkortikale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, non-syndromic cerebral malformation due to abnormal neuronal migration characterized by variable clinical manifestation depending on the location, size and thickness of subcortical bands. Clinical presentation ranges from mild cognitive deficit to developmental delay with severe intellectual disability, seizures and behavioral problems.", "synonyms": "Subcortical laminar heterotopia, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Unknown\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q04.3", "omim": "300067\u00a0 600348\u00a0 607432", "umls": "C1848201", "gard": "1904"}, {"name": "Subtelomere 1p36-Deletion", "sub_name": "1p36-Deletionssyndrom", "german_description": "Das 1p36-Deletions-Syndrom gilt als eines der h\u00e4ufigsten Chromosomendeletions-Syndrome. Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Lebendgeburten betr\u00e4gt in beiden Geschlechtern und in allen Ethnien 1/5000-1/10.000.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare chromosomal anomaly characterized by distinctive facial dysmorphic features, hypotonia, developmental delay, intellectual disability, seizures, heart defects, poor/absent speech, and prenatal onset growth deficiency.", "synonyms": "Del(1)(p36), Deletion 1p36, Deletion 1pter, Monosomy 1p36, Monosomy 1pter, Subtelomeric 1p36 deletion, ", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q93.5", "omim": "607872\u00a0 616975", "umls": "C1842870", "gard": "6082", "epidemiology": "1p36 deletion syndrome is considered one of the most common chromosome deletion syndromes; in the USA, the birth prevalence is estimated at 1/ 5,000. A higher frequency is observed among females.", "clinical_description": "Patients share recognizable craniofacial dysmorphism with microbrachycephaly, a large, late-closing anterior fontanel (>3 cm at birth), straight eyebrows, deep-set eyes, broad and depressed nasal bridge, midface retrusion, posteriorly rotated, low-set, abnormal ears, long philtrum, and pointed chin. Brachydactyly, camptodactyly and short feet are also characteristic. Almost all patients suffer from congenital hypotonia, contributing to feeding difficulties, delay in motor development and fine motor skills, and delayed or absent speech. A variable level of intellectual disability is observed in all patients. Other symptoms include prenatal-onset growth deficiency, structural brain abnormalities, seizures, congenital heart defects, eye/vision problems, hearing loss (sensorineural or conductive/glue ear), skeletal anomalies, abnormalities of the external genitalia and, less frequently, renal abnormalities and hypothyroidism.", "etiology": "1p36 deletion syndrome is caused by a partial heterozygous deletion that primarily involves the distal part of the short arm of chromosome 1, with breakpoints ranging from 1p36.13 to 1p36.33. About 50% of cases are due to a de novo terminal 1p36 deletion, around 29% to an interstitial deletion; remaining cases comprise more complex chromosome rearrangements.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on the clinical picture and is confirmed by chromosomal analysis. Molecular techniques are used for the genetic characterization of the deletion (fluorescence in situ hybridization, comparative genomic hybridization array). An evaluation for congenital heart defects with an echocardiogram and electrocardiagram; brain abnormalities with magnetic resonance imaging; seizures with an electroencephalogram; a neurodevelopmental assessment, and standard examinations for eye/vision problems, hearing loss, and skeletal and renal abnormalities are recommended.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Rett syndrome, Angelman syndrome, Prader-Willi syndrome, Smith-Magenis syndrome, Cohen syndrome, and Aicardi syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal testing is feasible when a 1p36 chromosome rearrangement is already identified in a family member.", "genetic_counseling": "Most cases are sporadic, but an unbalanced translocation may be inherited from a parent with a balanced rearrangement.", "management_and_treatment": "Management should be multi-disciplinary and include a regular follow-up. Early diagnosis and access to personalized rehabilitation therapies focusing on motor development, cognition, communication, and social skills are highly recommended. The use of sign language is helpful. Some congenital heart defects may resolve on their own, others may require medication or surgery. Epileptic seizures are treated with standard antiepileptics. Infantile spasms are responsive to corticotrophin. Feeding and growth should be monitored as feeding difficulties are common early on. Triiodothyronine, thyroxine, and thyrotropin levels should be evaluated at diagnosis, and, then, once a year.", "prognosis": "The severity of the 1p36 deletion syndrome varies between affected individuals. Seizures and other medical issues seem to improve with time. Patients will remain dependent on others for most activities of daily living and will require medical support throughout life. Individuals with 1p36 deletion syndrome survive well into adult life."}, {"name": "Subtelomere 20p-Deletion", "sub_name": "Mikrodeletionssyndrom 20p13", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "20p13 microdeletion syndrome is a rare chromosomal anomaly characterized by developmental delay, mild to moderate intellectual disability, epilepsy, and unspecific dysmorphic signs. High palate, delayed permanent tooth eruption, hypoplastic fingernails, clinodactyly and short fingers have also been reported.", "synonyms": "20p subtelomeric deletion syndrome, Del(20)(p13), Monosomy 20p13, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q93.5"}, {"name": "Subtelomere Deletion 13q34", "sub_name": "Monosomie 13q34", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Monosomenanomalie 13q34 ist eine seltene Chromosomenanomalie, die aus einer partiellen Deletion des langen Arms von Chromosom 13 resultiert und haupts\u00e4chlich durch eine globale Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, eine leichte Intelligenzminderung, Adipositas und eine leichte kraniofaziale Dysmorphie (Mikrozephalie, breite rechteckige Stirn, schr\u00e4g abw\u00e4rts verlaufende Lidspalten, leichte Ptosis, prominente Nase mit langem Nasenr\u00fccken und breiter Spitze, kleines Kinn) gekennzeichnet ist. Zu den weiteren variabel berichteten Merkmalen geh\u00f6ren angeborene Herzfehler, Hand- und Fu\u00dfanomalien (z. B. Polydaktylie) und Agenesie des Corpus callosum.", "synonyms": "Del(13)(q34), Deletion 13q34, distale, Subtelomere Deletion 13q34, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q93.5", "OMIM": "619148"}, {"name": "Subtelomes Deletionssyndrom 9q", "sub_name": "Kleefstra-Syndrom durch Mikrodeletion 9q34", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "9qSTDS, Kleefstra-Syndrom durch del(9)(q34), Kleefstra-Syndrom durch subtelomere Deletion 9q, Subtelomes Deletionssyndrom 9q, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.8", "OMIM": "610253", "UMLS": "C0795833", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Kleefstra-Syndrom"}, {"name": "Subtotales Fehlen des Zerebellums", "sub_name": "Isolierte zerebell\u00e4re Agenesie", "german_description": "Eine Hypoplasie des Kleinhirns (CH) ist im Zusammenhang mit verschiedenen klinischen Entit\u00e4ten beschrieben worden: Chromosomenanomalien, in utero-Exposition mit Toxinen und Infektionen, Stoffwechselkrankheiten und eine gro\u00dfe Zahl verschiedener neurologischer Erkrankungen. Die Fehlentwicklung des Kleinhirns kann den Wurm und /oder die Kleinhirn-Hemisph\u00e4ren betreffen und von teilweiser bis zu kompletter Agenesie reichen. Sie kann auf das Kleinhirn beschr\u00e4nkt bleiben (K\u00f6rnerzell-Hypoplasie Typ Norman, Dandy-Walker-Fehlbildung), oder auch andere Strukturen des ZNS einbeziehen: das Mittelhirn (Backenzahn-Syndrome (MTS)), Pons und Medulla (Ponto-zerebell\u00e4re Hypoplasie (PCH)), Hirnrinde (Lissenzephalie-Kleinhirnhypoplasie-Syndrome (LCH)). Die Unterscheidung zwischen Kleinhirn-Hypoplasie und -Atrophie ist nicht immer klar, da in einem hypoplastischen Kleinhirn auch Merkmale einer sekund\u00e4ren Atrophie gefunden werden k\u00f6nnen. Eine nicht geringe Zahl seltener zerebell\u00e4rer Syndrome mit CH ist mit Fehlbildungen von Niere, Auge, Leber oder Herz assoziiert: Oro-facio-digitales Syndrom Typ II und die Syndrome von Gillespie, Ritscher-Schinzel und Hoyeraal-Hreidarsson. Die Vererbung kann autosomal-rezessiv, autosomal-dominant oder X-chromosomal sein. Mutationen wurden in folgenden Genen gefunden: LCH/Reelin, PCH/PMM2 und den X-chromosomalen Genen OPHN1 und DCK1. Mehrere Loci wurden f\u00fcr die autosomal-rezessiven Ataxien kartiert. In einer Familie mit Pankreas- und Kleinhirnagenesie wurden Mutationen im Pankreas Transkriptionsfaktors 1 (PTF1A) identifiziert. Hemizygotie der ZIC 1 und ZIC 4 -Gene ist bei der Entstehung der Dandy-Walker-Fehlbildung beteiligt. Das klinische Spektrum der Kleinhirn-Hypoplasie ist, abh\u00e4ngig von der Ursache, variabel. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Symptome sind Entwicklungs- und Sprachverz\u00f6gerung, Muskelhypotonie, Ataxie und abnorme Augenbewegungen. Die klinische Diagnose mu\u00df durch bildgebende Verfahren gesichert werden. Sie erfordert langfristige Begleitung, sowie sorgf\u00e4ltige Analysen des Stoffwechsels und der Entwicklung. Die Prognose wird wesentlich von der geistigen Leistungsf\u00e4higkeit bestimmt. F\u00fcr die meisten F\u00e4lle ist eine spezifische Behandlung nicht verf\u00fcgbar. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic central nervous system malformation characterized by complete or near-complete absence of the cerebellum with a normal sized posterior fossa, possibly accompanied by hypoplasia of the brainstem. The clinical picture is highly variable, but typically includes ataxia, dysarthria, tremor, dysmetria, dysdiadochokinesia, and oculomotor abnormalities, in addition to impaired mental, motor, and language development and intellectual disability.", "synonyms": "Near total absence of cerebellum, Subtotal absence of cerebellum, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q04.3", "umls": "C0266470\u00a0 C0344488", "meddra": "10008033"}, {"name": "Succinat-Coenzym-Q-Reduktase-Mangel, isolierter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, mitochondrial oxidative phosphorylation disorder characterized by a highly variable phenotype. The severe, multisystemic disease involves brain, heart, muscles, liver, kidneys, and eyes and results in death in infancy. Mildly affected individuals have only isolated cardiac or muscle involvement in the adulthood. Histochemical and biochemical analysis reveals a global reduction of succinate dehydrogenase activity.", "synonyms": "Isolated mitochondrial respiratory chain complex II deficiency, Isolated succinate  dehydrogenase deficiency, Isolated succinate-coenzyme Q reductase deficiency, Isolated succinate-ubiquinone reductase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.3", "omim": "252011\u00a0 619166\u00a0 619167\u00a0 619224", "umls": "C1855008", "gard": "5053"}, {"name": "Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase (SSADH)-Mangel ist eine seltene neurometabolische St\u00f6rung des Gamma-Aminobutters\u00e4ure (GABA)-Stoffwechsels mit einer unspezifischen klinischen Pr\u00e4sentation (von leicht bis schwer). Die h\u00e4ufigsten Symptome sind kognitive Einschr\u00e4nkung mit ausgepr\u00e4gtem Defizit der expressiven Sprache, Hypotonie, Ataxie, Epilepsie und Verhaltensst\u00f6rung.", "synonyms": "4-Hydroxybutyrazidurie, Bernsteins\u00e4ure-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase-Mangel, Gamma-Hydroxybutyrazidurie, SSADH-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "E72.8", "OMIM": "271980", "UMLS": "C0268631", "GARD": "7695", "epidemiology": "In der Literatur sind bisher ungef\u00e4hr 450 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das durchschnittliche Alter bei Krankheitsbeginn betr\u00e4gt 11 Monate. Im Gegensatz zu vielen anderen metabolischen Enzephalopathien zeigen Patienten keine Hypoglyk\u00e4mie, Hyperammon\u00e4mie oder intermittierende Lethargie. S\u00e4uglinge zeigen f\u00fcr gew\u00f6hnlich eine langsam progrediente oder statische Enzephalopathie, welche sich in Hypotonie, Hyporeflexie, Ataxie und verz\u00f6gertem Erreichens von Meilensteinen der motorischen und Sprachentwicklung in den ersten beiden Lebensjahren \u00e4u\u00dfert. Krampfanf\u00e4lle treten bei mehr als der H\u00e4lfte aller Betroffenen auf; \u00fcblicherweise als tonisch-klonische Anf\u00e4lle oder atypische Absencen. Geistige Behinderung, psychiatrische Manifestationen (z. B. Aufmerksamkeitsdefizit-Hyperaktivit\u00e4tssyndrom und Aggressivit\u00e4t im Kindesalter, Zwangs- und Angstst\u00f6rungen im Jugend- und Erwachsenenalter) und Schlafst\u00f6rungen werden h\u00e4ufig beobachtet. Hyperkinetisches Verhalten, selbstverletzendes Verhalten und Halluzinationen werden bei der H\u00e4lfte aller Patienten beschrieben. Eine pl\u00f6tzlich auftretende und fr\u00fch beginnende Variante der Erkrankung findet sich bei bis zu 10 % der Patienten und ist durch extrapyramidale Zeichen und einem mitunter progredienten Verlauf gekennzeichnet.", "etiology": "Ursache f\u00fcr SSADH-Mangel sind Mutationen im ALDH5A1-Gen (6p22), welches f\u00fcr die mitochondriale Succinat-Semialdehyd-Dehydrogenase kodiert, ein am Aminos\u00e4ureabbau beteiligtes Protein. Eine mangelhafte SSADH-Enzymaktivit\u00e4t hemmt den Abbau von GABA, des wichtigsten inhibitorischen Transmitters im Gehirn. Dies f\u00fchrt zu erh\u00f6hten Konzentrationen eines vermutlich toxischen Metabolitens, Gamma-Hydroxybutyrat (GHB), welches sich in K\u00f6rperfl\u00fcssigkeiten einschlie\u00dflich Blut, Urin und Liquor nachweisen l\u00e4sst.", "diagnostic_methods": "Der wichtigste laborchemische diagnostische Hinweis auf einen SSADH-Mangel ist der Nachweis erh\u00f6hter GHB bei der Bestimmung organischer S\u00e4uren im Urin. Im Plasma ist GHB erh\u00f6ht, Lymphozyten zeigen eine verringerte SSADH-Enzymaktivit\u00e4t. Im Liquor sind GHB und GABA erh\u00f6ht. Die kraniale MR-Bildgebung zeigt in der T2-Wichtung bilaterale oft symmetrische Signalverst\u00e4rkungen im Globus Pallidus, den zerebell\u00e4ren Nuclei dentati und den subthalamischen Nuclei. Das Elektroenzephalogramm zeigt vor allem eine Grundaktivit\u00e4tsverlangsamung und Spike-Entladungen. Der molekulargenetische Nachweis einer Mutation im ALDH5A1-Gen best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen beinhalten Gamma-Aminobutters\u00e4ure-Transaminase-Mangel und Homocarnosinose (siehe dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine Pr\u00e4natal-Diagnostik in Familien mit bekannter krankheitsverursachender Mutation ist m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "SSADH-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung wird empfohlen.", "management_and_treatment": "Da es bislang noch keine effektive kausale Behandlung gibt, zielt die Langzeitbehandlung auf die pharmakologische Kontrolle der Begleiterkrankungen (typischerweise Krampfanf\u00e4lle und neuropsychiatrische St\u00f6rungen). Carbamazepin und Lamotrigin sind effektive Mittel zur Kontrolle der Krampfanf\u00e4lle. Angstst\u00f6rungen, Aggressivit\u00e4t, Unaufmerksamkeit und Halluzinationen k\u00f6nnen mit Benzodiazepinen, Methylphenidat, Thioridazin, Risperidon oder Fluoxetin behandelt werden. Physio- und Ergotherapie, sensorische Integrationstherapie und/oder Logop\u00e4die k\u00f6nnen den Verlauf g\u00fcnstig beeinflussen.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist variabel. Die meisten Patienten erreichen das Erwachsenenalter. Einschr\u00e4nkend k\u00f6nnen neuropsychiatrische Symptome und geringe Lebensqualit\u00e4t sein. Fr\u00fche Mortalit\u00e4t, einschlie\u00dflich pl\u00f6tzlichem unerwarteten Tod bei Epilepsiepatienten (sudden unexpected death in epilepsy patients, SUDEP), sind beschrieben.", "summary": "In der Literatur sind bisher ungef\u00e4hr 450 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Succinat-Ubiquinon-Reduktase-Mangel, isolierter", "sub_name": "Succinat-Coenzym-Q-Reduktase-Mangel, isolierter", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, mitochondrial oxidative phosphorylation disorder characterized by a highly variable phenotype. The severe, multisystemic disease involves brain, heart, muscles, liver, kidneys, and eyes and results in death in infancy. Mildly affected individuals have only isolated cardiac or muscle involvement in the adulthood. Histochemical and biochemical analysis reveals a global reduction of succinate dehydrogenase activity.", "synonyms": "Isolated mitochondrial respiratory chain complex II deficiency, Isolated succinate  dehydrogenase deficiency, Isolated succinate-coenzyme Q reductase deficiency, Isolated succinate-ubiquinone reductase deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "icd_10": "G71.3", "omim": "252011\u00a0 619166\u00a0 619167\u00a0 619224", "umls": "C1855008", "gard": "5053"}, {"name": "Succinyl-CoA:3-Ketos\u00e4ure-CoA-Transferase-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SCOTD ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden 33 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic disorder in ketone body utilization characterized by severe, potentially fatal intermittent episodes of ketoacidosis.", "synonyms": "OXCT1 deficiency, SCOT deficiency, Succinyl-CoA acetoacetate transferase deficiency, Succinyl-CoA:3-ketoacid CoA transferase deficiency, ", "epidemiology": "Over 30 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Neonatal onset occurs in half of patients, presenting with a first ketoacidotic attack 2-4 days after birth. Patients with later onset present with an initial episode of ketoacidosis between 6-20 months of age. Initial episodes are often severe, and further episodes may be triggered by metabolic stress, infection or extended periods of fasting. Symptoms include tachypnea, vomiting, lethargy, hypotonia, and, in severe cases, coma. Episode intensity and frequency is variable and severe attacks are potentially fatal. Patients are generally healthy and develop normally between episodes, but infants may present with failure to thrive and poor feeding prior to diagnosis. Cardiomegaly has developed in two cases and may lead to congestive heart failure.", "etiology": "This disease is caused by mutations in the OXCT1 gene (5p13) that encodes the mitochondrial enzyme, succinyl-CoA:3-oxoacid CoA transferase, essential for ketone body metabolism in all extrahepatic tissue. Over 30 different mutations to OXCT1 have been identified, all leading to the accumulation of ketone bodies and ketoacidosis during periods of catabolic stress. Partial loss-of-function mutations have been identified that also lead to severe ketoacidosis, but without permanent ketosis.", "diagnostic_methods": "Permanent ketosis or persistent ketouria are pathognomic features; however, some mild cases may not present with these signs. Patients display metabolic acidosis during crises and both serum and urinalysis reveal high levels of ketones, pH levels between 6.8 and 7.12, and HCO3 levels between 3-8 mmol/L may be observed. There is no characteristic organic acid or acylcarnitine profile. The ratio of free fatty acids to total ketone bodies becomes less than 0.3 during a short fast and this may lead one to suspect the disease. Enzyme activity assays using fibroblasts, lymphocytes or platelets reveal a lack, or great reduction, of functional succinyl-CoA:3-oxoacid CoA transferase.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include physiological ketosis (e.g. ketoacidosis due to significant catabolism due to rotavirus infection) and ketoacidosis due to beta-ketothiolase deficiency or monocarboxylate transporter 1 deficiency.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis by enzyme activity assays is possible using cultured amniocytes.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. There is a 25% risk of disease transmission to offspring where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "Ketoacidotic crises must be treated immediately with intravenous fluid therapy including enough glucose, even when patients show normo- or hyper-glycemia, to suppress ketogenesis. Treatment of metabolic acidosis using sodium bicarbonate is controversial. Minimal usage of sodium bicarbonate is recommended. Patients must avoid prolonged fasting. A fat-rich diet which induces ketogenesis should be avoided. Protein restriction may be not necessary, because the effect of prevention of ketoacidosis is not proven. Home monitoring of urinary ketones helps parents to follow the patient's condition. Carbohydrate-rich food or drink should immediately be provided if ketone levels are higher than usual. If patients become weak or vomit, intravenous glucose infusions should be considered. There is no recommended medication for the chronic phase. The use of oral sodium bicarbonate and L-carnitine have been reported in the literature, but the effect of prevention of ketoacidosis attack is not proven. Affected females should be closely monitored during pregnancy and delivery.", "prognosis": "Risk of premature death is highest during the neonatal and infantile period due to severe episodes of ketoacidosis. However, the frequency and severity of ketoacidosis decreases after 10 years of age; thus, beyond this period, life expectancy maybe as good as in the general population. Normal growth and development is expected when proper treatment and diet are followed."}, {"name": "Succinyl-CoA:3-Oxos\u00e4ure-CoA-Transferase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Succinyl-CoA:3-Ketos\u00e4ure-CoA-Transferase-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SCOTD ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden 33 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic disorder in ketone body utilization characterized by severe, potentially fatal intermittent episodes of ketoacidosis.", "synonyms": "OXCT1 deficiency, SCOT deficiency, Succinyl-CoA acetoacetate transferase deficiency, Succinyl-CoA:3-ketoacid CoA transferase deficiency, ", "epidemiology": "Over 30 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Neonatal onset occurs in half of patients, presenting with a first ketoacidotic attack 2-4 days after birth. Patients with later onset present with an initial episode of ketoacidosis between 6-20 months of age. Initial episodes are often severe, and further episodes may be triggered by metabolic stress, infection or extended periods of fasting. Symptoms include tachypnea, vomiting, lethargy, hypotonia, and, in severe cases, coma. Episode intensity and frequency is variable and severe attacks are potentially fatal. Patients are generally healthy and develop normally between episodes, but infants may present with failure to thrive and poor feeding prior to diagnosis. Cardiomegaly has developed in two cases and may lead to congestive heart failure.", "etiology": "This disease is caused by mutations in the OXCT1 gene (5p13) that encodes the mitochondrial enzyme, succinyl-CoA:3-oxoacid CoA transferase, essential for ketone body metabolism in all extrahepatic tissue. Over 30 different mutations to OXCT1 have been identified, all leading to the accumulation of ketone bodies and ketoacidosis during periods of catabolic stress. Partial loss-of-function mutations have been identified that also lead to severe ketoacidosis, but without permanent ketosis.", "diagnostic_methods": "Permanent ketosis or persistent ketouria are pathognomic features; however, some mild cases may not present with these signs. Patients display metabolic acidosis during crises and both serum and urinalysis reveal high levels of ketones, pH levels between 6.8 and 7.12, and HCO3 levels between 3-8 mmol/L may be observed. There is no characteristic organic acid or acylcarnitine profile. The ratio of free fatty acids to total ketone bodies becomes less than 0.3 during a short fast and this may lead one to suspect the disease. Enzyme activity assays using fibroblasts, lymphocytes or platelets reveal a lack, or great reduction, of functional succinyl-CoA:3-oxoacid CoA transferase.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include physiological ketosis (e.g. ketoacidosis due to significant catabolism due to rotavirus infection) and ketoacidosis due to beta-ketothiolase deficiency or monocarboxylate transporter 1 deficiency.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis by enzyme activity assays is possible using cultured amniocytes.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. There is a 25% risk of disease transmission to offspring where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "Ketoacidotic crises must be treated immediately with intravenous fluid therapy including enough glucose, even when patients show normo- or hyper-glycemia, to suppress ketogenesis. Treatment of metabolic acidosis using sodium bicarbonate is controversial. Minimal usage of sodium bicarbonate is recommended. Patients must avoid prolonged fasting. A fat-rich diet which induces ketogenesis should be avoided. Protein restriction may be not necessary, because the effect of prevention of ketoacidosis is not proven. Home monitoring of urinary ketones helps parents to follow the patient's condition. Carbohydrate-rich food or drink should immediately be provided if ketone levels are higher than usual. If patients become weak or vomit, intravenous glucose infusions should be considered. There is no recommended medication for the chronic phase. The use of oral sodium bicarbonate and L-carnitine have been reported in the literature, but the effect of prevention of ketoacidosis attack is not proven. Affected females should be closely monitored during pregnancy and delivery.", "prognosis": "Risk of premature death is highest during the neonatal and infantile period due to severe episodes of ketoacidosis. However, the frequency and severity of ketoacidosis decreases after 10 years of age; thus, beyond this period, life expectancy maybe as good as in the general population. Normal growth and development is expected when proper treatment and diet are followed."}, {"name": "Succinyl-CoA Acetoacetat Transferase-Mangel", "sub_name": "Succinyl-CoA:3-Ketos\u00e4ure-CoA-Transferase-Mangel", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SCOTD ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden 33 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic disorder in ketone body utilization characterized by severe, potentially fatal intermittent episodes of ketoacidosis.", "synonyms": "OXCT1 deficiency, SCOT deficiency, Succinyl-CoA acetoacetate transferase deficiency, Succinyl-CoA:3-ketoacid CoA transferase deficiency, ", "epidemiology": "Over 30 cases have been reported to date.", "clinical_description": "Neonatal onset occurs in half of patients, presenting with a first ketoacidotic attack 2-4 days after birth. Patients with later onset present with an initial episode of ketoacidosis between 6-20 months of age. Initial episodes are often severe, and further episodes may be triggered by metabolic stress, infection or extended periods of fasting. Symptoms include tachypnea, vomiting, lethargy, hypotonia, and, in severe cases, coma. Episode intensity and frequency is variable and severe attacks are potentially fatal. Patients are generally healthy and develop normally between episodes, but infants may present with failure to thrive and poor feeding prior to diagnosis. Cardiomegaly has developed in two cases and may lead to congestive heart failure.", "etiology": "This disease is caused by mutations in the OXCT1 gene (5p13) that encodes the mitochondrial enzyme, succinyl-CoA:3-oxoacid CoA transferase, essential for ketone body metabolism in all extrahepatic tissue. Over 30 different mutations to OXCT1 have been identified, all leading to the accumulation of ketone bodies and ketoacidosis during periods of catabolic stress. Partial loss-of-function mutations have been identified that also lead to severe ketoacidosis, but without permanent ketosis.", "diagnostic_methods": "Permanent ketosis or persistent ketouria are pathognomic features; however, some mild cases may not present with these signs. Patients display metabolic acidosis during crises and both serum and urinalysis reveal high levels of ketones, pH levels between 6.8 and 7.12, and HCO3 levels between 3-8 mmol/L may be observed. There is no characteristic organic acid or acylcarnitine profile. The ratio of free fatty acids to total ketone bodies becomes less than 0.3 during a short fast and this may lead one to suspect the disease. Enzyme activity assays using fibroblasts, lymphocytes or platelets reveal a lack, or great reduction, of functional succinyl-CoA:3-oxoacid CoA transferase.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include physiological ketosis (e.g. ketoacidosis due to significant catabolism due to rotavirus infection) and ketoacidosis due to beta-ketothiolase deficiency or monocarboxylate transporter 1 deficiency.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis by enzyme activity assays is possible using cultured amniocytes.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive and genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. There is a 25% risk of disease transmission to offspring where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "Ketoacidotic crises must be treated immediately with intravenous fluid therapy including enough glucose, even when patients show normo- or hyper-glycemia, to suppress ketogenesis. Treatment of metabolic acidosis using sodium bicarbonate is controversial. Minimal usage of sodium bicarbonate is recommended. Patients must avoid prolonged fasting. A fat-rich diet which induces ketogenesis should be avoided. Protein restriction may be not necessary, because the effect of prevention of ketoacidosis is not proven. Home monitoring of urinary ketones helps parents to follow the patient's condition. Carbohydrate-rich food or drink should immediately be provided if ketone levels are higher than usual. If patients become weak or vomit, intravenous glucose infusions should be considered. There is no recommended medication for the chronic phase. The use of oral sodium bicarbonate and L-carnitine have been reported in the literature, but the effect of prevention of ketoacidosis attack is not proven. Affected females should be closely monitored during pregnancy and delivery.", "prognosis": "Risk of premature death is highest during the neonatal and infantile period due to severe episodes of ketoacidosis. However, the frequency and severity of ketoacidosis decreases after 10 years of age; thus, beyond this period, life expectancy maybe as good as in the general population. Normal growth and development is expected when proper treatment and diet are followed."}, {"name": "S\u00fcdasiatische Elliptozytose", "sub_name": "Ovalozytose, s\u00fcdostasiatische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die S\u00fcdostasiatische Ovalozytose (SAO) ist eine seltene St\u00f6rung der Erythrozytenmembran, die durch ovale rote Blutk\u00f6rperchen gekennzeichnet ist. Die meisten Patienten sind symptomlos oder zeigen gelegentlich milde Symptome wie z. B. Bl\u00e4sse, Gelbsucht, An\u00e4mie and Gallensteine.", "synonyms": "Melanesische Ovalozytose, SAO, Stomatozytische heredit\u00e4re Elliptozytose, S\u00fcdasiatische Elliptozytose, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D58.1", "OMIM": "166900", "epidemiology": "Die SAO ist verbreitet in S\u00fcdostasien und L\u00e4ndern des westlichen Pazifikraums (z. B. Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesien, Philippinen und Papua-Neuguinea). Die SAO ist sehr h\u00e4ufig in Gebieten, in denen Malaria endemisch ist (Pr\u00e4valenz 1:20-1:4), aber in Europa sehr selten.", "clinical_description": "Eine SAO kann mit jedem Alter auftreten. Neugeborene mit SAO k\u00f6nnen symptomatisch sein mit H\u00e4molyse bei Geburt, die zu An\u00e4mie, Bl\u00e4sse oder Gelbsucht f\u00fchrt. An\u00e4mie und Hyperbilirubin\u00e4mie bei Neugeborenen tritt oft gemeinsam mit milder Splenomegalie and Gallensteinen auf. Eine H\u00e4molyse tritt f\u00fcr gew\u00f6hnlich in den ersten drei Lebensjahren auf. Erwachsene sind asymptomatisch oder haben nur eine minimale h\u00e4molytische An\u00e4mie. Eine erh\u00f6hte Malariaresistenz wird ebenfalls beobachtet.", "etiology": "Die SAO wird durch eine 27 bp-Deletion im SLC4A1-Gen verursacht, das auf Chromosom 17q2.31 lokalisiert ist (SLC4A1del27- Mutation). Dieses Gen kodiert f\u00fcr ein Bande 3-Anionen-Transportprotein, den Bicarbonat-Chlorid-Austauscher in den Membranen roter Blutk\u00f6rperchen. Mutationen in diesem Protein verursachen Membransteifigkeit. In fast allen F\u00e4llen kann die Deletion heterozygot nachgewiesen werden, wobei Homozygotie als lethal f\u00fcr den sich entwickelnden Embryo angesehen wird. Unl\u00e4ngst wurde in einem SAO-Fall eine homozygote Mutation nachgewiesen, die zu einer extrem schweren dyserythropoietischen An\u00e4mie mit distaler tubul\u00e4rer Azidose der Nieren (s. diese Termini) f\u00fchrt. Diese w\u00e4re t\u00f6dlich gewesen, wenn der Fet nicht in-utero Bluttransfusionen bekommen h\u00e4tte. Das gleichzeitige Vorkommen der SLC4A1del27-Mutation mit anderen Mutationen im SLC4A1-Gen kann eine distale tubul\u00e4re Azidose der Niere verursachen, die in einigen F\u00e4llen mit einer SAO assoziiert ist.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Nachweis von Makro-Ovalozyten im peripheren Blutausstrich, wobei einige der Zellen Stomatozyten \u00e4hneln mit mehreren charakteristischen schlitz- oder mundf\u00f6rmigen Aufhellungen ohne H\u00e4molyse. Zus\u00e4tzlich kann eine genetische Diagnostik zum Nachweis der SLC4A1-Genmutation herangezogen werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen beinhalten alle Formen der heredit\u00e4ren Elliptozytose und Sph\u00e4rozytose sowie der dehydrierten heredit\u00e4ren Stomatozytose (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist m\u00f6glich, wird aber aufgrund der milden Symptomatik der Erkrankung nicht angeboten.", "genetic_counseling": "Die SAO folgt einem autosomal-dominantem Erbgang. Eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die meisten SAO-F\u00e4lle sind asymptomatisch, und eine Behandlung ist nicht erforderlich.", "prognosis": "Eine SAO ist nicht lebensbedrohlich.", "summary": "Die SAO ist verbreitet in S\u00fcdostasien und L\u00e4ndern des westlichen Pazifikraums (z. B. Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesien, Philippinen und Papua-Neuguinea). Die SAO ist sehr h\u00e4ufig in Gebieten, in denen Malaria endemisch ist (Pr\u00e4valenz 1:20-1:4), aber in Europa sehr selten."}, {"name": "SUFE", "sub_name": "Epiphysiolyse der H\u00fcfte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Epiphysenl\u00f6sung der H\u00fcfte ist eine seltene Osteonekrose, die durch eine einseitige oder bilaterale St\u00f6rung des Kopf-Hals-\u00dcbergangs mit unterschiedlichem Grad an posteriorer Epiphysen\u00fcbersetzung und gleichzeitiger anteriorer Metaphysenversetzung gekennzeichnet ist. Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich typischerweise vor der Adoleszenz/Jugend mit Schmerzen unterschiedlicher Intensit\u00e4t an verschiedenen Stellen (H\u00fcfte, Leiste, Oberschenkel, Knie).", "synonyms": "Abl\u00f6sung der Femurkopf-Epiphyse, Epiphysiolyse des Femurkopfes, Epiphysiolyse des oberen Femur, SCFE, SUFE, Verschiebung der oberen Femurepiphyse, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "M93.9"}, {"name": "Sugarman-Brachydaktylie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sugarman brachydactyly is a rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation characterized by brachydactyly of fingers, with major proximal phalangeal shortening and immobile proximal interphalangeal joints, as well as dorsally and proximally placed, non-articulating great toes (with or without angulation). Radiographic findings of hands include bilateral double first metacarpals and biphalangeal fifth fingers. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1982.", "synonyms": "Sugarman-Hager-Kulik syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "omim": "272150"}, {"name": "Sugarman-Hager-Kulik-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Sugarman-Brachydaktylie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Sugarman brachydactyly is a rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation characterized by brachydactyly of fingers, with major proximal phalangeal shortening and immobile proximal interphalangeal joints, as well as dorsally and proximally placed, non-articulating great toes (with or without angulation). Radiographic findings of hands include bilateral double first metacarpals and biphalangeal fifth fingers. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1982.", "synonyms": "Sugarman-Hager-Kulik syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy", "omim": "272150"}, {"name": "Sugarman-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Oro-fazio-digitales Syndrom Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "OFD3, Sugarman-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q87.0", "OMIM": "258850", "UMLS": "C0406726", "GARD": "10518", "summary": "Das Oro-fazio-digitale Syndrom Typ 3 ist gekennzeichnet durch Mund-, Augen- und Fingerfehlbildungen und schweres intellektuelles Defizit. Bisher wurden in 2 Familien 5 F\u00e4lle (2 m., 3 w.) beschrieben. Die wichtigsten klinischen Merkmale sind prominente Stirn und Hinterkopf, rundes Gesicht mit vollen Wangen, Hypertelorismus, Esotropie, abfallende Lidachsen, myoklonisches Lidzucken, konjugierte Abweichung der Lidachsen, gespaltene Uvula, Trichterbrust, kurzes Sternum, Kyphose, postaxiale Polydaktylie und schwere spastische Parese. Die K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe ist normal. Autosomal-rezessive Vererbung wird vermutet, das urs\u00e4chliche Gen ist nicht bekannt. "}, {"name": "Sujansky-Leonard-Syndrom", "sub_name": "VACTERL-Assoziation mit Hydrozephalus", "german_description": "VACTERL ist ein Akronym f\u00fcr vertebrale Anomalien, Analatresie, angeborene Herzfehler (cardiac), Tracheo-\u00d6sophagel-Fistel, renale Anomalien und Gliedma\u00dfen-Fehlbildungen (limb). Das gemeinsame Auftreten von VACTERL und Hydrozephalus wurde nur selten beschrieben und wird vermutlich autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Es handelt sich immer um einen sehr schwerwiegenden oder sogar letalen Entwicklungsdefekt, der sich grundlegend von der VATER-Assoziation unterscheidet. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "VACTERL is an acronym for Vertebral anomalies, Anal atresia, Congenital cardiac disease, Tracheoesophageal fistula, Renal anomalies, and Limb defects. VACTERL associated with hydrocephalus has rarely been reported and is thought to be an autosomal recessive anomaly. The condition is described as a uniformly lethal or developmentally devastating disorder distinct from the VATER association.", "synonyms": "Sujansky-Leonard syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "276950\u00a0 314390", "gard": "272"}, {"name": "Sulfatase-Mangel, multipler", "german_description": "Der multiple Sulfatase-Mangel (MSD, Austin-Syndrom) ist mit nur etwa 40 beschriebenen Patienten eine extrem seltene lysosomale Speicherkrankheit. Es besteht ein universeller Mangel aller Sulfatasen, nicht nur der lysosomalen. Die prim\u00e4re Ursache ist ein Mangel des Formyl-Glyzin synthetisierenden Enzyms (FGE). Es ist im endoplasmatischen Retikulum aktiv und wird f\u00fcr die Umwandlung des Zysteins im aktiven Zentrum der Sulfatasen in C-Alpha-Formylglyzin ben\u00f6tigt. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Klinisch kombiniert der MSD zu unterschiedlichen Anteilen Symptome der Metachromatischen Leukodystrophie (Arylsulfatase A-Mangel), der Mukopolysaccharidose-Typen 2, 3A, 3D und 6 (Mangel verschiedener Sulfatasen) und der X-chromosomalen Ichthyose (Steroid-Sulfatase-Mangel). Die klassische Form beginnt mit etwa 1 bis 2 Jahren, es wurde die Krankheit aber auch schon bei Neugeborenen beschrieben. Die vermehrte Ausscheidung von Mukopolysacchariden und Sulfatiden sind diagnostische Laborbefunde. Durch die Messung der Aktivit\u00e4t verschiedener Sulfatasen in Leukozyten wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt. In Fibroblasten ist die enzymatische Diagnose schwieriger, da in diesen Zellen unterschiedlich hohe Restaktivit\u00e4ten gefunden werden. Das SUMF1-Gen liegt in der Chromosomenregion 3p26, und etwa 20 Mutationen wurden bisher beschrieben. Das homologe SUMF2 -Gen liegt in der Chromosomenregion 7q11 und ist wahrscheinlich f\u00fcr die Sulfatasen-Restaktivit\u00e4ten der Patienten verantwortlich. Nur eine symptomatische Therapie ist m\u00f6glich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Multiple sulfatase deficiency (MSD) is a very rare and fatal lysosomal storage disease characterized by a clinical phenotype that combines the features of different sulfatase deficiencies (whether lysosomal or not) that can have neonatal (most severe), infantile (most common) and juvenile (rare) presentations with manifestations including hypotonia, coarse facial features, mild deafness, skeletal anomalies, ichthyosis, hepatomegaly, developmental delay, progressive neurologic deterioration and hydrocephalus.", "synonyms": "Juvenile sulfatidosis, Austin type, MSD, Mucosulfatidosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E75.2", "omim": "272200", "umls": "C0268263\u00a0 C1720864", "gard": "5061"}, {"name": "Sulfatidose, juvenile, Typ Austin", "sub_name": "Sulfatase-Mangel, multipler", "german_description": "Der multiple Sulfatase-Mangel (MSD, Austin-Syndrom) ist mit nur etwa 40 beschriebenen Patienten eine extrem seltene lysosomale Speicherkrankheit. Es besteht ein universeller Mangel aller Sulfatasen, nicht nur der lysosomalen. Die prim\u00e4re Ursache ist ein Mangel des Formyl-Glyzin synthetisierenden Enzyms (FGE). Es ist im endoplasmatischen Retikulum aktiv und wird f\u00fcr die Umwandlung des Zysteins im aktiven Zentrum der Sulfatasen in C-Alpha-Formylglyzin ben\u00f6tigt. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Klinisch kombiniert der MSD zu unterschiedlichen Anteilen Symptome der Metachromatischen Leukodystrophie (Arylsulfatase A-Mangel), der Mukopolysaccharidose-Typen 2, 3A, 3D und 6 (Mangel verschiedener Sulfatasen) und der X-chromosomalen Ichthyose (Steroid-Sulfatase-Mangel). Die klassische Form beginnt mit etwa 1 bis 2 Jahren, es wurde die Krankheit aber auch schon bei Neugeborenen beschrieben. Die vermehrte Ausscheidung von Mukopolysacchariden und Sulfatiden sind diagnostische Laborbefunde. Durch die Messung der Aktivit\u00e4t verschiedener Sulfatasen in Leukozyten wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt. In Fibroblasten ist die enzymatische Diagnose schwieriger, da in diesen Zellen unterschiedlich hohe Restaktivit\u00e4ten gefunden werden. Das SUMF1-Gen liegt in der Chromosomenregion 3p26, und etwa 20 Mutationen wurden bisher beschrieben. Das homologe SUMF2 -Gen liegt in der Chromosomenregion 7q11 und ist wahrscheinlich f\u00fcr die Sulfatasen-Restaktivit\u00e4ten der Patienten verantwortlich. Nur eine symptomatische Therapie ist m\u00f6glich. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Multiple sulfatase deficiency (MSD) is a very rare and fatal lysosomal storage disease characterized by a clinical phenotype that combines the features of different sulfatase deficiencies (whether lysosomal or not) that can have neonatal (most severe), infantile (most common) and juvenile (rare) presentations with manifestations including hypotonia, coarse facial features, mild deafness, skeletal anomalies, ichthyosis, hepatomegaly, developmental delay, progressive neurologic deterioration and hydrocephalus.", "synonyms": "Juvenile sulfatidosis, Austin type, MSD, Mucosulfatidosis, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "E75.2", "omim": "272200", "umls": "C0268263\u00a0 C1720864", "gard": "5061"}, {"name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel durch Molybd\u00e4n-Cofaktor-Mangel", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MOCOD, ", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "252150\u00a0 252160\u00a0 615501", "GARD": "3705", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel durch Molybd\u00e4n-Kofaktor-Mangel Typ A", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MOCOD Typ A, Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ A, kombinierter Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "252150", "UMLS": "C1854988", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel durch Molybd\u00e4n-Kofaktor-Mangel Typ B", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MOCOD Typ B, Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ B, kombinierter Mangel, ", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "252160", "UMLS": "C1854989", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel durch Molybd\u00e4n-Kofaktor-Mangel Typ C", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MOCOD Typ C, Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ C, kombinierter Mangel, ", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "615501", "UMLS": "C1854990", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel, isolierter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "ISOD, Sulfocysteinurie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "272300", "UMLS": "C0268624\u00a0 C2931746", "GARD": "5062", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ A, kombinierter Mangel", "sub_name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel durch Molybd\u00e4n-Kofaktor-Mangel Typ A", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MOCOD Typ A, Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ A, kombinierter Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "252150", "UMLS": "C1854988", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ B, kombinierter Mangel", "sub_name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel durch Molybd\u00e4n-Kofaktor-Mangel Typ B", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MOCOD Typ B, Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ B, kombinierter Mangel, ", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "252160", "UMLS": "C1854989", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ C, kombinierter Mangel", "sub_name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel durch Molybd\u00e4n-Kofaktor-Mangel Typ C", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "MOCOD Typ C, Sulfitoxidase, Xanthin-Dehydrogenase und Aldehyd-Oxidase Typ C, kombinierter Mangel, ", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "615501", "UMLS": "C1854990", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Sulfocysteinurie", "sub_name": "Sulfitoxidase-Mangel, isolierter", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "ISOD, Sulfocysteinurie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "E72.1", "OMIM": "272300", "UMLS": "C0268624\u00a0 C2931746", "GARD": "5062", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Enzephalopathie durch Sulfitoxidase-Mangel"}, {"name": "Summerskill-Walshe-Tygstrup Syndrom", "sub_name": "Cholestase, benigne intrahepatische, rekurrente", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Benigne rekurrente intrahepatische Cholestase (BRIC), eine erbliche Leberst\u00f6rung, ist gekennzeichnet durch intermittierende Episoden intrahepatischer Cholestase, im Allgemeinen ohne Progression zu chronischem Leberschaden. Man nimmt an, dass die BRIC zu einem klinischen Spektrum intrahepatischer cholestatischer St\u00f6rungen geh\u00f6rt, das von den bei BRIC beobachteten milden intermittierenden Episoden bis hin zu schwerer, chronischer und progredienter Cholestase reicht, wie man sie bei der Progressiven famili\u00e4ren intrahepatischen Cholestase (PFIC; siehe dort) beobachtet.", "synonyms": "BRIC, Summerskill-Walshe-Tygstrup Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "K83.1", "OMIM": "243300\u00a0 605479", "UMLS": "C0149841", "GARD": "12185", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BRIC ist unbekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die erste cholestatische Episode kann in jedem Alter erfolgen, jedoch ist ein Beginn in den ersten zwei Lebensdekaden am h\u00e4ufigsten. Die Patienten weisen Sch\u00fcbe starken Juckreizes und Gelbsucht auf, die mehrere Wochen oder Monate andauern k\u00f6nnen, bevor sie spontan abklingen. Zu den assoziierten Symptomen geh\u00f6ren M\u00fcdigkeit, Appetitmangel, dunkler Urin und blasser Stuhl. Hepatomegalie ist ebenfalls ein h\u00e4ufiger Befund. Zwischen den Episoden zeigen die Patienten keine Symptome und die Intervalle zwischen den Anf\u00e4llen variieren von Monaten bis zu Jahren. Die Faktoren, die den Ausbruch der Cholestase ausl\u00f6sen bleiben bislang noch unklar, aber sowohl Virusinfektionen als auch Schwangerschaften und orale Verh\u00fctungsmittel wurden in der Vergangenheit daf\u00fcr verantwortlich gemacht. Zwei Formen der BRIC wurden beschrieben (BRIC1 und BRIC2) (siehe jeweils dort). Klinisch sind beide Formen einander recht \u00e4hnlich; jedoch k\u00f6nnen Patienten mit BRIC1 extrahepatische Merkmale zeigen, etwa H\u00f6rverlust, Pankreatitis und Diarrhoe, w\u00e4hrend Cholelithiasis ein h\u00e4ufiges Symptom bei BRIC2 ist. Patienten mit BRIC2 haben zudem ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko, an hepatobili\u00e4ren malignen Erkrankungen zu erkranken.", "etiology": "Die BRIC1 ist allelisch zur PFIC1 (siehe dort) und wird durch Mutationen im ATP8B1-Gen (18q21) verursacht. Es kodiert eine P-Typ-ATPase, die an der Gallenkan\u00e4lchen-Membran der Hepatozyten und in anderen Epithelien exprimiert wird. BRIC2 ist allelisch zu PFIC2 (siehe dort) und wird durch Mutationen im ABCB11-Gen (2q24) verursacht, das die leberspezifische Gallensalz-Exportpumpe (BSEP) kodiert. Die krankheitsverursachenden Mutationen bei der BRIC sind in der Regel Missense-Mutationen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf der klinischen Anamnese (mindestens 2-3 Cholestase-Episoden), der Serum-Biochemie (niedrige bis normale Gamma-GT-Aktivit\u00e4t und Cholesterinspiegel, erh\u00f6hte Gesamt-Gallens\u00e4uren (TBA) und hohe Spiegel konjugierten Bilirubins w\u00e4hrend der Episoden), der Cholangiographie (die normale intra- und extrahepatische Galleng\u00e4nge zeigt), der Leberhistologie (mit der eine intrahepatische Cholestase bei normaler Leberstruktur nachgewiesen wird) und der immunohistochemischen Analyse (fehlende oder verringerte BSEP-F\u00e4rbung bei der Mehrzahl der BRIC2-Patienten). Die Mutationsanalyse best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose und differenziert die Subtypen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Medikament\u00f6s induzierte cholestatische Erkrankung, intrahepatische Cholestase w\u00e4hrend der Schwangerschaft, prim\u00e4re bili\u00e4re Zirrhose und prim\u00e4r sklerosierende Cholangitis (siehe jeweils dort). Die BRIC kann von der PFIC auf der Grundlage des Krankheitsverlaufs und der Leberhistologie unterschieden werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Pr\u00e4natale Tests sind m\u00f6glich, wenn die krankheitsverursachenden Mutationen in der Familie bekannt sind.", "genetic_counseling": "Sowohl BRIC1 als auch BRIC2 werden autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, Bei einer BRIC-Familie wurde ein scheinbar autosomal-dominanter Erbgang (Pseudo-Dominanz?) beschrieben.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung erfolgt haupts\u00e4chlich symptomatisch: Rifampicin und Cholestyramin werden verordnet zur Verringerung des Juckreizes und um bei einigen Patienten die Remission einer cholestatischen Episode zu induzieren. Auch Plasmapherese/MARS (Molecular Adsorbents Recirculation System) hat sich in einigen F\u00e4llen als wirksam erwiesen. F\u00fcr Personen, die auf eine medikament\u00f6se Therapie nicht ansprechen, ist eine endoskopische nasobili\u00e4re Drainage im Allgemeinen wirksam. Eine partielle Ableitung nach au\u00dfen wird ebenfalls eingesetzt, um die Lebensqualit\u00e4t zu verbessern und eine Progression der Erkrankung zu verhindern. Eine Lebertransplantation kann schlie\u00dflich bei Patienten mit h\u00e4ufigen und schweren Episoden indiziert sein.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist allgemein g\u00fcnstig, mit einer Tendenz zu geringerer H\u00e4ufigkeit der Episoden mit zunehmendem Alter. Beschrieben wurde jedoch auch eine Progression von der BRIC zur PFIC, was auf ein klinisches Kontinuum hindeutet.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz der BRIC ist unbekannt."}, {"name": "Summitt-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Summitt-Syndrom ist eine ganz au\u00dferordentlich seltene Krankheit, die erstmals bei zwei Br\u00fcdern mit leichter bis schwerer Kraniosynostose, Syndaktylie, Adipositas und normaler Intelligenz beschrieben wurde. Die Eltern waren Vetter und Kusine I. Grades. Sp\u00e4ter wurde ein weiterer Patient mit Akrozephalie, Brachydaktylie, Klinodaktylie, leichter Syndaktylie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, Genu valgum und Adipositas beschrieben. Man nimmt an, da\u00df es sich beim Summit-Syndrom um eine Variante des Carpenter-Syndroms (Akrozephalopolysyndaktylie Typ II) handelt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndromic trigonocephaly characterized by marked malformations of the head and face (essentially acrocephaly), broad depressed nasal bridge, narrow maxillae, abnormalities of the hands and feet (polydactyly, brachydactyly, syndactyly, clinodactyly, camptodactyly, ulnar deviation), obesity and congenital heart disease. This disease is considered a variant of Carpenter syndrome without intellectual disabaility. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1992.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q82.0", "omim": "272350", "umls": "C1802405", "mesh": "C538142", "gard": "127"}, {"name": "SUNCT-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das SUNCT-Syndrom (Short-lasting Unilateral Neuralgiform headache attacks with Conjunctival injection and Tearing, d.h., kurzdauernde einseitige neuralgiforme Kopfschmerzen mit Bindehautr\u00f6tung und Tr\u00e4nenfluss) ist eine prim\u00e4re Kopfschmerz-Krankheit mit einseitigen Trigeminus-Schmerzen und ipsilateralen kranialen vegetativen Symptomen (Konjunktivar\u00f6tung, Tr\u00e4nenfluss). Die Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:15.000. Das Syndrom ist etwas h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht (m:w=1,5:1). Das mittlere Erkrankungsalter ist etwa 50 Jahre. Einige wenige Kinder mit SUNCT-Syndrom wurden beschrieben. Die Krankheit wird mit strikt einseitigen mittelschweren bis schweren Schmerzattacken manifest. Die Schmerzen werden als pochend, schneidend oder stechend beschrieben. Gew\u00f6hnlich ist der Augenast des Trigeminus betroffen, selten k\u00f6nnen auch alle Teile des Kopfes betroffen sein. In den meisten F\u00e4llen werden die Schmerzattacken durch Hautreize (nicht aber durch Alkohol oder Nitroglyzerin) ausgel\u00f6st. Auch spontan auftretende Attacken wurden beschrieben. In typischen F\u00e4llen treten am Tag 50 bis 100 Attacken von jeweils 1 bis 5 Minuten Dauer auf. Regelm\u00e4\u00dfig sind sie begleitet von ipsilateraler starker Konjunktivar\u00f6tung und Tr\u00e4nenfluss. Schwellung der Nasenschleimhaut und Sekretfluss sind h\u00e4ufig. Die Attacken treten vor allem am Tag auf. \u00c4tiologie und Pathogenese sind unklar. Trauma, arterio-ven\u00f6se Fehlbildungen und Hypophysen-adenome sind evtl. urs\u00e4chlich beteiligt. Die Diagnose wird klinisch gestellt. Die wichtigste Differentialdiagnose ist die Trigeminusneuralgie. Es ist sehr wichtig, das SUNCT-Syndrom von anderen autonomen Trigeminus-Kopfschmerzen (Cluster-Kopfschmerz, paroxysmale Hemikranie, sh. diese Termini) abzugrenzen, da jedes dieser Syndrome hochselektiv auf die Therapie anspricht. Eine kurative Behandlung des evtl. mit erheblichen Beschwerden verbundenen SUNCT-Syndroms gibt es nicht. Hilfreich kann die Gabe von Carbamazepin, Lamotrigin, Gabapentin oder Topiramat sein. Sauerstoff, an\u00e4sthetische Blockaden und Behandlung mit Sumatriptan oder Indomethacin, die bei anderen autonomen Trigeminus-Kopfschmerzen hilfreich sind, haben bei Patienten mit SUNCT-Syndrom nur eine geringe oder keine Wirkung. In schweren F\u00e4llen k\u00f6nnen verschiedene chirurgische Techniken erwogen werden (mikrovaskul\u00e4re Dekompression der Trigeminuswurzel, Ballon-Kompression des Trigeminusganglions, Opioid-Blockade des oberen zervikalen Ganglions).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare primary headache disorder characterized by unilateral trigeminal pain that occurs in association with ipsilateral cranial autonomic symptoms (conjunctival injection and tearing).", "synonyms": "Short-lasting unilateral neuralgiform headache attacks with conjunctival injection and tearing, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G44.8", "umls": "C1262087", "mesh": "D050798", "gard": "9257", "meddra": "10061981", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is estimated at approximately 1 in 15,000. It is slightly more predominant in males (male-to-female ratio of 1.5:1), with a mean age of onset of around 50 years. A few cases of SUNCT/SUNA syndrome have been reported in children.", "clinical_description": "The disease manifests with strictly unilateral pain attacks of moderate-to-severe or very severe intensity. The pain is described as throbbing, sharp or stabbing. It usually involves the ophthalmic division of the trigeminal nerve and, less commonly, may involve any part of the head. In the majority of cases, the pain attacks are triggered by cutaneous stimuli (and not by alcohol or nitroglycerin). Spontaneous attacks have also been described. The typical SUNCT/SUNA patient may have 50 to 100 short attacks a day, lasting for 1 to 5 minutes. The attacks predominate during the daytime. Prominent, ipsilateral conjunctival injection and lacrimation regularly accompany the attacks. Nasal stuffiness and rhinorrhea are frequent.", "etiology": "Etiopathology remains unclear. Trauma, arteriovenous malformations and pituitary adenomas may have a causative role.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is made after a careful history with attention to the features of the disorder as set out in the International Classification of Headache Disorders, 3rd Edition, careful physical examination and relevant investigations. Particular features of note are the relative brevity of lateralised attacks, their triggerability and the absence of a refractory period to stimulation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Trigeminal neuralgia is the major differential diagnosis. It is very important to differentiate SUNCT/SUNA syndrome from other trigeminal autonomic cephalgias such as cluster headache and paroxysmal hemicrania, as each of these syndromes have a highly selective response to treatment.", "management_and_treatment": "There is no cure for SUNCT/SUNA syndrome. Patients may benefit from administration of lamotrigine, topiramate, gabapentin or carbamazepine. Oxygen, anaesthetic blockades, and sumatriptan or indomethacin therapies, known to be effective in other trigeminal autonomic cephalgias, have little or no effect in SUNCT syndrome. In severe cases, surgical techniques, such as microvascular trigeminal nerve root decompression, have been considered.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is guarded in that most patients will continue to have attacks over many years."}, {"name": "Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems", "sub_name": "Superfizielle Siderose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die oberfl\u00e4chliche Siderose ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch eine progrediente Innenohrschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, pyramidale Zeichen und spezifischen Befunden im Neuroimaging gekennzeichnet ist, die H\u00e4mosiderinablagerungen in den spinalen und kranialen Leptomeningen und der subpialen Schicht zeigen. Die Krankheit schreitet langsam voran und die Patienten k\u00f6nnen sich mit leichter kognitiver Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, Nystagmus, Dysmetrie, Spastik, Dysdiadochokinese, Dysarthrie, Hyperreflexie und Babinski-Zeichen pr\u00e4sentieren. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale sind Demenz, Harninkontinenz, Anosmie, Verlust der Geschmacksempfindung und Anisokorie.", "synonyms": "H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des ZNS, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle Siderose des ZNS, Superfizielle Siderose des Zentralnervensystems, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "I69.0"}, {"name": "Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des ZNS", "sub_name": "Superfizielle Siderose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die oberfl\u00e4chliche Siderose ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch eine progrediente Innenohrschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, pyramidale Zeichen und spezifischen Befunden im Neuroimaging gekennzeichnet ist, die H\u00e4mosiderinablagerungen in den spinalen und kranialen Leptomeningen und der subpialen Schicht zeigen. Die Krankheit schreitet langsam voran und die Patienten k\u00f6nnen sich mit leichter kognitiver Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, Nystagmus, Dysmetrie, Spastik, Dysdiadochokinese, Dysarthrie, Hyperreflexie und Babinski-Zeichen pr\u00e4sentieren. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale sind Demenz, Harninkontinenz, Anosmie, Verlust der Geschmacksempfindung und Anisokorie.", "synonyms": "H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des ZNS, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle Siderose des ZNS, Superfizielle Siderose des Zentralnervensystems, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "I69.0"}, {"name": "Superfizielle Siderose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die oberfl\u00e4chliche Siderose ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch eine progrediente Innenohrschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, pyramidale Zeichen und spezifischen Befunden im Neuroimaging gekennzeichnet ist, die H\u00e4mosiderinablagerungen in den spinalen und kranialen Leptomeningen und der subpialen Schicht zeigen. Die Krankheit schreitet langsam voran und die Patienten k\u00f6nnen sich mit leichter kognitiver Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, Nystagmus, Dysmetrie, Spastik, Dysdiadochokinese, Dysarthrie, Hyperreflexie und Babinski-Zeichen pr\u00e4sentieren. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale sind Demenz, Harninkontinenz, Anosmie, Verlust der Geschmacksempfindung und Anisokorie.", "synonyms": "H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des ZNS, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle Siderose des ZNS, Superfizielle Siderose des Zentralnervensystems, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "I69.0"}, {"name": "Superfizielle Siderose des Zentralnervensystems", "sub_name": "Superfizielle Siderose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die oberfl\u00e4chliche Siderose ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch eine progrediente Innenohrschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, pyramidale Zeichen und spezifischen Befunden im Neuroimaging gekennzeichnet ist, die H\u00e4mosiderinablagerungen in den spinalen und kranialen Leptomeningen und der subpialen Schicht zeigen. Die Krankheit schreitet langsam voran und die Patienten k\u00f6nnen sich mit leichter kognitiver Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, Nystagmus, Dysmetrie, Spastik, Dysdiadochokinese, Dysarthrie, Hyperreflexie und Babinski-Zeichen pr\u00e4sentieren. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale sind Demenz, Harninkontinenz, Anosmie, Verlust der Geschmacksempfindung und Anisokorie.", "synonyms": "H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des ZNS, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle Siderose des ZNS, Superfizielle Siderose des Zentralnervensystems, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "I69.0"}, {"name": "Superfizielle Siderose des ZNS", "sub_name": "Superfizielle Siderose", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die oberfl\u00e4chliche Siderose ist eine seltene neurologische Erkrankung, die durch eine progrediente Innenohrschwerh\u00f6rigkeit, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie, pyramidale Zeichen und spezifischen Befunden im Neuroimaging gekennzeichnet ist, die H\u00e4mosiderinablagerungen in den spinalen und kranialen Leptomeningen und der subpialen Schicht zeigen. Die Krankheit schreitet langsam voran und die Patienten k\u00f6nnen sich mit leichter kognitiver Beeintr\u00e4chtigung, Nystagmus, Dysmetrie, Spastik, Dysdiadochokinese, Dysarthrie, Hyperreflexie und Babinski-Zeichen pr\u00e4sentieren. Zus\u00e4tzliche Merkmale sind Demenz, Harninkontinenz, Anosmie, Verlust der Geschmacksempfindung und Anisokorie.", "synonyms": "H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des ZNS, Superfizielle H\u00e4mosiderose des Zentralnervensystems, Superfizielle Siderose des ZNS, Superfizielle Siderose des Zentralnervensystems, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "I69.0"}, {"name": "Superiore limbische Keratokonjunktivitis Theodore", "sub_name": "Keratokonjunktivitis, limbische superiore", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare disorder of the anterior segment of the eye characterized by unilateral or bilateral, chronic and recurrent inflammation affecting the upper tarsal and bulbar conjunctiva, as well as the superior limbus, manifesting as a papillary reaction on the upper tarsal conjunctiva, thickening and folding of redundant superior bulbar conjunctiva, and superficial punctate epithelial keratitis with or without filament formation near the superior corneal limbus. Middle-aged women are most commonly affected and present with foreign body sensation, frequent blinking, burning sensation, and pruritus, among others.", "synonyms": "SLK, Theodore superior limbic keratoconjunctivitis, Theodore syndrome, ", "icd_10": "H16.2", "umls": "C0339229", "gard": "10940"}, {"name": "Superior mesenteric artery syndrome", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Supernumerary der(22)-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Emanuel-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Emanuel-Syndrom, eine konstitutionelle genomische St\u00f6rung, ist verursacht durch ein \u00fcberz\u00e4hliges Derivat-22-Chromosom. Symptome sind: Schwere geistige Behinderung, charakteristische faziale Dysmorphien (Mikrogenie, gebogene Lider, schr\u00e4g nach oben verlaufende Lidspalten, tiefliegende Augen, tief h\u00e4ngende Nasenscheidewand, langes Philtrum), angeborene Herzfehler und Nierenfehlbildungen.", "synonyms": "Supernumerary der(22)-Syndrom, der(22)t(11;22)-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q92.6", "OMIM": "609029", "UMLS": "C1836929", "MeSH": "C535733", "GARD": "9835"}, {"name": "Superoinferiore Ventrikellage", "sub_name": "Criss-Cross-Herz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Criss-cross-Herz (CCH) ist eine kardiale Fehlbildung, bei der sich die Zufl\u00fcsse der beiden Ventrikel (wegen einer Verdrehung des Herzens um seine Hauptachse) \u00fcberkreuzen. Die klinischen Symptome werden durch die jeweilig auftretenden Herzfehler bestimmt, z.B. einfache oder korrigierte Transposition der gro\u00dfen Arterien und Ventrikelseptumdefekte.", "synonyms": "Atrio-ventrikul\u00e4re Verbindungen, verdrehte, Superoinferiore Ventrikellage, \u00dcberkreuzte atrioventrikul\u00e4re Verh\u00e4ltnisse, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q24.8", "UMLS": "C0010334", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des CCH bei Geburt betr\u00e4gt unter den Lebendgeborenen 1 /125, 000 und macht <0.1% aller angeborenen Herzfehler aus.", "clinical_description": "CCH manifestiert sich schon bei Geburt mit schwerer Dyspnoe, Nasenfl\u00fcgeln, eingezogener Sternumkerbe, subkostalen und interkostalen Einziehungen, Schwitzen, Zyanose und Bl\u00e4sse. Weitere Zeichen sind: F\u00fctterprobleme, systolisches Herzger\u00e4usch am linken Sternumrand und akzentuierter zweiter Herzton, abh\u00e4ngig vom jeweils vorliegenden Herzfehler. Die h\u00e4ufigsten begleitenden Fehler sind Ventrikelseptumdefekt (VSD), vollst\u00e4ndige oder anatomisch korrigierte Transposition der gro\u00dfen Gef\u00e4\u00dfe, Double outlet right ventricle, periphere Pulmonalstenose, spreizende (straddling) Mitral- oder Trikuspidalklappe, Mitralstenose und subpulmonale, subaortale oder supravalvul\u00e4re Aortenstenose (s. diese Termini).", "etiology": "Ursache des CCH ist eine w\u00e4hrend der Embryonalentwicklung auftretende abnorme Rotation (im oder gegen Uhrzeigersinn) der Ventrikelmasse um die L\u00e4ngsachse des Herzens. Die Pathogenese des CCH ist unklar, jedoch weisen einige Untersuchungen an M\u00e4usen auf eine Rolle des Gja1-Gens. (GAP junction protein, alpha-1; 6q22)", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch zweidimensionale und Farb-Doppler-Echokardiographie best\u00e4tigt: Die atrio-ventrikul\u00e4ren (AV) Verbindungen sind auf H\u00f6he der AV-Klappen vollst\u00e4ndig gekreuzt. Ein charakteristischer 4-Kammer-Blicks kann nicht eingestellt werden. Die biventrikul\u00e4re Funktion ist normal, in der Regel bestehen jedoch perimembran\u00f6se Ventrikelseptumdefekte. Diagnostische Anomalien des Koronarkreislaufs werden durch MRI und Angiographie erfasst.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Spreizende (straddling) Mitral- oder Trikuspidalklappe, schwere Formen der Ebstein-Anomalie (die Trikuspidalklappe m\u00fcndet im Infundibulum, wodurch der Eindruck gekreuzter Klappen entsteht) (s. diese Termini) und doppelter Vorhofausgang (einer der Ausg\u00e4nge kreuzt scheinbar die andere Klappe).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik ist durch Nachweis der zwei wichtigsten CCH-Symptome mit Farb-Doppler-Sonographie m\u00f6glich: In der Standard-Transversalebene des fetalen Thorax kann (i) ein 4CV nicht eingestellt werden und wird (ii) die gekreuzte Anordnung der Zufl\u00fcsse zu den beiden Ventrikeln sichtbar.", "management_and_treatment": "Die chirurgische Behandlung des CCH besteht in der Korrektur gro\u00dfer und funktionell einschr\u00e4nkender Fehlbildungen, die Ventrikelrotation selbst muss nicht korrigiert werden. Die ersten Behandlungsschritte werden durch das Vorhandensein oder Fehlen einer Pulmonalstenose bestimmt. Bei ungen\u00fcgendem Pulmonalisfluss ist eine fr\u00fche Intervention mit Prostaglandin E1 indiziert um den Ductus arteriosus offenzuhalten. Wenn die anatomische Korrektur der Stenose nicht gelingt, kann der Pulmonalisfluss durch einen Shunt zum Systemkreislauf ausgeglichen werden. Die Art der chirurgischen Korrektur wird bestimmt durch die potentiell notwendigen Eingriffe an beiden Ventrikeln. Eine palliative Option ist die Fontan-Korrektur. Bei Assoziation des CCH mit Transposition der gro\u00dfen Arterien, VSD, Vorhofseptumdefekt oder offenem Ductus arteriosus (s. diese Termini) kann der chirurgische Arterienaustausch nach Jatene empfohlen werden.", "prognosis": "Ohne chirurgische Behandlung ist die Prognose ung\u00fcnstig. Nach Korrektur des haupts\u00e4chlichen Defektes ist jedoch eine normale k\u00f6rperliche, psychomotorische und kardiovaskul\u00e4re Entwicklung m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des CCH bei Geburt betr\u00e4gt unter den Lebendgeborenen 1 /125, 000 und macht <0.1% aller angeborenen Herzfehler aus."}, {"name": "Suppurative Myositis", "sub_name": "Pyomyositis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Pyomyositis (PM) ist eine seltene, prim\u00e4r bakterielle Infektion des Skelettmuskels und resultiert meist aus h\u00e4matogener Streuung oder einer Verletzung des Muskels. Der betroffene Muskel schmerzt und ist druckempfindlich. Es besteht Fieber, Abszessbildung ist m\u00f6glich.", "synonyms": "Myositis purulenta tropica, Myositis tropicans, Suppurative Myositis, Tropische Pyomyositis, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "M60.0", "UMLS": "C0041188\u00a0 C1704275", "MeSH": "D052880", "GARD": "4614", "MedDRA": "10037652", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. PM tritt in den Tropen auf und ist endemisch in Ost-Uganda, wo j\u00e4hrlich \u00fcber 400-900 F\u00e4lle berichtet wird. In temperierten Regionen wie den USA nimmt die H\u00e4ufigkeit gegenw\u00e4rtig zu.", "clinical_description": "Die PM tritt in jedem Alter auf, h\u00e4ufiger im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht. In tropischen Regionen erkranken anderweitig gesunde, kr\u00e4ftige Individuen, vor allem Kinder (Alter 2-5 Jahre) und junge Erwachsene. In temperierten Regionen sind die meisten Patienten immungeschw\u00e4cht (durch Mangelern\u00e4hrung, Chemotherapie, Diabetes mellitus und HIV-Infektionen), oder sie sind chronisch nierenkrank oder haben eine rheumatoide Arthritis. Die am h\u00e4ufigsten befallenen Muskeln sind: Serratus anterior, Pectoralis major, Biceps, Bauch- und R\u00fcckenmuskeln, Glutaeus, Iliopsoas, Quadriceps und Gastrocnemius. Die Krankheit entwickelt sich in 3 Phasen. Das invasive Stadium dauert 1 bis 10 Tage und ist gekennzeichnet durch lokalisierte Muskel-Schmerzen und -Schwellung (ohne Erw\u00e4rmung oder Erythem) und geringes Fieber. Bei Pyomyositis des Iliopsoas werden Symptome wie bei einer Appendizitis angegeben. Das purulente oder suppurative Stadium folgt 2-3 Wochen nach Beginn der Symptome mit zunehmend schwerer fieberhafter Erkrankung und einer weichen und bei Ber\u00fchrung schmerzhaften Schwellung des Muskels. Unbehandelt geht das dritte Stadium in Sepsis \u00fcber, mit Bakteri\u00e4mie, Septik\u00e4mie, metastatischen Abszessen, akutem Nierenversagen, septischem Schock und Tod.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache ist nicht bekannt, aber Muskeltrauma oder gro\u00dfe Anstrengungen k\u00f6nnen eventuell den h\u00e4matogenen Zugang von Bakterien zur Skelettmuskulatur (die in der Regel gegen diese Art von Infektion resistent ist) erleichtern. Als m\u00f6glicher Eintrittsort der Bakterien werden Fibronectin-bindende Rezeptoren an den Muskelzellen diskutiert. In den meisten F\u00e4llen ist Staphylococcus aureus (SA) die Ursache (in bis zu 90 % der tropischen F\u00e4lle und in etwa 70 % der F\u00e4lle in temperierten Regionen). Aber auch Infektionen mit anderen Spezies (z. B. Streptokokken) wurden beschrieben. Methicillin-resistente SA (MRSA) werden bei der nicht-tropischen PM als Erreger h\u00e4ufiger.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die PM ist oft nur schwer zu diagnostizieren. Im purulenten Stadium kann in der Regel Eiter aus dem Muskel aspiriert werden, wodurch die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt wird. Wenn ein Abszess fehlt, k\u00f6nnen Kultur und Muskelbiopsie mit spezifischer F\u00e4rbung die verantwortlichen Bakterien in gleicher Weise identifizieren und andere M\u00f6glichkeiten ausschlie\u00dfen. Bildgebende Verfahren sind bei der Diagnose und Behandlung der PM hilfreich.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind parasit\u00e4re und virale Myositis, Leptospirose, Polymyositis, Trichinellose (siehe diese Termini), Osteomyelitis, Cellulitis, nekrotisierende Fasziitis, Clostridien-Muskelnekrose, septische Arthritis, tiefe Venenthrombose und Muskelprellungen, -h\u00e4matome, -risse oder -zerrungen.", "management_and_treatment": "Unerl\u00e4sslich ist eine fr\u00fche Diagnose und schnelle Behandlung mit Antibiotika. Wegen der gr\u00f6\u00dferen H\u00e4ufigkeit von MRSA sind Vancomycin, Teicoplanin, Tigecyclin, Daptomycin, Linezolid oder Daptomycin die Antibiotika der Wahl. In einigen F\u00e4llen kann die Behandlung mit Tetracyclin oder Trimethoprim-Sulfamethoxisol ausreichend sein. Bei Beteiligung mehrerer Muskeln, ungen\u00fcgend drainierten Infektionen, versp\u00e4tet begonnener Behandlung oder bei Infektionen mit Mykobakterien oder Bartonella m\u00fcssen die Antibiotika 3-4 Wochen oder l\u00e4nger angewendet werden. Abszesse werden mit Inzision, Wundreinigung und Muskeldrainage behandelt, in einigen F\u00e4llen durch gezielte Aspiration und nachfolgende antibiotische Therapie. Muskeldrainage ist in 40-70 % der F\u00e4lle erforderlich, wiederholte Drainage in 10 % der F\u00e4lle. Die Behandlung sollte fortgesetzt werden, bis der Patient 7-10 Tage fieberfrei, die Wunde sauber und die Leukozytenzahl wieder normalisiert ist.", "prognosis": "Bei korrekter Diagnose und angemessene Behandlung ist die Prognose g\u00fcnstig, und die Muskeln sind nur sehr wenig deformiert, wenn \u00fcberhaupt. Unbehandelt hat die PM eine Mortalit\u00e4tsrate von 0,5-2 %.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. PM tritt in den Tropen auf und ist endemisch in Ost-Uganda, wo j\u00e4hrlich \u00fcber 400-900 F\u00e4lle berichtet wird. In temperierten Regionen wie den USA nimmt die H\u00e4ufigkeit gegenw\u00e4rtig zu."}, {"name": "Suprabulb\u00e4re Parese, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Worster-Drought-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Worster-Drought-Syndrom (WDS) ist eine Form von Zerebralparese und gekennzeichnet durch eine kongenitale pseudobulb\u00e4re (suprabulb\u00e4re) Parese mit selektiver Schw\u00e4che der Lippen, der Zunge und des weichen Gaumens, sowie durch Dysphagie, Dysphonie, Speichelfluss und ruckartige Kieferbewegungen.", "synonyms": "Suprabulb\u00e4re Parese, kongenitale, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G80.8", "OMIM": "185480", "UMLS": "C0796204", "MeSH": "C536747", "GARD": "5598", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:25.000-30.000. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist bevorzugt betroffen (m:w = 3:1). Das mittlere Alter bei der Diagnose betr\u00e4gt 6 Jahre.", "clinical_description": "Die haupts\u00e4chlichen klinischen Symptome sind von fr\u00fchem Alter an Spastizit\u00e4t und eingeschr\u00e4nkte Beweglichkeit der perioralen Region und der Kehle, sowie ruckartige Kieferbewegungen. In schweren F\u00e4llen sind auch die Kehlkopf- und Rachenmuskulatur betroffen. Epilepsie, Lernschwierigkeiten und Verhaltensauff\u00e4lligkeiten sind h\u00e4ufig. Bei bis zu 40% der Patienten treten eine pyramidale Tetraplegie, sezernierende Otitis media ('glue ear'), Aspirationen mit rezidivierenden Atemwegsinfekten und gastro-\u00f6sophagealer Reflux auf. Das WDS ist mit bilateralen L\u00e4sionen des kortiko-bulb\u00e4ren Traktes assoziiert. Involviert sind die Hirnnerven VII, X und XII.", "etiology": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, es wurde aber auch mehrere Familien mit mehr als 1 Betroffenen berichtet. Die Vererbung in diesen Familien schien einem autosomal-dominanten Muster mit variabler Expressivit\u00e4t und unvollst\u00e4ndiger Penetranz zu folgen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Anamnese, klinischer Befund und die Untersuchung mit Magnetresonanz-Bildgebung.", "differential_diagnosis": "Wichtigste Differentialdiagnose ist die Bilaterale perisylvische Polymikrogyrie (s. dort), die mit schwerer Epilepsie einhergeht. Klinische \u00dcberschneidungen des WDS mit der Kongenitalen bilateralen perisylvischen Polymikrogyrie und dem Foix-Chavany-Marie-Syndrom (s. diese Termini) l\u00e4sst einige Autoren an die M\u00f6glichkeit denken, dass diese drei Krankheiten ein Kontinuum repr\u00e4sentieren.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Art der Betreuung wird durch das Ausma\u00df der Ess- und Sprachst\u00f6rung bestimmt und erfordert ein multidisziplin\u00e4res therapeutisches Vorgehen unter Beteiligung von P\u00e4diatern, Sprachtherapeuten und therapeutische P\u00e4dagogen. Kinder mit Epilepsie werden antikonvulsiv behandelt. Der Verlauf des WDS ist station\u00e4r.", "prognosis": "Bei angemessener Behandlung der Nahrungsprobleme, der Epilepsie und der respiratorischen Komplikationen ist die allgemeine Prognose gut.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt etwa 1:25.000-30.000. Das m\u00e4nnliche Geschlecht ist bevorzugt betroffen (m:w = 3:1). Das mittlere Alter bei der Diagnose betr\u00e4gt 6 Jahre."}, {"name": "Supratentorielles Ependymom mit C11ORF95-RELA-Fusion", "sub_name": "RELA-Fusion-positives Ependymom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare ependymal tumor characterized by the presence of a RELA fusion gene. This supratentorial grade II or III ependymoma most often occurs in children and young adults. Histopathological features are variable, but a distinctive vascular pattern of branching capillaries or clear-cell change are common. Patients may present with focal neurological deficits, seizures, or features of raised intracranial pressure. Prognosis is worse than in other supratentorial ependymomas.", "synonyms": "Supratentorial C11ORF95-RELA fused ependymoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "C71.0"}, {"name": "Supratip-Dysplasie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Supratip dysplasia is a rare, congenital, non-syndromic, nose and cavum malformation characterized by the presence of a bulbous, soft tissue hypertrophy located in the middle-to-distal third of the nasal dorsum, in association with deformed, slightly laterally- and caudally-placed nasal alae and a scar-like atrophic skin lesion located at the nasal tip. Respiratory function is not affected.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "J34.8"}, {"name": "Supravalvul\u00e4rer Mitralring, kongenitaler", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Congenital supravalvular mitral ring is a rare, congenital, mitral valve malformation characterized by an abnormal ridge of the connective tissue on the atrial side of the mitral valve, which can present clinically with signs and symptoms of left ventricle inflow obstruction (dyspnea, tachypnea, pulmonary hypertension, right ventricle hypertrophy, pulmonary edema). Association with other mitral valve anomalies, aortic stenosis, ventricular septal defect, patent ductus arteriosus, double-outlet right ventricle, pulmonary hypertension, and Shone complex has been reported.", "icd_10": "Q23.2"}, {"name": "SURF1-abh\u00e4ngige Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein Subtyp der Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4, der durch den Beginn einer schweren, progressiven, demyelinisierenden sensomotorischen Neuropathie im Kindesalter gekennzeichnet ist. Die Krankheit manifestiert sich durch distale Muskelschw\u00e4che und Atrophie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, distale sensorische Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (Vibration und Nadelreiz) der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Laktatazidose, Areflexie und stark reduzierte motorische Nervenleitgeschwindigkeiten (25 m/s oder weniger). Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch Kyphoskoliose, Nystagmus, H\u00f6rverlust, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie und/oder MRT-Anomalien des Gehirns (putaminale und periaqu\u00e4duktale L\u00e4sionen) aufweisen.", "synonyms": "CMT4K, Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4K, SURF1-abh\u00e4ngige CMT4, SURF1-bedingte schwere demyelinisierende Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G60.0", "OMIM": "616684"}, {"name": "SURF1-abh\u00e4ngige Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Neuropathie Typ 1", "sub_name": "PMP2-abh\u00e4ngige Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare autosomal dominant hereditary demyelinating motor and sensory neuropathy characterized by progressive distal muscle weakness and atrophy, distal sensory impairment, and decreased or absent reflexes in the affected limbs, with an onset in the first or second decade of life. Median motor nerve conduction velocities are typically less than 38 m/s. Patients often have foot deformities. Sural nerve biopsy shows decrease in myelinated fibers, myelin abnormalities, and onion bulb formation. Fatty replacement of muscle tissue predominantly affects the anterior and lateral compartment of the lower legs.", "synonyms": "PMP2-related CMT1, PMP2-related Charcot-Marie-Tooth neuropathy type 1, PMP2-related hereditary motor and sensory neuropathy type 1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent", "icd_10": "G60.0", "omim": "618279"}, {"name": "SURF1-abh\u00e4ngige CMT4", "sub_name": "SURF1-abh\u00e4ngige Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein Subtyp der Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4, der durch den Beginn einer schweren, progressiven, demyelinisierenden sensomotorischen Neuropathie im Kindesalter gekennzeichnet ist. Die Krankheit manifestiert sich durch distale Muskelschw\u00e4che und Atrophie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, distale sensorische Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (Vibration und Nadelreiz) der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Laktatazidose, Areflexie und stark reduzierte motorische Nervenleitgeschwindigkeiten (25 m/s oder weniger). Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch Kyphoskoliose, Nystagmus, H\u00f6rverlust, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie und/oder MRT-Anomalien des Gehirns (putaminale und periaqu\u00e4duktale L\u00e4sionen) aufweisen.", "synonyms": "CMT4K, Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4K, SURF1-abh\u00e4ngige CMT4, SURF1-bedingte schwere demyelinisierende Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G60.0", "OMIM": "616684"}, {"name": "SURF1-bedingte schwere demyelinisierende Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit", "sub_name": "SURF1-abh\u00e4ngige Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein Subtyp der Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4, der durch den Beginn einer schweren, progressiven, demyelinisierenden sensomotorischen Neuropathie im Kindesalter gekennzeichnet ist. Die Krankheit manifestiert sich durch distale Muskelschw\u00e4che und Atrophie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe, distale sensorische Beeintr\u00e4chtigung (Vibration und Nadelreiz) der unteren Gliedma\u00dfen, Laktatazidose, Areflexie und stark reduzierte motorische Nervenleitgeschwindigkeiten (25 m/s oder weniger). Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch Kyphoskoliose, Nystagmus, H\u00f6rverlust, zerebell\u00e4re Ataxie und/oder MRT-Anomalien des Gehirns (putaminale und periaqu\u00e4duktale L\u00e4sionen) aufweisen.", "synonyms": "CMT4K, Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit Typ 4K, SURF1-abh\u00e4ngige CMT4, SURF1-bedingte schwere demyelinisierende Charcot-Marie-Tooth-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "G60.0", "OMIM": "616684"}, {"name": "Susac-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz des SS ist nicht bekannt. Weltweit wurde bisher \u00fcber mehr als 300 F\u00e4lle berichtet. Junge Frauen (20-40 Jahre) sind h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als M\u00e4nner (w:m 3,5:1).", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare systemic or rheumatologic disease characterized by the triad of central nervous system (CNS) dysfunction, branch retinal artery occlusions (BRAOs) and sensorineural hearing loss (SNHL) due to autoimmune-mediated occlusions of microvessels in the brain, retina, and inner ear.", "synonyms": "Retinocochleocerebral vasculopathy, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I67.7", "umls": "C2717757", "mesh": "D055955", "gard": "7713", "meddra": "10071573", "epidemiology": "Susac syndrome (SuS) prevalence is still unknown. To date more than 500 cases have been reported worldwide. Young females (20-40 years) are more affected (female: male ratio 3.5:1). The age at onset ranges from 8 to 72 years (mean age: 32 years).", "clinical_description": "Characteristic is a triad of encephalopathy (cognitive and behavioral disturbances, personality changes, psychosis, preceding headaches) and/or focal CNS dysfunction, visual dysfunction due to BRAO and SNHL. The components of the triad may not be concomitantly present and may develop successively. Three major disease courses have been suggested: monocyclic (fluctuating disease that self-limits after a maximum period of 2 years), polycyclic (relapses that continue beyond a 2 years period) and chronic-continuous.", "etiology": "The etiology and precise pathophysiology are not yet clear. According to recent data, clonally expanding autoreactive cytotoxic CD8+ T cells cause inflammation-mediated injury of the microvascular endothelium which leads to swelling of endothelial cells, vessel occlusion in the affected organ and finally micro-ischaemic damage and dysfunction.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is based on the demonstration of the typical triad. There is no singular ''marker'' of SuS. Beside the clinical examination, most relevant diagnostic tools are brain magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), retinal fluorescein angiography (FA), and audiometry. In the acute phase, T2 weighted brain MRI often shows blurry lesions in the central fibers of the corpus callosum (''snowball lesions'') which later convert into sharply defined ''punched out'' lesions. Periventricular lesions and involvement of cerebellum, brain stem and deep grey matter nuclei are also often present. FA demonstrates BRAO and fluorescein leakage, often in the retinal periphery (may then be clinically silent). Audiometry analysis reveals uni- or bilateral SNHL. Cerebrospinal fluid analysis often shows mild pleocytosis and moderate protein elevation, oligoclonal bands are uncommon. Anti endothelial cell antibodies have been reported in some cases. An early and reliable diagnosis is facilitated by application of the validated diagnostic criteria of the European Susac Consortium (EUSAC).", "differential_diagnosis": "Inflammatory demyelinating CNS disease (such as multiple sclerosis, acute disseminated encephalitis, neuromyelitis optica spectrum disorders), autoimmune encephalitis, and various other diseases involving CNS, retina, and inner ear (including infections, malignancies, psychotic disorders, cerebrovascular disease, migraine, Meniere disease, isolated BRAO) and a variety of autoimmune diseases such as Cogan syndrome, Eales disease, autoimmune inner-ear disease, polyarteritis nodosa, Wegener granulomatosis, Churg-Strauss syndrome, systemic lupus erythematosus, antiphospholipid syndrome, Sj\u00f6gren syndrome and Beh\u00e7et disease.", "management_and_treatment": "No evidence-based treatment strategies exist. Empirically, pulsed glucocorticosteroid treatment is effective in the acute phase. In severe cases treatment may be complemented by cyclophosphamide and/or intravenous immunoglobulins (ivIG), methotrexate (MTX), azathioprine (AZA) or mycophenolate mofetil (MMF). After stabilization glucocorticosteroids should be very slowly tapered. Long term immunosuppressive treatment by MTX, AZA, MMF, and/or ivIG is usually necessary. More recently, positive experiences have been reported with monoclonal antibodies such as rituximab, natalizumab, and infliximab. Patients with severe hearing loss may benefit from cochlear implants.", "prognosis": "The disease usually self-limits after 2-4 years, Late relapses after decades have been reported. The final outcome shows a large variability of disability ranging from unimpairment to dementia, deafness and blindness. The majority of patients retains variable degrees of cognitive, visual and/or hearing deficits."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Bakterieninfektion durch TLR Signalweg-Defizienz", "english": 0, "defenition": "Pyogene bakterielle Infektionen durch MyD88-Mangel ist ein prim\u00e4rer Immundefekt und gekennzeichnet durch pyogene bakterielle Infektionen, einschlie\u00dflich invasiver Pneumokokken-, Staphylokokken- und Pseudomonas-Infektionen.", "synonyms": "MyD88-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "612260", "UMLS": "C2677092", "GARD": "12638", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, nur 24 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit beginnt im Kindesalter mit rezidivierenden lebensbedrohlichen pyogenen bakteriellen Infektionen mit Streptococcus pneumoniae, Staphylococcus aureus oder Pseudomonas aeruginosa. Gegen die meisten anderen Erreger sind die Patienten in der Regel resistent. Diese Pr\u00e4disposition zu lebensbedrohlichen Infektionen scheint nur vor\u00fcbergehend zu bestehen: Bei den bisher beschriebenen F\u00e4llen dauerte sie die ersten 10 Lebensjahre an. Akutphasen-Reaktionen, wie Sie bei anderen invasiven Infektionen gesehen werden (erh\u00f6hte Temperatur, erh\u00f6hte Spiegel des C-reaktiven Proteins (CrP)) sind geringer oder fehlen ganz.", "etiology": "Der MyD88-Mangel unterdr\u00fcckt die Zytokin-Antworten der Blutzellen. Ursache sind Mutationen im MYD88-Gen (3p22-3p21.3).", "diagnostic_methods": "An MyD88-Mangel soll bei Patienten mit rezidivierenden pyogenen bakteriellen Infektionen gedacht werden. Der diagnostische Verdacht folgt aus dem Befund fehlender Produktion von inflammatorischen Zytokinen nach Aktivierung mit IL-1\u00df oder Toll-like-Rezeptoragonisten. Durch Nachweis von Mutationen im MYD88-Gen wird die Diagnose best\u00e4tigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind (i) der Interleukin-1-Rezeptor-assoziierte Kinase-4 (IRAK4)-Mangel (s. dort), der durch das Fehlen von Mutationen im IRAK4-Gen ausgeschlossen wird; (ii) der Mangel des essentiellen NF-\u03baB Modulators (NEMO) und (iii) der Mangel des Inhibitors des essentiellen NF-\u03baB Modulators (I\u03baB-\u03b1) (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannter Mutation in der Familie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik nach Chorionzottenbiopsie m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Den betroffenen Familien soll eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt und wurde in konsanguinen und nicht-konsanguinen Familien gesehen.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung basiert auf prophylaktischer Antibiotika-Therapie, um Infektionen vorzubeugen. Zus\u00e4tzlich kann eine IgG-Substitution erwogen werden, besonders f\u00fcr Patienten mit gest\u00f6rtem Antik\u00f6rperantworten auf Polysaccharide. Der wichtigste Rat an Familien und \u00c4rzte von MyD88-defizienten Patienten ist es, sobald als m\u00f6glich mit einer empirischen antibiotischen Behandlung gegen Streptococcus pneumoniae, Staphylococcus aureus und Pseudomonas aeruginosa zu beginnen, wenn eine Infektion vermutet wird oder wenn der Patient ein moderates Fieber entwickelt. Entz\u00fcndungsparameter d\u00fcrfen hierbei nicht ber\u00fccksichtigt werden, da die Patienten trotz angemessener Prophylaxe an den Folgen einer schnellen invasiven bakteriellen Infektion versterben k\u00f6nnen. Wenn der verursachende Keim dokumentiert worden ist, kann sekund\u00e4r die antibiotische Behandlung angepasst werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose im S\u00e4uglingsalter und in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit ist ung\u00fcnstig, besonders wenn \u00c4rzten und Eltern die Diagnose nicht bekannt ist. Mit angemessener prophylaktischer Antibiotika-Therapie verbessert sich f\u00fcr die meisten Patienten die Prognose, da mit zunehmendem Alter die H\u00e4ufigkeit der Infektionen abnimmt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, nur 24 F\u00e4lle wurden bisher beschrieben."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Infektionen durch TYK2-Mangel", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Susceptibility to infection due to TYK2 deficiency is a rare primary immunodeficiency characterized by increased susceptibility to intracellular bacterial and viral infection, with or without increased serum IgE. Clinical manifestations are highly variable, depending on the infection type and location, and can include recurrent otitis, sinusitis, pulmonary and cutaneous infections, meningitis and internal abscesses.", "synonyms": "Autosomal recessive hyper-IgE syndrome due to TYK2 deficiency, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "D82.4", "omim": "611521", "umls": "C1969086"}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr lokalisierte juvenile Periodontitis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare functional neutrophil defect characterized by increased susceptibility to aggressive periodontitis in otherwise young, healthy individuals, due to impaired polymorphonuclear leukocyte chemotaxis toward bacterial formylpeptides. The periodontitis is rapidly progressive with progredient destruction of periodontal tissue and attachment loss.", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adolescent", "icd_10": "D71"}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen durch kompletten IFN-gamma-R1-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die monogen vererbte Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen (MSMD) durch vollst\u00e4ndigen Mangel des Interferon-gamma-Rezeptors 1 (IFN-gammaR1) ist eine genetische Variante der MSMD (siehe dort). Der vollst\u00e4ndige IFN-gammaR1-Mangel beeintr\u00e4chtigt die IFN-gamma-Immunit\u00e4t mit der Folge schwerer, oft letal verlaufender Infektionen mit dem Bazillus Calmette-Gu\u00e9rin (BCG) und anderen Mykobakterien aus der Umwelt (EM).", "synonyms": "MSMD durch kompletten IFN-gamma-R1-Defekt, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien bei vollst\u00e4ndigem Interferon-Gamma-Rezeptor 1-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "209950", "UMLS": "C2930924", "MeSH": "C535530", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Schwere und oft letal verlaufende BCG- und EM-Infektionen beginnen in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit (vor dem Alter von 3 Jahren), d.h., der vollst\u00e4ndige Rezeptormangel ist klinisch schon fr\u00fch vollst\u00e4ndig ausgepr\u00e4gt. Zu den h\u00e4ufigsten Pathogenen z\u00e4hlen Mycobacterium fortuitum, M. chelonae, M. smegmatis und M. peregrinum. Die Infektion ist disseminiert und kann Weichteile, Knochenmark, Lungen, Haut, Knochen und Lymphknoten befallen. Symptome sind Fieber, Gewichtsverlust, Hepatosplenomegalie, Lymphadenopathien und lepromat\u00f6se L\u00e4sionen. Eine Salmonellose wird bei etwa 5% der Patienten gesehen. In einem Fall wurden weitere Infektionen mit Cytomegalovirus, Listeria monocytogenes und humanem Herpes-Virus 8 beschrieben.", "etiology": "Ursache der MSMD durch vollst\u00e4ndigen IFN-gammaR1-Mangel sind Mutationen im IFNGR1-Gen (6q23-q24). Dieses Gen kodiert die ligandenbindende Kette des IFN-gamma-Rezeptors, und eine Mutation f\u00fchrt zum Stopp des IFN-gammaR1 an der Zelloberfl\u00e4che. Mehr als 21 urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen wurden bisher identifiziert, die meisten davon homozygot. Bisher wurden zwei klinisch ununterscheidbare Formen des vollst\u00e4ndigen IFN-gammaR1-Mangels definiert, eine Form mit und eine Form ohne Expression der Zelloberfl\u00e4chenrezeptoren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Laboranalysen gestellt. Die IFN-gamma-, IL-12p40- und IL-12p70-Spiegel werden nach Vollblut-Aktivierung durch BCG, BCG+IL-12 und BCG+IFN-gamma im ELISA bestimmt. Hohe IFN-gamma-Konzentrationen im Plasma weisen auf einen vollst\u00e4ndigen IFN-gammaR-Mangel hin. Leukozyten und Fibroblasten von Patienten mit diesem Immundefekt reagieren in vitro nicht auf IFN-gamma. Die Histologie der Lymphknoten zeigt unklar abgegrenzte und schwach differenzierte lepromat\u00f6se multibazill\u00e4re Granulome mit wenigen Riesenzellen. Gentests zeigen Mutationen im IFNGR1-Gen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind andere genetische \u00c4tiologien der MSMD, insbesondere der vollst\u00e4ndige IFN-gammaR2-Mangel (siehe jeweils dort), Chronisch-granulomat\u00f6se Erkrankung, Zystische Fibrose und Schwerer kombinierter Immundefekt (siehe jeweils dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Bei bekannter IFNGR1-Mutation ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die \u00dcbertragung erfolgt autosomal-rezessiv, eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die einzige kurative Behandlung bei MSMD mit vollst\u00e4ndigem IFN-gammaR1-Mangel ist die Transplantation blutbildender Stammzellen (HSCT). Da bei diesem Verfahren eine hohe Wahrscheinlichkeit der Absto\u00dfung besteht, f\u00f6rdert eine Behandlung mit IFN-gamma-depletierten Antik\u00f6rpern durch Verringerung der IFN-gamma-Spiegel vor der Transplantation einen positiven Ausgang. Wegen des Fehlens spezifischer Rezeptoren ist eine IFN-gamma-Behandlung nicht indiziert. Eine BCG-Impfung muss bei Patienten mit bekannter IFNGR1-Mutation vermieden werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig, die meisten Patienten versterben vor dem 10. Lebensjahr.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen durch kompletten IFN-gamma-R2-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen (MSMD) durch kompletten Defekt des Interferon-gamma-Rezeptors 2 (IFN-gammaR2) ist eine genetische Variante des MSMD (siehe dort). Die Folge des vollst\u00e4ndigen IFN-gammaR2-Mangels mit nicht messbarer IFN-gamma-Antwort sind schwere und oft t\u00f6dliche Infektionen mit Bazillus Calmette-Gu\u00e9rin (BCG) und anderen Mykobakterien aus der Umwelt (EM).", "synonyms": "MSMD durch kompletten IFNgammaR2-Defekt, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien bei vollst\u00e4ndigem Interferon gamma-Rezeptor 2-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "614889", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur 10 betroffene Kinder beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Schwere und oft letale BCG- und EM-Infektionen beginnen in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit (vor dem Alter von 3 Jahren). Zu den h\u00e4ufigsten bei den Patienten beobachteten Pathogenen z\u00e4hlen  Mycobacterium fortuitum, Mycobacterium bovis, BCG, Mycobacterium abscessus und Mycobacterium avium. Die Infektionen sind disseminiert und k\u00f6nnen die Weichteile, Knochenmark, Lungen, Haut, Knochen und Lymphknoten befallen. Symptome sind Fieber, Gewichtsverlust, Hepatosplenomegalie und Lymphadenopathien. Ein letaler Verlauf ist m\u00f6glich.", "etiology": "Ursache der Erkrankung sind Mutationen im IFNGR2-Gen (21q22.1-22.2), das die signalgebende Kette des IFN-gamma-Rezeptors kodiert, die f\u00fcr die IFN-gamma-vermittelte Immunit\u00e4t von entscheidender Bedeutung ist. Die beiden Formen mit bzw. ohne Proteinexpression auf der Zelloberfl\u00e4che sind klinisch nicht zu unterscheiden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Laboranalysen gestellt. Die IFN-gamma-, IL-12p40- und IL-12p70-Spiegel werden nach Vollblut-Aktivierung durch BCG, BCG+IL-12 und BCG+IFN-gamma im ELISA bestimmt. Leukozyten und Fibroblasten in Patienten mit diesem Immundefekt reagieren in vitro nicht auf IFN-gamma. Gentests zeigen Mutationen im IFNGR2-Gen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind neben anderen Varianten der MSMD, besonders dem vollst\u00e4ndigen IFN-gammaR1-Mangels (siehe dort). Chronische granulomat\u00f6se Erkrankung, Zystische Fibrose und Schwerer kombinierter Immundefekt (siehe jeweils dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Da diese Erkrankung oft letal verl\u00e4uft, wird Familien mit einer bekannten IFNGR2-Mutation eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose angeboten.", "genetic_counseling": "Die MSMD durch kompletten IFN-gammaR2-Defekt wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Die einzige kurative Therapie bei MSMD durch kompletten IFN-gammaR2-Defekt ist die Transplantation blutbildender Stammzellen (HSCT). Wegen des Fehlens spezifischer Rezeptoren ist eine IFN-gamma-Behandlung nicht indiziert. Eine BCG-Impfung muss bei Patienten mit bekannter IFNGR2-Mutation vermieden werden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur 10 betroffene Kinder beschrieben."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen durch kompletten IL12B-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen (MSMD) durch vollst\u00e4ndigen Mangel der Beta-Untereinheit des Interleukins 12 (IL12B) ist eine genetische Variante des MSMD (siehe dort), mit milden Bazillus Calmette-Gu\u00e9rin (BCG)- und rezidivierenden Salmonella-Infektionen.", "synonyms": "MSMD durch kompletten IL12B-Defekt, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien bei vollst\u00e4ndigem Interleukin 12B-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "614890", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden bei 49 Patienten aus 30 Familien aus Indien, Iran, Pakistan, Saudi-Arabien und Tunesien Mutationen gefunden.", "clinical_description": "Die Erkrankung wird in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit manifest. BCG ist die h\u00e4ufigste Infektion und tritt meist nach der Impfung auf. Nicht-typh\u00f6se Salmonella-Infektionen werden bei der H\u00e4lfte der F\u00e4lle beobachtet. Seltener beschrieben wurden chronische mukokutane Candidiasis (CMC), Nokardiose und Klebsiellose. Die klinische Penetranz dieses Immundefektes ist unvollst\u00e4ndig.", "etiology": "Ursache der MSMD durch vollst\u00e4ndigen IL12B-Mangel sind homozygote Mutationen im IL12B-Gen (5q31.1-q33.1), das die p40-Untereinheit des IL12 kodiert. Von den 9 bekannten IL12B-Mutationen waren 2 kleine Insertionen, 3 kleine Deletionen, 2 Splei\u00df-Mutationen, 1 gro\u00dfe Deletion und 1 Nonsense-Mutation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Laboranalysen gestellt. Die IFN-gamma-, IL12 p40- und IL12 p70-Spiegel k\u00f6nnen nach einer Vollblut-Aktivierung durch BCG, BCG+IL12 und BCG+IFN-gamma im ELISA gemessen werden. Bei den Patienten sind IL12 p70 und IL12 p40 nicht nachweisbar, IFN-gamma wird nur geringen Mengen produziert. Gentests zeigen Mutationen im IL12B-Gen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind die anderen genetischen Formen der MSMD, besonders die MSMD durch vollst\u00e4ndigen IL12RB1-Mangel (siehe dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Dieser Immundefekt ist nicht gravierend, eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose dehalb keine Option.", "genetic_counseling": "Die MSMD durch vollst\u00e4ndigen IL12B-Mangels wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei Patienten mit dieser Erkrankung muss eine BCG-Impfung vermieden werden. Die Infektionskontrolle durch verl\u00e4ngerte antimikrobielle Therapie zusammen mit rekombinantem IFN-gamma ist in den meisten F\u00e4llen erfolgreich. Eine Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen (HST) wird nicht empfohlen.", "prognosis": "Patienten mit diesem Immundefekt haben in der Regel eine gute Prognose.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden bei 49 Patienten aus 30 Familien aus Indien, Iran, Pakistan, Saudi-Arabien und Tunesien Mutationen gefunden."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen durch kompletten IL12RB1-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen (MSMD) durch kompletten Defekt der Beta-1-Untereinheit des Interleukin-12-Rezeptors (IL12RB1) ist eine genetische Variante des MSMD (siehe dort) mit milden Infektionen durch Bazillus Calmette-Gu\u00e9rin (BCG) und rezidivierenden Salmonella-Infektionen.", "synonyms": "MSMD durch kompletten IL12RB1-Defekt, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien bei vollst\u00e4ndigem Interleukin 12-Rezeptor beta 1-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "614891", "GARD": "10984", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weltweit mehr als 140 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die Erkrankung wird in der Regel vor dem 12. Lebensjahr mit der BCG-Krankheit, meist nach der Impfung manifest. \u00dcber die H\u00e4lfte der Patienten mit dieser Variante machen weitere Infektionen mit nicht-typh\u00f6sen Salmonellen durch. Eine schwere, von Mycobacterium tuberculosis verursachte Tuberkulose wurde bei mehreren nicht miteinander verwandten Patienten beschrieben. Es war dies der erste dokumentierte Nachweis einer monogenen Pr\u00e4disposition f\u00fcr Tuberkulose. Bei einem einzigen Patienten wurden weitere Infektionen mit Paracoccidiodes brasiliensis, Leishmania und Klebsiella beschrieben. Einige Patienten leiden au\u00dferdem unter Candida-Infektionen. Die meisten genetisch betroffenen Geschwister von Indexpatienten sind symptomfrei, ein Hinweis auf die niedrige Penetranz der diagnostischen Ph\u00e4notypen.", "etiology": "Ursache der MSMD durch vollst\u00e4ndigen IL12RB1-Mangel sind Mutationen im IL12RB1-Gen (19p13.1), das die IL-12R-Beta1-Kette kodiert. Diese Mutationen beeintr\u00e4chtigen den IL-12/IL-23-Signalweg, der von entscheidender Bedeutung f\u00fcr die Produktion von IFN-beta und f\u00fcr die sich daraus ergebende Immunit\u00e4t gegen Salmonella- und BCG-Infektionen ist. Die beiden Formen mit und Proteinexpression auf der Zelloberfl\u00e4che sind klinisch nicht zu unterscheiden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Laboranalysen gestellt. Im Allgemeinen wird IL12RB1 auf der Oberfl\u00e4che der aktivierten T-Lymphozyten und der NK-Zellen nicht exprimiert. Bisher ist nur 1 IL12RB1-Mutation mit residueller Expression des Rezeptors auf der Zelloberfl\u00e4che bekannt. Nach Vollblut-Aktivierung durch BCG, BCG+IL-12 und BCG+IFN-gamma werden im ELISA nur geringe IFN-gamma-Werte gemessen. Gentests zeigen Mutationen im IL12RB1-Gen. Bei Patienten mit diesem Immundefekt ist die Entwicklung der Th17-Zellen beeintr\u00e4chtigt.", "differential_diagnosis": "Andere genetische \u00c4tiologien des MSMD m\u00fcssen ausgeschlossen werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Dieser Immundefekt ist nicht gravierend, eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose daher keine Option.", "genetic_counseling": "Die MSMD durch vollst\u00e4ndigen IL12RB1-Mangel wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine BCG-Impfung ist bei Personen mit einer bekannten Mutation im IL12RB1-Gen zu vermeiden. Eine Behandlung erfolgt in der Regel in Form einer langfristigen antimikrobiellen Therapie in Kombination mit rekombinantem IFN-gamma. Bei Patienten mit lokalisierten L\u00e4sionen der Milz/des Mesenteriums mit schwacher Aufnahem der Medikamente in das Gewebe ist eine chirurgische Entfernung indiziert.", "prognosis": "Bei geeigneter Behandlung ist die Prognose in der Regel gut und die meisten Patienten erreichen das Erwachsenenalter.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weltweit mehr als 140 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen durch kompletten ISG15-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen (MSMD) durch vollst\u00e4ndigen ISG15-Mangel ist eine genetische Variante des MSMD (siehe dort) mit Infektionen durch Bazillus Calmette-Gu\u00e9rin (BCG).", "synonyms": "MSMD durch kompletten ISG15-Defekt, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien bei vollst\u00e4ndigem ISG15-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "616126", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Im Jahr 2012 wurden 3 Patienten aus zwei nicht miteinander verwandten Familien aus der T\u00fcrkei und dem Iran beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Bei den Patienten werden BCG-Infektionen beschrieben. Zwei 12- und 15-j\u00e4hrige Patienten hatten in der Vergangenheit zahlreiche Virus-Erkrankungen ohne ungew\u00f6hnlich schwere Auswirkungen durchgemacht.", "etiology": "Ursache der MSMD durch vollst\u00e4ndigen ISG15-Mangel sind Mutationen im ISG15-Gen (1p36.33). Das Genprodukt, das Ubiquitin-artige intrazellul\u00e4re Protein ISG15, wird durch IFN-alpha/beta induziert und durch Leukozyten sezerniert. Dieser f\u00fcr die Induktion von IFN-gamma und damit f\u00fcr eine optimale antimykobakterielle Immunit\u00e4t notwendige Schritt ist durch die Mutationen beeintr\u00e4chtigt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Laboranalysen gestellt. Die IFN-gamma-, IL12 p40- und IL12 p70-Werte k\u00f6nnen nach Vollblut-Aktivierung durch BCG, BCG+IL12 und BCG+IFN-gamma im ELISA gemessen werden. \u00c4hnlich wie bei Patienten mit einem IL12RB1-Mangel produzieren Patienten mit einem ISG15-Mangel kleine Mengen an IFN-gamma, w\u00e4hrend sie normale Mengen an IL12p40 und IL12p70 produzieren. Gentests zeigen Mutationen im ISG15-Gen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Andere \u00c4tiologien der MSMD, insbesondere MSMD aufgrund eines vollst\u00e4ndigen IL12RB1-Mangels (siehe dort), m\u00fcssen ausgeschlossen werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Dieser Immundefekt ist nicht gravierend und eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose ist nicht erforderlich.", "genetic_counseling": "Die MSMD aufgrund eines vollst\u00e4ndigen ISG15-MAngels wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt, eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine BCG-Impfung ist bei Personen mit einer bekannten ISG15-Mutation zu vermeiden. Die Behandlung umfasst in der Regel eine langfristige antimikrobielle Therapie in Kombination mit rekombinantem IFN-gamma.", "prognosis": "Bei einer geeigneten Behandlung gilt die Prognose als gut.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Im Jahr 2012 wurden 3 Patienten aus zwei nicht miteinander verwandten Familien aus der T\u00fcrkei und dem Iran beschrieben."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen durch partiellen IRF8-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominant vererbte (AD) Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien (MSMD) mit partiellem IRF8 (Interferon Regulatory Factor 8)-Mangel, eine seltene genetische Variante des MSMD (siehe dort), ist durch selektive Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr relativ milde Infektionen mit Bazillus Calmette-Gu\u00e9rin (BCG) gekennzeichnet.", "synonyms": "MSMD durch partiellen IRF8-Defekt, MSMD durch partiellen Interferon-Regulationsfaktor 8-Mangel, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien bei IRF8-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "614893", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Nur 2 F\u00e4lle weltweit wurden bisher beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die ersten Infektionen treten nach einer BCG-Impfung und vor dem Alter von 2 Jahren auf. Sie sind relativ mild, mit Fieber und Lymphknotenschwellung. Weitere Infektionskrankheiten wurden nicht beschrieben.", "etiology": "Ursache der AD MSMD mit teilweisem IRF8-Mangel sind heterozygote Mutationen im IRF8-Gen (16q24.1), das IRF8 kodiert, ein Protein, das f\u00fcr die Entwicklung dendritischer Zellen und f\u00fcr die Differenzierung von Makrophagen und Granulozyten von entscheidender Bedeutung ist. Mutationen im IRF8-Gen beeintr\u00e4chtigen die IL-12-Sekretion durch Monozyten und dendritische Zellen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die MSMD aufgrund eines teilweisen IRF8-Mangels wird autosomal-dominant vererbt, eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Nur 2 F\u00e4lle weltweit wurden bisher beschrieben."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen durch partiellen STAT1-Defekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-dominant vererbte (AD) Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien (MSMD) aufgrund eines teilweisen STAT1 (signal transducer and activator of transcription 1)-Mangels ist eine genetische Variante des MSMD (siehe dort) mit teilweisen Defekt im Interferon (IFN)-gamma-Signalweg, was zu milden mykobakteriellen Infektionen f\u00fchrt.", "synonyms": "MSMD durch partiellen STAT1-Defekt, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien bei partiellem STAT1-Mangel, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "614892", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Im Jahr 2001 wurden 2 nicht miteinander verwandte Patienten, mit nur leichter MSMD beschrieben. Seither wurden bis zu 6 weitere Familien mit MSMD durch dominant vererbten partiellen STAT1-Mangel bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die ersten Infektionen treten nach dem Alter von 3 Jahren auf, die meisten mit dem schwach virulenten Mycobacterium bovis, mit BCG und dem Mycobacterium avium-Komplex oder mit dem virulenteren Mycobacterium tuberculosis. Die klinische Penetranz ist unvollst\u00e4ndig. Einige Patienten sind symptomfrei, w\u00e4hrend andere sehr milde klinische Symptome zeigen. Keiner der Patienten hat bislang eine schwere virale Erkrankung entwickelt.", "etiology": "Ursache der AD MSMD mit partiellem STAT1-Mangel sind heterozygote Mutationen im STAT1-Gen (2q32.2-q32.3), das den Signalgeber und Aktivator der Transkription 1 (Signal Transducer and Activator of Transcription 1) kodiert. Bisher wurden zwei unterschiedliche Formen beschrieben: eine mit beeintr\u00e4chtigter Phosphorylierung und eine mit reduzierter DNA-Bindungsaktivit\u00e4t.", "genetic_counseling": "Die St\u00f6rung wird autosomal-dominant vererbt, eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Im Jahr 2001 wurden 2 nicht miteinander verwandte Patienten, mit nur leichter MSMD beschrieben. Seither wurden bis zu 6 weitere Familien mit MSMD durch dominant vererbten partiellen STAT1-Mangel bekannt."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen, famili\u00e4re Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die monogen vererbte Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen (MSMD) ist ein seltenes Immundefekt-Syndrom mit selektiver Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr wenig virulente Mykobakterien, wie den Bazillus Calmette-Gu\u00e9rin (BCG)-Impfstoffen und Mykobakterien aus der Umwelt (EM). Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch schwere, rezidivierende, disseminierte oder lokal begrenzte Infektionen.", "synonyms": "Idiopathische Infektionen durch BCG oder atypische Mykobakterien, MSMD, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Erkrankungen durch Mykobakterien, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "UMLS": "C3266863", "GARD": "12977", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die schwersten Varianten der MSMD werden durch einen autosomal-rezessiv (AR) vererbten vollst\u00e4ndigen Mangel der Interferon-gamma-Rezeptoren 1 (IFN-gammaR1) und 2 (IFN-gammaR2) (siehe jeweils dort) verursacht. Sie werden in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit manifest, die ersten Infektionen treten in der Regel im Alter von 3 Jahren auf. Ernste, disseminierte Infektionen mit BCG und EM k\u00f6nnen die Weichteile, das Knochenmark, die Lungen, die Haut, die Knochen und die Lymphknoten betreffen. Auch andere Infektionen, mit Salmonella spp., Listeria monocytogenes und Viren, wurden beschrieben. MSMD mit weniger schwerem Verlauf ist verursacht durch partiellen Mangel von IFN-gammaR1 und IFN-gammaR2, durch vollst\u00e4ndigen Mangel von IL-12R-beta1, IL12B und ISG15, durch partiellen Mangel von STAT1 und IRF8 und durch X-chromosomal-rezessiv (XR) vererbte Mutationen (siehe jeweils dort). Sie weisen leichtere Symptome auf und einige treten erst nach einem Alter von 3 Jahren bis zum Erwachsenenalter auf. Die Patienten sind anf\u00e4llig gegen\u00fcber dem Mycobacterium tuberculosis. Bei der H\u00e4lfte der Patienten treten schwere Infektionen durch nicht-typhoide Salmonellen auf, insbesondere beim IL-12R-beta1- und IL12B-Mangel.", "etiology": "Bei nur etwa der H\u00e4lfte der Patienten mit MSMD wurde die genetische \u00c4tiologie aufgekl\u00e4rt. Neun f\u00fcr MSMD verantwortliche Gene sind bekannt. Sieben von ihnen werden autosomal vererbt (IFNGR1, IFNGR2, STAT1, IL12B, IL12RB1, IRF8 und ISG15) und zwei X-chromosomal (IKBKG und CYBB). MSMD ist heterogen und gilt wegen der gro\u00dfen Zahl blutsverwandter Eltern, wegen famili\u00e4rer H\u00e4ufung und teilweise X-chromosomalem Erbgang als monogene Erkrankung. Die genetischen Defekte beeintr\u00e4chtigen die IL-12-abh\u00e4ngige IFN-gamma-Immunit\u00e4t. Die hohe allelische Heterogenit\u00e4t f\u00fchrt zu 17 genetisch unterscheidbaren Erkrankungen, die je nach Art der Vererbung, Auswirkung auf die Funktion, fehlende Proteinexpression oder Expression eines abnormen Proteins und der spezifisch betroffenen Funktion definiert werden. Die molekularen und zellul\u00e4ren Mechanismen sind bislang noch weitgehend unbekannt.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch Laboranalysen gestellt. Die IFN-gamma-, IL-12p40- und IL-12p70-Spiegel werden nach Vollblut-Aktivierung durch BCG, BCG+IL-12 und BCG+IFN-Gamma im ELISA bestimmt. Hohe IFN-gamma-Konzentrationen im Plasma weisen auf einen vollst\u00e4ndigen IFN-gammaR-Mangel hin. Eine Mutationsanalyse ist notwendig, um die genetische Ursache zu identifizieren.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Chronisch-granulomat\u00f6se Erkrankung, Zystische Fibrose, Schwerer kombinierte Immundefekt und der vollst\u00e4ndige Mangel von IRF8, STAT1 und TyK2 (siehe jeweils dort).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose kann denjenigen Familien angeboten werden, bei denen der oft t\u00f6dliche vollst\u00e4ndige IFNGR-Mangel auftritt.", "genetic_counseling": "MSMD kann AD, AR oder X-chromosomal vererbt werden. Eine genetische Beratung ist m\u00f6glich, wenn eine spezifische Mutation in einer Familie identifiziert wurde.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine BCG-Impfung soll bei MSMD-Patienten vermieden werden. Patienten mit IL-12B-, IL-12R-Beta1- oder ISG15-Mangel und teilweisem IFN-gammaR-, IRF8- und STAT1-Mangel sprechen gut auf eine antibiotische Therapie an und k\u00f6nnen auch mit IFN-gamma behandelt werden. Eine Resektion der abdominalen Lymphknoten kann in einigen F\u00e4llen erforderlich sein. Eine Transplantation blutbildender Stammzellen (HSCT) sollte bei denjenigen Patienten in Betracht gezogen werden, bei denen ein vollst\u00e4ndiger IFN-gammaR1- bzw. IFN-gammaR2-Mangel besteht, jedoch besteht eine hohe Absto\u00dfungsrate, vermutlich wegen der hohen IFN-gamma-Werte, die im Serum dieser Patienten gemessen werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose h\u00e4ngt von der jeweiligen Mutation und der entsprechenden assoziierten St\u00f6rung ab. Einige F\u00e4lle sind letal, w\u00e4hrend andere sich mit antibiotischer Therapie erholen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Suszeptibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr Mykobakteriosen, X-chromosomal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die X-chromosomal vererbte (XR) Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien (MSMD; siehe dort) umfasst eine seltene Gruppe von Immundefekten aufgrund spezifischer Mutationen in den Genen: IKBKG (inhibitor of kappa light polypeptide gene enhancer in B-cells, kinase gamma) oder CYBB (Cytochrom b-245, beta Polypeptid). Kennzeichnend sind mykobakterielle Infektionen, die bei m\u00e4nnlichen Personen auftreten.", "synonyms": "MSMD, X-chromosomal, Mendelsche Anf\u00e4lligkeit f\u00fcr Krankheiten durch Mykobakterien, X-chromosomal, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Kindesalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "D84.8", "OMIM": "300636\u00a0 300645", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Bisher wurden 6 m\u00e4nnliche Patienten mit einem XR-MSMD-Mangel aufgrund von IKBKG-Mutationen und 7 m\u00e4nnliche Patienten mit einem XR-MSMD-Mangel aufgrund von CYBB-Mutationen beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "M\u00e4nnliche Patienten mit XR-MSMD aufgrund eines IKBKG-Mangels sind im \u00fcbrigen gesund. Am h\u00e4ufigsten sind Infektionen durch Mycobacterium avium, Mycobacterium bovis, BCG und Mycobacterium tuberculosis. Bei 1 Patienten wurde \u00fcber eine invasive Haemophilus influenzae Typ-b-Infektion berichtet. In 2 F\u00e4llen wurden milde Anzeichen einer anhidrotischen ektodermen Dysplasie (AED; siehe dort), beschr\u00e4nkt auf das Symptom konischer Milchschneidez\u00e4hne, beobachtet. Patienten mit einer XR-MSMD aufgrund eines CYBB-Mangels weisen eine disseminierte tuberkul\u00f6se Mykobakteriose (BCG oder M. tuberculosis) auf. Sie leiden an keinen anderen Infektionskrankheiten.", "etiology": "Ursache der XR-MSMD sind hemizygote Mutationen im IKBKG- oder CYBB-Gen. IKBKG (Xq28) kodiert die Kinase gamma des Inhibitors des Kappa-Leichtketten-Gen-Verst\u00e4rkers in B-Zellen. Diese Mutation verursacht Defekte in der T-Zell-abh\u00e4ngigen IL-12-Produktion und dadurch in der Produktion von IFN-gamma. Die Mutationen st\u00f6ren die Motilit\u00e4t der Leucin-Zipper-Dom\u00e4ne- (LDZ-)Helix des IKBKG und greifen selektiv in den CD40-NEMO-NF\u0138B Signalweg ein. Diese hypomorphen Mutationen sind mit einer beeintr\u00e4chtigten NF\u0138B-Aktivierung des c-Rel-enthaltenden Proteins in Reaktion auf CD40 assoziiert. Das CYBB-Gen (Xp21.1) kodiert die gp91-phox-Untereinheit der Phagozyten-NADPH-Oxidase. Diese Mutationen beeintr\u00e4chtigen selektiv Makrophagen und die B-Zell-Linie, nicht jedoch den oxidativen Burst in Granulozyten und Monozyten.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose erfordert Laboranalysen. Die IFN-gamma-, IL12-p40- und IL12-p70-Konzentrationen werden im ELISA gemessen. Bei Personen mit einer IKBKG-Mutation werden niedrige IFN-gamma-Werte und, nach Phytohemagglutinin (PHA)-Gabe, eine geringe IL12-Produktion der mononukle\u00e4ren Zellen beobachtet. Bei Patienten mit einer CYBB-Mutation ist die NADPH-Aktivit\u00e4t in vitro in Makrophagen und B-Zellen erniedrigt. Eine Mutationsanalyse in den krankheitsverursachenden Genen ist f\u00fcr die Aufstellung eines spezifischen Behandlungsplans erforderlich.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnosen umfassen andere durch IKBKG-Mutationen verursachte Erkrankungen, wie EDA mit Immundefekt (siehe dort). Es ist wichtig, die Diagnose einer durch CYBB-Mutationen verursachten Chronisch granulomat\u00f6sen Krankheit (CGD; siehe dort) auszuschlie\u00dfen. Andere genetische Formen der MSMD m\u00fcssen ebenfalls ausgeschlossen werden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Dieser Immundefekt ist nicht gravierend, eine pr\u00e4natale Diagnose nicht diskutabel.", "genetic_counseling": "Mykobakteriellen Erkrankungen bei m\u00fctterlich miteinander verwandten m\u00e4nnlichen Personen weisen auf eine X-chromosomal-rezessive Form der MSMD hin. Eine genetische Beratung wird empfohlen.", "management_and_treatment": "Bei Personen mit einer bekannten XR-MSMD-Mutation ist eine BCG-Impfung zu vermeiden. Die Behandlung umfasst in der Regel eine IFN-gamma-Therapie sowie die Gabe von Antibiotika.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist gut.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist unbekannt. Bisher wurden 6 m\u00e4nnliche Patienten mit einem XR-MSMD-Mangel aufgrund von IKBKG-Mutationen und 7 m\u00e4nnliche Patienten mit einem XR-MSMD-Mangel aufgrund von CYBB-Mutationen beschrieben."}, {"name": "SVAS", "sub_name": "Aortenstenose, supravalvul\u00e4re", "german_description": "Die Supravalvul\u00e4re Aortenstenose (SVAS) ist gekennzeichnet durch ein verengtes Lumen der Aorta (nahe an ihrem Ansatz) oder anderer Arterien (Pulmonalarterie, Koronararterien). Durch die Einengung wird der Blutfluss in der Aorta und der Pulmonalarterie beeintr\u00e4chtigt, was evtl. zu einem Herzger\u00e4usch und (im Fall der Aortenbeteiligung) zu einer Ventrikelhypertrophie f\u00fchrt. Verursacht wird die Einengung durch eine Verdickung der Arterienwand, Atherosklerose ist nicht beteiligt. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird auf 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt und die mittlere Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemein-bev\u00f6lkerung auf 1:7.500. Klinische Symptome der SVAS sind ein systolisches Auswurfger\u00e4usch und in einigen F\u00e4llen ein niedrigerer arterieller Blutdruck im linken Arm als im rechten Arm. Das EKG kann in Ruhe Zeichen einer gest\u00f6rten Repolarisation und/oder nach Belastung Zeichen einer Ischaemie aufweisen. Ursache der SVAS sind Mutationen im Elastin-Gen (ELN, Chromosomenregion 7q11.23). In nahezu allen F\u00e4llen wird durch die Mutationen die Proteinsynthese beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Die Krankheit tritt sporadisch und famili\u00e4r auf. Die famili\u00e4ren F\u00e4lle werden autosomal-dominant mit inkompletter Penetranz und in der Familie variabler Expressivit\u00e4t vererbt. Die SVAS kann Symptom des Williams-Beuren-Syndroms sein (s. dort). Ursache des Williams-Beuren-Syndroms ist eine Mikrodeletion in der Chromosomenregion 7q11-q23, mit Verlust des Elastin-Gens und vieler benachbarter Gene ('contiguous gene syndrome'). Die Entdeckung des systolischen Herzger\u00e4usches ist Anlass f\u00fcr eine kardiologische Untersuchung und f\u00fchrt dann zum Nachweis einer Ventrikel-Hypertrophie. Echokardiographisch ist evtl. eine 'sanduhr'-artige Einengung des Lumens der Aorta und/oder der Pulmonalarterie nachweisbar, ein spezifisches Zeichen der SVAS. Eine genauere Diagnose ist mit retrograder Katheterisierung einer Femoralarterie m\u00f6glich, aber diese Untersuchung birgt bei signifikanter Stenose Risiken, weshalb in solchen F\u00e4llen bildgebende Verfahren vorzuziehen sind. Die SVAS beim Williams-Beuren-Syndrom unterscheidet sich nicht von der isolierten, nicht-syndromalen SVAS. Patienten mit Williams-Beuren-Syndrom haben aber ein charakteristisches Gesicht, ein besonderes Verhalten und eine Hyperkalz\u00e4mie. Wegen des progredienten Charakters der Krankheit ist es wichtig, in Familien mit SVAS die Mutationstr\u00e4ger zu finden, damit diese medizinisch betreut werden k\u00f6nnen. Vor der Geburt kann die supravalvul\u00e4re Aorten- oder Pulmonalstenose ultrasonographisch erkannt werden. Zu empfehlen sind regelm\u00e4\u00dfige Kontrolluntersuchungen (alle 6 Monate bei Kleinkindern und 1 Mal j\u00e4hrlich bei \u00e4lteren Kindern), um die Entwicklung der Stenose zu verfolgen. Eine chirurgische Entfernung der Stenose ist nur bei signifikanter Einengung indiziert.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare aortic malformation characterized by the narrowing of the aorta lumen (close to its origin) associated or not with stenosis of other arteries (branch pulmonary arteries, coronary arteries). This narrowing of the aorta or pulmonary branches may impede blood flow, resulting in heart murmur and ventricular hypertrophy (left ventricle in case of aorta involvement, right ventricle in case of pulmonary artery involvement).", "synonyms": "SVAS, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "Q25.3", "omim": "185500", "umls": "C0003499\u00a0 C1305147", "mesh": "D021921", "gard": "743", "meddra": "10042598", "epidemiology": "The incidence of supravalvular aortic stenosis (SVAS) is estimated at approximately 1 in 25 000 births and the mean prevalence in the general population at 1/7 500.", "clinical_description": "Clinical manifestations of SVAS include ejection systolic murmur and, in some cases, symptoms of chest pain or syncope. The electrocardiogram may indicate signs of a repolarisation disorder at rest and/or signs of ischemia after a stress test.", "etiology": "The narrowing results from a thickening of the artery wall, which is not related to atherosclerosis. SVAS is caused by a mutation in the elastin gene (ELN), which is located on chromosome 7q11.23. In nearly all cases, ELN mutations disrupt elastin protein synthesis, resulting in a production deficit.", "diagnostic_methods": "The discovery of a systolic murmur may prompt a cardiological examination, potentially showing ventricular hypertrophy. Echocardiogram may indicate a progressive ''hourglass'' narrowing of the aorta and/or pulmonary artery lumen, specific to SVAS. Angiography by retrograde femoral arterial catheterization would allow a more precise diagnosis but it may be associated with risk if the stenosis is significant. Thus, in such cases scanning is preferred. CT scan can show the location and the severity of aorta narrowing.", "differential_diagnosis": "SVAS can be part of the Williams-Beuren syndrome caused by microdeletion of the 7q11-q23 region, including the elastin and many contiguous genes. SVAS associated with Williams-Beuren syndrome is identical to isolated SVAS, however Williams-Beuren syndrome is also associated with a characteristic face, behavioral disorders and hypercalcemia.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "In a family affected by SVAS, the progressive nature of the disease makes the identification of mutation carriers important for follow-up. Prenatal ultrasound examination can allow detection of the aortic or pulmonary supravalvular stenosis.", "genetic_counseling": "Except for the cases with Williams-Beuren syndrome, the disease is either sporadic or familial. In familial cases it is transmitted as an autosomal dominant trait with incomplete penetrance and variable expressivity within members of the same family.", "management_and_treatment": "Regular follow-up is recommended (every 6 months for infants and each year in children) in order to monitor the evolution of the stenosis, which can be removed by surgery. Surgical repair is indicated only for significant stenosis.", "prognosis": "The prognosis of SVAS depends on the severity of the lesion and on potential associated anomalies located on the aortic valve or coronary arteries. Predictors of worse outcomes and frequent surgical intervention are the presence of diffuse lesions compared to discrete stenosis or presence of associated aortic valve disease."}, {"name": "SVC-Agenesie", "sub_name": "Vena cava superior, Agenesie der", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene angeborene Anomalie der gro\u00dfen Venen, die durch einseitiges oder beidseitiges vollst\u00e4ndiges Fehlen der Vena cava superior (SVC) gekennzeichnet ist. Die unilaterale Agenesie ist meist asymptomatisch (meist zuf\u00e4llig diagnostiziert) und die Patienten haben in der Regel eine ansonsten normale Herzstruktur. Eine bilaterale Agenesie ist jedoch h\u00e4ufig mit anderen angeborenen kardialen Anomalien und/oder Erregungsleitungsanomalien (z. B. Fallot-Tetralogie, Vorhofseptumdefekt) assoziiert und zeigt typischerweise Symptome eines SVC-Syndroms.", "synonyms": "Agenesie der oberen Hohlvene, SVC-Agenesie, ", "ICD-10": "Q26.8"}, {"name": "SVC, rechte, verbunden mit dem linken Vorhof", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die rechte Vena cava superior, die mit dem linken Vorhof verbunden ist, ist eine seltene, angeborene Gef\u00e4\u00dffehlbildung der gro\u00dfen Gef\u00e4\u00dfe, bei der die rechte SVC medial und dorsal zur Aortenwurzel verl\u00e4uft und in den linken Vorhof ableitet. Die Patienten weisen in der Regel einen systemisch-ven\u00f6sen Rechts-Links-Shunt auf, der sich mit arterieller Hypox\u00e4mie, Zyanose, Belastungsdyspnoe, Trommelschl\u00e4gelfinger, Herzklopfen, Herzger\u00e4uschen und/oder einem potenziell t\u00f6dlichen Hirnabszess manifestieren kann. Es wurde \u00fcber eine Assoziation mit anderen kardialen Anomalien berichtet.", "ICD-10": "Q26.8"}, {"name": "Sweet-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Sweet-Syndrom (Eponym f\u00fcr die Akute febrile neutrophile Dermatose) ist gekennzeichnet durch eine Konstellation klinischer Symptome und somatischer und pathologischer Befunde. Dazu geh\u00f6ren Fieber, neutrophile Leukozytose, Hautver\u00e4nderungen (Papeln, Kn\u00f6tchen und Plaques) und ein diffuses Infiltrat, das haupts\u00e4chlich aus reifen neutrophilen Granulozyten in der oberen Dermis besteht. Mehrere Hundert F\u00e4lle von Sweet-Syndrom wurden bisher beschrieben. Es tritt in drei klinischen Zusammenh\u00e4ngen auf: Klassisch (idiopathisch), assoziiert mit einem Malignom und medikamenten-induziert. Das klassische Sweet-Syndrom (CSS) wird in der Regel bei Frauen im Alter von 30 bis 50 Jahren gesehen, folgt oft nach einer Infektion der oberen Luftwege, kann aber auch im Zusammenhang mit einer entz\u00fcndlichen Darmerkrankung oder einer Schwangerschaft auftreten. Bei etwa einem Drittel der Patienten mit CSS hat die Dermatose einen rezidivierenden Charakter. Das malignom-assoziierte Sweet-Syndrom (MASS) tritt als paraneoplastisches Syndrom auf, entweder bei Patienten mit bekanntem Krebs oder bei Individuen, deren Leukose oder solider Tumor noch nicht entdeckt wurde. Am h\u00e4ufigsten steht MASS im Zusammenhang mit einer akuten myeloischen Leuk\u00e4mie. Die Dermatose kann der Diagnose des Malignoms vorangehen, ihr folgen oder zeitgleich auftreten. So kann MASS als dermatologischer Vorbote eines noch nicht bekannten internen Malignoms bei einer bisher gesunden Person auftreten, oder als Vorbote eines unerwarteten Krebsrezidivs bei einem onkologischen Patienten. Das medikamenten-induzierte Sweet-Syndrom (DISS) tritt am h\u00e4ufigsten nach einer Behandlung mit G-CSF (Granulozyten-koloniestimulierender Faktor) auf, aber auch andere Medikamente k\u00f6nnen mit DISS assoziiert sein. Die Pathogenese des Sweet-Syndroms ist evtl. multifaktoriell, aber noch nicht vollst\u00e4ndig aufgekl\u00e4rt. Klinische Daten und Laborbefunde lassen vermuten, dass Zytokine urs\u00e4chlich beteiligt sind. Therapeutischer Goldstandard f\u00fcr das Sweet-Syndrom ist die systemische Anwendung von Kortikosteroiden. Nach Beginn der systemischen Kortikosteroid-Behandlung kommt es sofort zu einer dramatischen Besserung der Allgemeinsymptome und der Hautl\u00e4sionen. Topische Applikation oder Injektion hochwirksamer Kortikosteroide in die L\u00e4sionen ist bei \u00f6rtlich begrenztem Prozess wirksam. Alternative Mittel der ersten Wahl sind Kaliumjodid und Kolchizin. Mittel der zweiten Wahl sind Indomethacin, Clofazimin, Cyclosporin und Dapson. Die Symptome und L\u00e4sionen des Sweet-Syndroms k\u00f6nnen sich spontan, ohne jegliche therapeutische Intervention, zur\u00fcckbilden. Rezidive treten aber nicht nur nach spontanen Remissionen, sondern auch nach therapiebedingter klinischer Remission auf.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare inflammatory disease characterized by abrupt appearance of painful, edematous and erythematous papules, plaques and nodules on the skin, and frequently accompanied by fever and neutrophilia with a dense infiltration of mature neutrophils that are typically located in the upper dermis. The disease is classically associated with inflammatory disease, pregnancy, infection (mostly of the upper respiratory tract), or vaccination but may be idiopathic, associated with a hematological or visceral malignancy, or drug-induced.", "synonyms": "Acute febrile neutrophilic dermatosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Multigenic/multifactorial\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "L98.2", "omim": "608068", "umls": "C0085077", "mesh": "D016463", "gard": "521", "meddra": "10000748", "epidemiology": "Several hundred cases of Sweet syndrome have been published.", "clinical_description": "Classical Sweet syndrome (CSS) usually presents in women between the age of 30 and 50 years. It is often preceded by an upper respiratory tract infection and may be associated with inflammatory bowel disease. It is characterized by the abrupt onset of painful erythematous plaques or nodules, but pustules and bullae are also described. Fever is observed in 30 to 80% of cases. Approximately one-third of patients with CSS experience recurrence of the dermatosis. Malignancy-associated Sweet syndrome (MASS) can occur as a paraneoplastic syndrome in patients with an established cancer or individuals whose Sweet syndrome-related hematologic dyscrasia or solid tumor was previously undiscovered; MASS is most commonly related to acute myelogenous leukemia. The dermatosis can precede, follow, or appear concurrently with the diagnosis of the patient's cancer. Hence, MASS can be the cutaneous harbinger of either an undiagnosed visceral malignancy in a previously cancer-free individual or an unsuspected cancer recurrence in an oncology patient. Drug-induced Sweet syndrome (DISS) most commonly occurs in patients who have been treated with granulocyte-colony stimulating factor, however, numerous medications have also be associated with DISS.", "etiology": "The pathogenesis may be multifactorial and still remains to be definitively established. Clinical and laboratory evidence suggests that altered expression of inflammatory effector molecules, abnormal neutrophil function and genetic predisposition have an etiologic role.", "diagnostic_methods": "Sweet syndrome (SS) is a diagnosis of exclusion and is based on criteria (both of the major and 2 minor criteria are required for diagnosis). Major criteria include 1) abrupt onset of typical cutaneous lesions and 2) histopathology consistent with SS. Minor criteria include 1) lesions preceded by one of the associated infections or vaccinations; accompanied by one of the associated malignancies or inflammatory disorders; associated with drug exposure or pregnancy, 2) presence of fever and constitutional signs and symptoms, 3) leukocytosis, and 4) excellent response to systemic corticosteroids.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes infectious disorders, inflammatory disorders (e.g. arthropod bites, halogenoderma, other neutrophilic dermatoses, Wells syndrome), and neoplastic disorders (e.g. leukemia cutis, lymphoma cutis, metastatic carcinoma).", "management_and_treatment": "Management of SS need to take into account any associated-diseases or medications. Systemic corticosteroids are the therapeutic gold standard. After initiation of treatment with systemic corticosteroids, there is a prompt response consisting of dramatic improvement of both the dermatosis-related symptoms and skin lesions. Topical application of high potency corticosteroids or intralesional corticosteroids may be used for treating localized lesions. Other first-line oral systemic agents are potassium iodide and colchicine. Second-line oral systemic agents include indomethacin and dapsone. TNF alpha inhibitors and the IL-1 receptor antagonist (anakinra) have been used in case reports.", "prognosis": "The symptoms and lesions may resolve spontaneously, without any therapeutic intervention; however, recurrence may follow either spontaneous remission or therapy-induced clinical resolution."}, {"name": "Swift-Feer-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Quecksilbervergiftung, infantile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die infantile Quecksilbervergiftung ist eine seltene Vergiftung bei Kindern, die am h\u00e4ufigsten durch Erytheme an H\u00e4nden, F\u00fc\u00dfen und Nase, \u00f6demat\u00f6se, schmerzhafte, rosafarbene bis rote, abschuppende Finger und Zehen, bl\u00e4uliche, kalte und feuchte Extremit\u00e4ten, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfiges Schwitzen, Reizbarkeit, Photophobie, Muskelschw\u00e4che, diffuse Hypotonie, Par\u00e4sthesie, Hypertonie und Tachykardie aufgrund einer elementaren, organischen oder anorganischen Quecksilberexposition gekennzeichnet ist. Weitere Erscheinungsformen sind Alopezie, Appetitlosigkeit, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfiger Speichelfluss mit rotem und geschwollenem Zahnfleisch, Zahn- und Nagelverlust und Schlaflosigkeit.", "synonyms": "Feer-Krankheit, Infantile Akrodynie, Infantile Quecksilber-intoxifikation, Pink-Krankheit, Swift-Feer-Krankheit, Swift-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "T56.1"}, {"name": "Swift-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Quecksilbervergiftung, infantile", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die infantile Quecksilbervergiftung ist eine seltene Vergiftung bei Kindern, die am h\u00e4ufigsten durch Erytheme an H\u00e4nden, F\u00fc\u00dfen und Nase, \u00f6demat\u00f6se, schmerzhafte, rosafarbene bis rote, abschuppende Finger und Zehen, bl\u00e4uliche, kalte und feuchte Extremit\u00e4ten, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfiges Schwitzen, Reizbarkeit, Photophobie, Muskelschw\u00e4che, diffuse Hypotonie, Par\u00e4sthesie, Hypertonie und Tachykardie aufgrund einer elementaren, organischen oder anorganischen Quecksilberexposition gekennzeichnet ist. Weitere Erscheinungsformen sind Alopezie, Appetitlosigkeit, \u00fcberm\u00e4\u00dfiger Speichelfluss mit rotem und geschwollenem Zahnfleisch, Zahn- und Nagelverlust und Schlaflosigkeit.", "synonyms": "Feer-Krankheit, Infantile Akrodynie, Infantile Quecksilber-intoxifikation, Pink-Krankheit, Swift-Feer-Krankheit, Swift-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "T56.1"}, {"name": "SWS", "sub_name": "Sturge-Weber-Syndrom", "german_description": "Die Geburtspr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf etwa 1/20.000 und 1/50.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare congenital neurocutaneous syndrome defined by a facial capillary malformation or port-wine birthmark (PWB) associated with cerebral and ocular ipsilateral vascular malformations in most of the cases resulting in variable ocular and neurological complications.", "synonyms": "Encephalofacial angiomatosis, Encephalotrigeminal angiomatosis, SWS, Sturge-Weber-Dimitri syndrome, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe angiomatosis, Sturge-Weber-Krabbe syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q85.8", "omim": "185300", "umls": "C0038505", "mesh": "D013341", "gard": "7706", "meddra": "10042265\u00a0 10057653", "epidemiology": "The birth prevalence in Europe is estimated at around 1/20,000 to 1/50,000.", "clinical_description": "The facial port-wine birthmark is present at birth and covers the forehead and/or the upper eyelid (at risk zone). Glaucoma is the most common ocular complication, affecting 30 to 60% of patients with a risk of early visual impairment. Epilepsy is often the first neurological manifestation. Around 80% of patients develop seizures at a median age of 6 months. First seizures are usually focal motor. Drug resistant seizures are reported in up to 50% of patients and status epilepticus is commonly seen. Fever induced seizures are frequently reported. A pattern of seizure clustering followed by prolonged period of seizure freedom occurs in 40% of cases. The natural history is highly variable but typically marked by seizures in early childhood, stroke-like events, progressive hemiparesis and developmental impairment, glaucoma and visual field defects. Later manifestations include headaches, academic difficulties, behavioral and psychiatric disorders. An increased risk of growth hormone deficiency is reported.", "etiology": "The syndrome is caused by a somatic mosaic mutation in GNAQ (9q21) that codes for the protein guanine nucleotide-binding protein G(q) subunit alpha which is critical to the intracellular signaling of a large group of G protein coupled receptors important to vascular development and function. Mutations in GNAQ can also result in an isolated PWB phenotype. The phenotypic presentation is thought to be determined by the developmental time point at which the somatic mutation occurs.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected at birth in newborns presenting facial PWB in the at risk zone. The risk of cerebral involvement in such situation ranges between 15 and 40%. Diagnosis can be confirmed by a contrast-enhanced cerebral magnetic resonance imaging showing direct (angioma) and indirect (enlargement of choroid plexus unilaterally) radiological signs of the leptomeningeal angioma. A computer tomography scan can help diagnosis showing localized calcifications and atrophy, although they might develop later during the course of the disease. Electroencephalogram (EEG) recording can show decreased amplitude of the EEG signal on the side of brain involvement.", "differential_diagnosis": "The main diagnostic concern is to separate infants with an isolated facial PWB from those with Sturge-Weber syndrome (SWS) brain involvement. Differential diagnosis includes PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndromes, especially megalencephaly-capillary malformation-polymicrogyria (MCAP) syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal ultrasounds are usually normal.", "genetic_counseling": "The disease is sporadic and due to somatic mutations.", "management_and_treatment": "A multidisciplinary approach is needed from onset to monitor disease progression in the skin, eye, and brain. Laser treatment is proposed in infancy to reduce the PWS. Regular ocular monitoring is recommended throughout life. Eye drops are used to lower intraocular pressure but surgical interventions may be required. Parental education for early seizure recognition and individualized emergency plans including the use of rescue benzodiazepine therapy is recommended. Low-dose aspirin might be useful to prevent the stroke-like episodes and possibly seizures but the risk-benefit ratio of such approach is not well established. Antiseizure medications are used to treat epilepsy. Patients with focal drug-resistant seizures should be considered early for pre-surgical evaluation at a reference center. Neuropsychological assessments and rehabilitation are needed and physiotherapy is required for functional deficits.", "prognosis": "The prognosis of SWS is highly variable. Early seizure onset, drug-resistant seizures and bilateral intracranial involvement have been associated with poor cognitive outcomes."}, {"name": "Swyer-Syndrom", "sub_name": "46,XY-Gonadendysgenesie, vollst\u00e4ndige", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die vollst\u00e4ndige 46,XY Gonadendysgenesie (46,XY-CGD) ist eine St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung (DSD) mit Anomalien der Gonadenentwicklung, die zu einem weiblichen externen und internen Genitale trotz 46,XY-Karyotyp f\u00fchren.", "synonyms": "46,XY reine Gonadendysgenesie, 46,XY-CGD, Swyer-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Y-chromosomal\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "Q99.1", "OMIM": "154230\u00a0 233420\u00a0 300018\u00a0 400044\u00a0 612965\u00a0 613080\u00a0 613762\u00a0 616425", "UMLS": "C0018054\u00a0 C2936694", "GARD": "5068", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten werden w\u00e4hrend der Adoleszenz durch fehlende Pubert\u00e4t trotz normaler weiblicher \u00e4u\u00dferer Genitalien und trotz normaler Adrenarche auff\u00e4llig. Die Patienten haben vollst\u00e4ndig unentwickelte Stranggonaden und ein erh\u00f6htes Risiko f\u00fcr abdominelle Tumoren (am h\u00e4ufigsten Dysgerminome; s. dort), die in einigen F\u00e4llen das erste Symptom darstellen. Die K\u00f6rpergr\u00f6\u00dfe ist normal oder \u00fcbernormal, Symptome des Turner-Syndroms (s. dort) fehlen.", "etiology": "Die Ursache ist nicht vollst\u00e4ndig bekannt, jedoch resultiert das 46,XY-CGD aus einem Fehlen der Testesentwicklung durch Unterbrechung der zugrunde liegenden genetischen Signalketten. Mehrere Gene wurden beteiligt gefunden: SRY (Yp11.3; Gendeletion oder Punktionsverlust-Mutationen), NR5A1 (9q33) und DHH (12q13.1; homozygote oder compound-heterozygote Mutationen). Auch Patienten mit partiellen Duplikationen von Xp (einschlie\u00dflich des NR0B1-Gens) und Chromosom 9p-Deletionen (einschlie\u00dflich der DMRT1- und DMRT2-Gene) k\u00f6nnen als isolierte 46,XY-CGD auffallen. Mutationen im MAP3K1-Gen (5q), die distal in der MAP-Kinase-Signalkette St\u00f6rungen verursachen, wurden k\u00fcrzlich bei 2 famili\u00e4ren und 2 sporadischen F\u00e4llen gefunden. Zus\u00e4tzlich wurden Umweltfaktoren (m\u00fctterliche Progesteron-Einnahme w\u00e4hrend der Schwangerschaft) und gest\u00f6rtes pr\u00e4natales Wachstum mit 46,XY-CGD in Verbindung gebracht.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen Befunde zusammen mit den Ergebnissen der Chromosomenanalyse, der endokrinologischen Untersuchung, der molekulargenetischen Analysen, sowie manchmal die Ergebnisse der chirurgischen Untersuchung mit Biopsie und Entfernung der Stranggonaden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnostisch sollten erwogen werden: hypergonadotrope Ovarialdysgenesie (46,XX-GD) und alle Formen von syndromaler 46,XY-CGD (z. B. Frasier-Syndrom, kampomele Dysplasie und 46,XY-DSD mit Nebennieren-Insuffizienz; s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "In Familien mit bekannter genetischer Anomalie ist eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik m\u00f6glich, sie wird jedoch nur in syndromalen F\u00e4llen empfohlen.", "genetic_counseling": "Auch wenn einige F\u00e4lle von 46,XY-CGD sporadisch auftreten, soll den betroffenen Familien immer eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden. Die Beratung sollte auf die Art der Vererbung der jeweils diagnostizierten genetischen St\u00f6rung Bezug nehmen.", "management_and_treatment": ".Teil der Behandlung ist die Entfernung der Stranggonaden, da sie ein hohes Risiko f\u00fcr maligne Entartung bergen. M\u00f6gliche assoziierte Gesundheitsprobleme (z. B. Niereninsuffizienz beim Frasier-Syndrom oder assoziierte Fehlbildungen) m\u00fcssen je nach genetischer Diagnose behandelt werden. Zum Zeitpunkt der Pubert\u00e4t wird Hormon-Substitution empfohlen. Dazu soll den Patienten und ihren Familien auch psychologische Hilfe angeboten werden. Die Infertilit\u00e4t ist ein wichtiges Thema bei der Behandlung. Durch Eizellspende sind jedoch Schwangerschaften m\u00f6glich.", "prognosis": "Bei angemessener Behandlung ist das Risiko f\u00fcr ein Malignom niedrig und die psychologischen und klinischen Ergebnisse f\u00fcr die Patienten sind gut.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Sxt-HUS", "sub_name": "Shiga-\u00e4hnliches Toxin-assoziiertes H\u00e4molytisch-ur\u00e4misches Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Typical hemolytic-uremic syndrome (typical HUS) is a thrombotic microangiopathy characterized by mechanical hemolytic anemia, thrombocytopenia, and renal dysfunction that is usually associated with prodromal enteritis caused by Shigella dysentriae type 1 or E. Coli.", "synonyms": "D+ HUS, EHEC-HUS, Hemolytic uremic syndrome associated with Shiga toxin-producing Escherichia coli, Hemolytic uremic syndrome with diarrhea, STEC-HUS, Shiga-like toxin-associated HUS, Stx-HUS, Typical HUS, Typical hemolytic uremic syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D58.8", "omim": "235400"}, {"name": "Sydenham-Chorea", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter, Jugendalter", "ICD-10": "I02.0\u00a0 I02.9", "UMLS": "C0152113", "GARD": "7716", "MedDRA": "10042732", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Symblepharon, kongenitales", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q11.2", "UMLS": "C0152454", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Kryptophthalmie, isolierte"}, {"name": "Symbrachydaktylie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Symbrachydaktylie der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe ist eine seltene, nicht-syndromale Gliedma\u00dfenreduktionsst\u00f6rung, die durch ein- oder beidseitige Brachydaktylie, kutane Syndaktylie und globale Hypoplasie der Hand und/oder des Fu\u00dfes gekennzeichnet ist, wobei die darunter liegenden Muskeln, Sehnen, B\u00e4nder und Knochen betroffen sind, aber keine anderen Gliedma\u00dfenanomalien damit einhergehen. Die Patienten weisen typischerweise kurze, steife, mit Schwimmh\u00e4uten versehene oder fehlende Finger und/oder Zehen auf, die oft durch kleine St\u00fcmpfe (Nubbins) mit Restn\u00e4geln ersetzt werden.", "synonyms": "De Smet-Fabry-Fryns-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q73.8", "UMLS": "C2931719"}, {"name": "Sympathische Ophthalmie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Uveitis, sympathische, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "H44.1", "UMLS": "C0029077", "MeSH": "D009879", "MedDRA": "10042742", "summary": "Die Ophthalmia sympathica (SO) ist eine beidseitige granulierende anteriore Uveitis, die meist innerhalb von drei Monaten nach Trauma oder chirurgischem Eingriff an einem der beiden Augen auftritt. Zwischen 1:1.000 und 1:1.650 Individuen mit einer penetrierenden Augenverletzung in der Vorgeschichte entwickeln eine SO. Die Patienten klagen \u00fcber Schmerzen, Lichtscheu, Akkomodationsl\u00e4hmung, Metamorphopsie und leicht bis signifikant verminderte Sehkraft. Die granulierende anteriore Uveitis ist begleitet von Ver\u00e4nderungen im hinteren Segment, z.B. moderate bis schwere Entz\u00fcndung des Glask\u00f6rpers, Choroiditis, Papillitis, Perivasculitis und gelblich-wei\u00dfe L\u00e4sionen des Pigmentepithels (Dalen-Fuchs-Kn\u00f6tchen). Die Entz\u00fcndung kann zu schwerer Netzhautabl\u00f6sung und Makula\u00f6dem f\u00fchren. Extraokul\u00e4re Symptome sind Kopfschmerzen, Meningitis oder Pleozytose des Liquors, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, Poliose und Vitiligo. Die \u00c4tiologie der SO ist teilweise noch unklar. Ursachen der Entz\u00fcndung sind ein zellvermittelter Immunprozess und eine entz\u00fcndliche Autoimmunreaktion gegen durch die urspr\u00fcngliche Verletzung freigesetzte Selbst-Antigene des Auges. \u00dcber die Art dieser Selbst-Antigene besteht noch keine Einigkeit. Eine bakterielle Infektion kann die Entstehung einer SO beg\u00fcnstigen, und Berichte \u00fcber Assoziationen mit spezifischen HLA-Antigenen (DR4, A11 und B40) sind ein Hinweis auf die Beteiligung genetischer Faktoren. Die SO kann nach Verletzung (47-65%) oder Kontusion des Auges auftreten. Das h\u00f6chste Risiko tragen Verletzungen des Ziliark\u00f6rpers. Auch chirurgische Eingriffe k\u00f6nnen eine SO ausl\u00f6sen. Eingriffe im hinteren Segment sind in dieser Hinsicht risikoreicher als Operationen im vorderen Segment. Die Diagnose basiert auf der Vorgeschichte und den klinischen Symptomen. Bildgebende Verfahren (Fluorescein- oder Indocyaningr\u00fcn-Angiographie, B-Scan-Ultrasonographie und Optische-Koh\u00e4renz-Tomographie) k\u00f6nnen n\u00fctzlich f\u00fcr die Best\u00e4tigung der Diagnose sein. Durch Laboruntersuchungen wird eine infekti\u00f6se Uveitis ausgeschlossen. Differentialdiagnosen bei nachgewiesenem Augentrauma sind Endophthalmitis (s. dort) und andere Formen von posttraumatischer Uveitis (linsen-induzierte Uveitis, posttraumatische Iridozyklitis) gedacht werden. Wenn ein Augentrauma in der Vorgeschichte nicht gesichert werden kann, ist auch an andere Krankheiten mit granulierender Uveitis (Sarkoidose, Vogt-Koyanagi-Harada-Syndrom; s. diese Termini) und an das Uvea-Effusions-Syndrom zu denken. Sofortiger und sorgf\u00e4ltiger Verschluss aller Wunden senkt das Risiko einer SO. Prim\u00e4r erhalten die Patienten \u00fcber mindestens drei Monate hochdosiert Steroide. Abh\u00e4ngig vom therapeutischen Ansprechen wird die Dosis allm\u00e4hlich reduziert. Nach Aufl\u00f6sung der Symptome folgt noch eine sechs- bis zw\u00f6lfmonatige Erhaltungstherapie. Wenn die Entz\u00fcndung durch Steroide allein nicht kontrolliert wird, kann auch an den Einsatz von Immunmodulatoren (Cyclophosphamid, Azathioprin oder Cyclosporin) gedacht werden. Eine chirurgische Behandlung wird kontrovers diskutiert. Enukleation oder Eviszeration soll nur bei Blindheit oder Schmerzen im ausl\u00f6senden Auge erwogen werden, da die Prognose des sympathisierenden Auges auch g\u00fcnstiger sein kann. Eine sp\u00e4te Enukleation bringt keinen Nutzen. Ohne Behandlung ist die Prognose f\u00fcr den Visus sehr ung\u00fcnstig, da die SO dann in beidseitige Erblindung m\u00fcndet. Schneller Verschluss der Wunde und effiziente medizinische Behandlung erm\u00f6glichen eine relativ gute visuelle Prognose. Da jedoch Rezidive und Komplikationen auftreten k\u00f6nnen, ist eine langfristige Kontrolle der Patienten erforderlich."}, {"name": "Sympathische Reflex-Dystrophie", "sub_name": "Komplexes regionales Schmerzsyndrom Typ 1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Complex regional pain syndrome type 1 (CRPS1) is a form of complex regional pain syndrome (see this term) in which the pain is disproportionate to any known inciting event and is characterized by continuous pain, allodynia, or hyperalgesia as well as edema, coloration (changes in skin blood flow), or abnormal sudomotor activity in the region of pain. Onset of CRPS1 symptoms may occur within a few days to a month after an injury or trauma to the affected limb.", "synonyms": "Algodystrophy, Reflex sympathetic dystrophy, ", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "G90.5", "omim": "604335", "umls": "C0034931\u00a0 C1527353", "meddra": "10064334"}, {"name": "Sympathoblastom", "sub_name": "Neuroblastom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Neuroblastom ist ein maligner Tumor der Neuralleistenzellen, aus denen sich das sympathische Nervensystem entwickelt.", "synonyms": "Sympathoblastom, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "C74.9", "OMIM": "256700\u00a0 613013\u00a0 613014\u00a0 613015\u00a0 613016\u00a0 613017\u00a0 616792", "UMLS": "C0027819\u00a0 C2931189", "MeSH": "C536408\u00a0 D009447", "GARD": "7185", "MedDRA": "10029260", "epidemiology": "Der Tumor tritt bei Kindern auf und macht vor dem 15. Lebensjahr 10% der soliden Tumoren aus. In dieser Altersgruppe betr\u00e4gt die Jahres-Inzidenz 1:70.000. 90% der F\u00e4lle werden in den ersten 5 Lebensjahren diagnostiziert.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild des Neuroblastoms ist sehr unterschiedlich und wird durch das Tumorstadium und den Ort des Tumors bestimmt. Das Neuroblastom kann an allen Stellen des sympathischen Nervensystems auftreten, etwa 80% der Tumoren liegen im Abdomen. \u00d6rtlich begrenzte Tumoren werden entweder zuf\u00e4llig entdeckt oder sie fallen als manchmal schmerzhafte Tumormasse im Abdomen oder Thorax auf. Zum Zeitpunkt der Diagnose hat schon etwa die H\u00e4lfte der Tumoren Metastasen entwickelt. Am h\u00e4ufigsten treten Metastasen im Knochenmark, im Knochen, in der Leber und in der Haut auf. Hinweise auf Metastasierung des Neuroblastoms sind Knochenschmerzen, Hinken, L\u00e4hmungen, Hepatomegalie (Pepper-Syndrom) und Exophthalmus (Hutchinson-Syndrom). M\u00f6gliche Begleitsymptome sind Bluthochdruck, Fieber und reduzierter Allgemeinzustand (Gewichtsverlust, Schmerzen, Irritabilit\u00e4t, An\u00e4mie).", "etiology": "Die Tumoren weisen zahlreiche, die Prognose bestimmende genetische Ver\u00e4nderungen auf: Die Amplifikation des Onkogens MYCN (2p24.3) ist ein Faktor mit ung\u00fcnstiger Prognose; Triploidie und numerische Chromosomenanomalien bedeuten eine gute Prognose, w\u00e4hrend Di- oder Tetraploidie und segmentale Chromosomenanomalien (Verlust von 1p oder 11q, oder Vermehrung von 17q) wiederum eine ung\u00fcnstige Prognose bedeuten. K\u00fcrzlich wurde bei etwa 12% der Patienten eine Mutation im ALK-Gen (2p23) gefunden, das f\u00fcr eine Tyrosinkinase kodiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf dem Nachweis einer erh\u00f6hten Konzentration der Katecholamin-Metaboliten VMA, HVA und Dopamin im Urin und auf der Darstellung des initialen Tumors mit bildgebenden Verfahren (US, CT, MRI). Szintigraphie mit 131J-MIBG und Liquoranalyse sind hilfreich f\u00fcr das Auffinden von Metastasen. Die Tumorbiopsie best\u00e4tigt die Diagnose, erm\u00f6glicht eine histologische Klassifizierung und erlaubt molekular- und zytogenetische Analysen, z.B. den Nachweis einer MYCN-Amplifikation.", "differential_diagnosis": "Eine Differentialdiagnose ist das Nephroblastom mit abdominalem Tumor, das durch systematische Analyse der Katecholamine im Urin ausgeschlossen wird. Knochenschmerzen und Hinken k\u00f6nnen als Symptome einer H\u00fcftgelenk-Synovitis fehlgedeutet werden. M\u00f6gliche beidseitige, durch orbitale Metastasen verursachte periorbitale H\u00e4matome sollten nicht zur Diagnose von Kindesmisshandlung f\u00fchren.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die vorgeburtliche sonographische Diagnose eines Neuroblastoms erm\u00f6glicht die Planung einer ad\u00e4quaten Therapie nach der Geburt.", "management_and_treatment": "Abgegrenzte Tumoren werden chirurgisch resiziert, manchmal nach vorangegangener Chemotherapie. Behandlungsoptionen bei mehr als 1 Jahr alten Kindern mit Metastasen und in F\u00e4llen mit MYCN-Amplifikation sind: Konventionelle Chemotherapie, Operation des initialen Tumors, Hochdosis-Chemotherapie mit Transplantation h\u00e4matopoetischer Stammzellen, \u00f6rtliche Strahlentherapie und Erhaltungstherapie mit Vitamin A-S\u00e4ure.", "prognosis": "Die meisten Patienten mit lokalisierten Tumoren haben postoperativ eine exzellente Prognose. Kinder unter 1 Jahr haben eine bessere Prognose als \u00e4ltere Kinder. Einige Tumoren zeigen sogar eine spontane Regression. Dagegen haben etwa 60% der Kinder \u00fcber 1 Jahr bei der Diagnose Metastasen und auch bei intensiver Behandlung schlechte Ergebnisse. Bei Kindern \u00fcber 1 Jahr liegt die 5-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate zwischen 95% bei einigen lokalisierten Tumoren und 30% bei Patienten mit Metastasen.", "summary": "Der Tumor tritt bei Kindern auf und macht vor dem 15. Lebensjahr 10% der soliden Tumoren aus. In dieser Altersgruppe betr\u00e4gt die Jahres-Inzidenz 1:70.000. 90% der F\u00e4lle werden in den ersten 5 Lebensjahren diagnostiziert."}, {"name": "Symphalangie - Brachydaktylie", "sub_name": "Multiple Synostosen", "german_description": "Das Syndrom der Multiplen Synostosen ist eine seltene, autosomal-dominant vererbte Dysostose mit vorzeitiger Ankylose der Gelenke. Es wurde in etwa 20 Familien mit mehreren Betroffenen beschrieben. Die Patienten haben ein charakteristisches langes, schmales Gesicht, eine breite, halbzylinderf\u00f6rmige Nase mit flachen Nasenfl\u00fcgeln und schmales Oberlippenrot. Die meisten Betroffenen werden schon fr\u00fch schwerh\u00f6rig, wegen einer Otosklerose, die mit Stapes-Ektomie gut behandelt werden kann. Die Gelenkankylosen nehmen ihren Anfang in der fr\u00fchen Kindheit und sind danach progredient. Der Proze\u00df beginnt in der Regel im proximalen Interphalangealgelenk der Kleinfinger und schreitet von ulnar nach radial und von proximal nach distal fort, typischerweise am 3., 4. und 5. Finger. Weitere Befunde sind Klinodaktylie, Brachydaktylie, verk\u00fcrzte Gro\u00dfzehe, Syndaktylie der 2. und 3. Zehe und leichter Minderwuchs. R\u00f6ntgenologisch werden in vielen Bereichen des Skeletts eine progrediente Verengung der Gelenkr\u00e4ume und, hieraus resultierend, Gelenkfusionen gesehen. Die Einengung der interphalangealen Gelenkr\u00e4ume beginnt schon fr\u00fch, und in der Folge verschmelzen die Phalangen. Eine Komplikation des Syndroms, die Einengung des Halswirbelkanals, erfordert eine neurologische Betreuung. Diese Patienten sollen m\u00f6glichst auch Aktivit\u00e4ten vermeiden, die mit einem Risiko f\u00fcr Hals- oder Wirbels\u00e4ulenverletzungen verbunden sind. Das Gen f\u00fcr das Syndrom der Multiplen Synostosen wurde in die Chromosomenregion 17q21-q22 kartiert, in der auch das SYM1-Gen f\u00fcr die Proximale Symphalangie liegt. Aus diesem Grund und wegen vergleichbaren Symptomen (fr\u00fch beginnende und progrediente Symphalangie, H\u00f6rverlust) wird angenommen, da\u00df beide Syndrome allelische Manifestationen des gleichen Gens sind. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Multiple synostoses syndrome (MSS) is a rare developmental bone disorder characterized by proximal symphalangism of the fingers and/or toes often associated with fusion of carpal and tarsal, humeroradial, and cervical spine joints.", "synonyms": "Deafness-Hermann type symphalangism syndrome, Facio-audio-symphalangism, Hearing loss-Hermann type symphalangism syndrome, Symphalangism-brachydactyly syndrome, WL syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "Q78.8", "omim": "186500\u00a0 610017\u00a0 612961", "umls": "C0175700\u00a0 C0342282", "gard": "3836"}, {"name": "Symphalangismus-Brachydaktylie-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Sillence-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Symphalangismus-Brachydaktylie-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q74.8", "OMIM": "113450", "UMLS": "C0342282\u00a0 C1862092", "MeSH": "C537338", "GARD": "4869", "summary": "Das Sillence-Syndrom (Brachydaktylie-Symphalangismus-Syndrom) \u00e4hnelt einem Typ A1 der Brachydaktylie (unterschiedliche Verk\u00fcrzung der Mittelphalangen aller Finger) mit gleichzeitiger Symphalangie. Die Endphalangen sind \u00e4hnlich einer Halmafigur geformt. Weitere charakteristische Symptome sind Skoliose, Klumpfu\u00df und Hochwuchs. Das Syndrom wurde in 1 Familie bei 5 Betroffenen aus 3 aufeinander folgenden Generationen beschrieben. Die Vererbung scheint autosomal-dominant zu sein. "}, {"name": "Symphalangismus, distaler", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Distal symphalangism is a very rare bone disorder characterized by ankylosis of the distal interphalangeal joints of the hands and/or feet.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.9", "omim": "185700", "umls": "C1861401"}, {"name": "Symphalangismus mit multiplen Anomalien der H\u00e4nde und F\u00fc\u00dfe", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Symphalangism with multiple anomalies of hands and feet is a rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation disorder characterized by bilateral symphalangism of hands and feet associated with cutaneous syndactyly of digits II-V, unilateral or bilateral brachydactyly type D (i.e. short, broad terminal phalanges of the thumbs), clinodactyly of fifth toes and/or mild hypoplasia of the thenar and hypothenar eminences. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1981.", "synonyms": "Learman syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q74.8", "omim": "185750", "umls": "C1861391", "gard": "5077"}, {"name": "Symphalangismus, proximaler", "german_description": "Der Proximale Symphalangismus, auch Cushing-Symphalangie genannt, ist charakterisiert durch die Fusion der proximalen Interphalangealgelenke. Auch andere Gelenke k\u00f6nnen betroffen sein: m\u00f6glich sind Ankylosen des Ellenbogengelenkes, des Sprunggelenkes und des Handgelenkes (Fusion der Tarsal- und Karpalknochen). Charakteristisch ist auch eine Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit als Folge einer Fusion der Geh\u00f6rkn\u00f6chelchen. Der Zustand wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im NOG-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 17q22. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Proximal symphalangism is a very rare, genetic bone disorder characterized by ankylosis of the proximal interphalangeal joints, carpal and tarsal bone fusion, and conductive hearing loss in some patients.", "synonyms": "Symphalangism, Cushing type, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.9", "omim": "185800\u00a0 615298", "umls": "C1861385", "mesh": "C536223", "gard": "8182"}, {"name": "Symptomale Form des Coffin-Lowry-Syndroms bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare X-linked syndromic intellectual disability which in symptomatic, female carriers is characterized by a highly variable phenotype including facial dysmorphisms (prominent forehead, hypertelorism, down-slanting palpebral fissures, epicanthic folds, thick lips with everted lower vermilion, thick nasal alae, and septum), short hands with tapering fingers, short stature and skeletal findings (progressive kyphoscoliosis). Intellectual disability is mild to moderate, but intellect can also be normal. A high rate of psychiatric disorders has also been reported.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q87.0"}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form der H\u00e4mophilie A bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "german_description": "Die symptomatische H\u00e4mophilie A bei weiblichen \u00dcbertr\u00e4gerinnen ist eine Form der H\u00e4mophilie A (s. dort). Sie tritt bei einigen M\u00e4dchen und Frauen mit Mutationen im F8-Gen (Xq28) auf, das f\u00fcr den Gerinnungsfaktor VIII kodiert. Diese Form ist selten, aber die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Symptome sind abnorme Blutungen nach kleinen Verletzungen, Operationen und Zahnextraktionen. Gelegentlich k\u00f6nnen Spontanblutungen auftreten. Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare bleeding disorder in association with carrier mutations in the F8 gene (Xq28) encoding coagulation factor VIII (FVIII), with a biological activity of FVIII \u226540 IU/dL and characterized clinically by abnormal bleeding as a result of minor injuries or following trauma, surgery or tooth extraction. Spontaneous hemorrhages may occur occasionally. Heavy menstrual bleeding is the most frequent type of bleed in the carriers.", "synonyms": "Symptomatic form of hemophilia A in female carriers, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "icd_10": "D66", "omim": "306700"}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form der H\u00e4mophilie B bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "german_description": "Die symptomatische H\u00e4mophilie B bei weiblichen \u00dcbertr\u00e4gerinnen ist eine Form der H\u00e4mophilie B (s. dort). Sie tritt bei einigen M\u00e4dchen und Frauen mit Mutationen im F9-Gen (Xq27) auf, das f\u00fcr den Gerinnungsfaktor IX kodiert. Diese Form ist selten, aber die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Symptome sind abnorme Blutungen nach kleinen Verletzungen, Operationen und Zahnextraktionen. Gelegentlich k\u00f6nnen Spontanblutungen auftreten. Die Vererbung ist X-chromosomal-rezessiv. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare bleeding disorder in association with carrier mutations in the F9 gene (Xq27.1) encoding coagulation factor IX (FIX), with a biological activity of FIX \u226540 IU/dL and characterized clinically by abnormal bleeding as a result of minor injuries or following trauma, surgery or tooth extraction. Spontaneous hemorrhages may occur occasionally. Heavy menstrual bleeding is the most frequent type of bleed in the carriers.", "synonyms": "Symptomatic form of hemophilia B in female carriers, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked recessive\u00a0", "icd_10": "D67", "omim": "306900"}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form der HFE-Gen-assoziierten heredit\u00e4ren H\u00e4mochromatose", "sub_name": "H\u00e4mochromatose Typ 1, symptomatische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Symptomatic form of hemochromatosis type 1 is a rare, hereditary hemochromatosis characterized by inappropriately regulated intestinal iron absorption which leads to excessive iron storage in various organs and manifests with a wide range of signs and symptoms, including abdominal pain, weakness, lethargy, weight loss, elevated serum aminotransferase levels, increase in skin pigmentation, and/or arthropathy in the metacarpophalangeal joints. Other commonly associated manifestations include hepatomegaly, cirrhosis, liver fibrosis, hepatocellular carcinoma, restrictive cardiomyopathy and/or diabetes mellitus.", "synonyms": "Symptomatic form of HFE-related hereditary hemochromatosis, Symptomatic form of classic hemochromatosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "E83.1", "omim": "235200"}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form der klassischen H\u00e4mochromatose", "sub_name": "H\u00e4mochromatose Typ 1, symptomatische Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Symptomatic form of hemochromatosis type 1 is a rare, hereditary hemochromatosis characterized by inappropriately regulated intestinal iron absorption which leads to excessive iron storage in various organs and manifests with a wide range of signs and symptoms, including abdominal pain, weakness, lethargy, weight loss, elevated serum aminotransferase levels, increase in skin pigmentation, and/or arthropathy in the metacarpophalangeal joints. Other commonly associated manifestations include hepatomegaly, cirrhosis, liver fibrosis, hepatocellular carcinoma, restrictive cardiomyopathy and/or diabetes mellitus.", "synonyms": "Symptomatic form of HFE-related hereditary hemochromatosis, Symptomatic form of classic hemochromatosis, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "E83.1", "omim": "235200"}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form der Muskeldystrophie Duchenne und Becker in weiblichen Tr\u00e4gerinnen", "german_description": "Symptomatische Formen der Duchenne- und Becker-Muskeldystrophien (DMD und BMD; s. diese Termini) bei Konduktorinnen sind gekennzeichnet durch unterschiedlich schwer ausgepr\u00e4gte Muskelschw\u00e4che bei progredienter Skelettmuskel-Myopathie, manchmal in Verbindung mit dilatativer Kardiomyopathie und erweitertem linken Ventrikel. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. An DMD und BMD erkranken prim\u00e4r m\u00e4nnliche Personen, nur ein kleiner Teil der Konduktorinnen hat Krankheitszeichen (24% der DMD- und 19% der BMD-\u00dcbertr\u00e4gerinnen). Die Symptome treten bei Konduktorinen in der Regel erst im Erwachsenenalter auf. Die Muskelschw\u00e4che ist in der Regel leicht bis moderat und dann eher proximal und asymmetrisch. Oft sind die Arme schw\u00e4cher als die Beine. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber Myalgien und Kr\u00e4mpfe. Einige Patienten haben nur kardiale Symptome. DMD und BMD werden X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache ist ein Dystrophin-Mangel in Skelett- und Herzmuskulatur als Folge von Deletionen und anderen Mutationen im DMD-Gen (Xp21.2). Frauen mit klinischen Zeichen der DMD oder BMD sind meist Tr\u00e4gerinnen von X-chromosomalen Rearrangements, oder haben eine schiefe X-Inaktivierung oder ein Turner-Syndrom (vollst\u00e4ndiges oder teilweises Fehlen eines X-Chromosoms; s. dort). Die Diagnose kann bei klinischem Verdacht durch molekulare Analyse best\u00e4tigt werden. Wie die m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten mit DMD oder BMD m\u00fcssen auch die Konduktorinnen f\u00fcr DMD und BMD multidisziplin\u00e4r betreut und regelm\u00e4\u00dfig kardiologisch kontrolliert werden. Die Prognose symptomatischer Konduktorinnen ist unterschiedlich, aber der Verlauf ist in der Regel leichter als bei m\u00e4nnlichen Patienten, und die Progredienz ist gering. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic muscular dystrophy affecting female carriers and characterized by variable degrees of muscle weakness due to progressive skeletal myopathy, sometimes associated with dilated cardiomyopathy or left ventricle dilation.", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "G71.0", "epidemiology": "The prevalence is unknown. Duchenne muscular dystrophy (DMD) and Becker muscular dystrophy (BMD) primarily affect males and only a small percentage of female carriers have been reported to manifest symptoms of these diseases (24% of female carriers from families with DMD and 19% of female carriers from families with BMD).", "clinical_description": "Symptomatic female carriers usually present later than males with DMD or BMD. The muscle weakness is generally less severe than in affected males and is usually proximal and, unlike males, has an asymmetric distribution. The upper limbs may be weaker than the lower limbs. Myalgia and cramps have also been reported. The serum creatine kinase level is raised. Some patients may present with cardiac manifestations alone.", "etiology": "DMD and BMD are both X-linked recessive diseases and are caused by dystrophin deficiency in skeletal and heart muscles due to variants in the DMD gene (Xp21.2). Females with clinical features of DMD and BMD are usually carriers of X-chromosome rearrangements and display skewed X-inactivation.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis can be confirmed by molecular testing of the DMD gene (Xp21.2-p21.1). Muscle biopsy shows a mosaic pattern of dystrophin expression.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses includes Turner syndrome.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is X-linked and genetic counseling should be offered to affected families. Female siblings of a proband with DMD or BMD have a 50% risk of being carriers. Female offspring of a female carrier have a 50% risk of becoming a carrier, male offspring have 50% of inheriting DMD or BMD depending on the mutation. In female carriers, the penetrance of symptoms is variable; most carriers are asymptomatic.", "management_and_treatment": "Management of symptomatic patients should be multidisciplinary, severely affected patients may require treatment with corticosteroids as in DMD. Physiotherapy and orthotics should be used to prevent joint contractures. Respiratory function should be monitored regularly and nocturnal hypoventilation treated with BiPAP (bilevel positive airway pressure). There should be regular cardiac monitoring of all female carriers of BMD and DMD, symptomatic and asymptomatic, with early treatment using ACE inhibitors and or beta-blockers.", "prognosis": "Female carriers of DMD and BMD have been shown to be at increased risk of developing dilated cardiomyopathy, although the impact on survival is uncertain."}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen myotubul\u00e4re Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "sub_name": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen zentronukle\u00e4ren Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen myotubul\u00e4re Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, Symptomatische Form von XLCNM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, Symptomatische Form von XLMTM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, ", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen zentronukle\u00e4ren Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen myotubul\u00e4re Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, Symptomatische Form von XLCNM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, Symptomatische Form von XLMTM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, ", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form des Fra(X)-Syndroms bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by a variable clinical phenotype which includes similar features but is typically less severe than in affected males. Patients may present with mild to borderline intellectual disability, anxiety, social phobia, selective mutism, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, language deficit, neurologic signs and symptoms (such as seizures, hypotonia, and clonus), ophthalmologic anomalies (strabismus, refractive errors), and facial dysmorphism (including long face, prominent forehead, large, prominent ears, and mandibular prognathism).", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "X-linked dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q99.2", "omim": "300624"}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form von XLCNM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "sub_name": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen zentronukle\u00e4ren Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen myotubul\u00e4re Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, Symptomatische Form von XLCNM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, Symptomatische Form von XLMTM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, ", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Symptomatische Form von XLMTM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "sub_name": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen zentronukle\u00e4ren Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Symptomatische Form der X-chromosomalen myotubul\u00e4re Myopathie bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, Symptomatische Form von XLCNM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, Symptomatische Form von XLMTM bei weiblichen Anlagetr\u00e4gerinnen, ", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Syndaktylie der Finger 4 und 5", "sub_name": "Syndaktylie Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by complete and bilateral syndactyly between the 4th and 5th fingers. In most cases, it is a soft tissue syndactyly, but occasionally the distal phalanges may be fused. The middle phalanx of the fifth finger is usually hypoplastic, and the feet are not affected.", "synonyms": "SD3, Syndactyly of fingers 4 and 5, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.1", "omim": "186100", "umls": "C1861366", "mesh": "C538154", "gard": "5088"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie-ektodermale Dysplasie-Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumen-Spalte-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumen-Spalte-ektodermale Dysplasie-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Zlotogora-Ogur-Syndrom ist ein Ektodermale-Dysplasie-Syndrom. Kennzeichnend sind: Anomalien der Haare, der Haut und der Z\u00e4hne, faziale Dysmorphien mit Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte, kutane Syndaktylie und in einigen F\u00e4llen intellektuelle Behinderung.", "synonyms": "CLPED1, Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumen-Spalte-Syndaktylie-Pili torti-Syndrom, Syndaktylie-ektodermale Dysplasie-Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumen-Spalte-Syndrom, Zlotogora-Ogur-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "OMIM": "225060", "UMLS": "C2931488", "MeSH": "C536726", "GARD": "375", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Bedingt durch einen Gr\u00fcndereffekt tritt die Krankheit geh\u00e4uft auf der Insel Margarita (Kleine Antillen) auf.", "clinical_description": "Das ist Zlotogora-Ogur-Syndrom, eine angeborene Erkrankung, ist gekennzeichnet durch sp\u00e4rliche und gedrehte Haare (Pili torti; siehe dort), fehlende oder sp\u00e4rliche Augenbrauen, Hypohidrose, trockene Haut, palmoplantare Keratodermie, abnorme Z\u00e4hne (versp\u00e4teter Durchbruch, bei Erwachsenen Mikrodontie/Hypodontie und Anodontie ; siehe diese Termini) faziale Dysmorphien (abstehende und malformierte Ohren, Mikrognathie, beidseitige Lippen-Kiefer-Gaumenspalte), kutane Syndaktylie der Finger und Zehen und transversale Furche der Handfl\u00e4chen. Auch Nageldystrophie kann vorhanden sein. Zus\u00e4tzliche Symptome sind: Intellektuelle Behinderung, Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, hypoplastischer Tr\u00e4nenpunkt, Anomalien der Mamillen, Anomalien des Urogenitalsystems (hypoplastisches Skrotum, Testes im Leistenkanal) und Lendenlordose. Das Zlotogora-Ogur-Syndrom und die Ektodermale Dysplasie Typ Margarita Island sind die gleiche Erkrankung.", "etiology": "Ursache des Zlotogora-Ogur-Syndroms sind Mutationen im Gen PVRL1 (11q23-q24), das f\u00fcr den Rezeptor Nectin-1 kodiert, der den Alpha-Herpesviren den Eintritt in menschliche Zellen erm\u00f6glicht. Der pathophysiologische Mechanismus des Zlotogora-Ogur-Syndroms ist noch nicht gekl\u00e4rt, es wird jedoch vermutet, dass Nectin-1 ein Zell-Zell-Adh\u00e4sionsmolek\u00fcl vor allem der Keratinozyten ist und dass durch Mutationen im PVRL1<#7i>-Gen die NAP (Nectin, Afadin, Ponsin)-abh\u00e4ngige Zell-Zell-Adh\u00e4sion gest\u00f6rt wird.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Bedingt durch einen Gr\u00fcndereffekt tritt die Krankheit geh\u00e4uft auf der Insel Margarita (Kleine Antillen) auf."}, {"name": "Syndaktylie - Kamptodaktylie und Klinodaktylie des f\u00fcnften Fingers - bifide Zehen", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation syndrome characterized by a unique combination of bilateral, symmetrical camptodactyly and clinodactyly of 5th fingers, mesoaxial camptodactyly of toes, and ulnar deviation of 3rd fingers. Additional variable manifestations include bifid toes and severe syndactyly, or synpolydactyly, involving all digits of hands and feet.", "synonyms": "Synactyly-camptodactyly and clinodactyly of fifth fingers-bifid halluces syndrome, Wahab syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.2", "omim": "615170"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie, nicht-syndromale", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A group of rare, congenital, non-syndromic distal limb malformation disorders characterized by webbing or fusion of the fingers or toes, involving soft parts only or including bone structure. The morphological anomaly can be unilateral or bilateral, symmetrical or asymmetrical, depending on the specific type.", "icd_10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3\u00a0 Q70.4\u00a0 Q70.9", "umls": "C0039075", "mesh": "D013576", "meddra": "10042778"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie-Nystagmus-Syndrom durch dup(2)(q31.1)", "sub_name": "Syndaktylie-Nystagmus-Syndrom durch Mikroduplikation 2q31.1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, chromosomal anomaly syndrome resulting from partial duplication of the long arm of chromosome 2 characterized by congenital pendular nystagmus associated with bilateral cutaneous syndactyly between the third and fourth fingers.", "synonyms": "Syndactyly-nystagmus syndrome due to dup(2)(q31.1), Syndactyly-nystagmus syndrome due to trisomy 2q31.1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q92.3"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie-Nystagmus-Syndrom durch Mikroduplikation 2q31.1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, chromosomal anomaly syndrome resulting from partial duplication of the long arm of chromosome 2 characterized by congenital pendular nystagmus associated with bilateral cutaneous syndactyly between the third and fourth fingers.", "synonyms": "Syndactyly-nystagmus syndrome due to dup(2)(q31.1), Syndactyly-nystagmus syndrome due to trisomy 2q31.1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q92.3"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie-Nystagmus-Syndrom durch Trisomie 2q31.1", "sub_name": "Syndaktylie-Nystagmus-Syndrom durch Mikroduplikation 2q31.1", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, chromosomal anomaly syndrome resulting from partial duplication of the long arm of chromosome 2 characterized by congenital pendular nystagmus associated with bilateral cutaneous syndactyly between the third and fourth fingers.", "synonyms": "Syndactyly-nystagmus syndrome due to dup(2)(q31.1), Syndactyly-nystagmus syndrome due to trisomy 2q31.1, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q92.3"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie-Polydaktylie-Ohrmuschel-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, congenital limb malformation syndrome characterized by complete cutaneous syndactyly between toes 1-2, ulnar polydactyly (ranging from nubbins to an almost complete additional finger) and earlobe malformations. Additionally, abnormalities along the medial border of the foot are observed on X-ray imaging. There have been no further descriptions in the literature since 1976.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "omim": "186350", "umls": "C1861347", "gard": "5090"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie - pr\u00e4axiale Polydaktylie - Sternumdeformit\u00e4t", "sub_name": "Akro-pektorales Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Acro-pectorale Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Fehlbildungen der distalen Strukturen der Gliedma\u00dfen (Syndaktylie aller Finger und Zehen, pr\u00e4axiale Polydaktylie der F\u00fc\u00dfe und/oder H\u00e4nde) und durch Fehlbildungen des oberen Anteiles des Sternums. Es wurde in 1 t\u00fcrkischen Familie bei 22 Angeh\u00f6rigen aus 6 Generationen beschrieben. Der Genort wurde in die Chromosomenregion 7q36 kartiert. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare syndrome characterized by a combination of distal limb abnormalities (syndactyly of all fingers and toes, preaxial polydactyly in the feet and/or hands) and upper sternum malformations.", "synonyms": "ACRP syndrome, Syndactyly-preaxial polydactyly-sternal deformity syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q74.0", "omim": "605967", "umls": "C1853812", "gard": "8485"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie-Telekanthus-anogenitale und renale Fehlbildungen-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch eine Assoziation von Syndaktylie der Zehen, fazialen Dysmorphien (z.B. Telekanthus (weiter Abstand der inneren Augenwinkel) und breite Nasenspitze), sowie anogenitalen (Analatresie) und renalen Fehlbildungen. Ursache des Syndroms sind Mutationen im FAM58A-Gen. Das Gen liegt auf dem X-Chromosom (Xq28) und kodiert f\u00fcr ein Protein unbekannter Funktion. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare malformation syndrome characterized by the association of toe syndactyly, facial dysmorphism including telecanthus (abnormal distance between the eyes) and a broad nasal tip, urogenital malformations and anal atresia.", "synonyms": "STAR syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "X-linked dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "300707", "umls": "C2678045", "gard": "10295"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1", "german_description": "Die Syndaktylie Typ 1 (SD1), in der Vergangenheit auch Zygodaktylie genannt, ist eine distale Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung mit kompletter oder partieller h\u00e4utiger Syndaktylie der Finger III/IV und der Zehen II/III. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Neugeborenen betr\u00e4gt 1-3:10.000. Manchmal sind auch andere Finger involviert. Der Ph\u00e4notyp kann nicht nur zwischen verschiedenen Familien, sondern auch innerhalb der gleichen Familie unterschiedlich sein, manchmal sind nur die H\u00e4nde, manchmal nur die F\u00fc\u00dfe betroffen. M\u00f6glich ist auch eine h\u00e4utige Syndaktylie zweier Finger mit gleichzeitiger kn\u00f6cherner Fusion der Endphalangen. Der SD1-Locus wurde in die Chromosomenregion 2q34-q36 kartiert. Die SD1 wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by complete or partial webbing between the 3rd and 4th fingers and/or the 2nd and 3rd toes. Other digits may be involved occasionally. The phenotype varies widely within and between families, sometimes only the hands are affected and sometimes only the feet. Webbing between fingers may be associated with bony fusion of the distal phalanges.", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "omim": "185900\u00a0 609815", "umls": "C1861380", "gard": "5081"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1a", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1, Typ Weidenreich, SD1a, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Weidenreich, Syndaktylie Typ 1a, Zygodaktylie, Typ Weidenreich, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.3", "OMIM": "609815", "UMLS": "C1853294", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1b", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1, Typ Lueken, SD1b, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Lueken, Syndaktylie Typ 1b, Zygodaktylie Typ Lueken, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1c", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1 Typ Montagu, SD1c, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Montagu, Syndaktylie Typ 1c, Zygodaktylie Typ Montagu, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1d", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1 Typ Castilla, SD1d, Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Typ Castilla, Zygodaktylie Typ Castilla, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Typ Castilla", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 4", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1 Typ Castilla, SD1d, Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Syndaktylie Typ 1d, Typ Castilla, Zygodaktylie Typ Castilla, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1 - Mikrozephalie mit Intelligenzminderung", "sub_name": "Filippi-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Filippi-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Mikrozephalie, kutane Syndaktylie der Finger und Zehen, geistige Retardierung, Kleinwuchs und ein charakteristisches Gesicht (hoher breiter Nasenr\u00fccken, d\u00fcnne Nasenfl\u00fcgel, Mikrogenie, hoher Stirn-Haaransatz). Bisher wurden weniger als 25 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome sind Kryptorchismus, Polydaktylie und Zahn- und Haaranomalien. Das Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Filippi syndrome is characterised by microcephaly, cutaneous syndactyly of the fingers and toes, intellectual deficit, growth retardation and a characteristic facies (high and broad nasal bridge, thin alae nasi, micrognathia and a high frontal hairline). So far, less than 25 cases have been reported. Cryptorchidism, polydactyly, and teeth and hair anomalies may also be present. Transmission is autosomal recessive.", "synonyms": "Type 1 syndactyly-microcephaly-intellectual disability syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "272440", "umls": "C0795940", "mesh": "C538152", "gard": "62"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Lueken", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1, Typ Lueken, SD1b, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Lueken, Syndaktylie Typ 1b, Zygodaktylie Typ Lueken, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Montagu", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1 Typ Montagu, SD1c, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Montagu, Syndaktylie Typ 1c, Zygodaktylie Typ Montagu, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.1\u00a0 Q70.2\u00a0 Q70.3", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Weidenreich", "sub_name": "Zygodaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD1, Typ Weidenreich, SD1a, Syndaktylie Typ 1, Typ Weidenreich, Syndaktylie Typ 1a, Zygodaktylie, Typ Weidenreich, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.3", "OMIM": "609815", "UMLS": "C1853294", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Syndaktylie Typ 2 oder Synpolydaktylie (SPD) ist eine seltene angeborene distale Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung mit einer Kombination von Syndaktylie und Polydaktylie. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. In den meisten F\u00e4llen betrifft die SPD beiderseits die Finger III und IV und die Zehen IV und V. Weitere Symptome sind Klinodaktylie des Kleinfingers, Kamptodaktylie und/oder Brachydaktylie. Die Synpolydaktylie wird autosomal-dominant vererbt, bisher sind 3 urs\u00e4chliche Genorte identifiziert: SPD1 (HOXD13-Gen, 2q31), SPD2 (FBLN1-Gen; 22q13.31) und SPD3 (14q11.2-q12). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by a distinctive combination of syndactyly and polydactyly, generally affecting the 3rd and 4th fingers and the 4th and 5th toes, bilaterally, with partial or complete reduplication of a digital ray within the syndactylous web. Additional features include 5th finger clinodactyly, camptodactyly and/or brachydactyly.", "synonyms": "Synpolydactyly, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "omim": "186000\u00a0 608180\u00a0 610234", "umls": "C2699746", "mesh": "C538153", "gard": "5087"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 3", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by complete and bilateral syndactyly between the 4th and 5th fingers. In most cases, it is a soft tissue syndactyly, but occasionally the distal phalanges may be fused. The middle phalanx of the fifth finger is usually hypoplastic, and the feet are not affected.", "synonyms": "SD3, Syndactyly of fingers 4 and 5, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.1", "omim": "186100", "umls": "C1861366", "mesh": "C538154", "gard": "5088"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 4", "german_description": "Die Syndaktylie Typ 4 (SD4) ist eine sehr seltene angeborene distale Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung mit beidseitiger vollst\u00e4ndiger Syndaktylie aller f\u00fcnf Finger. Bisher sind in der Literature nur 4 Berichte erschienen. Dabei wurde auch in mehreren F\u00e4llen eine Assoziation mit Polydaktylie (sechs Finger und sechs Metacarpalia) gesehen. Die F\u00fc\u00dfe k\u00f6nnen ebenfalls betroffen sein. Der SD4-Locus wurde in die Chromosomenregion 7q36 kartiert. Die SD4 wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by complete bilateral cutaneous fusion of all fingers, frequently associated with polydactyly (usually involving six digits and six metacarpals). Phalanges may fuse as a conglomerate mass of bones. Feet are occasionally affected.", "synonyms": "Polysyndactyly, Haas type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.4", "omim": "186200", "umls": "C1861355", "gard": "4434"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 5", "german_description": "Bisher gibt es in der Literatur weniger als zehn Berichte.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by soft tissue syndactyly of the 3rd and 4th fingers and the 2nd and 3rd toes associated with metacarpal and metatarsal fusion of the 4th and 5th digits. Shortening of fused metacarpals, ulnar deviation of fingers, interdigital cleft, camptodactyly, short distal phalanges, and absent distal interphalangeal creases have also been reported.", "synonyms": "Postaxial syndactyly with metacarpal synostosis, SD5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "omim": "186300", "umls": "C1861348", "mesh": "C538155", "gard": "5089"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 6", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Syndaktylie Typ 6 ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte, nicht-syndromale, angeborene Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung, die durch eine einseitige Fusion des zweiten bis f\u00fcnften Fingers, eine Verschmelzung der distalen Phalangen in einer knotenartigen Struktur und eine Fusion der zweiten und dritten Zehe gekennzeichnet ist. Einige Individuen zeigen nur ein Vernetzung zwischen der zweiten und dritten Zehe, ohne Beteiligung der Finger.", "synonyms": "Syndaktylie, Typ Mitten, Unilaterale Syndaktylie der Digitalen 2-5, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.1"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 7", "sub_name": "Cenani-Lenz-Syndaktylie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Cenani-Lenz-Syndrom (CLS) ist ein Syndrom mit angeborenen Fehlbildungen und gekennzeichnet durch komplexe Syndaktylie der Finger mit Fehlbildungen der Unterarmknochen und \u00e4hnlichen Fehlbildungen an den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen.", "synonyms": "Cenani-Lenz-Syndrom, Cenani-Syndaktylie, Syndaktylie Typ 7, Syndaktylie Typ Cenani-Lenz, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q78.4", "OMIM": "212780", "UMLS": "C1859309", "GARD": "5084", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 30 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die meisten F\u00e4lle wurden in Familien mit Verwandtenehen beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das klassische CLS ist gekennzeichnet durch eine fast symmetrische vollst\u00e4ndige Fusion der Fingerknochen und Synostose der Handknochen, was den H\u00e4nden das Aussehen eines Fausthandschuhes verleiht. Beschrieben wurde eine Variante des Syndroms, mit Oligodaktylie und partieller Syndaktylie. Die typischen Symptome des Syndroms sind: Synostosen der Karpal-, Metakarpal- und Fingerknochen, Anlagest\u00f6rung der Karpalknochen, verminderte Anzahl der Fingerstrahlen und Syndaktylie der Zehen. Andere Symptome sind radio-ulnare Synostose mit Verk\u00fcrzung von Radius und Ulna, Brachymesomelie, Dislokation des Radiusk\u00f6pfchens und Synostosen der Metatarsalia. In der Regel sind die unteren Gliedma\u00dfen weniger schwer betroffen als die oberen. In einigen Berichten werden assoziierte Fehlbildungen (Nierenhypoplasie, Wirbelfehlbildungen, Hemivertebrae) beschrieben. In einigen Publikationen werden F\u00e4lle von CLS mit anderen, h\u00e4ufigeren Formen der Syndaktylie beschrieben. In einzelnen F\u00e4llen wurden leichte faziale Dysmorphien beschrieben (Ptose; hoher Gaumen; hohe breite prominente Stirn; Hypertelorismus; flacher Nasenr\u00fccken; schr\u00e4g abw\u00e4rts verlaufende Lidspalten; kurze Nase; kurzes prominentes Philtrum; Jochbeinhypoplasie).", "etiology": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind homozygote und compound-heterozygote Mutationen im LRP4-Gen (11p12-p11.2). Bei einem CLS-\u00e4hnlichen Syndrom wurde eine heterozygote 1,7 Mb gro\u00dfe Duplikation beschrieben, die die Gene GREM1 und FMN1 (15q13-q15) umfasst.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird klinisch gestellt und ist mit Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall auch pr\u00e4natal m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Es wird empfohlen, die Finger einzeln zu rekonstruieren, die funktionellen Ergebnisse sind aber nicht immer befriedigend.", "prognosis": "Die spezischen Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildungen bestimmen die funktionelle Prognose.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 30 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die meisten F\u00e4lle wurden in Familien mit Verwandtenehen beschrieben."}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 8", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by unilateral or bilateral fusion of the 4th and 5th metacarpals with no other associated abnormalities. Patients present shortened 4th and 5th metacarpals with excessive separation between their distal ends, resulting in marked ulnar deviation of the little finger and an inability to bring the 5th finger in parallel with the other fingers.", "synonyms": "Fusion of metacarpals 4 and 5, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0X-linked recessive\u00a0", "icd_10": "Q70.0", "omim": "309630", "umls": "C1839728", "gard": "3559"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ 9", "sub_name": "Mesoaxiale synostotische Syndaktylie mit phalangealer Reduktion", "german_description": "Es wurde in zwei Familien beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by mesoaxial reduction of fingers, complete syndactyly of the 3rd and 4th fingers with synostoses of the corresponding metacarpals and associated single phalanges, malformed thumbs, and hypoplasia and clinodactyly of the 5th finger. Preaxial webbing of toes with terminal phalangeal hypoplasia of all toes has been reported in association.", "synonyms": "MSSD, Syndactyly type 9, Syndactyly, Malik-Percin type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "omim": "609432", "umls": "C1836206", "gard": "10590"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ Cenani-Lenz", "sub_name": "Cenani-Lenz-Syndaktylie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Cenani-Lenz-Syndrom (CLS) ist ein Syndrom mit angeborenen Fehlbildungen und gekennzeichnet durch komplexe Syndaktylie der Finger mit Fehlbildungen der Unterarmknochen und \u00e4hnlichen Fehlbildungen an den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen.", "synonyms": "Cenani-Lenz-Syndrom, Cenani-Syndaktylie, Syndaktylie Typ 7, Syndaktylie Typ Cenani-Lenz, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q78.4", "OMIM": "212780", "UMLS": "C1859309", "GARD": "5084", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 30 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die meisten F\u00e4lle wurden in Familien mit Verwandtenehen beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das klassische CLS ist gekennzeichnet durch eine fast symmetrische vollst\u00e4ndige Fusion der Fingerknochen und Synostose der Handknochen, was den H\u00e4nden das Aussehen eines Fausthandschuhes verleiht. Beschrieben wurde eine Variante des Syndroms, mit Oligodaktylie und partieller Syndaktylie. Die typischen Symptome des Syndroms sind: Synostosen der Karpal-, Metakarpal- und Fingerknochen, Anlagest\u00f6rung der Karpalknochen, verminderte Anzahl der Fingerstrahlen und Syndaktylie der Zehen. Andere Symptome sind radio-ulnare Synostose mit Verk\u00fcrzung von Radius und Ulna, Brachymesomelie, Dislokation des Radiusk\u00f6pfchens und Synostosen der Metatarsalia. In der Regel sind die unteren Gliedma\u00dfen weniger schwer betroffen als die oberen. In einigen Berichten werden assoziierte Fehlbildungen (Nierenhypoplasie, Wirbelfehlbildungen, Hemivertebrae) beschrieben. In einigen Publikationen werden F\u00e4lle von CLS mit anderen, h\u00e4ufigeren Formen der Syndaktylie beschrieben. In einzelnen F\u00e4llen wurden leichte faziale Dysmorphien beschrieben (Ptose; hoher Gaumen; hohe breite prominente Stirn; Hypertelorismus; flacher Nasenr\u00fccken; schr\u00e4g abw\u00e4rts verlaufende Lidspalten; kurze Nase; kurzes prominentes Philtrum; Jochbeinhypoplasie).", "etiology": "Die Krankheit wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind homozygote und compound-heterozygote Mutationen im LRP4-Gen (11p12-p11.2). Bei einem CLS-\u00e4hnlichen Syndrom wurde eine heterozygote 1,7 Mb gro\u00dfe Duplikation beschrieben, die die Gene GREM1 und FMN1 (15q13-q15) umfasst.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird klinisch gestellt und ist mit Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall auch pr\u00e4natal m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Es wird empfohlen, die Finger einzeln zu rekonstruieren, die funktionellen Ergebnisse sind aber nicht immer befriedigend.", "prognosis": "Die spezischen Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildungen bestimmen die funktionelle Prognose.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt, bisher wurden weniger als 30 F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Die meisten F\u00e4lle wurden in Familien mit Verwandtenehen beschrieben."}, {"name": "Syndaktylie Typ Malik-Percin", "sub_name": "Mesoaxiale synostotische Syndaktylie mit phalangealer Reduktion", "german_description": "Es wurde in zwei Familien beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by mesoaxial reduction of fingers, complete syndactyly of the 3rd and 4th fingers with synostoses of the corresponding metacarpals and associated single phalanges, malformed thumbs, and hypoplasia and clinodactyly of the 5th finger. Preaxial webbing of toes with terminal phalangeal hypoplasia of all toes has been reported in association.", "synonyms": "MSSD, Syndactyly type 9, Syndactyly, Malik-Percin type, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "omim": "609432", "umls": "C1836206", "gard": "10590"}, {"name": "Syndaktylie, Typ Mitten", "sub_name": "Syndaktylie Typ 6", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Syndaktylie Typ 6 ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte, nicht-syndromale, angeborene Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung, die durch eine einseitige Fusion des zweiten bis f\u00fcnften Fingers, eine Verschmelzung der distalen Phalangen in einer knotenartigen Struktur und eine Fusion der zweiten und dritten Zehe gekennzeichnet ist. Einige Individuen zeigen nur ein Vernetzung zwischen der zweiten und dritten Zehe, ohne Beteiligung der Finger.", "synonyms": "Syndaktylie, Typ Mitten, Unilaterale Syndaktylie der Digitalen 2-5, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.1"}, {"name": "Syndromale chorioretinale Dystrophie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromale Diarrhoe/Tricho-hepato-enterisches Syndrom", "sub_name": "Diarrhoe, syndromale", "german_description": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz betr\u00e4gt <1/1.000.000. Von 1982 bis 2012 wurden 44 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, 13 davon in Frankreich. Die Patienten wurden in der indischen, europ\u00e4ischen und mediterranen Bev\u00f6lkerung beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare gastroenterologic disease manifesting as intractable diarrhea in the first month of life with failure to thrive and associated with facial dysmorphism, hair abnormalities, and, in some cases, immune disorders and intrauterine growth restriction.", "synonyms": "Phenotypic diarrhea, SD/THE, Syndromic diarrhea/Tricho-hepato-enteric syndrome, Tricho-hepato-enteric syndrome, Trichohepatoenteric syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal, Antenatal", "omim": "222470\u00a0 614602", "umls": "C1857276", "gard": "5258", "epidemiology": "Syndromic diarrhea (SD/THE) prevalence is <1/1,000,000. More than 100 cases have been reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Severe, persistent and intractable diarrhea most often starts within the first month after birth (at latest 6 months) and is accompanied by severe malabsorption resulting in early and relentless protein-energy malnutrition and failure to thrive. SD children in most reported cases (>70%) were below the 10th percentile of birth weight and nearly half were born preterm suffering from intrauterine growth restriction. Patients present with facial dysmorphism including prominent forehead and cheeks, broad nasal root and hypertelorism. Hair is woolly, easily removable and in some cases sparse and poorly pigmented; further analysis reveals trichorrhexis nodosa, pili torti, trichothiodystrophy and aniso- and poikilotrichosis. Liver disease, with extensive fibrosis or cirrhosis and siderosis, affects about half of the patients, and hepatomegaly may be observed. Patients are prone to frequent infections and may fail to produce antibodies upon vaccination or present low immunoglobulin levels. Skin abnormalities including caf\u00e9 au lait spots, xerosis and rubbery skin are seen in half of the reported cases and are more prevalent with time. Cardiac abnormalities have been reported in a few cases and mild intellectual deficiency in half of patients.", "etiology": "Autosomal recessive mutations in SKIV2L (40% of cases) and TTC37 (60% of cases) lead to SD/THE. These genes encode proteins that form the Ski complex, a group of proteins responsible for the 3'-5' degradation of aberrant mRNA. Many different mutations have been identified and are spread along the genes. How Ski complex defects lead to the observed phenotype has yet to be elucidated and no genotype/phenotype correlation has been established to date.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suggested by clinical features. Small intestine biopsy shows non-specific villous atrophy with variable mononuclear cell infiltration of the lamina propria, but no specific histological abnormalities involving the epithelium. Genetic testing confirms these observations.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include all causes of chronic diarrhea, copper and iron deficiencies due to malnutrition, intestinal epithelial dysplasia, and microvillus inclusion disease.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Antenatal diagnosis should be offered to the parents of an affected child once the molecular defect has been characterized.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal recessive. Genetic counseling should be offered to at-risk couples (both individuals are carriers of a disease-causing mutation) informing them that there is a 25% risk of having an affected child at each pregnancy.", "management_and_treatment": "Intractable diarrhea requires parenteral nutrition during a variable period of time ranging from a few months to over a decade. In some cases, the association of enteral with parenteral nutrition can be indicated. Immunoglobulin supplementation may be necessary and antibody production after vaccination should be monitored. Finally, some children can present with a severe liver disease, independent of parenteral nutrition, but which could be worsened by it. In cases of severe liver disease, the only therapeutic option is a liver graft.", "prognosis": "Prognosis is poor with a mortality rate of up to 50%. The main complications are severe liver disease and infections. Some patients are rapidly weaned off parenteral nutrition but others remain under parenteral dependence for more than 10 years. Most of the children achieve a small final stature and half manifest mild intellectual deficit."}, {"name": "Syndromale Ectopia lentis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromale Erkrankung des Tr\u00e4nenapparates", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromale genetisch bedingte Ectopia lentis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromale genetisch bedingte Katarakt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromale genetische Krankheit mit Strabismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromale heredit\u00e4re Optikus-Neuropathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromale Hypoplasie der Orbitawand", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die syndromale Hypoplasie der Orbitawand ist eine seltene Krankheit, die bisher in 2 Familien beschrieben wurde. Sie ist gekennzeichnet durch Agenesie der Orbitawand, unterschiedliche Defekte der Tr\u00e4nenpassage, Hypoplasie der Lidaut und Tarsalplatten und Atresie des Ductus nasolacrimalis.", "synonyms": "Urrets-Zavalia-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "OMIM": "165600", "UMLS": "C1833795"}, {"name": "Syndromale kongenitale Natriumdiarrh\u00f6e", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, syndromic intestinal disorder, characterized by congenital onset of severe watery diarrhea containing high concentrations of sodium, hyponatremia and metabolic acidosis, and generally, uni- or bilateral chonal atresia, and corneal erosions. Additional congenital malformations may include intestinal atresia, and hexadactyly.", "synonyms": "Syndromic congenital tufting enteropathy, ", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "K59.8", "epidemiology": "Whilst the prevelence is unknown, less than 50 cases of both the syndromic and non-syndromic form have been reported in the literature.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically prenatal with polyhydramnios, prominent abdominal distension due to dilated fluid-filled loops of the intestine. A watery diarrhea is present after birth, independent of oral feeding (breast or formula) or nil by mouth. There are increased bowel sounds at examination, and passing of meconium is never reported. The infants become irritable and eventually apathetic, and develop moderate to severe dehydration. Rarely, there is no watery diarrhea noticed either due to severe dehydration or intestinal paralysis. This pseudo-obstruction is caused by dilated fluid-filled loops of intestine, which may result in volvulus, and requires abdominal surgery. Laboratory findings include high stool sodium levels (importantly, this can be normal when the depletion of body sodium has progressed for some time) and low serum sodium levels, metabolic acidosis and alkaline fecal pH, and low urinary sodium excretion. Histological findings reveal characteristic epithelial tufts, small crowding of enterocytes, which are often hard to find. Generally, uni- or bilateral chonal atresia is observed at birth, and most often, episodes of corneal erosions are seen. Additional congenital malformations are observed in some patients, most often intestinal atresia, and hexadactyly. In the case of unrecognized bilateral choanal atresia, aspiration and breathing difficulties can occur postnatally, in addition to the congenital diarrhea; the congenital diarrhea can go unrecognized (as the diarrhea is mistaken for urine), and severe dehydration can occur within the first days of life.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to homozygous or compound-heterozygous mutations in serine peptidase inhibitor, Kunitz type 2 (SPINT2; encoded by SPINT2, 19q13.2), resulting in abrogated sodium absorption, enhanced fluid secretion and diarrhea.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation and exclusion of the differential diagnosis. Initial diagnosis might include determination of fecal sodium, chloride and potassium. Separate sampling of watery stool and urine should be performed. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes the non-syndromic (classical) form of congenital sodium diarrhea (due to NHE3 or GUCY2C mutations) which is typically distinguished by the absence of congenital malformations or corneal erosions. Other differential diagnoses include anatomical bowel obstruction, congenital chloride diarrhea (distinguished by excessive fecal chloride), glucose-galactose malabsorption (which exhibits a diet-induced dehydrating diarrhea with later onset), microvillus inclusion disease and congenital tufting enteropathy (distinguished by histopathology).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Diagnosis may be suspected on presentation of polyhydramnios in the third trimester. Early, targeted genetic prenatal testing is possible after identifying disease-causing variants in an index patient; however, general concerns to sampling fetal material and diagnosing genetic conditions late in pregnancy would apply.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive (AR) for SPINT2 mutations. The risk of disease transmission to offspring for AR disease is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "After birth, total parenteral nutrition for treatment of dehydration for at least several months is required. Sodium supplementation should be provided for treatment of severe dehydration and to maintain normal body growth by preventing total body sodium depletion. In certain cases, patients may be weaned off total parenteral nutrition. For monitoring adequate sodium supplementation, the fractional excretion of sodium (FENa) should be calculated (normal range reportedly between 0.5%-1.5%). Choanal atresia and anal intestinal atresia require surgical treatment.", "prognosis": "Total parenteral nutrition carries the risk of bacteremia, and the risk of acute liver failure in very young children. Affected individuals may continue to have mild-to-moderate watery diarrhea but otherwise tend to lead a normal life. Reported complications include growth delay and hypoaldosteronism. Some patients episodically develop corneal erosions which are associated with pain and visual disturbances, and are treated with hydrating eye drops."}, {"name": "Syndromale kongenitale Tufting-Enteropathie", "sub_name": "Syndromale kongenitale Natriumdiarrh\u00f6e", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, syndromic intestinal disorder, characterized by congenital onset of severe watery diarrhea containing high concentrations of sodium, hyponatremia and metabolic acidosis, and generally, uni- or bilateral chonal atresia, and corneal erosions. Additional congenital malformations may include intestinal atresia, and hexadactyly.", "synonyms": "Syndromic congenital tufting enteropathy, ", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "K59.8", "epidemiology": "Whilst the prevelence is unknown, less than 50 cases of both the syndromic and non-syndromic form have been reported in the literature.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is typically prenatal with polyhydramnios, prominent abdominal distension due to dilated fluid-filled loops of the intestine. A watery diarrhea is present after birth, independent of oral feeding (breast or formula) or nil by mouth. There are increased bowel sounds at examination, and passing of meconium is never reported. The infants become irritable and eventually apathetic, and develop moderate to severe dehydration. Rarely, there is no watery diarrhea noticed either due to severe dehydration or intestinal paralysis. This pseudo-obstruction is caused by dilated fluid-filled loops of intestine, which may result in volvulus, and requires abdominal surgery. Laboratory findings include high stool sodium levels (importantly, this can be normal when the depletion of body sodium has progressed for some time) and low serum sodium levels, metabolic acidosis and alkaline fecal pH, and low urinary sodium excretion. Histological findings reveal characteristic epithelial tufts, small crowding of enterocytes, which are often hard to find. Generally, uni- or bilateral chonal atresia is observed at birth, and most often, episodes of corneal erosions are seen. Additional congenital malformations are observed in some patients, most often intestinal atresia, and hexadactyly. In the case of unrecognized bilateral choanal atresia, aspiration and breathing difficulties can occur postnatally, in addition to the congenital diarrhea; the congenital diarrhea can go unrecognized (as the diarrhea is mistaken for urine), and severe dehydration can occur within the first days of life.", "etiology": "The disorder is due to homozygous or compound-heterozygous mutations in serine peptidase inhibitor, Kunitz type 2 (SPINT2; encoded by SPINT2, 19q13.2), resulting in abrogated sodium absorption, enhanced fluid secretion and diarrhea.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation and exclusion of the differential diagnosis. Initial diagnosis might include determination of fecal sodium, chloride and potassium. Separate sampling of watery stool and urine should be performed. Diagnosis is confirmed by genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes the non-syndromic (classical) form of congenital sodium diarrhea (due to NHE3 or GUCY2C mutations) which is typically distinguished by the absence of congenital malformations or corneal erosions. Other differential diagnoses include anatomical bowel obstruction, congenital chloride diarrhea (distinguished by excessive fecal chloride), glucose-galactose malabsorption (which exhibits a diet-induced dehydrating diarrhea with later onset), microvillus inclusion disease and congenital tufting enteropathy (distinguished by histopathology).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Diagnosis may be suspected on presentation of polyhydramnios in the third trimester. Early, targeted genetic prenatal testing is possible after identifying disease-causing variants in an index patient; however, general concerns to sampling fetal material and diagnosing genetic conditions late in pregnancy would apply.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal recessive (AR) for SPINT2 mutations. The risk of disease transmission to offspring for AR disease is 25% where both parents are unaffected carriers.", "management_and_treatment": "After birth, total parenteral nutrition for treatment of dehydration for at least several months is required. Sodium supplementation should be provided for treatment of severe dehydration and to maintain normal body growth by preventing total body sodium depletion. In certain cases, patients may be weaned off total parenteral nutrition. For monitoring adequate sodium supplementation, the fractional excretion of sodium (FENa) should be calculated (normal range reportedly between 0.5%-1.5%). Choanal atresia and anal intestinal atresia require surgical treatment.", "prognosis": "Total parenteral nutrition carries the risk of bacteremia, and the risk of acute liver failure in very young children. Affected individuals may continue to have mild-to-moderate watery diarrhea but otherwise tend to lead a normal life. Reported complications include growth delay and hypoaldosteronism. Some patients episodically develop corneal erosions which are associated with pain and visual disturbances, and are treated with hydrating eye drops."}, {"name": "Syndromale Mikrophthalmie durch OTX2-Genmutation", "sub_name": "Syndromale Mikrophthalmie Typ 5", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 5 der Syndromalen Mikrophthalmie ist gekennzeichnet durch verschiedene Augenanomalien (Anophthalmie, Mikrophthalmie, Netzhautanomalien), unterschiedlich starke Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und Fehlbildungen des Zentralnervensystems.", "synonyms": "Syndromale Mikrophthalmie durch OTX2-Genmutation, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q11.2", "OMIM": "610125", "UMLS": "C1864690", "GARD": "3692", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild ist sehr unterschiedlich, selbst bei Betroffenen aus der gleichen Familie. Die Augenbefunde reichen von beidseitiger Anophthalmie bis zu schwerer oder milder beid- oder einseitiger Mikrophthalmie und Netzhautdystrophie. M\u00f6gliche Befunde im MRI sind Sehnerven-Aplasie/Hypoplasie, Fehlbildungen des Hippocampus, ver\u00e4nderte Struktur der Hypophyse und Agenesie des Corpus callosum. Bei einigen Patienten bestand eine schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, w\u00e4hrend andere sich kognitiv normal entwickelten. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber Dysfunktion des HVL mit Wachstumshormon-Mangel und Kleinwuchs oder kombinierten Mangel der HVL-Hormone (CPHD).", "etiology": "Ursache des Syndroms sind heterozygote Mutationen im OTX2-Gen (14q22.3). Ein \u00e4hnlicher Ph\u00e4notyp mit beidseitiger Anophthalmie und HVL-Anomalien (und zus\u00e4tzlich Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildungen, Ohranomalien und fazialen Dysmorphien) wurde bei Patienten mit 14q22-q23-Deletion und Einschluss des OTX2-Gens gefunden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Patienten mit dem vollen klinischen Spektrum von Fehlbildungen der Augen, des Zentralnervensystems und des Hypophysenvorderlappens zeigen eine signifikante \u00dcberscheidung mit der Septooptischen Dysplasie (s. dort).", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Syndromale Mikrophthalmie Typ 5", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Typ 5 der Syndromalen Mikrophthalmie ist gekennzeichnet durch verschiedene Augenanomalien (Anophthalmie, Mikrophthalmie, Netzhautanomalien), unterschiedlich starke Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung und Fehlbildungen des Zentralnervensystems.", "synonyms": "Syndromale Mikrophthalmie durch OTX2-Genmutation, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q11.2", "OMIM": "610125", "UMLS": "C1864690", "GARD": "3692", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Das klinische Bild ist sehr unterschiedlich, selbst bei Betroffenen aus der gleichen Familie. Die Augenbefunde reichen von beidseitiger Anophthalmie bis zu schwerer oder milder beid- oder einseitiger Mikrophthalmie und Netzhautdystrophie. M\u00f6gliche Befunde im MRI sind Sehnerven-Aplasie/Hypoplasie, Fehlbildungen des Hippocampus, ver\u00e4nderte Struktur der Hypophyse und Agenesie des Corpus callosum. Bei einigen Patienten bestand eine schwere Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung, w\u00e4hrend andere sich kognitiv normal entwickelten. Berichtet wurde auch \u00fcber Dysfunktion des HVL mit Wachstumshormon-Mangel und Kleinwuchs oder kombinierten Mangel der HVL-Hormone (CPHD).", "etiology": "Ursache des Syndroms sind heterozygote Mutationen im OTX2-Gen (14q22.3). Ein \u00e4hnlicher Ph\u00e4notyp mit beidseitiger Anophthalmie und HVL-Anomalien (und zus\u00e4tzlich Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildungen, Ohranomalien und fazialen Dysmorphien) wurde bei Patienten mit 14q22-q23-Deletion und Einschluss des OTX2-Gens gefunden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Patienten mit dem vollen klinischen Spektrum von Fehlbildungen der Augen, des Zentralnervensystems und des Hypophysenvorderlappens zeigen eine signifikante \u00dcberscheidung mit der Septooptischen Dysplasie (s. dort).", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur weniger als 20 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Syndromale Mikrosph\u00e4rophakie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromaler genetisch bedingter Keratokonus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromaler neurosensorischer H\u00f6rverlust durch COXPD", "sub_name": "Syndromale sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit durch kombinierten Defekt der oxidativen Phosphorylierung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare mitochondrial disease characterized by a variable phenotype comprising congenital sensorineural deafness, intermittent or persistent hypoglycemia, and hepatic and renal dysfunction potentially progressing to organ failure. Serum lactate levels are variably increased, deficiency of mitochondrial respiratory chain complexes I, III, and IV is observed in the liver and in fibroblasts.", "synonyms": "Syndromic sensorineural deafness due to COXPD, Syndromic sensorineural hearing loss due to COXPD, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "617872"}, {"name": "Syndromale sensorineurale Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit durch kombinierten Defekt der oxidativen Phosphorylierung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare mitochondrial disease characterized by a variable phenotype comprising congenital sensorineural deafness, intermittent or persistent hypoglycemia, and hepatic and renal dysfunction potentially progressing to organ failure. Serum lactate levels are variably increased, deficiency of mitochondrial respiratory chain complexes I, III, and IV is observed in the liver and in fibroblasts.", "synonyms": "Syndromic sensorineural deafness due to COXPD, Syndromic sensorineural hearing loss due to COXPD, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "E88.8", "omim": "617872"}, {"name": "Syndromales Mikrophthalmie-Anophthalmie-Kolobom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Mikrophtalmie, syndromale, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndromale Vitreoretinopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom der aseptischen Abszesse", "sub_name": "Kortikosteroidsensitives aseptisches Abszesssyndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Abszesse, aseptische disseminierte, Abszesse, aseptische systemische, Syndrom der aseptischen Abszesse, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "D89.8", "GARD": "10946", "summary": "Das Syndrom der kortikoid-sensitiven aseptischen Abszesse ist eine gut definierte Entit\u00e4t in der Gruppe der auto-inflammatorischen Krankheiten. Die Krankheit ist selten, bisher wurden nur 49 F\u00e4lle dokumentiert. Betroffen sind vor allem junge Erwachsene. Symptome sind rezidivierende Fiebersch\u00fcbe mit tiefen, abszessartigen Herden im Abdomen. Die Blutspiegel der Entz\u00fcndungsmarker und die Zahl der Neutrophilen sind erh\u00f6ht. Die Abszesse treten entweder isoliert auf, oder zusammen mit einer zugrundeliegenden Krankheit, z.B. einer rezidivierenden Polychondritis oder einer entz\u00fcndlichen Darmerkrankung. Die Abszesse treten meist vor der Diagnose einer entz\u00fcndlichen Darmerkrankung auf, evtl. mehrere Jahre vorher. Die Ursache ist unbekannt. Alles Suchen nach einem pathogenen Erreger blieb ohne Erfolg, auch bei Verwendung der PCR mit universellen und spezifischen Proben. In einigen wenigen F\u00e4llen bestand in der Familie eine granulomat\u00f6se Erkrankung. Die aseptischen Abszesse enthalten Ansammlungen von ver\u00e4nderten neutrophilen Granulozyten, die palisadenartig von Histiozyten und manchmal auch von Riesenzellen umgeben sind. Antibiotika sind wirkungslos. Eine dramatische Besserung wird dagegen mit Kortikosteroiden und Immunsuppressiva erreicht. "}, {"name": "Syndrom der Augen- und Gesichtanomalien mit Telekanthus und Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit", "sub_name": "Donnai-Barrow-Syndrom", "german_description": "Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz sind schwer zu bestimmen. Bisher wurden weniger als 50 Betroffene aus etwa 20 Familien beschrieben. DBS tritt in allen Ethnien auf und wird h\u00e4ufiger in konsanguinen Familien beschrieben. M\u00e4nnliche und weibliche Patienten sind gleich h\u00e4ufig.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A multiple congenital malformation syndrome characterized by typical facial dysmorphism, myopia and other ocular findings, hearing loss, agenesis of the corpus callosum, low-molecular-weight proteinuria, and variable intellectual disability. Congenital diaphragmatic hernia (CDH) and/or omphalocele are common.", "synonyms": "DBS/FOAR syndrome, Diaphragmatic hernia-exomphalos-hypertelorism syndrome, Diaphragmatic hernia-hypertelorism-myopia-deafness syndrome, Diaphragmatic hernia-hypertelorism-myopia-hearing loss syndrome, FOAR syndrome, Facio-oculo-acoustico-renal syndrome, Holmes-Schepens syndrome, Syndrome of ocular and facial anomalies, telecanthus and deafness, Syndrome of ocular and facial anomalies, telecanthus and hearing loss, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "222448", "umls": "C1857277", "mesh": "C536390", "gard": "1899", "epidemiology": "The prevalence and incidence of Donnai-Barrow syndrome (DBS) are difficult to estimate. Fewer than 50 individuals from about 20 families have been reported. DBS affects all ethnicities; it is more commonly diagnosed in the offspring of consanguineous unions. Males and females are affected equally.", "clinical_description": "Almost all patients have the following features: agenesis/hypogenesis of the corpus callosum, enlarged anterior fontanelle, marked sensorineural hearing loss and hypertelorism. Characteristic facial features include: down-slanting palpebral fissures, short nose with flat nasal bridge, tall broad forehead, widow's peak in the anterior hairline, and sometimes prominent globes. About 40% of patients have CDH and/or omphalocele. Developmental delay and variable intellectual deficit are frequent. High myopia (> 6 diopters), a distinctive optic nerve head dysgenesis, and an increased risk of retinal detachment may lead to progressive loss of vision. Iris coloboma, Focal segmental glomerulosclerosis and proximal tubule dysfunction (rarely progressing to renal insufficiency) are reported occasionally.", "etiology": "DBS is an autosomal recessive disorder caused by loss of function variants in the LRP2 low-density lipoprotein receptor-related protein 2 gene (2q31.1) encoding the protein megalin, expressed on multiple absorptive epithelia, notably in the brain, kidney, and eye. Megalin plays an important role in endocytosis of numerous ligands and in various signaling pathways.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suggested by a combination of clinical and neuroimaging features along with a typical pattern of low-molecular-weight proteinuria, increased urinary levels of retinol-binding protein (RBP) and RBP/creatinine ratio. The diagnosis is confirmed by molecular genetic testing.", "differential_diagnosis": "DBS has a characteristic constellation of clinical features limiting differential diagnoses. However, some overlapping signs are found in tetrasomy 12p, Fryns, Chudley-McCullough, Acrocallosal, and Craniofrontonasal syndromes. The renal phenotype partly resembles Dent disease and Lowe syndrome. The ocular phenotype may be suggestive of Stickler syndrome.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Detection of hypertelorism, agenesis of the corpus callosum, and either CDH or omphalocele by prenatal imaging should raise suspicion of DBS. Prenatal diagnosis for at-risk pregnancies is possible and requires prior identification of the disease-causing mutation in the family.", "genetic_counseling": "DBS is an autosomal recessive disorder. Genetic counseling should be provided to parents of affected children and to their relatives. Parents of an affected child are obligate carriers for the disease-causing allele. The sole exception reported to date is a patient with DBS due to uniparental disomy (UPD).", "management_and_treatment": "Regular screening of vision, hearing, and renal function should be established. Corrective lenses, preventive treatment for retinal detachment, and hearing aids and/or cochlear implants may be required. CDH and/or omphalocele, when present, necessitate surgical intervention. Specific adapted education for vision, hearing and intellectual disabilities should be provided as is needed for affected children.", "prognosis": "Affected individuals can achieve useful vision and hearing with correction. Overall health status in patients is generally good in childhood and adolescence. End-stage kidney failure is a rare and life-threatening complication. Pre- or peri-natal presentation with diaphragmatic and abdominal wall defects requires surgical intervention and is associated with elevated morbidity and mortality."}, {"name": "Syndrom der breiten Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen", "sub_name": "Rubinstein-Taybi-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Rubinstein-Taybi-Syndrom (RTS) ist gekennzeichnet durch angeborene Fehlbildungen (Mikrozephalie, spezifische faziale Dysmorphien, breite Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen und postnatale Wachstumsretardierung), Intelligenzminderung und charakteristisches Verhalten.", "synonyms": "Syndrom der breiten Daumen und Gro\u00dfzehen, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Unbekannt\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q87.2", "OMIM": "180849\u00a0 610543\u00a0 613684", "UMLS": "C0035934", "MeSH": "D012415", "GARD": "7593", "MedDRA": "10039281", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird auf etwa 1/100.000 bis 125.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Die Auspr\u00e4gung der fazialen Charakteristika (stark gebogene Augenbrauen, lange Wimpern, anti-mongoloide Lidachsen, schnabelf\u00f6rmige Nase, hoher schmaler Gaumen, Mikrogenie) nimmt mit dem Alter zu. Sehr h\u00e4ufig werden an der R\u00fcckseite der bleibenden Schneidez\u00e4hne sog. 'talon cusps' (fingernagelf\u00f6rmige Vertiefungen) gesehen. Die meisten betroffenen Patienten zeigen ein ungew\u00f6hnliches L\u00e4cheln mit fast vollst\u00e4ndig geschlossenen Augen. Weitere k\u00f6rperliche Befunde sind Augenanomalien (Verschluss des Ductus nasolacrimalis, angeborenes Glaukom, Refraktionsfehler), verschiedene Herzfehler (z. B. Ventrikel- und Atriumseptum-Defekt, ein offener Ductus arteriosus), \u00fcberstreckbare Gelenke und Anomalien der Haut (vor allem Neigung zu Keloiden). F\u00fctterungsschwierigkeiten werden h\u00e4ufig im ersten Jahr beobachtet, und Atemwegsinfektionen sind im S\u00e4uglings- und Kindesalter sehr h\u00e4ufig. Obstipation ist meist ein lebenslanges Problem und viele Patienten werden in der sp\u00e4ten Kindheit oder fr\u00fchen Pubert\u00e4t adip\u00f6s. Als Kinder k\u00f6nnen die Patienten sehr gute soziale Kontakte herstellen. Im Erwachsenenalter werden pl\u00f6tzliche Stimmungsschwankungen und obsessiv-kompulsives Verhalten allm\u00e4hlich immer h\u00e4ufiger. Anders als bisher angenommen, haben Personen mit Rubinstein-Taybi-Syndrom unter 40 Jahren kein erh\u00f6htes Risiko, an b\u00f6sartigen Tumoren zu erkranken. Es ist unklar, ob dieses Risiko bei \u00e4lteren Menschen mit Rubinstein-Taybi-Syndrom zunimmt.", "etiology": "Ursachen des RTS sind: Mikrodeletionen der Chromosomenregion 16p13.3 oder 22q13.2, Mutationen im Gen f\u00fcr das CREB-bindende Protein (CREBBP, 16p13.3) und Mutationen im E1A-bindenden Protein (EP300, 22q13). Die CREBBP- und EP300-Proteine zeigen einen hohen Grad von Homologie und sind beide sehr wichtige globale transkriptionelle Koaktivatoren. Die genaue Pathogenese ist aber noch nicht bekannt. Es besteht keine signifikante Genotyp-Ph\u00e4notyp-Korrelation, au\u00dfer bei Individuen mit einer EP300-Mutation, die im Durchschnitt ein h\u00f6heres Funktionsniveau, weniger ausgepr\u00e4gte distale Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildungen und eine ausgepr\u00e4gtere Mikrozephalie aufweisen.", "diagnostic_methods": "Prinzipiell wird die Diagnose klinisch gestellt. Eine zytogenetische oder molekulare Ver\u00e4nderung wird bei etwa 65% der Patienten gefunden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Gelegentlich ist das Syndrom schwer vom Sathre-Chotzen-, Floating-Harbor- und dem Cornelia de Lange-Syndrom (s. diese Termini) zu unterscheiden.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Wenn bei dem betroffenen Kind eine zytogenetische oder molekulare Anomalie gefunden wurde, ist in weiteren Schwangerschaften eine vorgeburtliche Diagnose nach Chorionzottenbiopsie m\u00f6glich. Durch Fehlbildungsultraschall ist das RTS pr\u00e4natal nur selten verl\u00e4sslich zu diagnostizieren.", "genetic_counseling": "Das Syndrom tritt fast immer sporadisch auf, die meisten F\u00e4lle resultieren aus de novo-Mutationen. Das Wiederholungsrisiko f\u00fcr Geschwister von Indexpatienten, mit einem RTS geboren zu werden, ist niedrig (0,5%). Wenn eine Person mit Rubinstein-Taybi-Syndrom in der Lage ist, sich fortzupflanzen, betr\u00e4gt das Wiederholungsrisiko 50 %.", "management_and_treatment": "Alle Personen sollten zum Zeitpunkt der Diagnose eine kardiologische Untersuchung erhalten und auf H\u00f6r- oder Sehst\u00f6rungen untersucht werden (alle 3 Jahre bei Kindern und alle 5 Jahre bei Erwachsenen). Spezielle F\u00f6rderprogramme sind erforderlich, mit fr\u00fchem Schwerpunkt auf der psychomotorischen Entwicklung und Sprachtherapie. Kinder sollten in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden mit einer systematischen Entwicklungsbeurteilung ab dem Alter von 3 bis 4 Jahren getestet werden, um eine ad\u00e4quate p\u00e4dagogische Unterst\u00fctzung zu gew\u00e4hrleisten, die mit dem Potenzial des jeweiligen Kindes vereinbar ist. Wenn ein chirurgischer Eingriff erforderlich ist, sollten Personen, die sich einer Vollnarkose unterziehen, von einem An\u00e4sthesisten betreut werden, der mit komplexen Atemwegsproblemen vertraut ist und sich des erh\u00f6hten Risikos einer Aspiration und von Herzrhythmusst\u00f6rungen bei der Verwendung von kardioaktiven Medikamenten bewusst ist.", "prognosis": "Die Lebenserwartung ist nicht wesentlich beeintr\u00e4chtigt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt wird auf etwa 1/100.000 bis 125.000 gesch\u00e4tzt."}, {"name": "Syndrom der chronischen atrialen und intestinalen Rhythmusst\u00f6rung", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic disease characterized by co-occurrence of sick sinus syndrome (manifesting as sinus bradycardia, often requiring pacemaker implantation) and chronic intestinal pseudo-obstruction (which may be of myogenic or neurogenic origin and usually requires total parenteral nutrition), with an age of onset within the first four decades of life. Other cardiac features, such as atrial flutter or fibrillation and valve anomalies, may also be present.", "synonyms": "CAID syndrome, Chronic atrial dysrhythmia-intestinal motility disorder, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "K59.8", "omim": "616201", "gard": "12281"}, {"name": "Syndrom der fehlenden Nasenzilien, famili\u00e4re Form", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene genetische otorhinolaryngologische Erkrankung, die durch eine respiratorische Morbidit\u00e4t aufgrund fehlender Zilien auf den Epithelzellen der Atemwege gekennzeichnet ist. Die Erkrankung manifestiert sich von Geburt an mit Atemnot, neonataler Pneumonie, Dyspnoe, lob\u00e4rer Atelektase und Bronchiektasie. Wiederkehrende Infektionen der oberen und unteren Atemwege, chronischer feuchter Husten und chronische Sinusitis, Otitis und Rhinitis sind typische lebenslange Beschwerdebilder.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q30.8", "GARD": "2254"}, {"name": "Syndrom der fehlenden Pulmonalklappe", "sub_name": "Pulmonalklappenagenesie", "german_description": "Das angeborene Fehlen der Pulmonalklappe (APV) ist definiert als v\u00f6lliges oder fast v\u00f6lliges Fehlen der Pulmonalklappensegel. Immer ist der Defekt begleitet von einer Infundibulumstenose und von einer aneurysmatischen Erweiterung der Arterien in der Lunge. Das APV kann mit einfachen und komplexen Herzfehlern assoziiert sein. Die Anomalie kann isoliert auftreten oder als Symptom eines genetisch determinierten Syndroms. Die h\u00e4ufigste Assoziation ist das gemeinsame Auftreten mit einer Fallotschen Tetralogie und fehlendem Ductus Botalli (Fallot-Typ APV/ADA). Seltener ist das APV assoziiert mit intaktem Ventrikelseptum oder muskul\u00e4rem Ventrikelseptumdefekt bei persistierendem Ductus Botalli (non-Fallot-Typ APV/PDA). Diese ph\u00e4notypische Variabilit\u00e4t weist auf eine komplexe Pathogenese, auch der Zusammenhang mit der Wanderung kephalischer Neuralleistenzellen und dem 22q11.2-Deletionssyndrom. Hauptsymptome des APV sind Ateminsuffizienz und Verlegung der Bronchien. Beginn und Schweregrad der obstruktiven Ateminsuffizienz schwanken erheblich. Das APV ist meist eine isolierte, nicht-syndromische Fehlbildung mit unbekannter Ursache. Dagegen haben Kinder mit Fallot-Typ APV/ADA und Symptomen eines DiGeorge-Velokardiofazialen Syndroms (DG/VCFS) h\u00e4ufig eine Mikrodeletion 22q11.2. Bei syndromischem (mit weiteren Fehlbildungen assoziiertem) Fallot-Typ APV/PDA mu\u00df ein 18q-Deletionssyndrom ausgeschlossen werden. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit aller APV zusammen ist nicht bekannt. Der Fallot-Typ APV/ADA wird bei 1 von 500 lebend mit Herzfehler geborenen Kindern gefunden. Eine fr\u00fche chirurgische Korrektur ist bei allen Patienten indiziert und erfolgt durch Insertion eines Ventilrohres in den rechtsventrikul\u00e4ren Ausflu\u00dftrakt mit Plikation der Lungenarterien oder dem LeCompte-Man\u00f6ver zur Entlastung der komprimierten Bronchien. Bei anhaltenden Atemproblemen mu\u00df evtl. erneut chirurgisch eingegriffen werden, z.B. duch Implantation eines intrabronchialen dehnungsf\u00e4higen Stents. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Pulmonary valve agenesis is a rare congenital heart malformation characterized by a total or partial absence of the pulmonary valve leaflets associated with stenosis of the pulmonary artery orifice and aneurysmal dilatation of the pulmonary arteries. It usually occurs in association with additional cardiovascular malformations such as teralogy of fallot or ventricular septal defect, or can occur as part of a syndrome (e.g. 22q11.2 deletion syndrome). Clinical features depend on the presence of associated cardiac malformations and include pulmonary insufficiency, bronchial obstruction (secondary to compression by aneurysmally dilated pulmonary arteries), pulmonary stenosis, cyanosis, and cardiac failure.", "synonyms": "Absent pulmonary valve syndrome, Congenital absence of the pulmonary valve, PVA, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q22.2", "gard": "4597"}, {"name": "Syndrom der fetalen Einkapselung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltener, t\u00f6dlicher Entwicklungsdefekt w\u00e4hrend der Embryogenese, der durch schwere fetale Fehlbildungen gekennzeichnet ist, einschlie\u00dflich kraniofazialer Dysmorphien (abnormale Zyste in der Sch\u00e4delregion, hypoplastische Aug\u00e4pfel, zwei durch eine Nasenscheidewand getrennte \u00d6ffnungen im Nasenbereich, abnorme \u00d6ffnung anstelle des Mundes), Omphalozele und unbewegliche, hypoplastische Gliedma\u00dfen, die unter einer abnormalen, transparenten, membranartigen Haut eingeschlossen sind. Weitere Merkmale sind das Fehlen von Adnexstrukturen der Haut an der Au\u00dfenseite der Gliedma\u00dfen sowie unterentwickelte Skelettmuskeln und -knochen. Es wird \u00fcber eine Assoziation mit Fallot-Tetralogie, Hufeisennieren und Zwerchfell- und Lungenlappendefekten berichtet.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich", "OMIM": "613630"}, {"name": "Syndrom der Gemischten Mosaik-Aneuploidie", "sub_name": "Variables Aneuploidie-Mosaik-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom der Gemischten Mosaik-Aneuploidie (mosaic variegated aneuploidy; MVA) ist eine Chromosomenanomalie mit multiplen Mosaik-Aneuploidien, die zu unterschiedlichen Symptomen und zu Krebsdisposition f\u00fchrt.", "synonyms": "Syndrom der Gemischten Mosaik-Aneuploidie, Warburton-Anyane-Yeboa-Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q99.8", "OMIM": "257300\u00a0 614114\u00a0 617598", "UMLS": "C1850343\u00a0 C2931286", "MeSH": "C536987", "GARD": "3007", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur 41 F\u00e4lle von MVA beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Die h\u00e4ufigsten klinischen Symptome sind pr\u00e4natal einetzende Wachstumsretardierung, Mikrozephalie, verz\u00f6gerte Entwicklung, strukturelle Anomalien des Zentralnervensystems und der Augen (z.B. Katarakt, Hornhauttr\u00fcbung, Mikrophthalmie, Glaukom) und leicht ausgepr\u00e4gte Dysmorphien (dreieckiges Gesicht, Mikrogenie, Epikanthus). Weitere Symptome sind Oligohydramnion, erweitere Ventrikel, Dandy-Walker-Malformation, fetaler Aszites und verg\u00f6\u00dferte Nackenfalte (increased nuchal translucency). Bei etwa 1/3 der Patienten entwickeln sich Malignome. Schon vor dem Alter von 5 Jahren treten Wilms-Tumor, Rhabdomyosarkom, Akute Lymphoblasten-Leuk\u00e4mie und maligne Granulosazell-Tumoren des Ovars auf (s. diese Termini). Bei einem Patienten traten im Erwachsenenalter ein Karzinom der Ampulla Vateri und des Kolons auf.", "etiology": "Dem MVA-Syndom liegt ein Defekt der Zellteilung zugrunde, mit aberranter Verteilung der Chromosomen in der Mitose. Im Ergebnis sind mehr als 10% der Zellen aneuploid. Bei Patienten mit MVA wurden Mutationen in den Genen BUB1B (15q15.1) und CEP57 (11q21) gefunden. BUB1B kodiert f\u00fcr BUBR1, ein Schl\u00fcsselprotein bei der Bildung der Mitosespindel. Das zentrosomale Protein CEP57 ist an der Nukleisation und Stabilisierung der Mikrotubuli beteiligt. W\u00e4hrend etwa 75% der Patienten mit BUB1B-Mutationen Krebs haben, wurde bisher kein Patient mit CEP57-Mutation und Krebs gefunden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose der MVA f\u00fchrt die zytogenetische Analyse mit dem Nachweis gemischter Aneuploidie.", "differential_diagnosis": "Aneuploidie ist eine Merkmal der Chromosomeninstabilit\u00e4t-Syndrome: Roberts-Syndrom, Ataxia telangiectatica, Xeroderma pigmentosum, Bloom-Syndrom, Werner-Syndrom und Nijmegen- breakage-Syndrom. Mikrozephalie mit Chromosomeninstabilit\u00e4t ist bei Fanconi-An\u00e4mie m\u00f6glich (s. diese Termini).", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Eine vorgeburtliche Karyotypanalyse ist nach Chorionzottenbiopsie oder Amniozentese m\u00f6glich. Sie erfolgt bei famili\u00e4rem Wiederholungsrisiko oder nach auff\u00e4lligem, mit MVA vereinbarem Ergebnis im Ultrrschall.", "genetic_counseling": "Die MVA wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Die Eltern eines betroffenen Kindes sind heterozygote Tr\u00e4ger der Anlage. Das Wiederholungsrisiko f\u00fcr Geschwister ist 25%. Die Suche nach Anlagetr\u00e4gern in der Verwandtschaft der Patienten ist durch DNA-Analyse in den Genen BUB1B bzw. CEP57 m\u00f6glich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die klinische Versorgung orientiert sich an den jeweiligen spezifischen Bed\u00fcrfnissen der Patienten (z.B. Therapie der Wachstumsst\u00f6rung mit Wachstumshormon). F\u00e4lle mit zytogenetisch (multiple Aneuploidien) oder molekular (BUB1B-Mutationen) best\u00e4tigter MVA sollen bis zum Alter von 5 Jahren regelm\u00e4\u00dfig in 3-4-monatigem Abstand zum Ausschluss eine Wilms-Tumors untersucht werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch die Art der Fehlbildungen und durch das Malignom-Risiko bestimmt.", "summary": "Bisher wurden in der Literatur 41 F\u00e4lle von MVA beschrieben."}, {"name": "Syndrom der generalisierten basaloiden follikul\u00e4ren Hamartome", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das generalisierte basaloide follikul\u00e4re Hamartom ist eine seltene, genetisch bedingte Hauterkrankung, die durch multiple miliumartige, komedonartige L\u00e4sionen und hautfarbene bis hyperpigmentierte, 1 bis 2 mm gro\u00dfe Papeln gekennzeichnet ist, die mit Hypotrichose und palmaren/plantaren Gr\u00fcbchen einhergehen. Die L\u00e4sionen werden normalerweise zuerst an den Wangen oder am Hals bemerkt und nehmen allm\u00e4hlich an Gr\u00f6\u00dfe und Anzahl zu, um die Kopfhaut, das Gesicht, die Ohren, die Schultern, die Brust, die Achselh\u00f6hlen und die Oberarme zu befallen. In schweren F\u00e4llen k\u00f6nnen auch der untere R\u00fccken, die Unterarme und die R\u00fcckseite der Beine betroffen sein. Es wurde auch \u00fcber leichte Hypohidrose berichtet.", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q82.5", "OMIM": "605827", "UMLS": "C1853919"}, {"name": "Syndrom der genickten Lidplatte", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Tarsal kink syndrome is a rare congenital malformation of the tarsus that causes entropion characterized by blepharospasm and absence of an upper eyelid fold that may lead to corneal ulceration caused by the folded edge of the upper tarsus or the inturned eyelashes if not corrected by surgery."}, {"name": "Syndrom der immotilen Zilien", "sub_name": "Zilien-Dyskinesie, prim\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, genetisch heterogene, prim\u00e4r respiratorische Erkrankung, die durch eine chronische Erkrankung der oberen und unteren Atemwege gekennzeichnet ist. Etwa die H\u00e4lfte der Patienten weist einen Lateralisationsdefekt der Organe auf (Situs inversus totalis oder Situs ambiguus/Heterotaxie).", "synonyms": "PCD, Syndrom der immotilen Zilien, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q34.8", "OMIM": "215518\u00a0 215520\u00a0 242670\u00a0 242680\u00a0 244400\u00a0 300991\u00a0 606763\u00a0 608644\u00a0 608646\u00a0 608647\u00a0 610852\u00a0 611884\u00a0 612274\u00a0 612444\u00a0 612518\u00a0 612649\u00a0 612650\u00a0 613193\u00a0 613807\u00a0 613808\u00a0 614017\u00a0 614679\u00a0 614874\u00a0 614935\u00a0 615067\u00a0 615294\u00a0 615444\u00a0 615451\u00a0 615481\u00a0 615482\u00a0 615500\u00a0 615504\u00a0 615505\u00a0 615872\u00a0 616037\u00a0 616481\u00a0 616726\u00a0 617091\u00a0 617092\u00a0 617577\u00a0 618063\u00a0 618449\u00a0 618695\u00a0 618781\u00a0 618801", "GARD": "4484", "MedDRA": "10069713", "epidemiology": "Die prim\u00e4re zili\u00e4re Dyskinesie (PCD) hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte Inzidenz von 1/15.000-1/30.000 Lebendgeburten, aber das ist wahrscheinlich eine Untersch\u00e4tzung. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist schwer zu bestimmen.", "clinical_description": "Klinische Symptome der PCD k\u00f6nnen schon bei der Geburt vorliegen oder entwickeln sich in den ersten Lebensmonaten. Aufgrund der diagnostischen Herausforderungen werden jedoch einige F\u00e4lle von PCD erst im Erwachsenenalter diagnostiziert. Die meisten Neugeborenen haben eine Atemnot mit Tachypnoe (akutes Atemnotsyndrom bei S\u00e4uglingen) und ben\u00f6tigen in der Regel tagelang, teilweise wochenlang zus\u00e4tzlichen Sauerstoff. Bei S\u00e4uglingen und Kindern sind t\u00e4gliche Rhinitis und t\u00e4glicher ganzj\u00e4hriger feuchter Husten kurz nach der Geburt mit damit verbundenen wiederkehrenden oder chronischen bakteriellen Infektionen der unteren Atemwege \u00fcblich. Chronische Otitis media ist weit verbreitet, manchmal mit vor\u00fcbergehendem oder dauerhaftem H\u00f6rverlust und eingeschr\u00e4nkter Sprachentwicklung. Die meisten Patienten entwickeln wiederkehrende Sinusitis. Die Bronchiektasie tritt altersbedingt auf und ist bei Erwachsenen nahezu universell. Pectus excavatum und Skoliose werden selten beschreiben (5-10%), ebenso wie Trommelschl\u00e4gelfinger. Fast alle M\u00e4nner mit PCD sind aufgrund der Dysmotilit\u00e4t der Spermien unfruchtbar, obwohl einige von ihnen eine normale Spermienmotilit\u00e4t haben. Eine verminderte Fruchtbarkeit oder eine Vorgeschichte von ektopischen Schwangerschaften wurde bei betroffenen Frauen berichtet. Situs inversus totalis, eine spiegelbildliche Umkehrung aller viszeralen Organe, ist bei 40-50% der Individuen zu finden und etabliert die Diagnose des Kartagener-Syndroms. Heterotaxie (Diskordanz zwischen rechten und linken Mustern von normalerweise asymmetrischen Strukturen) ist in mindestens 12% der Betroffenen vorhanden, von diesen zeigt eine Untergruppe eine strukturelle angeborene Herzerkrankung. Es wurde eine sehr seltene Assoziation von X-chromosomaler PCD mit Retinitis pigmentosa oder intellektuellem Defizit berichtet.", "etiology": "Lungenerkrankungen bei PCD stehen im Zusammenhang mit Defekten in den Abwehrmechanismen der Lunge aufgrund einer abnormalen Ziliarstruktur und gest\u00f6rter Funktion der mukozili\u00e4ren Clearance. In rund 46 verschiedenen Genen des gesamten Genom wurden Mutationen als Ursache der PCD identifiziert. Hierzu geh\u00f6ren DNAH5 , CCDC39 , DNAI1 , CCDC40 , DNAH11 , ZMYND10 , CCDC103 , CCDC151 und ARMC4. Bei einem Drittel der derzeit bekannten Patienten konnten keine Mutationen in diesen Genen gefunden werden.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose basiert auf den charakteristischen klinischen Symptomen. Molekulargenetische Tests zur Identifizierung pathogener Varianten in einem der verursachenden Gene, sowie die Transmissionselektronenmikroskopie zur Identifizierung spezifischer zili\u00e4rer ultrastruktureller Defekte in Biopsieproben k\u00f6nnen die Diagnose unterst\u00fctzen. Weitere Tests umfassen die Messung von nasalem Stickstoffmonoxid in den oberen Atemwegen (bei Patienten im Alter von 5 Jahren oder \u00e4lter, in der Regel bei PCD niedrig), nachdem eine Mukoviszidoseassoziation ausgeschlossen wurde, und die Hochgeschwindigkeits-Videomikroskopie zur Beurteilung der Wellenform und Schlagfrequenz der Zilien, immunfluoreszierende F\u00e4rbung zur Untersuchung der Ziliarstruktur und die Analyse der mukozili\u00e4ren Clearance zur Beurteilung von Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen sind Mukoviszidose, Immundefektsyndrome und gastro\u00f6sophagealer Reflux. Dar\u00fcber hinaus wurde PCD bei Patienten mit Cri-du-chat-Syndrom aufgrund des gemeinsamen Locus auf Chromosom 5p festgestellt. Die segmentale Deletion des Chromosoms 5p beim Cri-du-chat-Syndrom beinhaltet in der Regel das PCD-assoziierte Gen DNAH5 und die pathogene Variante im verbleibenden Allel von DNAH5 f\u00fchrt zur PCD.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "PCD wird in der Regel autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Einige F\u00e4lle mit autosomal-dominanten oder X-chromosomalen Erbgang wurden beschrieben. Sind in einer Familie krankheitsverursachende Mutationen bekannt, kann ein pr\u00e4natale Diagnostik angeboten werden.", "genetic_counseling": "Den betroffenen Familien sollte eine genetische Beratung angeboten werden.", "management_and_treatment": "Regelm\u00e4\u00dfige klinische Besuche zur \u00dcberwachung des Krankheitszustandes sind entscheidend. Eine aggressive Behandlung wird empfohlen, um die Schleiml\u00f6sung zu verbessern. Eine Antibiotikatherapie ist erforderlich und eine routinem\u00e4\u00dfige Immunisierung wird empfohlen. Nasennebenh\u00f6hlenentz\u00fcndungen k\u00f6nnen mit Nasensteroiden und Nasensp\u00fclungen behandelt werden. Polypen k\u00f6nnen eine chirurgische Behandlung erfordern. Audiologische Beurteilung, H\u00f6rger\u00e4te und Kommunikationsunterst\u00fctzung sollten bei Bedarf angeboten werden. Patienten mit Lungenerkrankungen im Endstadium sind Kandidaten f\u00fcr eine Lungentransplantation.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose h\u00e4ngt von einer rechtzeitigen Diagnose und einer angemessenen Behandlung ab. Die Lebenserwartung ist wahrscheinlich etwas verk\u00fcrzt, obwohl quantitative Sch\u00e4tzungen derzeit nicht verf\u00fcgbar sind.", "summary": "Die prim\u00e4re zili\u00e4re Dyskinesie (PCD) hat eine gesch\u00e4tzte Inzidenz von 1/15.000-1/30.000 Lebendgeburten, aber das ist wahrscheinlich eine Untersch\u00e4tzung. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist schwer zu bestimmen."}, {"name": "Syndrom der isolierten medianen Gesichtsspalte", "sub_name": "Frontorhinie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Frontorhiny is a distinct syndromic type of frontonasal malformation characterized by hypertelorism, wide nasal bridge, broad columella, widened philtrum, widely separated narrow nares, poor development of nasal tip, midline notch of the upper alveolus, columella base swellings and a low hairline. Additional features reported in some include upper eyelid ptosis and midline dermoid cysts of craniofacial structures and philtral pits or rugose folding behind the ears. An autosomal recessive inheritance has been proposed.", "synonyms": "ALX3-related frontonasal dysplasia, Frontonasal dysplasia type 1, Isolated median cleft face syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q75.8", "omim": "136760", "gard": "12642"}, {"name": "Syndrom der kombinierten hyperaktiven Dysfunktion der kranialen Nerven", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Combined hyperactive dysfunction syndrome of the cranial nerves is a rare, acquired peripheral neuropathy characterized by symptoms arising from combined overactivity in cranial nerves, without any explanatory structural lesion. The symptoms may be unilateral or bilateral, may occur synchronously or metachronously, and include trigeminal neuralgia, hemifacial spasm and glossopharyngeal neuralgia.", "icd_10": "G52.7"}, {"name": "Syndrom der kongenitalen generalisierten hyperkontraktilen Muskelsteifheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare defect of tropomyosin characterized by decreased fetal movements and generalized muscle stiffness at birth. Additional features include joint contractures, short stature, kyphosis, dysmorphic features, temperature dysregulation, and variably severe respiratory involvement with hypoxemia. Muscle biopsy shows mild myopathic features.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "G71.2"}, {"name": "Syndrom der kongenitalen letalen Kontrakturen", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A group of rare arthrogryposis syndromes characterized by fetal akinesia, multiple congenital contractures, anterior horn cell degeneration, skeletal muscle atrophy, and other features, depending on the subtype. All types are lethal in the fetal or neonatal period.", "synonyms": "LCCS, ", "icd_10": "Q68.8", "gard": "12643"}, {"name": "Syndrom der kongenitalen letalen Kontrakturen Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisch bedingtes Arthrogrypose-Syndrom, das durch eine totale fetale Akinese (nachweisbar ab der 13. Schwangerschaftswoche), begleitet von Hydrops, Mikrognathie, pulmonaler Hypoplasie, Pterygium und multiplen Gelenkkontrakturen (meist Flexionskontrakturen in den Ellenbogen und Extensionskontrakturen in den Knien) gekennzeichnet ist und unweigerlich zum Tod vor der 32 Schwangerschaftswoche f\u00fchrt. Das Fehlen von Vorderhorn-Motoneuronen, eine schwere Atrophie des ventralen R\u00fcckenmarks und eine schwere Skelettmuskelhypoplasie sind charakteristische neuropathologische Befunde, ohne Hinweise auf andere Organstrukturanomalien.", "synonyms": "Herva-Krankheit, LCCS1, Syndrom der multiplen Kontrakturen, finnischer Typ, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q68.8", "OMIM": "253310", "UMLS": "C1854664", "MeSH": "C537194", "GARD": "3227"}, {"name": "Syndrom der kongenitalen letalen Kontrakturen Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Arthrogrypose-Syndrom, das gekennzeichnet ist durch multiple kongenitale Kontakturen (typischerweise gestreckte Ellbogen und gebeugte Knie), Mikrognathie, Vorderhornzelldegeneration, Skelettmuskelatrophie (haupts\u00e4chlich in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen) und Vorhandensein einer deutlich erweiterten Harnblase. Hydrops, Pterygium und Knochenfrakturen liegen nicht vor. Es k\u00f6nnen auch kraniofaziale (z.B. Gaumenspalte, Gesichtsl\u00e4hmung) und okul\u00e4re (z.B. Anisokorie, Netzhautabl\u00f6sung) Anomalien vorhanden sein. Die Erkrankung zeigt in der Regel im Neugeborenenalter einen letalen Verlauf, es wurde jedoch auch \u00fcber ein \u00dcberleben bis ins Jugendalter berichtet.", "synonyms": "LCCS2, Syndrom der multiplen Kontrakturen Typ Israeli-Bedouin, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q68.8", "OMIM": "607598", "UMLS": "C1843478", "GARD": "9177"}, {"name": "Syndrom der kongenitalen letalen Kontrakturen Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Arthrogrypose-Syndrom, das durch klinische Merkmale gekennzeichnet ist, die mit den Symptomen des Syndroms der kongenitalen letalen Kontrakturen Typ 2 (LCCS2) identisch sind: multiple kongenitale Kontakturen (typischerweise gestreckte Ellbogen und gebeugte Knie), Mikrognathie, Vorderhornzellendegeneration und Skelettmuskelatrophie (haupts\u00e4chlich in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen). Wie in LCCS2 fehlen Hydrops, Pterygium oder Knochenbr\u00fcche, allerdings liegt in LCCS3 keine Blasenvergr\u00f6\u00dferung vor.", "synonyms": "LCCS3, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q68.8", "OMIM": "611369\u00a0 614915", "UMLS": "C1969655", "GARD": "12644"}, {"name": "Syndrom der konotrunkalen Anomalie mit Gesichtsdysmorphie", "sub_name": "Deletion 22q11", "german_description": "Die weltweite Pr\u00e4valenz bei lebend Geborenen wird auf 1/2.000-1/4.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare chromosomal anomaly which causes a congenital malformation disorder that is typically characterized by cardiac defects, palatal anomalies, facial dysmorphism, developmental delay and immune deficiency.", "synonyms": "22q11DS, CATCH 22, Cayler cardiofacial syndrome, Conotruncal anomaly face syndrome, DiGeorge sequence, DiGeorge syndrome, Microdeletion 22q11.2, Monosomy 22q11, Sedlackova syndrome, Shprintzen syndrome, Takao syndrome, Velocardiofacial syndrome, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "D82.1", "omim": "188400\u00a0 192430", "umls": "C0012236\u00a0 C0220704\u00a0 C0431406\u00a0 C0795907\u00a0 C2936346\u00a0 C3266101", "mesh": "D058165", "gard": "10299", "meddra": "10012979\u00a0 10066430", "epidemiology": "The worldwide prevalence at birth is estimated at 1/4,500-1/10,000.", "clinical_description": "22q11.2 deletion syndrome shows a variable clinical phenotype that can range from mild to severe. Congenital heart defects (two-thirds of cases) include mainly conotruncal malformations such as ventricular septal defect, truncus arteriosus, tetralogy of Fallot and interrupted aortic arch. Anomalies of the aortic arch and vascular ring are frequent. More than 65% of patients present with palatal anomalies (e.g. velopharyngeal incompetence, submucous cleft palate or bifid uvula) that may lead to hypernasal speech and feeding difficulties. Overt cleft palate and cleft lip are less frequent. Most patients display subtle but recognizable facial features (e.g. ptosis, hypertelorism, epicanthal folds, prominent nasal root, malar flatness, small ears). Immune deficiency is the consequence of thymic aplasia/hypoplasia and improvement in T-cell production occurs over time. Patients have a higher risk of developing an autoimmune disease such as idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura and juvenile idiopathic arthritis. Hypocalcemia as a consequence of hypoparathyroidism is frequent in the neonatal period and usually resolves but can reappear at any age. Additional clinical findings may include gastrointestinal anomalies (intestinal malrotation, imperforate anus), hearing loss, renal anomalies (renal agenesis), dental anomalies (enamel hypoplasia), and skeletal anomalies (scoliosis, clubfoot). Learning difficulties and developmental delay are almost always present. Psychiatric illness (anxiety, depression, schizophrenia) and Parkinson's disease are more frequent than in the general population.", "etiology": "In most cases, the syndrome is due to a 3 million base pair (Mb) deletion on the chromosomal region 22q11.2 that is flanked by low copy number repeats. The deletion is due to a non-allelic meiotic recombination during spermatogenesis or oogenesis. In ~15% of cases, the deletion is nested within the 3 Mb DiGeorge critical region and varies in size. Most deletions include the TBX1 gene that has been shown to be implicated in cardiac, parathyroid, thymus and facial structure development. The variable expression of the 22q11.2 phenotype is thought to be due to genetic modifiers on either the other 22q11.2 allele or on other chromosomes.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected upon clinical examination and confirmed by detection of the 22q11.2 deletion, using fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH), multiplex ligation-dependent probe amplification (MLPA), array comparative genomic hybridization (aCGH) or genome-wide SNP (single nucleotide polymorphism) microarrays.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes Smith-Lemli-Opitz syndrome, CHARGE syndrome, Alagille syndrome, VATER syndrome, Goldenhar syndrome and isotretinoin embryopathy.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Prenatal diagnosis is possible in familial cases by chorionic villus sampling or amniocentesis, and in pregnancies where associated anomalies have been noted by fetal echocardiography. Preimplantation genetic diagnosis is possible.", "genetic_counseling": "The deletion arises de novo in ~90% of the cases. The recurrence risk in the sibship of a de novo case is 2-3% due to of low-grade germline parental mosaicism. Affected individuals have a 50% risk of having an affected child.", "management_and_treatment": "Management is symptom-based and requires a multidisciplinary approach. It may consist of heart and/or palate surgery, nasogastric feeding, calcium supplementation, occupational, physical, and speech therapy, educational and behavioral therapy, as well as support and treatment for psychiatric disease. Tonsillectomy is not recommended unless indicated by a center of expertise. A regular surveillance of calcium, thyroid function and blood cell count is necessary. Immune function must be evaluated before administering live vaccines.", "prognosis": "The prognosis is variable and depends on the severity of the disease. The infant mortality rate is relatively low (~4%); in adults mortality is higher than that of the rest of the adult population. Most congenital malformations and medical problems can be managed. Prognosis in adults depends on the degree of autonomy."}, {"name": "Syndrom der kontinuierlichen Muskelfaseraktivit\u00e4t", "sub_name": "Isaacs-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Isaac-Syndrom ist eine immun-vermittelte periphere Motorneuron-Krankheit. Aus der kontinuierlichen Aktivit\u00e4t der Muskelfasern in Ruhe resultieren Muskelsteife, Muskelkr\u00e4mpfe, Myokymie und Pseudomyotonie.", "synonyms": "Isaac-Mertens-Syndrom, Neuromyotonie, erworbene, Quantal-Squander-Syndrom, Syndrom der kontinuierlichen Muskelfaseraktivit\u00e4t, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G71.1", "UMLS": "C0242287\u00a0 C0751919", "GARD": "6793", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden 100-200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Der Beginn der Erkrankung reicht vom S\u00e4uglingsalter bis in das 6. Lebensjahrzehnt, mit Gipfel zwischen 40 und 60. Das Isaac-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch kontinuierliche Muskelfaseraktivit\u00e4t in der Ruhe (sogar im Schlaf), woraus Muskelkr\u00e4mpfe, Muskelsteife und -schw\u00e4che, Pseudomyotonie, Muskelzucken (sichtbare Myokymie) und Faszikulieren resultieren. Weitere Symptome sind verst\u00e4rktes Schwitzen, Muskelhypertrophie und reduzierte Reflexe. Steife ohne schwere Schmerzen ist in den distalen Muskeln st\u00e4rker ausgepr\u00e4gt als in den proximalen. In 20 % der F\u00e4lle treten Malignome auf (Thymom, kleinzelliges Bronchialkarzinom) (siehe diese Termini). Am h\u00e4ufigsten ist die Krankheit mit Myasthenia gravis (siehe dort) assoziiert, gelegentlich aber auch mit anderen immun-vermittelten Krankheiten: Chronisch-entz\u00fcndliche demyelinisierende Polyneuropathie (CIDP), rheumatoide Arthritis, Guillain-Barr\u00e9-Syndrom und Systemischer Lupus erythematosus (siehe diese Termini). Einige Patienten erkranken mit einer Variante, dem Morvan-Syndrom (siehe dort), das durch Muskelaktivit\u00e4t, exzessives Schwitzen und psychische Symptome (Pers\u00f6nlichkeitsver\u00e4nderungen, Halluzinationen, Stimmungsschwankungen und Schlafst\u00f6rungen) gekennzeichnet ist.", "etiology": "Die Ursache dieser Krankheit ist nicht bekannt. Eine Rolle spielt vermutlich der spannungs-gesteuerte Kaliumkanal-Komplex (VGKC), wie die Entdeckung von Antik\u00f6rpern gegen den VGKC-Komplex andeutet. Diese Antik\u00f6rper sind nicht gegen VGKC selbst gerichtet, sondern gegen Caspr2 und in geringerem Ausma\u00df, bei Neuromyotonie, gegen LGI1. Diese Antik\u00f6rper regulieren VGKC herunter, mit der Folge wiederholter Aktionspotenziale. Andere Befunde mit erh\u00f6htem Spiegel von VGKC-Komplex-Antik\u00f6rpern ohne Caspr2- oder LGI1-Antik\u00f6rper sind gegenw\u00e4rtig umstritten, wie auch die Anwendung einer Immuntherapie in dieser spezifischen Gruppe.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose des Isaac-Syndroms f\u00fchren Anamnese, k\u00f6rperliche Befunde und Elektromyographie (EMG). Typische Befunde sind Dublett-, Triplett- oder Multiplett-('myokymische') Entladungen motorischer Einheiten und Faszikulationen. Erh\u00f6hte Spiegel von Anti-VGKC-Komplex-Antik\u00f6rpern werden bei 35-40 % der Patienten gefunden, h\u00e4ufiger beim Morvan-Syndrom als beim Isaac-Syndrom.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind: Heredit\u00e4re Neuromyotonie- oder Myokymie (mit/ohne episodische Ataxie)-Syndrome, Krampf-Faszikulations-Syndrom, Motorneuron-Krankheiten (Progressive spinale Muskelatrophie, Neuropathie, Amyotrophe Lateralsklerose (ALS; siehe dort)), Intoxikation (Gold, Quecksilber, Toluol, Insektizide) und Tetanus (siehe dort).", "management_and_treatment": "Die verst\u00e4rkte Erregbarkeit der peripheren Nerven beim Isaac-Syndrom kann mit membran-stabilisierenden Medikamenten (Phenytoin, Valproins\u00e4ure, Carbamazepin oder Lamotrigin) behandelt werden, allein oder, wenn notwendig, in Kombination. Bei ungen\u00fcgender Wirkung k\u00f6nnen orale Kortikosteroide (Prednisolon) verordnet werden. Erwogen werden kann auch die zus\u00e4tzliche Gabe nicht-steroidaler immunsuppressiver Medikamente wie Azathioprin und Methotrexat. T\u00e4gliche Behandlung mit Azetazolamid kann die zuckenden/windenden Bewegungen einschr\u00e4nken und die Episoden von Tonusverlust eliminieren. Bei schwerer Neuromyotonie und f\u00fcr Patienten mit Morvan-Syndrom sind Plasmaaustausch und intraven\u00f6se Gabe von Immunglobulin indiziert. Bei der paraneoplastischen Form muss das Malignom behandelt werden.", "prognosis": "F\u00fcr das Isaac-Syndrom gibt es keine kurative Therapie, es ist aber nicht letal. Einen schwereren, eventuell auch letalen Verlauf hat das Morvan-Syndrom. Die Langzeitprognose f\u00fcr Patienten mit paraneoplastischem Isaac-Syndrom wird durch den Verlauf der Tumor-Erkrankung gepr\u00e4gt.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden 100-200 F\u00e4lle beschrieben."}, {"name": "Syndrom der Kraniosynostose und Radiusaplasie", "sub_name": "Baller-Gerold-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Syndrom der Kraniosynostose und Radiusaplasie, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q75.0", "OMIM": "218600", "UMLS": "C0265308", "MeSH": "C536788", "GARD": "1602", "summary": "Das Baller-Gerold-Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch Kranznaht-Synostose und Anomalien des radialen Strahls (Oligodaktylie, Daumenaplasie oder -hypoplasie, Radiusaplasie oder -hypoplasie). Bisher wurden etwa 30 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, die Pr\u00e4valenz des Syndroms ist nicht bekannt. Die Kraniosynostose mit Brachyzephalie, Exophthalmus und Balkonstirn und die Anomalien des radialen Strahls bestehen seit Geburt. Weitere Symptome sind faziale Dysmorphien (hypoplastische Nase, kleiner Mund, spitzer Gaumenbogen). In den ersten Lebensmonaten kann eine Poikilodermie auftreten. Fast immer ist das Wachstum retardiert, meist um -4 SD. Im Kindesalter f\u00e4llt eine Aplasie oder Hypoplasie der Patella auf. Die Intelligenz ist in der Regel normal. Es besteht eine Krebsdisposition, besonders f\u00fcr die Entstehung von Osteosarkomen. Das Baller-Gerold-Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im RECQL4-Gen (8q24.3). RECQL4 ist ein Mitglied der Genfamilie der RecQ-Helicasen, die auch f\u00fcr andere Krankheiten mit Krebsdisposition verantwortlich sind. Der Anteil der Patienten mit Mutationen in diesem Gen ist noch nicht bekannt. Das Baller-Gerold-Syndrom ist eine klinische Diagnose. Angesichts der vielen Differentialdiagnosen verschafft der Nachweis einer RECQL4-Mutation diagnostische Klarheit und erm\u00f6glicht eine gezielte genetische Beratung und Betreuung. Die wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen sind das Rothmund-Thomson-Syndrom (RTS) und das RAPADILINO-Syndrom (s. diese Termini), die beide durch RECQL4-Mutationen bedingt sind. Mehrere Autoren haben auf das klinische Kontinuum dieser drei Krankheiten hingewiesen, es erscheint daher m\u00f6glich, dass sie das Ergebnis einer gleichen Pathogenese sind. Andere Differentialdiagnosen sind: Roberts-Syndrom und Fanconi-An\u00e4mie (h\u00e4ufig mit radialen Defekten und nur selten mit Kraniosynostose) und das Saethre-Chotzen-Syndrom (mit charakteristischer Kranznaht-Synostose, aber gew\u00f6hnlich ohne radiale Defekte), s. diese Termini. Die Kombination von Kraniosynostose und Hypoplasie des radialen Strahles tritt auch bei der Valproat-Embryopathhie (Fetales Valproat-Syndrom, s. dort) auf. Bei vorhandener Poikilodermie k\u00f6nnen andere Krankheiten ausgeschlossen werden. Der Nachweis pathogener RECQL4-Mutationen beim Indexfall erm\u00f6glicht in weiteren Schwangerschaften eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik durch Chorionzottenbiopsie. Anomalien der Gliedma\u00dfen und abnorme Form des Kopfes werden durch Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall nachgewiesen. Die Behandlung besteht in chirurgischer L\u00f6sung der Kraniosynostose in den ersten 6 Lebensmonaten und, falls erforderlich, in einer Rekonstruktion des Daumens durch Transposition des Zeigefingers. Bei der klinischen \u00dcberwachung der Patienten muss wegen des Osteosarkom-Risikos besonders auf Knochenschmerzen, Gangst\u00f6rungen und Frakturen geachtet werden. Wegen des Risikos f\u00fcr Hautkrebs und Photosensibilit\u00e4t soll Sonnenexposition vermieden werden. Die Prognose der Tr\u00e4ger homozygoter oder heterozygoter RECQL4-Mutationen wird durch das erh\u00f6hte Krebsrisiko bestimmt."}, {"name": "Syndrom der lateralen Meningozele", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by multiple lateral meningoceles, distinctive facial dysmorphism (including hypertelorism, downslanting palpebral fissures, posteriorly rotated ears, micrognathia, and high, narrow palate, among others), and skeletal abnormalities (e. g. vertebral anomalies, wormian bones, short stature, and scoliosis). Multiple additional features may present, such as conductive hearing impairment, hypotonia, and connective tissue and urogenital abnormalities. Cognition is usually normal.", "synonyms": "Lehman syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.5", "omim": "130720", "umls": "C0344487\u00a0 C1851710", "gard": "9873"}, {"name": "Syndrom der lethalen kongenitalen Kontrakturen Typ 5", "sub_name": "Fetale Akinesie-zerebrale und retinale Blutungen-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom der fetalen Akinesie mit zerebralen und retinalen Blutungen ist ein seltenes, t\u00f6dliches, kongenitales Myopathie-Syndrom, das durch verminderte fetale Bewegungen und Polyhydraminos in utero und das Vorhandensein von Akinesie, schwerer Hypotonie mit respiratorischer Insuffizienz, fehlenden Reflexen, Gelenkkontrakturen, Skelettanomalien mit d\u00fcnnen Rippen und Knochen, intrakraniellen und retinalen Blutungen und vermindertem Geburtsgewicht beim Neugeborenen gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "LCCS5, Syndrom der lethalen kongenitalen Kontrakturen Typ 5, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "G71.2", "OMIM": "615368"}, {"name": "Syndrom der medianen Gesichtsspalte", "sub_name": "Dysplasie, fronto-nasale", "german_description": "Als Fronto-nasale Dysplasie oder Mediane-Spalte-Syndrom wird ein Fehlbildungsmuster mit Anomalien der Augen, der Stirn und Nase und mit Dysraphie der Gesichtsmitte bezeichnet. Das Syndrom ist selten, die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz aber nicht bekannt. Das klinische Bild ist au\u00dferordentlich variabel, Hauptsymptome sind Hypertelorismus, breite Nasenwurzel, gro\u00dfe und geteilte Nasenspitze und spitz zulaufender Ansatz der Stirnhaare ('widow's peak'). Seltenere Symptome sind akzessorische Nasen-Anh\u00e4ngsel, Lippenspalte, Augenanomalien (Kolobom, Katarakt, Mikrophthalmie), Schalleitungs-Schwerh\u00f6rigkeit, basale Enzephalozele und/oder Agenesie des Corpus callosum. Die meisten Betroffenen haben eine normale Intelligenz. Die Fronto-nasale Dysplasie kommt auch als syndromale Form vor, in Verbindung mit weiteren Fehlbildungen, z.B. Fallotsche Tetralogie, fehlende Tibia, Ohranomalien, Makrostomie und Hirnfehlbildungen. Verminderte Intelligenz ist wahrscheinlicher bei Patienten mit schwerem Hypertelorismus und extra-kranialer Beteiligung. Die \u00c4tiologie ist noch nicht bekannt, scheint aber mit einer gest\u00f6rten embryologischen Entwicklung der Nasenkapsel in Berbindung zu stehen. In Hinblick auf die genetische Beratung wird angenommen, dass die Krankheit in den meisten F\u00e4llen sporadisch ist. Es wurden aber auch einige wenige famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle beschrieben. Durch vorgeburtlichen Fehlbildungs-Ultraschall k\u00f6nnen Hypertelorismus, Lippenspalte und Enzephalozele nachgewiesen werden. Die Betreuung des Neugeborenen schlie\u00dft die Suche nach m\u00f6glichen oralen und respiratorischen Problemen ein. Eine mehrstufige Korrektur der Gesichtsstrukturen ist gerechtfertigt und sollte im Alter von 6-8 Jahren erfolgen. Sie kann zufriedenstellende funktionelle und kosmetische Resultate erzielen. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A group of rare bone development disorders characterized by an array of abnormalities affecting the eyes, forehead, and nose, and linked to midfacial dysraphia. The clinical picture is highly variable, but the major findings include hypertelorism, a broad nasal root, a large and bifid nasal tip, and widow's peak. Occasionally, abnormalities can include accessory nasal tags, cleft lip, ocular abnormalities (coloboma, cataract, microphthalmia), conductive hearing loss, basal encephalocele and/or agenesis of the corpus callosum. Intellectual deficit is rare and more likely to occur in cases where hypertelorism is severe or where there is extra-cranial involvement.", "synonyms": "Median cleft face syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q75.8", "umls": "C0432106\u00a0 C1876203", "mesh": "C538065", "gard": "2392"}, {"name": "Syndrom der multiplen Kontrakturen, finnischer Typ", "sub_name": "Syndrom der kongenitalen letalen Kontrakturen Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes, genetisch bedingtes Arthrogrypose-Syndrom, das durch eine totale fetale Akinese (nachweisbar ab der 13. Schwangerschaftswoche), begleitet von Hydrops, Mikrognathie, pulmonaler Hypoplasie, Pterygium und multiplen Gelenkkontrakturen (meist Flexionskontrakturen in den Ellenbogen und Extensionskontrakturen in den Knien) gekennzeichnet ist und unweigerlich zum Tod vor der 32 Schwangerschaftswoche f\u00fchrt. Das Fehlen von Vorderhorn-Motoneuronen, eine schwere Atrophie des ventralen R\u00fcckenmarks und eine schwere Skelettmuskelhypoplasie sind charakteristische neuropathologische Befunde, ohne Hinweise auf andere Organstrukturanomalien.", "synonyms": "Herva-Krankheit, LCCS1, Syndrom der multiplen Kontrakturen, finnischer Typ, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q68.8", "OMIM": "253310", "UMLS": "C1854664", "MeSH": "C537194", "GARD": "3227"}, {"name": "Syndrom der multiplen Kontrakturen Typ Israeli-Bedouin", "sub_name": "Syndrom der kongenitalen letalen Kontrakturen Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Ein seltenes Arthrogrypose-Syndrom, das gekennzeichnet ist durch multiple kongenitale Kontakturen (typischerweise gestreckte Ellbogen und gebeugte Knie), Mikrognathie, Vorderhornzelldegeneration, Skelettmuskelatrophie (haupts\u00e4chlich in den unteren Gliedma\u00dfen) und Vorhandensein einer deutlich erweiterten Harnblase. Hydrops, Pterygium und Knochenfrakturen liegen nicht vor. Es k\u00f6nnen auch kraniofaziale (z.B. Gaumenspalte, Gesichtsl\u00e4hmung) und okul\u00e4re (z.B. Anisokorie, Netzhautabl\u00f6sung) Anomalien vorhanden sein. Die Erkrankung zeigt in der Regel im Neugeborenenalter einen letalen Verlauf, es wurde jedoch auch \u00fcber ein \u00dcberleben bis ins Jugendalter berichtet.", "synonyms": "LCCS2, Syndrom der multiplen Kontrakturen Typ Israeli-Bedouin, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "Q68.8", "OMIM": "607598", "UMLS": "C1843478", "GARD": "9177"}, {"name": "Syndrom der nicht k\u00e4mmbaren Haare", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom der nicht k\u00e4mmbaren Haare (UHS), oder pili trianguli et canaliculi, ist eine seltene Dysplasie des Haarschaftes.", "synonyms": "Pili trianguli et canaliculi, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "ICD-10": "Q84.1", "OMIM": "191480\u00a0 617251\u00a0 617252", "UMLS": "C0432347", "MeSH": "C536939", "GARD": "5404", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die Symptome beginnen in der Regel im Alter zwischen drei Monaten und zw\u00f6lf Jahren. Die Haare werden zunehmend silberblond oder strohfarben, trocken und ungeordnet, stehen von der Kopfhaut ab, wachsen in verschiedene Richtungen und k\u00f6nnen nicht glattgek\u00e4mmt werden. Die Zahl der Haare bleibt normal. Die mikroskopische Analyse zeigt eine longitudinale Rinne des Haarschaftes und einen dreieckigen oder nierenf\u00f6rmigen Querschnitt. Die Anomalie ist klinisch erkennbar, wenn etwa 50 % der Haare betroffen sind. Berichtet wurde \u00fcber das gemeinsame Auftreten von UHS mit verschiedenen Krankheiten: Ektodermale Dysplasie, Netzhautdysplasie, Netzhaut-Pigmentdystrophie, juvenile Katarakt, Fingeranomalien, Zahnschmelzanomalien, Oligodontie, phalango-epiphys\u00e4re Dysplasie, Alopecia areata, atopisches Ekzem und Ichthyosis vulgaris.", "etiology": "Es wird vermutet, dass die Steifheit und Aufhellung des Haares aus einer fehlgeformten Hautpapille resultiert, die in der inneren Wurzelmembran eine abnorme Keratinisierung ausl\u00f6st.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinische und mikroskopische Analyse. Durch elektronenmikroskopische Analyse des Haarschaftes k\u00f6nnen andere Haaranomalien ausgeschlossen werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differenzialdiagnosen sind: Ektodermale Dysplasie Rapp-Hodgkin, Noonan-\u00e4hnliches Syndrom mit losem Anagenhaar, Lewis-Pashayan-Syndrom, Famili\u00e4re Tricho-odonto-onychiale ektodermale Dysplasie mit Syndaktylie und anderen Dysplasien des Ektoderms (siehe diese Termini).", "genetic_counseling": "Das UHS ist wahrscheinlich eine autosomal-dominant vererbte Krankheit mit variabler Penetranz. Ein urs\u00e4chliches Gen wurde bisher nicht identifiziert.", "management_and_treatment": "Das UHS bildet sich im sp\u00e4ten Kindesalter spontan zur\u00fcck. Empfohlen werden eine leichte Haarpflegemittel und weiche B\u00fcrsten. Gr\u00f6bere Behandlung der Haare soll vermieden werden. Eine Behandlung mit Biotin wurde bei einigen Patienten zur Kontrolle der Nagelbr\u00fcchigkeit verordnet, soll dann aber auch nach 4 Monaten Supplementierung zu verst\u00e4rktem Haarwachstum gef\u00fchrt haben.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Syndrom der okulo-gastro-intestinalen neurologische Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "OGIN-Syndrom, ", "OMIM": "619318", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Syndrom der Omphalozele mit Gesichtsdysmorphien, famili\u00e4re Form", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Familial omphalocele syndrome with facial dysmorphism is a rare genetic developmental defect during embryogenesis characterized by omphalocele associated with facial dysmorphism including flat face, short, upturned nose, long and wide philtrum and flattened maxillary arch and abnormalities of hands.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal"}, {"name": "Syndrom der Osteolyse von Sprungbein, Kniescheibe und Kahnbein", "sub_name": "Syndrom der Osteolyse von Talus, Patella und Skaphoid", "english": 0, "defenition": "Talo-patello-scaphoide Osteolyse ist eine \u00e4u\u00dferst seltene Form der prim\u00e4ren Osteolyse (s.dort), die bisher bei 2 Schwestern beschrieben wurde. Die Patienten haben eine spezifische bilaterale Osteolyse von Talus, Patella und Scaphoid mit periartikul\u00e4ren Schwellungen und Schmerzen. Dazu kommen ein kurzes Metacarpale IV (Brachydaktylie Typ E; s.dort) und chronische Synovitis. Wahrscheinlich wird die Krankheit autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "synonyms": "Singh-Williams-McAlister-Syndrom, Syndrom der Osteolyse von Sprungbein, Kniescheibe und Kahnbein, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "OMIM": "609655", "UMLS": "C1864784", "GARD": "10061"}, {"name": "Syndrom der Osteolyse von Talus, Patella und Skaphoid", "english": 0, "defenition": "Talo-patello-scaphoide Osteolyse ist eine \u00e4u\u00dferst seltene Form der prim\u00e4ren Osteolyse (s.dort), die bisher bei 2 Schwestern beschrieben wurde. Die Patienten haben eine spezifische bilaterale Osteolyse von Talus, Patella und Scaphoid mit periartikul\u00e4ren Schwellungen und Schmerzen. Dazu kommen ein kurzes Metacarpale IV (Brachydaktylie Typ E; s.dort) und chronische Synovitis. Wahrscheinlich wird die Krankheit autosomal-rezessiv vererbt.", "synonyms": "Singh-Williams-McAlister-Syndrom, Syndrom der Osteolyse von Sprungbein, Kniescheibe und Kahnbein, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter", "OMIM": "609655", "UMLS": "C1864784", "GARD": "10061"}, {"name": "Syndrom der partiellen Corpus callosum-Agenesie mit zerebell\u00e4rer Vermishypoplasie und Zysten der hinteren Sch\u00e4delgrube", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Partial corpus callosum agenesis-cerebellar vermis hypoplasia with posterior fossa cysts syndrome is a rare, hereditary, cerebral malformation with epilepsy syndrome characterized by severe global developmental delay with no ability to walk and no verbal language, intractable epilepsy, partial agenesis of the corpus callosum and cerebellar vermis hypoplasia with posterior fossa cysts.", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q04.3"}, {"name": "Syndrom der polyvalvul\u00e4ren Herzfehlbildung", "german_description": "Bisher wurden weniger als 15 F\u00e4lle beschrieben.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare multiple congenital anomalies syndrome characterized by the combination of cardiac anomalies (most commonly mitral valve defects and cardiomyopathy), short stature, facial dysmorphism and sometimes mild developmental delay.", "synonyms": "PHD syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "epidemiology": "70 individuals have been described in literature: 34 individuals with TAB2 variants, 36 individuals with TAB2 deletions.", "clinical_description": "Almost all individuals present with a specific facial appearance including: broad forehead, hypertelorism, up/downslanting palpebral fissures, ptosis, low set ears, broad/short neck, and half of the individuals have a face suggestive for Noonan syndrome. Cardiac disease is seen in most individuals and includes mainly mitral valve defects, sometimes in combination with another valve defect, and (dilated) cardiomyopathy. Cardiomyopathy can be present from birth or develop between infancy and adulthood. Other cardiovascular defects are variably reported, including dysplasia of the tricuspid, aortic and pulmonary valves, atrial and/or ventricular septal defects, coarctation of the aorta and thoracic aneurysms. Short stature is often disproportionate (short limbs). Connective tissue abnormalities can include joint hypermobility, umbilical and inguinal hernias, pes planus, pectus excavatum and other skeletal and/or skin abnormalities. Some individuals have mild developmental delay. More severe developmental delay can be seen in larger deletions (>6.47 Mb) containing TAB2, but was never reported in individuals with TAB2 variants. Hearing loss and vision problems are also reported. Hypotonia is reported in individuals with TAB2 deletions, but rarely in TAB2 variants.", "etiology": "This syndrome is caused by heterozygous pathogenic variants in the TAB2 gene, or by chromosome 6 deletions including TAB2 (6q25.1). Both TAB2 variants and deletions including TAB2 lead to a highly comparable phenotype.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is based on clinical examination, and cytogenetic and molecular studies.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis includes Noonan syndrome/RASopathies, cardiospondylocarpofacial syndrome (MAP3K7 gene), cardiac valvular dysplasia (FLNA gene), connective tissue disorders with cardiac valve involvement such as Loeys Dietz type 3 (SMAD3 gene) or 5 (TGFB3 gene).", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Detection of the TAB2 variant or deletion by chorion villus biopsy or amniocentesis should be discussed with adults carrying the deletion or variant.", "genetic_counseling": "Transmission is autosomal dominant. TAB2 deletions often arise de novo, but are also reported in families (largest known familial deletion: 8.67 Mb) and therefore should be excluded in parents before counselling a low recurrence risk. Genetic counselling should be offered to all individuals with a TAB2 variant or deletion. For patients with a heterozygous TAB2 variant or deletion, each pregnancy carries a is 50% risk of transmission to offspring. Sibling recurrence in de novo mutations may occur due to mosaicism, but has not been reported.", "management_and_treatment": "Regular cardiac evaluation and evaluation of overall development, hearing, vision and connective tissue abnormalities is recommended for all affected individuals. Cardiac follow-up is needed as valvular heart disease, thoracic aneurysm and cardiomyopathy may manifest later in life. Surgical intervention for cardiac anomalies may be required. The relevance of growth hormone therapy for short stature in this syndrome is not clear and should be studied further.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy can be limited due to severe cardiac disease. Three children died due to dilated cardiomyopathy and four adults died between the age of 40-60 from the (late) effects of structural heart disease."}, {"name": "Syndrom der Resistenz gegen TSH", "sub_name": "Hyperthyreose durch TSH-Rezeptor-Genmutationen, famili\u00e4re Form", "german_description": "Die Famili\u00e4re Hyperthyreose mit Mutationen im Rezeptor f\u00fcr das thyreotrope Hormon (TSH) ist eine heredit\u00e4re, nicht auto-immune Form von Hyperthyreose, d.h., die Patienten haben Symptome einer Schilddr\u00fcsen\u00fcberfuntion, eine diffuse Struma, und es fehlen Hinweise auf ein Autoimmun-Geschehen. Die H\u00e4ufigkeit ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden nur wenige Familien und einige sporadische F\u00e4lle mit Neumutationen im TSHR-Gen f\u00fcr den TSH-Rezeptor beschrieben, hauts\u00e4chlich bei Patienten europ\u00e4ischer Herkunft. Das Alter bei Beginn der Erkrankung ist au\u00dferordentlich variabel: Es reicht von der Kindheit bis in das Erwachsenenalter. Die Struma ist unterschiedlich gro\u00df, bei jungen Patienten ist die Schilddr\u00fcse evtl. nur minimal oder gar nicht vergr\u00f6\u00dfert. Ist eine Struma aber einmal vorhanden, w\u00e4chst sie nahezu immer kontinuierlich. Die Differentialdiagnose beruht auf dem Fehlen typischer Zeichen einer Autoimmun-Hyperthyreose, z.B. Exophthalmus, Anti-TSH-Rezeptor-Antik\u00f6rper, und lymphozyt\u00e4rer Infiltration der Schilddr\u00fcse. Die Krankheit wird autosomal-dominant vererbt. Der prognostische Wert einer genetischen Analyse in Familien mit Heredit\u00e4rer Nicht-Autoimmun-Hyperthyreose ist begrenzt, da eine klare Korrelation zwischen den urs\u00e4chlichen TSHR-Mutationen und den beobachteten klinischen Ph\u00e4notypen nicht besteht. Funktionssteigernde ('gain of function') Keimbahn-Mutationen betreffen vor allem die Transmembran-Dom\u00e4ne des TSH-Rezeptors und sind die Ursache der Famili\u00e4ren Nicht-Autoimmun-Hyperthyreose. Auch die Famili\u00e4re Gestations-Hyperthyreose ist durch TSHR-Mutationen verursacht. Der TSH-Rezeptor reagiert durch die Mutation hypersensitiv auf Choriongonadotropin. Grundlage der Behandlung der manifesten Hyperthyreose ist die drastische Ablation der Struma (chirurgisch oder mit Radio-Jod). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare hyperthyroidism characterized by mild to severe hyperthyroidism, presence of goiter, absence of features of autoimmunity, frequent relapses while on treatment and a positive family history.", "synonyms": "Familial non-immune hyperthyroidism, Resistance to thyroid stimulating hormone, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "E05.8", "omim": "609152", "gard": "2858"}, {"name": "Syndrom der roten Palmae", "sub_name": "Erythema palmare hereditarium", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Erythema palmare hereditarium ist eine seltene, gutartige, angeborene genetische Hauterkrankung, die durch ein dauerhaftes und asymptomatisches Erythem der palmaren und seltener der solaren Oberfl\u00e4chen gekennzeichnet ist. In den meisten F\u00e4llen zeigt sich eine scharf begrenzte R\u00f6tung der thenaren und hypothenaren Eminenzen sowie der palmaren Seite der Phalangen mit verstreuten Teleangiektasien, die dem Patienten keine Beschwerden (Schmerzen, Juckreiz oder Brennen) verursachen.", "synonyms": "Heredit\u00e4res Erythem der Handinnenfl\u00e4che, Lane-Krankheit, Syndrom der roten Palmae, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "L59.8", "OMIM": "133000", "UMLS": "C1851502"}, {"name": "Syndrom der spr\u00f6den Hornhaut", "sub_name": "Brittle-Cornea-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Brittle-Cornea-Syndrom ist eine Form des Ehlers-Danlos-Syndroms, das durch schwere Augenmanifestationen gekennzeichnet ist. Diese \u00e4u\u00dfern sich in extremer Hornhautverd\u00fcnnung mit Fragilit\u00e4t und Rissen, die in Abwesenheit eines signifikanten Traumas auftreten und bei Fortschreiten der Krankheit zur Erblindung f\u00fchren k\u00f6nnen. Extraokulare Manifestationen umfassen Taubheit, entwicklungsbedingte H\u00fcftdysplasie und Gelenkhypermobilit\u00e4t.", "synonyms": "Syndrom der spr\u00f6den Hornhaut, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q79.6", "OMIM": "229200\u00a0 614170", "UMLS": "C0268344", "GARD": "1019"}, {"name": "Syndrom der Taubheit mit kranio-fazialer Dysmorphie", "german_description": "Dieses Syndrom ist gekennzeichnet durch angeborenen H\u00f6rverlust und faziale Dysmorphien (asymmetrisches Gesicht, breite Nasenwurzel, kleine Nasenfl\u00fcgel). Es wurde in 1 j\u00fcdischen Familie bei Vater und Tochter beschrieben. Weiteres Symptom war eine intermittierende Alopezie. Autosomal-dominante Vererbung wurde vermutet. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Deafness-craniofacial syndrome is characterised by the association of congenital hearing loss and facial dysmorphism (facial asymmetry, a broad nasal root and small nasal alae). It has been described in two members (father and daughter) of one Jewish family. Temporal alopecia was also noted. Transmission appeared to be autosomal dominant.", "synonyms": "Hearing loss-craniofacial syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q87.0", "omim": "125230", "umls": "C1852278", "gard": "1686"}, {"name": "Syndrom der testikul\u00e4ren Feminisierung (TFM)", "sub_name": "Androgeninsensitivit\u00e4tssyndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Androgen-Insensitivit\u00e4ts-Syndrom (AIS) ist eine St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung von M\u00e4nnern mit 46,XY-Karyotyp. Charakteristisch sind \u00e4u\u00dfere weibliche Genitalien, intermedi\u00e4res Genitale oder unterschiedliche Defekte der Virilisierung. Die Individuen sprechen nicht oder nur teilweise auf alterstypische Androgenspiegel an. Zwei klinische Untergruppen des AIS werden unterschieden, das vollst\u00e4ndige AIS (CAIS) und das partielle AIS (PAIS).", "synonyms": "AIS, Androgen-Resistenz-Syndrom, Androgenresistenz-Syndrom, Goldberg-Maxwell-Syndrom, Morris-Syndrom, Syndrom der testikul\u00e4ren Feminisierung (TFM), ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit, Vorgeburtlich", "ICD-10": "E34.5", "UMLS": "C0039585\u00a0 C0936016", "MeSH": "D013734", "GARD": "5803", "MedDRA": "10056292"}, {"name": "Syndrom der transienten linksventrikul\u00e4ren apikalen Ballonierung", "sub_name": "Tako-Tsubo-Kardiomyopathie", "german_description": "Die Kardiomyopathie Typ Takotsubo (TC) ist eine k\u00fcrzlich beschriebene akute Erkrankung des Herzens, die unter dem Bild eines akuten Herzinfarkts verl\u00e4uft. Das Syndrom wurde zuerst in der japanischen Bev\u00f6lkerung beschrieben, dann aber auch in den USA und Europa. Am h\u00e4ufigsten betroffen sind Frauen im Alter von 55 bis 75 Jahren. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 1:36.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Patienten haben einen isch\u00e4mischen Thoraxschmerz oder sind dyspnoeisch, im EKG ist die ST-Strecke erh\u00f6ht und das QT-Intervall ist verl\u00e4ngert. Die kardialen Serumenzyme und Biomarker sind leicht bis m\u00e4\u00dfig erh\u00f6ht. Spitze und der Mittelteil des linken Ventrikels sind 'balloniert'. Im Gegensatz zu akuten Koronarsyndromen (ACS) haben Patienten mit TC keine angiographischen Zeichen einer obstruktiven Koronarkrankheit. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Komplikationen sind kardiogener Schock, Obstruktion des linksventrikul\u00e4ren Ausflusstraktes, Schlaganfall und Bildung eines apikalen Thrombus. Die Ursache ist nicht genau bekannt, aber in typischen F\u00e4llen wird das Syndrom durch akute seelische oder k\u00f6rperliche Belastung, eine Reihe von nicht-kardialen Krankheiten und chirurgische Eingriffe ausgel\u00f6st. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Angiographie der Koronararterien, Links-Ventrikulographie und Echokardiographie. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an ACS und andere passagere ventrikul\u00e4re Funktionsst\u00f6rungen zu denken. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen station\u00e4r \u00fcberwacht und behandelt (Vorhof- und Kammerarrhythmien, Herzversagen, mechanische Komplikationen) werden. Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und symptomatisch, z.B. mit Betablockern, Inhibitoren des angiotensin-konvertierenden Enzyms (ACE-Hemmer), Aspirin und Diuretika. Wenn in der akuten Phase der Erkrankung die richtigen Ma\u00dfnahmen getroffen werden, ist der kurzfristige Verlauf durch sehr gute klinische Erholung gekennzeichnet. Der weitere Verlauf ist in der Regel unauff\u00e4llig, aber eine Ventrikelruptur ist m\u00f6glich. Damit ist dieses Syndrom eine weitere Ursache eines pl\u00f6tzlichen Todes.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare cardiac disease characterized by acute occurrence of heart failure after an emotional or physical trigger however, recovery of the wall motion abnormalities are observed within months. Symptoms are similar to acute coronary syndrome (ACS).", "synonyms": "Ampulla cardiomyopathy, Apical ballooning syndrome, Ballooning cardiomyopathy, Broken heart syndrome, Stress cardiomyopathy, Tako-Tsubo syndrome, Takotsubo cardiomyopathy, Takotsubo syndrome, Transient left ventricular apical ballooning syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I42.8", "umls": "C1168291\u00a0 C1739395", "gard": "9400", "epidemiology": "Takotsubo syndrome (TTS) is found in about 1-3% of all patients with symptoms of ACS; however, the prevalence is likely underestimated. Around 90% of TTS patients are women, typically postmenopausal but male and younger patients are diagnosed increasingly due to raised awareness of the syndrome.", "clinical_description": "In the acute phase, clinical presentation, electrocardiography (ECG) and cardiac biomarkers are similar to those of ACS. Typical symptoms are acute chest pain or dyspnea. Further symptoms can arise from complications of TTS, e.g. heart failure, cardiogenic shock, or cardiac arrest. New ECG changes or elevated cardiac biomarkers may or may not be present.", "etiology": "The underlying mechanisms of this syndrome remain incompletely understood. Recent findings show that specific alterations in neurological response and sympathetic activation after emotional stimuli are present in TTS. These findings confirm the importance of brain-heart interaction in the development of this process. Microcirculatory constriction is also proposed as an underlying mechanism.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is often challenging due to the similarity with ACS. Coronary angiography with left ventriculography is considered the gold standard diagnostic tool. The InterTAK (international takotsubo) Diagnostic Criteria have been developed to improve diagnosis and include the following: 1) transient left ventricular dysfunction presenting as either apical, midventricular, basal or focal wall motion abnormalities with possible right ventricular involvement, 2) a preceding emotional, physical, or combined trigger (although not obligatory), 3) neurological disorders can be possible triggers, 4) presence of new ECG abnormalities (ST-segment elevation or depression, T-wave inversion, or QTc prolongation), 5) elevated cardiac markers (especially brain natriuretic peptide), 6) significant coronary artery disease can coexist, 7) absence of myocarditis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include AMI, myocarditis, spontaneous coronary artery dissection, or peripartum cardiomyopathy.", "management_and_treatment": "Due to difficulty in distinguishing TTS from ACS, patients should be transferred to a chest pain unit upon presentation and receive guideline based treatment of ACS. There are no randomized clinical trials to support specific acute or long term treatment recommendations in TTS. However, the consensus statement from an international TTS expert panel provides recommendations for optimal treatment of TTS patients. Electrocardiogram monitoring is essential as a prolonged QT-interval may trigger malignant ventricular arrhythmias (torsades de pointes) or atrioventricular-block. Cardiogenic shock or post cardiac arrest requires intensive care with treatment according to the presence or absence of pulmonary edema, low left ventricular ejection fraction, hypotension and bradycardia. In all cases, inotropic substances should be avoided. For long term treatment, angiotensin converting-enzyme inhibitors (ACEi) or angiotensin II receptor blockers (ARB) are recommended as they are associated with improved survival and lower recurrence rates. Echocardiography should be performed during the acute phase to exclude right ventricular involvement, left ventricular outflow tract obstruction or intraventricular thrombus. A follow-up echocardiography should be performed after discharge to confirm recovery.", "prognosis": "The spectrum of TTS is wide and ranges from low to very high risk. In-hospital mortality and long-term outcome in TTS are similar compared to ACS. Recovery of the left ventricular regional systolic dysfunction is usually observed after 4-8 weeks. The risk of recurrence is around 5%."}, {"name": "Syndrom der verbr\u00fchten Haut", "sub_name": "Staphylococcal-Scalded-Skin-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare staphylococcal toxemia caused by epidermolytic toxins of Staphylococcus aureus and characterized by the appearance of widespread erythematous patches, on which large blisters develop. Upon rupture of these blisters, the skin appears reddish and scalded. The lesions typically begin in the face and rapidly expand to other parts of the body. The disease may be complicated by pneumonia and sepsis. It most commonly affects newborns and infants.", "synonyms": "Generalized exfoliative disease, SSSS, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "L00", "umls": "C0038165", "mesh": "D013206", "meddra": "10041929"}, {"name": "Syndrom der Wachstumshormoninsensivit\u00e4t", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "GHIS, Kleinwuchs durch Wachstumshormonrezeptor-Defekt oder St\u00f6rung im nachfolgenden Stoffwechselweg, ", "ICD-10": "E34.3", "UMLS": "C0271568", "GARD": "3924", "summary": "Das Syndrom der Wachstumshormon-Insensitivit\u00e4t (GHIS) bezeichnet eine Gruppe von Krankheiten mit erheblichem Kleinwuchs und normaler oder erh\u00f6hter Konzentration des Wachstumshormons (GH). Extern zugef\u00fchrtes GH ist ohne Wirkung auf das Wachstum. Das GHIS umfasst die folgenden Krankheiten: Kleinwuchs durch IGF-Mangel, Laron-Syndrom, Kleinwuchs durch STAT5b-Mangel und der prim\u00e4re Mangel der s\u00e4urelabilen Untereinheit (ALS) (s. diese Termini). In der Literatur wurden bisher nur einige F\u00e4lle von IGF-1-Mangel, IGF-1-Resistenz, STAT5b- und ALS-Mangel, aber mehr als 250 F\u00e4lle von Laron-Syndrom beschrieben. Beide Geschlechter sind gleich betroffen. In der Regel sind das intrauterine Wachstum und die Gr\u00f6\u00dfe bei Geburt unternormal. Das postnatale Wachstum ist verz\u00f6gert. H\u00e4ufig bestehen faziale Dysmorphien (Mikrozephalie, schmale Oberlippe, evertierte Unterlippe, kleines Kinn). Bei einigen F\u00e4llen wurden dysproportioniertes Wachstum, verz\u00f6gerte motorische Entwicklung und Pubertas tarda beschrieben. Bei jungen Erwachsenen kann eine relative Obesitas bestehen. Die intellektuelle Entwicklung ist unterschiedlich und reicht von normaler Intelligenz bis zu intellektuellem Defizit. Allen Patienten sind der Kleinwuchs und die klassischen biochemischen Merkmale der GH-Insensitivit\u00e4t gemeinsam, dennoch unterscheiden sich die Patienten der einzelnen genetischen Formen in ihren klinischen Merkmalen voneinander. Bei einigen Patienten mit STAT5b-Mangel wurde eine Immunschw\u00e4che beschrieben, einige Patienten mit IGF1-Mangel waren schwerh\u00f6rig. Ursachen des GHIS sind Mutationen im GHR-Gen (5p13-p12), das f\u00fcr den Wachstumshormon-Rezeptor kodiert (Laron-Syndrom), oder Postrezeptordefekte durch Mutation in den Genen IGF-1 (12q22-q24) (IGF-1-Mangel und IGF1-Resistenz), IGFALS (16p13) (Kleinwuchs durch prim\u00e4ren ALS-Mangel) oder STAT5B (17q11) (STAT5b-Mangel). Die Vererbung ist autosomal-rezessiv. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die klinischen und biochemischen Befunde: Die Serum-GH-Konzentrationen sind normal oder erh\u00f6ht. Die Spiegel des IGF-1 und des Wachstumshormon-bindenden Proteins (GHBP) werden durch die jeweilige genetische Form bestimmt. Die IGF-1-Spiegel sind niedrig bei GHR-Defekten und bei STAT5b-, IGF-1- und ALS-Mangel und hoch bei IGF-1-Resistenz. Die GHBP-Spiegel sind niedrig bei Mutationen in der extrazellul\u00e4ren GHR-Dom\u00e4ne und normal bei Mutationen in der intrazellul\u00e4ren GHR-Dom\u00e4ne und bei Postrezeptor-Defekten. Die IGF-BP-3-Spiegel sind niedrig bei GHR-, STAT5b- und ALS-Mangel und normal bei IGF-1-Mangel. Der ALS-Spiegel ist bei ALS-Mangel erniedrigt. Zur Sicherung der pr\u00e4zisen \u00e4tiologischen Diagnose sollte eine molekulare Analyse erfolgen. Differentialdiagnosen sind der sekund\u00e4re IGF-1-Mangel bei Ern\u00e4hrungsproblemen oder chronischen p\u00e4diatrischen Erkrankungen. Schon vor einer n\u00e4chsten Schwangerschaft soll den Eltern eine genetische Beratung zur Besprechung der Risiken und der verf\u00fcgbaren diagnostischen Methoden angeboten werden. Die Behandlung zielt auf eine Verbesserung des Wachstums und besteht, au\u00dfer bei IGF-1-Resistenz, aus t\u00e4glicher subkutaner Injektion von Mecasermin, einem rekombinantem humanen IGF-1, und einer Di\u00e4t mit angemessener kalorischer Zufuhr. Im August 2005 erhielt Mecasermin f\u00fcr die EU die Kennzeichnung als Orphan-Medikament. Bei IGF-1-Resistenz kann das Wachstum durch eine Behandlung mit Wachstumshormon teilweise gebessert werden. Heilung oder Pr\u00e4vention sind nicht m\u00f6glich. Mit zunehmendem Alter k\u00f6nnen sich Osteoporose, Adipositas, Hypercholesterin\u00e4mie, Insulinresistenz, Glukoseintoleranz und sogar ein Typ II- Diabetes entwickeln."}, {"name": "Syndrom des 'Doppelstei\u00df'", "sub_name": "Duplikation, kaudale", "german_description": "Das Syndrom der Kaudalen Duplikation ist eine seltene Entit\u00e4t, bei der die Strukturen, die sich von der embryonalen Kloake und vom Notochord herleiten, in unterschiedlichem Ausma\u00df dupliziert sind. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt liegt unter 1:100.000. Der Terminus 'Kaudale Duplikation' umfasst ein ganzes Spektrum von Anomalien und wird oft benutzt, um die unvollst\u00e4ndige Trennung eineiiger Zwillinge zu bezeichnen, oder er bezieht sich auf einen Teil der Anomalien bei siamesischen Zwillingen. Einige beschriebene F\u00e4lle hatten einen nicht betroffenen eineiigen Zwilling. Die kaudale Duplikation beinhaltet in der Regel mehrere seltene Fehlbildungen und Duplikationen distaler Organe, die sich vom Enddarm, dem Neuralrohr und dem kaudalen Mesoderm herleiten. Fehlbildungen der Wirbels\u00e4ule sind: Duplikation der distalen Wirbels\u00e4ule, Diplomyelie (gespaltene Medulla), Spina bifida mit Myelomeningozele, Stei\u00dfbein-Duplikation und/oder Hemivertebrae. Duplikationen oder Fehlbildungen der \u00e4u\u00dferen Genitalien manifestieren sich im weiblichen Geschlecht als septierter Uterus mit Zervix-Duplikation und longitudinalem Vaginaseptum. Symptome im m\u00e4nnlichen Geschlecht sind verdoppelter Penis (Diphallie), manchmal mit peno-skrotaler Transposition. Auch Duplikationen von Teilen der Harnwege (Ureteren, Blase, Urethra) kommen vor, und verdoppelte Enddarmstrukturen. Duplikation des distalen Darms mit zwei D\u00fcnnd\u00e4rmen, Appendices und Dickd\u00e4rmen (mit oder ohne Hypoganglionose des Kolons) und Anus imperforatus mit Rektum-Urethra-Fistel. Manchmal wird auch eine Omphalozele gesehen. Noch seltener wurde \u00fcber zus\u00e4tzliche, mehr oder weniger vollst\u00e4ndige untere Gliedma\u00dfen berichtet, die am Beckenkamm oder in der sub-pubischen Region angeheftet sind. Da die Mausmutanten 'fused' und 'disorganization' eine gewisse \u00c4hnlichkeit mit der Kaudalen Duplikation haben, wurde bei einem Patienten und seiner Familie eine DNA-Analyse des AXIN1-Gens durchgef\u00fchrt. Eine urs\u00e4chliche Mutation wurde aber bisher nicht gefunden. Es wurde vermutet, dass die Krankheit durch falsche Expression der mehr distalen HOX-Gene, vor allem HOX10 und HOX11, bedingt ist, mit der Folge einer abnormen Induktion und Proliferation des kaudalen Mesenchyms. Die Fehlbildungen werden meist im zweiten Trimenon durch Ultraschall diagnostiziert. Beim Neugeborenen sollten immer die Harnwege und der Magen-Darm-Kanal untersucht werden. Abh\u00e4ngig vom Schweregrad der Fehlbildung ist oft eine chirurgische Korrektur m\u00f6glich. In ei Es wurde vermutet, dass die Krankheit durch falsche Expression der mehr distalen HOX-Gene, vor allem HOX10 und HOX11, bedingt ist, mit der Folge einer abnormen Induktion und Proliferation des kaudalen Mesenchyms. Die Fehlbildungen werden meist im zweiten Trimenon durch Ultraschall diagnostiziert. Beim Neugeborenen sollten immer die Harnwege und der Magen-Darm-Kanal untersucht werden. Abh\u00e4ngig vom Schweregrad der Fehlbildung ist oft eine chirurgische Korrektur m\u00f6glich. In einigen F\u00e4llen von verdoppelter Blase konnte auf eine Blasenresektion verzichtet werden. Eine Omphalozele wird in der Regel klassisch versorgt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Caudal duplication (CD) is a rare developmental anomaly in which structures derived from the embryonic cloaca and notochord are duplicated to varying extents.", "synonyms": "Dipygus, Split notochord syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Antenatal", "icd_10": "Q87.8", "omim": "607864", "umls": "C0266688\u00a0 C1842884", "gard": "1164"}, {"name": "Syndrom des epidermalen Hamartoms", "sub_name": "Syndrom des epidermalen Naevus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Syndrom des epidermalen Hamartoms, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q85.8", "UMLS": "C0334082", "MeSH": "C536114\u00a0 D054000", "MedDRA": "10014985", "summary": "Das Syndrom des Epidermalen Naevus (ENS) ist ein schon kongenital manifestiertes Syndrom, charakterisiert durch die Assoziation von epidermalen Naevi mit verschiedenen Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen der Augen und des Nerven-, Skelett-, Urogenital- und kardiovaskul\u00e4ren Systems. Die epidermalen Naevi sind Folge einer gest\u00f6rten Morphogenese mit einer Hyperplasie epidermaler Strukturen in umschriebenen Hautarealen. Die meisten Naevi sind schon bei der Geburt vorhanden. Sie entstehen sporadisch in Patienten beiderlei Geschlechts. Alle gut definierten ENS sind genetische Letalsyndrome mit Ausnahme des Naevus comedonicus-Syndroms. Etwa die H\u00e4lfte der Patienten hat neurologische Symptome: geistige Retardierung, Epilepsie, spastische Parese, Fehlbildungen der Hirngef\u00e4\u00dfe, Rindenatrophie und erweiterte Seitenventrikel. Etwa ein Drittel der Patienten hat ophthalmologische Zeichen: Kolobome der Lider, der Iris und der Retina, Lipodermoide der Konjunktiven, Choristome, zentrale Blindheit, Mikro-, Makro- oder Anophthalmie, Hornhauttr\u00fcbung und Katarakt. Andere Anomalien des Skeletts und nicht-kutaner Systeme sind m\u00f6glich. Es existiert keine zufriedenstellende Therapie der kutanen L\u00e4sionen des ENS, chirurgische Interventionen sind aber teilweise m\u00f6glich. Der Inflammatorische lineare verruk\u00f6se epidermale Naevus (ILVEN) spricht manchmal auf Bestrahlung mit Erbium-YAG-Laser und auf Vitamin D-Analoge an. Versucht wurden auch Salicyls\u00e4ure und andere Keratolytika, topische und systemische Retinoide, Dermabrasion und Kryotherapie. Begleitende Skelett- und Augenanomalien k\u00f6nnen chirurgisch korrigiert werden. Die Therapie eines Krampfleidens erfolgt wie \u00fcblich. "}, {"name": "Syndrom des epidermalen Naevus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Syndrom des epidermalen Hamartoms, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q85.8", "UMLS": "C0334082", "MeSH": "C536114\u00a0 D054000", "MedDRA": "10014985", "summary": "Das Syndrom des Epidermalen Naevus (ENS) ist ein schon kongenital manifestiertes Syndrom, charakterisiert durch die Assoziation von epidermalen Naevi mit verschiedenen Entwicklungsst\u00f6rungen der Augen und des Nerven-, Skelett-, Urogenital- und kardiovaskul\u00e4ren Systems. Die epidermalen Naevi sind Folge einer gest\u00f6rten Morphogenese mit einer Hyperplasie epidermaler Strukturen in umschriebenen Hautarealen. Die meisten Naevi sind schon bei der Geburt vorhanden. Sie entstehen sporadisch in Patienten beiderlei Geschlechts. Alle gut definierten ENS sind genetische Letalsyndrome mit Ausnahme des Naevus comedonicus-Syndroms. Etwa die H\u00e4lfte der Patienten hat neurologische Symptome: geistige Retardierung, Epilepsie, spastische Parese, Fehlbildungen der Hirngef\u00e4\u00dfe, Rindenatrophie und erweiterte Seitenventrikel. Etwa ein Drittel der Patienten hat ophthalmologische Zeichen: Kolobome der Lider, der Iris und der Retina, Lipodermoide der Konjunktiven, Choristome, zentrale Blindheit, Mikro-, Makro- oder Anophthalmie, Hornhauttr\u00fcbung und Katarakt. Andere Anomalien des Skeletts und nicht-kutaner Systeme sind m\u00f6glich. Es existiert keine zufriedenstellende Therapie der kutanen L\u00e4sionen des ENS, chirurgische Interventionen sind aber teilweise m\u00f6glich. Der Inflammatorische lineare verruk\u00f6se epidermale Naevus (ILVEN) spricht manchmal auf Bestrahlung mit Erbium-YAG-Laser und auf Vitamin D-Analoge an. Versucht wurden auch Salicyls\u00e4ure und andere Keratolytika, topische und systemische Retinoide, Dermabrasion und Kryotherapie. Begleitende Skelett- und Augenanomalien k\u00f6nnen chirurgisch korrigiert werden. Die Therapie eines Krampfleidens erfolgt wie \u00fcblich. "}, {"name": "Syndrom des gebrochenen Herzens", "sub_name": "Tako-Tsubo-Kardiomyopathie", "german_description": "Die Kardiomyopathie Typ Takotsubo (TC) ist eine k\u00fcrzlich beschriebene akute Erkrankung des Herzens, die unter dem Bild eines akuten Herzinfarkts verl\u00e4uft. Das Syndrom wurde zuerst in der japanischen Bev\u00f6lkerung beschrieben, dann aber auch in den USA und Europa. Am h\u00e4ufigsten betroffen sind Frauen im Alter von 55 bis 75 Jahren. Die Pr\u00e4valenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung wird auf 1:36.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die Patienten haben einen isch\u00e4mischen Thoraxschmerz oder sind dyspnoeisch, im EKG ist die ST-Strecke erh\u00f6ht und das QT-Intervall ist verl\u00e4ngert. Die kardialen Serumenzyme und Biomarker sind leicht bis m\u00e4\u00dfig erh\u00f6ht. Spitze und der Mittelteil des linken Ventrikels sind 'balloniert'. Im Gegensatz zu akuten Koronarsyndromen (ACS) haben Patienten mit TC keine angiographischen Zeichen einer obstruktiven Koronarkrankheit. Die h\u00e4ufigsten Komplikationen sind kardiogener Schock, Obstruktion des linksventrikul\u00e4ren Ausflusstraktes, Schlaganfall und Bildung eines apikalen Thrombus. Die Ursache ist nicht genau bekannt, aber in typischen F\u00e4llen wird das Syndrom durch akute seelische oder k\u00f6rperliche Belastung, eine Reihe von nicht-kardialen Krankheiten und chirurgische Eingriffe ausgel\u00f6st. Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren Angiographie der Koronararterien, Links-Ventrikulographie und Echokardiographie. Differentialdiagnostisch ist an ACS und andere passagere ventrikul\u00e4re Funktionsst\u00f6rungen zu denken. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen station\u00e4r \u00fcberwacht und behandelt (Vorhof- und Kammerarrhythmien, Herzversagen, mechanische Komplikationen) werden. Die Behandlung ist unterst\u00fctzend und symptomatisch, z.B. mit Betablockern, Inhibitoren des angiotensin-konvertierenden Enzyms (ACE-Hemmer), Aspirin und Diuretika. Wenn in der akuten Phase der Erkrankung die richtigen Ma\u00dfnahmen getroffen werden, ist der kurzfristige Verlauf durch sehr gute klinische Erholung gekennzeichnet. Der weitere Verlauf ist in der Regel unauff\u00e4llig, aber eine Ventrikelruptur ist m\u00f6glich. Damit ist dieses Syndrom eine weitere Ursache eines pl\u00f6tzlichen Todes.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare cardiac disease characterized by acute occurrence of heart failure after an emotional or physical trigger however, recovery of the wall motion abnormalities are observed within months. Symptoms are similar to acute coronary syndrome (ACS).", "synonyms": "Ampulla cardiomyopathy, Apical ballooning syndrome, Ballooning cardiomyopathy, Broken heart syndrome, Stress cardiomyopathy, Tako-Tsubo syndrome, Takotsubo cardiomyopathy, Takotsubo syndrome, Transient left ventricular apical ballooning syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "I42.8", "umls": "C1168291\u00a0 C1739395", "gard": "9400", "epidemiology": "Takotsubo syndrome (TTS) is found in about 1-3% of all patients with symptoms of ACS; however, the prevalence is likely underestimated. Around 90% of TTS patients are women, typically postmenopausal but male and younger patients are diagnosed increasingly due to raised awareness of the syndrome.", "clinical_description": "In the acute phase, clinical presentation, electrocardiography (ECG) and cardiac biomarkers are similar to those of ACS. Typical symptoms are acute chest pain or dyspnea. Further symptoms can arise from complications of TTS, e.g. heart failure, cardiogenic shock, or cardiac arrest. New ECG changes or elevated cardiac biomarkers may or may not be present.", "etiology": "The underlying mechanisms of this syndrome remain incompletely understood. Recent findings show that specific alterations in neurological response and sympathetic activation after emotional stimuli are present in TTS. These findings confirm the importance of brain-heart interaction in the development of this process. Microcirculatory constriction is also proposed as an underlying mechanism.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is often challenging due to the similarity with ACS. Coronary angiography with left ventriculography is considered the gold standard diagnostic tool. The InterTAK (international takotsubo) Diagnostic Criteria have been developed to improve diagnosis and include the following: 1) transient left ventricular dysfunction presenting as either apical, midventricular, basal or focal wall motion abnormalities with possible right ventricular involvement, 2) a preceding emotional, physical, or combined trigger (although not obligatory), 3) neurological disorders can be possible triggers, 4) presence of new ECG abnormalities (ST-segment elevation or depression, T-wave inversion, or QTc prolongation), 5) elevated cardiac markers (especially brain natriuretic peptide), 6) significant coronary artery disease can coexist, 7) absence of myocarditis.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnoses include AMI, myocarditis, spontaneous coronary artery dissection, or peripartum cardiomyopathy.", "management_and_treatment": "Due to difficulty in distinguishing TTS from ACS, patients should be transferred to a chest pain unit upon presentation and receive guideline based treatment of ACS. There are no randomized clinical trials to support specific acute or long term treatment recommendations in TTS. However, the consensus statement from an international TTS expert panel provides recommendations for optimal treatment of TTS patients. Electrocardiogram monitoring is essential as a prolonged QT-interval may trigger malignant ventricular arrhythmias (torsades de pointes) or atrioventricular-block. Cardiogenic shock or post cardiac arrest requires intensive care with treatment according to the presence or absence of pulmonary edema, low left ventricular ejection fraction, hypotension and bradycardia. In all cases, inotropic substances should be avoided. For long term treatment, angiotensin converting-enzyme inhibitors (ACEi) or angiotensin II receptor blockers (ARB) are recommended as they are associated with improved survival and lower recurrence rates. Echocardiography should be performed during the acute phase to exclude right ventricular involvement, left ventricular outflow tract obstruction or intraventricular thrombus. A follow-up echocardiography should be performed after discharge to confirm recovery.", "prognosis": "The spectrum of TTS is wide and ranges from low to very high risk. In-hospital mortality and long-term outcome in TTS are similar compared to ACS. Recovery of the left ventricular regional systolic dysfunction is usually observed after 4-8 weeks. The risk of recurrence is around 5%."}, {"name": "Syndrom des k\u00e4lte-induzierten Schwitzens", "sub_name": "K\u00e4lteinduziertes Schwitzen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das Syndrom des k\u00e4lte-induzierten Schwitzens (CISS) ist gekennzeichnet durch in kalter Umgebung auftretendes profuses Schwitzen an Thorax, Gesicht, Armen und Stamm.", "synonyms": "CISS, Syndrom des k\u00e4lte-induzierten Schwitzens, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "G90.8", "OMIM": "272430\u00a0 610313\u00a0 617055", "epidemiology": "Bisher wurden sechs Patienten mit norwegischer, israelischer und kanadischer Herkunft beschrieben.", "clinical_description": "Weitere m\u00f6gliche Anomalien sind Kyphoskoliose, hoher Gaumen, nasale Stimme, flacher Nasenr\u00fccken und eingeschr\u00e4nkte periphere Schmerz- und Temperaturempfindlichkeit.", "etiology": "CISS wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt. Ursache sind Mutationen im CRLF1-Gen (19p12; CISS Typ1). Bei einem australischen Mann ohne betroffene Verwandte wurden urs\u00e4chliche Mutationen im CLCF1-Gen (11q13.3; CISS Typ2) gefunden.", "summary": "Bisher wurden sechs Patienten mit norwegischer, israelischer und kanadischer Herkunft beschrieben."}, {"name": "Syndrom des laryngealen und okul\u00e4ren Granulationsgewebes bei Kindern des Indischen Subkontinents", "sub_name": "Laryngo-onycho-kutanes Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Das LOC-Syndrom ist ein Subtyp der Junktionalen Epidermolysis bullosa (JEB; siehe dort) und gekennzeichnet durch auff\u00e4lliges Schreien in der Neugeborenenperiode und durch abnorme Produktion von Granulationsgewebe, besonders in den oberen Luftwegen, auf den Konjunktiven und im peri- und subungualen Bereich.", "synonyms": "LOGIC-Syndrom, Shabbir-Syndrom, Syndrom des laryngealen und okul\u00e4ren Granulationsgewebes bei Kindern des Indischen Subkontinents, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q81.8", "OMIM": "245660", "UMLS": "C1328355", "GARD": "368", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, meist in konsanguinen Familien aus der Punjab-Region Pakistans und Indiens.", "clinical_description": "Die Krankheit besteht seit Geburt. Charakteristische Hautbefunde sind verg\u00e4ngliche Blasen, die nur langsam heilende Erosionen mit Bildung \u00fcbersch\u00fcssigen Granulationsgewebes hinterlassen. Betroffen sind vor allem Kopf und Hals, H\u00e4nde, F\u00fc\u00dfe, Ellenbogen und Knie. Immer bestehen auch extrakutane Symptome: Die fortschreitende Beteiligung des Kehlkopfes f\u00fchrt h\u00e4ufig im Kleinkindalter zu schwerer Obstruktion der Atemwege; Folgen der chronischen L\u00e4sionen der Konjunktiva sind Bildung eines Symblepharons, auch Verschluss der Lider und Erblindung. Immer besteht eine Zahnschmelzhypoplasie, Nageldystrophien sind h\u00e4ufig.", "etiology": "Mit der Krankheit assoziiert sind Mutationen im Gen f\u00fcr die Alpha-3-Kette des Laminin-332 (LAMA3).", "genetic_counseling": "Das LOC-Syndrom wird autosomal-rezessiv vererbt", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist ung\u00fcnstig.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. Bisher wurden weniger als 50 F\u00e4lle beschrieben, meist in konsanguinen Familien aus der Punjab-Region Pakistans und Indiens."}, {"name": "Syndrom des linearen Naevus sebaceus", "german_description": "Die Inzidenz des epidermalen Naevus (EN) (isolierter Befund oder als Syndrom) wird auf 1-3 von 1000 Lebendgeburten gesch\u00e4tzt, wobei der Naevus sebaceus (NS) sch\u00e4tzungsweise die H\u00e4lfte der Gesamtzahl ausmacht. Das Naevus-sebaceus-Syndrom (NSS) ist selten; die genaue Pr\u00e4valenz und Inzidenz in der Allgemeinbev\u00f6lkerung ist nicht bekannt.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare nevus syndrome characterized by the association of an nevus sebaceous with a broad spectrum of abnormalities that affect many organ systems, most commonly the eye, skeletal and central nervous system.", "synonyms": "Nevus sebaceus of Jadassohn, Nevus sebaceus syndrome, Organoid nevus syndrome, Schimmelpenning syndrome, Solomon syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neonatal, Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q85.8", "omim": "163200", "umls": "C0265329\u00a0 C3854181", "gard": "10291", "epidemiology": "The incidence of epidermal nevus (EN) (isolated finding or as a syndrome) is estimated at 1-3/1,000 live births, with nevus sebaceous (NS) estimated at half of the total. Nevus sebaceous syndrome (NSS) is rare; the exact prevalence and incidence in the general population is unknown.", "clinical_description": "NSS is the association of NS with extracutaneous manifestations. NS presents typically at birth as hairless yellow-pink, salmon-colored Blaschkoid plaque(s), but nevi may not appear clinically until later in infancy or early childhood. NS are found on the head and neck in two-thirds of cases, and large extensive nevi or a centrofacial location is more associated with NSS. In puberty, NS thicken and can become verrucous in appearance. Later in life, benign neoplasms may grow within the NS; rarely do malignant neoplasms grow, and the risk specifically for basal cell carcinoma is less than 1%. Central nervous system (CNS) findings are the most common extracutaneous anomalies, notably intellectual disability (nearly 80%) and seizures (57%, generalized tonic, tonic-clonic, focal motor, infantile spasms). While structural brain anomalies may occur (hemiatrophy, vascular anomalies, hemimegalencephaly, gyral or posterior fossa abnormalities), 75% of patients with CNS findings have normal imaging. Many other organ systems may also be involved in this syndrome, most commonly ophthalmologic (strabismus, lipodermoids, retinal anomalies, coloboma, cataracts, corneal vascularization) and skeletal (frontal bossing, skeletal hypoplasia, scoliosis and kyphoscoliosis, vitamin D-resistant rickets, hypophosphatemia). Other rare findings have included endocrine, cardiovascular and urogenital systems and oral anomalies (including rare neoplasms of ameloblastoma ,odontoma, giant cell granuloma).", "etiology": "NSS is a sporadic disease. EN syndromes are the result of post-zygotic mutations. Mutations in KRAS, HRAS , and NRAS have been described in both isolated NS and NSS. Mutations in these same genes are seen in keratinocytic EN (KEN).", "diagnostic_methods": "Evaluation should include prenatal, developmental, and family histories. Cutaneous examination should evaluate all skin including areas covered by hair, mucosa, eyes (especially the conjunctiva, sclerae, and extra-ocular eye movements). Careful neurologic and ophthalmologic exams should be performed. Any child with NS on the head or neck and developmental delay should have brain imaging. Skeletal exam should evaluate for kyphoscoliosis, gait and limb length. Skin biopsies and relevant laboratory studies (serum/urine calcium and phosphate, liver and renal function tests) as appropriate. Referral to specialists guided by the above is recommended.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes cutaneous-skeletal hypophosphatemia syndrome, nevus comedonicus syndrome, Becker nevus syndrome, phakomatosis pigmentokeratotica, CHILD syndrome, the spectrum of PIK3CA-related overgrowth syndrome, SOLAMEN (segmental outgrowth-lipomatosis-arteriovenous malformation-epidermal nevus syndrome), and CLOVES syndrome.", "genetic_counseling": "NSS occurs sporadically due to a postzygotic mutation. They do not appear to be heritable, as the severity of the mutations are thought to be incompatible with life when present in the germline.", "management_and_treatment": "NSS management is individualized and multidisciplinary based on the involved organ systems and degree of impairment. NS are no longer prophylactically excised in infancy, given low risk of malignant potential. In puberty, patients may opt for removal of the thickened lesions for cosmetic reasons. Biopsy is recommended for any growths that may occur within lesions. Tissue should be sent to an experienced dermatopathologist to prevent misdiagnosis of basal cell carcinoma.", "prognosis": "The prognosis depends on the severity of the clinical manifestations and the extent of the multisystem involvement."}, {"name": "Syndrom des linearen verruk\u00f6sen Naevus", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare skin disease characterized by a hamartomatous epidermal lesion presenting as a linear array of verrucous, hyperkeratotic papules that often coalesce into plaques and are formed along the lines of Blaschko. The condition is associated with involvement of other organ systems, mainly brain, eye, and skeletal system. It is the result of mosaic post-zygotic mutations and most commonly presents at birth, but may occur anytime during childhood, rarely also in adulthood.", "synonyms": "Linear hamartoma syndrome, ", "icd_10": "Q82.5", "gard": "3259"}, {"name": "Syndrom des periodischen Fiebers, aphth\u00f6ser Stomatitis, Pharyngitis und Adenitis", "sub_name": "PFAPA-Syndrom", "german_description": "Das Marshall-Syndrom, auch mit dem Akronym PFAPA-Syndrom bezeichnet (periodisches Fieber, aphth\u00f6se Stomatitis, Pharyngitis, zervikale Lymphadenitis), ist eine periodische Krankheit des Kindesalters, charakterisiert durch rekurrierenden Fiebersch\u00fcbe mit Symptomen an Kopf und Hals. Der Ursprung dieses Syndroms, das mehrere Jahre andauern kann, ist nicht bekannt. W\u00e4hrend der symptomfreien Zeiten wachsen die Patienten normal. Differentialdiagnostisch abzugrenzen sind andere Krankheiten mit periodischem Fieber: Rekurrierende Tonsillitis, verschiedene Infektionskrankheiten, juvenile idiopathische Arthritis, Beh\u00e7et-Syndrom, zyklische Neutropenie, Famili\u00e4res Mittelmeerfieber, Famili\u00e4res Irisches (Hibernian) Fieber und das Hyper-IgD-Syndrom. Viele Medikamente (Antibiotika, nicht-steroidale Antiphlogistika, Azetysalizyls\u00e4ure, Colchicin, antivirale Mittel, Steroide, H2-Rezeptor-Antagonist Cimetidin) und Tonsillektomie wurden mit unterschiedlichem Erfolg zur Behandlung versucht. Unsere Erfahrung und eine Analyse der Literatur sprechen daf\u00fcr, da\u00df operative Verfahren (Tonsillektomie mit oder ohne Adenotomie) bei der Behandlung des PFAPA-Syndroms wahrscheinlich die besten Resultate garantieren. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "PFAPA (Periodic fever - aphthous stomatitis- pharyngitis - adenopathy) syndrome is an auto inflammatory syndrome characterized by recurrent febrile episodes associated with aphthous stomatitis, pharyngitis and cervical adenitis.", "synonyms": "Marshall syndrome with periodic fever, Periodic fever-aphtous stomatitis-pharyngitis-adenopathy syndrome, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Infancy", "icd_10": "E85.0", "umls": "C2938935", "gard": "5657", "epidemiology": "Prevalence of PFAPA is unknown, over 500 cases have been reported and patients are predominantly male (>60%).", "clinical_description": "PFAPA usually presents during early childhood (<5 years old) with recurrent episodes of fever (>39\u00b0C) lasting 3-7 days, during which children appear very ill. Aphthous stomatitis is characterized by relatively painless small, round and shallow lesions on the tongue and oral mucosa (70% of cases) that recover completely in 10-14 days. Most patients present with tonsillitis, occasionally with white exudates (mimicking streptococci infection), and a general pharyngitis (75% of cases) with diffuse hyperemia of the entire palate. Swelling of upper cervical lymph nodes appears in >75% of cases. Abdominal pain has also been reported in many cases (65%) and generally correlates with mesenteric adenopathy. Other reported features include chills, headache, vomiting, diarrhea, hepatosplenomegaly and joint pain. Episodes recur every 3-5 weeks, often in a predictable fashion with patients describing a mild malaise the day before recurrence. Patients are in good health between episodes and generally develop normally, but leg pain and chronic fatigue are often reported.", "etiology": "PFAPA is an idiopathic inflammatory condition. Elevated levels of IL-2, TNF-alpha, decreased levels of IL-10 and a significant over expression of IL-1-related (IL-1B, IL-1RN, CASP1, IL18RAP), and IFN-induced (AIM2, IP-10/CXCL10) genes are noted during the episodes.", "diagnostic_methods": "PFAPA is a diagnosis of exclusion based on clinical manifestations. The regularity of acute episodes during the active phase of the disease is an important clue. Marked leukocytosis and elevated CRP levels are observed in blood samples collected during acute episodes. Oral culture swabs are negative for infection, and patients fail to respond to antipyretic or antibiotic treatment.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis includes other diseases characterized by periodic fever such as recurrent tonsillitis, streptococcal infection, juvenile idiopathic arthritis, Beh\u00e7et's disease, cyclic neutropenia, familial Mediterranean fever, TRAPS syndrome, and mevalonate kinase deficiency (see these terms).", "management_and_treatment": "PFAPA has no specific treatment. Fever does not respond to non-steroidal anti-inflammatory medications. A dose of corticosteroid (prednisone, 1-2 mg/kg, or betametasone, 0.1-0.2 mg/kg) given upon the first signs of an episode can shorten or even end the episode within hours. This treatment has, however, been reported to reduce the interval between episodes. Cimetidine and colchicine have had some success in preventing relapse through regular administration. Tonsillectomy may be considered in more severe cases with very frequent flare ups.", "prognosis": "Episodes usually decrease in frequency and resolve during the patient's second decade. Tonsillectomy may cure the disease in most cases."}, {"name": "Syndrome des otopalatodigitalen Spektrums", "german_description": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Otopalatodigital syndrome spectrum disorder is a primary bone dysplasia and encompasses a group of congenital anomalies that are characterized by skeletal dysplasia of varying clinical severity and an X linked dominant pattern of inheritance. This group includes otopalatodigital syndrome type 1 and 2 (OPD1, OPD2) which are characterized in affected males by cleft palate, conductive hearing loss, craniofacial abnormalities and skeletal dysplasia; Melnick-Needles syndrome (MNS) which displays skeletal deformities in females and embryonic or perinatal lethality in most males; frontometaphyseal dysplasia (FMD); and terminal osseous dysplasia - pigmentary defects.", "synonyms": "OPD spectrum disorder, OPSD, ", "umls": "C2748918"}, {"name": "Syndrome mit 46,XX-DSD", "sub_name": "Syndrome mit St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Syndrome mit 46,XX-DSD, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit 46,XY-DSD", "sub_name": "Syndrome mit St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Syndrome mit 46,XY-DSD, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit Alpha-Thalass\u00e4mie als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Der Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Gruppe von Krankheiten, die durch Alpha-Thalass\u00e4mie und eine assoziierte Krankheit gekennzeichnet sind. Drei Formen sind in dieser Gruppe enthalten: Alpha-Thalass\u00e4mie-intellektuelles Defizit-Syndrom, X-chromosomal (oder ATR-X-Syndrom), Alpha-Thalass\u00e4mie-intellektuelles Defizit-Syndrom und myelodysplastische Erkrankung oder ATMDS (s. diese Termini).", "ICD-10": "D56.0"}, {"name": "Syndrome mit DSD des gyn\u00e4kologischen Fachbereichs", "sub_name": "Syndrome mit St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung des gyn\u00e4kologischen Formenkreises", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Syndrome mit DSD des gyn\u00e4kologischen Fachbereichs, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit DSD des gyn\u00e4kologischen Fachbereichs, genetische Formen", "sub_name": "St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung des gyn\u00e4kologischen Formenkreises, genetisch bedingte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Syndrome mit DSD des gyn\u00e4kologischen Fachbereichs, genetische Formen, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit Extremit\u00e4tenfehlbildung als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "ICD-10": "Q87.2", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit kombiniertem Immundefekt", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit Reduktionsdefekten der Extremit\u00e4ten", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit reduzierter Sensitivit\u00e4t gegen\u00fcber Schilddr\u00fcsenhormon", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XX", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Syndrome mit 46,XX-DSD, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung 46,XY", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "synonyms": "Syndrome mit 46,XY-DSD, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit St\u00f6rung der Geschlechtsentwicklung des gyn\u00e4kologischen Formenkreises", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Syndrome mit DSD des gyn\u00e4kologischen Fachbereichs, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit Synostose oder anderer Gelenkfehlentwicklung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome mit with Extremit\u00e4ten-Verdoppelung, Polydaktylie, Syndaktylie und/oder Triphalangismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrome und Fehlbildungen mit assoziierten Ohren-, Nasen- und Rachenfehlbildungen", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit Corpus callosum-Agenesie als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit Dandy-Walker-Fehlbildung als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit Hypoparathyreoidismus", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit Mikrozephalie als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit oro-mandibul\u00e4rer und Gliedma\u00dfen-Hypogenesis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Oro-akrales Syndrom, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q87.5", "GARD": "4116", "summary": "Die Syndrome mit oro-mandibul\u00e4rer und Gliedma\u00dfen-Hypogenesis sind eine Gruppe von Dysmorphie-Komplexen, zu denen das Charlie-M-Syndrom, das Hanhart-Syndrom und die Glosso-palatine Ankylose geh\u00f6ren (s. diese Termini). Sie sind gekennzeichnet durch schwere, asymmetrische, prim\u00e4r distale Gliedma\u00dfendefekte und Anomalien der Mundh\u00f6hle und des Unterkiefers (Hypoglossie, Aglossie, Mikrogenie, glosso-palatine Ankylose, Gaumenspalte und Ver\u00e4nderungen der Gingiva). Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird auf 1:500.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. Die klinischen Symptome bestehen schon bei Geburt, die Intelligenz ist normal. Die Ursache ist nicht bekannt. "}, {"name": "Syndrom mit pulmonaler Hypertension als Hauptmerkmal", "sub_name": "Syndrom mit pulmonaler Hypertonie als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Syndrom mit pulmonaler Hypertension als Hauptmerkmal, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit pulmonaler Hypertonie als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Syndrom mit pulmonaler Hypertension als Hauptmerkmal, ", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit Wollhaaren", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "UMLS": "C0345427", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit zerebell\u00e4rer Fehlbildung als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Syndrom mit ZNS-Fehlbildung als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "SYNE1-abh\u00e4ngige AMC", "sub_name": "Myogene Arthrogryposis multiplex congenita, autosomal-rezessive", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die autosomal-rezessive myogene Arthrogryposis multiplex congenita ist eine seltene, vererbte neuromuskul\u00e4re Erkrankung, die sich bereits pr\u00e4natal (gew\u00f6hnlich im zweiten Trimester) pr\u00e4sentiert und von reduzierten fetalen Bewegungen und Fehlstellung der Gelenke gekennzeichnet ist. Die Gelenkanomalien k\u00f6nnen sowohl untere als auch obere Extremit\u00e4ten betreffen und sind gew\u00f6hnlich symmetrisch. Die Krankheit manifestiert sich durch schwere Hypotonie bei der Geburt mit beidseitigem Klumpfu\u00df, Verz\u00f6gerung der motorischen Entwicklung, leichte Schw\u00e4che der Fazialmuskeln ohne Opthalmoplegie, fehlende tiefe Sehnenreflexe, normale motorische und sensorische Nervenleitgeschwindigkeiten. Eine Beteiligung des Kleinhirns oder der Pyramiden liegt nicht vor. Ein progressiver Krankheitsverlauf f\u00fchrt zum Verlust der Gehf\u00e4higkeit nach dem ersten Lebensjahrzehnt.", "synonyms": "AMC, myogene, autosomal-rezessive, Arthrogryposis multiplex congenita, SYNE1-abh\u00e4ngige, SYNE1-abh\u00e4ngige AMC, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q74.3", "OMIM": "618484"}, {"name": "SYNGAP1-abh\u00e4ngige DEE", "sub_name": "SYNGAP1-assoziierte Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung mit epileptischer Enzephalopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic developmental and epileptic encephalopathy (DEE) characterized by developmental delay, generalized epilepsy consisting of eyelid myoclonia with absences and myoclonic-atonic seizures, intellectual disability and autism spectrum disorder (ASD).", "synonyms": "SYNGAP1-related DEE, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G40.4", "epidemiology": "This disorder has an estimated prevalence of <1/1 000 000.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is of developmental delay, identified in the first months of life, associated with hypotonia and subsequent neurodevelopmental plateauing or regression. Generalized epilepsy is present in most with seizure onset typically at 2-3 years (ranges from 4 months to 7 years) with a distinctive epilepsy syndrome, combining eyelid myoclonia with absences and myoclonic-atonic seizures. Drop attacks due to eyelid myoclonia evolving to myoclonic-atonic or atonic seizure can be present. Other generalized seizure types, variably combined, and reflex seizures triggered by eating or eyes closure may occur. The spectrum of seizure severity varies, with drug-resistant seizures in about half of patients. Moderate to severe intellectual disability becomes progressively evident in most, associated with ASD in about half of the patients. Behavioral disorders, including oppositional and defiant behavior with aggression, self-injury, and temper tantrums, are seen in most. Subtle dysmorphic facial features may be present in some, including slightly prominent eyebrows with medial flaring, hypertelorism, full nasal tip, slightly upturned nasal tip, short philtrum, cupid bow upper lip, broad mouth with diastemata of the upper teeth, and small pointed chin. Other associated features comprise high pain threshold, eating and sleeping problems, ataxia or gait abnormalities, and orthopedic abnormalities. Brain imaging is usually normal with possible nonspecific findings.", "etiology": "The SYNGAP1 gene (6p21.32) encodes the synaptic Ras-GTPase-activating protein 1, mainly expressed in the synapses of excitatory neurons. Loss of function mutations in SYNGAP1 impairs neuronal homeostasis and development. This disorder is caused by heterozygous pathogenc SYNGAP1 variants or chromosome 6p21.32 microdeletions encompassing the SYNGAP1 gene.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is suspected in a patient with developmental delay or intellectual disability, ASD and generalized epilepsy with generalized epileptiform abnormalities on EEG. The genetic identification of pathogenic SYNGAP1 variants (next generation sequencing) or chromosome 6p21.32 microdeletions (aCGH ) confirms the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The phenotype of SYNPAG1-related encephalopathy might overlap with that of other neurodevelopmental disorders and DEEs. Seizures semiology, trigger factors and EEG patterns can help to differentiate this syndrome and orient the genetic testing.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Once a pathogenic SYNGAP1 variant has been identified, prenatal testing is possible for a pregnancy at increased risk.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal dominant. Whilst pathogenic variants occur de novo in almost all cases, parental mosaicism is possible. In such cases, genetic counseling is recommended as the risk of recurrence in affected families is higher than the general population.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach and tailored treatments addressing the specific symptoms. Anti-seizure medications and ketogenic diet are used for the management of seizures. Non-pharmacological interventions comprise physical, occupational, speech, and feeding therapy, as well as individualized educational plans.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is unknown due to under diagnosis in adult age. However, adult patients are known, demonstrating that survival into adulthood is possible. Prognosis is poor, resulting in severe cognitive deficits in most, associated with behavioral disorders of variable degree, and persisting seizures in half of the cases."}, {"name": "SYNGAP1-assoziierte Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung mit epileptischer Enzephalopathie", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic developmental and epileptic encephalopathy (DEE) characterized by developmental delay, generalized epilepsy consisting of eyelid myoclonia with absences and myoclonic-atonic seizures, intellectual disability and autism spectrum disorder (ASD).", "synonyms": "SYNGAP1-related DEE, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "G40.4", "epidemiology": "This disorder has an estimated prevalence of <1/1 000 000.", "clinical_description": "Presentation is of developmental delay, identified in the first months of life, associated with hypotonia and subsequent neurodevelopmental plateauing or regression. Generalized epilepsy is present in most with seizure onset typically at 2-3 years (ranges from 4 months to 7 years) with a distinctive epilepsy syndrome, combining eyelid myoclonia with absences and myoclonic-atonic seizures. Drop attacks due to eyelid myoclonia evolving to myoclonic-atonic or atonic seizure can be present. Other generalized seizure types, variably combined, and reflex seizures triggered by eating or eyes closure may occur. The spectrum of seizure severity varies, with drug-resistant seizures in about half of patients. Moderate to severe intellectual disability becomes progressively evident in most, associated with ASD in about half of the patients. Behavioral disorders, including oppositional and defiant behavior with aggression, self-injury, and temper tantrums, are seen in most. Subtle dysmorphic facial features may be present in some, including slightly prominent eyebrows with medial flaring, hypertelorism, full nasal tip, slightly upturned nasal tip, short philtrum, cupid bow upper lip, broad mouth with diastemata of the upper teeth, and small pointed chin. Other associated features comprise high pain threshold, eating and sleeping problems, ataxia or gait abnormalities, and orthopedic abnormalities. Brain imaging is usually normal with possible nonspecific findings.", "etiology": "The SYNGAP1 gene (6p21.32) encodes the synaptic Ras-GTPase-activating protein 1, mainly expressed in the synapses of excitatory neurons. Loss of function mutations in SYNGAP1 impairs neuronal homeostasis and development. This disorder is caused by heterozygous pathogenc SYNGAP1 variants or chromosome 6p21.32 microdeletions encompassing the SYNGAP1 gene.", "diagnostic_methods": "The diagnosis is suspected in a patient with developmental delay or intellectual disability, ASD and generalized epilepsy with generalized epileptiform abnormalities on EEG. The genetic identification of pathogenic SYNGAP1 variants (next generation sequencing) or chromosome 6p21.32 microdeletions (aCGH ) confirms the diagnosis.", "differential_diagnosis": "The phenotype of SYNPAG1-related encephalopathy might overlap with that of other neurodevelopmental disorders and DEEs. Seizures semiology, trigger factors and EEG patterns can help to differentiate this syndrome and orient the genetic testing.", "antenatal_diagnosis": "Once a pathogenic SYNGAP1 variant has been identified, prenatal testing is possible for a pregnancy at increased risk.", "genetic_counseling": "The pattern of inheritance is autosomal dominant. Whilst pathogenic variants occur de novo in almost all cases, parental mosaicism is possible. In such cases, genetic counseling is recommended as the risk of recurrence in affected families is higher than the general population.", "management_and_treatment": "Management requires a multidisciplinary approach and tailored treatments addressing the specific symptoms. Anti-seizure medications and ketogenic diet are used for the management of seizures. Non-pharmacological interventions comprise physical, occupational, speech, and feeding therapy, as well as individualized educational plans.", "prognosis": "Life expectancy is unknown due to under diagnosis in adult age. However, adult patients are known, demonstrating that survival into adulthood is possible. Prognosis is poor, resulting in severe cognitive deficits in most, associated with behavioral disorders of variable degree, and persisting seizures in half of the cases."}, {"name": "Syngnathie - Gaumenspalte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "age_of_onset": "Vorgeburtlich, Neugeborenenzeit", "GARD": "5091", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Syngnathie, isolierte kongenitale", "english": 0, "defenition": "Bei der isolierten kongenitalen Syngnathie handelt es sich um einen sehr seltenen Entwicklungsdefekt w\u00e4hrend der Embryogenese, der durch einen unterschiedlichen Grad der kongenitalen Verschmelzung (von einfachen Schleimhautadh\u00e4sionen bis hin zu einer ausgedehnten kn\u00f6chernen Verschmelzung) des Unterkiefers mit dem Oberkiefer gekennzeichnet ist und nicht mit anderen Fehlbildungen einhergeht. Die Patienten pr\u00e4sentieren sich mit einer Einschr\u00e4nkung der Mund\u00f6ffnung (die von einer schweren bis zu einer minimalen Einschr\u00e4nkung reichen kann), die typischerweise zu Schwierigkeiten bei der Nahrungsaufnahme, beim Schlucken und/oder bei der Atmung f\u00fchrt, was zu einem Versagen der Nahrungsaufnahme, Unterern\u00e4hrung und/oder einer Kiefergelenksankylose f\u00fchren kann.", "synonyms": "Maxillomandibul\u00e4re Fusion, isolierte kongenitale, ", "age_of_onset": "Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q67.4"}, {"name": "Syngnathie-multiple Anomalien-Syndrom", "sub_name": "Dobrow-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Dobrow syndrome is a rare multiple congenital defects/dysmorphic syndrome characterized by variable degrees of bony syngnathia associated with variable additional abnormalities, including growth retardation, intellectual disability, microcephaly, iris coloboma, nystagmus, deafness, and vertebral segmentation defects, as well as genital, limb and additional facial malformations, among others.", "synonyms": "Syngnathia-multiple anomalies syndrome, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "gard": "5092"}, {"name": "Synkinesie, kontralaterale, famili\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Spiegelbewegungen, famili\u00e4re kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare, genetic, movement disorder characterized by involuntary movements on one side of the body that mirror intentional movements on the opposite side of the body, which are present in various first-degree members of a family, persist beyond the first decade of life, and have no associated comorbidities.", "synonyms": "Familial congenital controlateral synkinesia, Hereditary congenital controlateral synkinesia, Hereditary congenital mirror movements, Isolated congenital controlateral synkinesia, Isolated congenital mirror movements, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "G25.8", "omim": "157600\u00a0 614508\u00a0 616059\u00a0 618264", "gard": "12551"}, {"name": "Synostose, bikoronare nicht-syndromale", "sub_name": "Brachyzephalie, isolierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "Synostose, bikoronare nicht-syndromale, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q75.0", "OMIM": "123100\u00a0 615314\u00a0 616602", "UMLS": "C0221356", "summary": "Die Isolierte Brachyzephalie ist eine relativ h\u00e4ufige nicht-syndromale Kraniosynostose mit pr\u00e4maturer Fusion beider Kranzn\u00e4hte. Sie f\u00fchrt zu einer Sch\u00e4deldeformit\u00e4t mit breiter flacher Stirn und tastbaren Koronarleisten. Die Pr\u00e4valenz bei Geburt ist etwa 1:20.000. Die Sch\u00e4deldeformit\u00e4t ist gekennzeichnet durch einen kurzen anterior-posterioren Sch\u00e4deldurchmessers und eine kompensatorische Zunahme des bitemporalen Durchmessers. M\u00f6glich sind auch supraorbitale Rezession und Exorbitismus/Exophthalmus. Mit der Brachyzephalie assoziierte faziale Dysmorphien sind Mittelgesichtshypoplasie, leichter Hypertelorismus und vorgew\u00f6lbte Schl\u00e4fen. Hirndrucksteigerung (ICP) ist h\u00e4ufig und kann unbehandelt Ursache eines intellektuellen Defizits sein. Ohne Behandlung f\u00fchrt ICP im Erwachsenenalter zu Knochendefekten. Es ist noch unklar, in welchem Umfang die nicht-syndromale Brachyzephalie genetisch determiniert ist. Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch, 14% aller F\u00e4lle sind famili\u00e4r, etwa 10% der F\u00e4lle werden dominant vererbt. In 74% der famili\u00e4ren und in 17% der sporadischen F\u00e4lle wird (v\u00e4terlich vererbt) die rekurrente Mutation P250R im FGFR3-Gen (4p16.3) f\u00fcr den Fibroblastenwachstumsfaktor-Rezeptor 3 gefunden. Weibliche Tr\u00e4ger der P250R-Mutation sind schwerer und h\u00e4ufiger betroffen als m\u00e4nnliche Tr\u00e4ger (w:m = 2:1). H\u00e4ufig sind die Mutationstr\u00e4ger leicht schwerh\u00f6rig. Einige Mutationstr\u00e4ger haben eine Brachydaktylie und/oder eine Fusion von Metakarpalknochen. Bei einem einzelnen Patienten mit isolierter bikoronarer Synostose wurde eine Mutation im TWIST 1-Gene (7p21) gefunden. Zu nicht-genetischen Determinanten geh\u00f6ren evtl. mechanische Einengungen w\u00e4hrend der Schwangerschaft und nach der Geburt. Die Diagnose st\u00fctzt sich auf klinische und sonografische Befunde, auf R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen und 3D-CT- und/oder MRT-Untersuchungen des Sch\u00e4dels. F\u00fcr alle Familien mit der nicht-syndromalen Form der Brachyzephalie wird ein molekulares Screening empfohlen, da die morphologischen und funktionellen Ergebnisse einer operativen Korrektur bei Nicht-Tr\u00e4gern der FGFR3-Mutation g\u00fcnstiger zu sein scheinen. Bedingt durch die ph\u00e4notypische Variabilit\u00e4t bei Tr\u00e4gern der P250R-Mutation ist eine klinische Unterscheidung von syndromalen und nicht-syndromalen Formen der Brachyzephalie oft schwierig. Zwar erinnert die Sch\u00e4delform manchmal an das Saethre-Chotzen- oder das Pfeiffer-Syndrom (s. diese Termini), aber das Fehlen offenkundiger Hand- und/oder Fu\u00dfanomalien ist ein diagnostisches Leitsymptom der nicht-syndromalen Brachyzephalie. Die ausgepr\u00e4gte Vorw\u00f6lbung der Schl\u00e4fen, besonders bei weiblichen Tr\u00e4gern der FGFR3-Mutation, kann differentialdiagnostische Bedeutung haben. Wichtigste Behandlung ist die chirurgische Rekonstruktion der Sch\u00e4deln\u00e4hte. Dadurch wird die Sch\u00e4delform verbessert, das intrakraniale Volumen vergr\u00f6\u00dfert und gleichzeitig in der Regel der Hirndruck verringert. Die fr\u00fche Diagnose einer H\u00f6rst\u00f6rung erm\u00f6glicht, falls erforderlich, eine rechtzeitige Intervention. Die intellektuelle Entwicklung der Patienten nach kranialer Expansion ist meist gut. Patienten mit der FGFR3-Mutation haben im Vergleich zu Patienten ohne diese Mutation ein 5-fach h\u00f6heres Risiko, dass eine zweite Operation notwendig wird. Auch sind die Ergebnisse des chirurgischen Engriffes weniger g\u00fcnstig."}, {"name": "Synostose, humero-radiale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Humero-radial synostosis is a rare, genetic, congenital joint formation defect disorder characterized by uni- or bilateral fusion of the humerus and radius bones at the elbow level, with or without associated ulnar and carpal/metacarpal deficiency, leading to loss of elbow motion and, in many cases, functional arm incapacity. Bowing of radius may be additionally present.", "synonyms": "Humero-radial fusion, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0or\u00a0Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q74.0", "omim": "143050\u00a0 236400", "umls": "C0431800", "gard": "2748"}, {"name": "Synostose, humero-radio-ulnare", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Humero-radio-ulnar synostosis is an extremely rare, genetic, congenital joint formation defect disorder characterized by uni- or bilateral fusion of the humerus, radius and ulnar bones, leading to loss of elbow motion and, in most, functional arm incapacity. It may appear as distal humeral bifurcation with absent elbow joint and shortened arm length on imaging. Hand abnormalities, namely oligoectrosyndactyly, may be associated.", "synonyms": "Humero-radio-ulnar fusion, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q74.0", "gard": "2749"}, {"name": "Synostose, humero-ulnare", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare joint formation defect characterized by a bony connection between the humerus and the ulna, resulting in fixed flexion of the forearm, usually near 90\u00b0. The condition may be associated with upper limb hypoplasia. It may be sporadic or familial and occur uni- or bilaterally.", "synonyms": "Humero-ulnar fusion, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "No data available", "icd_10": "Q74.0", "umls": "C0431799"}, {"name": "Synovialitis, pigmentierte villonodul\u00e4re", "sub_name": "Tenosynovialer Riesenzelltumor", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Pigmented villonodular synovitis (PVNS) is a rare benign proliferative disorder of the synovial membrane primarily affecting young adults (with a peak age of onset in the second to fourth decade of life) characterized by proliferative, locally invasive tumor-like lesions, usually involving a single joint, tendon sheath or bursa (most commonly the joints of the knee and hip and rarely others such as the ankle, shoulder and temporomandibular joints). It presents with pain and limitation of motion along with swelling, heat and tenderness over the involved joint, eventually leading to arthritic degeneration and significant locomotor deficit, if left untreated. PVNS can recur in patients even after treatment.", "synonyms": "Diffuse-type GCT, Diffuse-type giant cell tumor, Pigmented villonodular synovitis, TGCT, TSGCT, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Adolescent, Adult", "icd_10": "M12.2", "umls": "C0039106", "mesh": "D013586", "gard": "7396"}, {"name": "Synovialsarkom", "german_description": "Das Synovialsarkom (SS) ist ein aggressiver Weichteiltumor, der 7-8% aller malignen Sarkome des Menschen ausmacht. Am h\u00e4ufigsten sind Erwachsene betroffen, aber ca. 30% der Patienten sind Jugendliche und Kinder. Der Name ist irref\u00fchrend, da das SS wahrscheinlich nicht synovialen Ursprungs ist, sondern sich von multipotenten Stammzellen herleitet, die eine Differenzierung in mesenchymale und/oder epitheliale Strukturen erfahren. Klinisch tritt das SS als tiefliegende, schmerzlose, langsam wachsende Masse in Erscheinung. Der h\u00e4ufigste Sitz des Tumors sind Beine und Arme, dort besonders in der Umgebung der gro\u00dfen Gelenke. Die \u00c4tiologie des SS ist unbekannt. Fast alle Tumorzellen haben eine Translokation zwischen dem X-Chromosom und Chromosom 18 [t(X;18)(p11.2;q11.2)]. Diese Translokation ist spezifisch f\u00fcr das SS und daher sehr gut f\u00fcr dessen Diagnose geeignet. Ein optimaler Therapieansatz wurde f\u00fcr das SS noch nicht gefunden. Hauptziel ist die vollst\u00e4ndige chirurgische Resektion des Prim\u00e4rtumors. Nach der Operation ist eine adjuvante Strahlentherapie f\u00fcr die mikroskopisch-residuale Erkrankung hilfreich. Die Rolle einer Chemotherapie ist noch unklar. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "Synovial sarcoma is an aggressive soft tissue sarcoma (see this term), occurring most commonly in adolescents and young adults (15 to 40 years), usually localized near the large joints of the extremities but also in the head and neck, mediastinum and viscera (lung, kidney etc), clinically presenting as a deep seated swelling or a painful mass often with an initial indolent course and is characterized by its local invasiveness and a propensity to metastasize. The origin of synovial sarcoma is likely from multipotent mesenchymal cells and not synovium (contrary to its name).", "synonyms": "Synovialosarcoma, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "All ages", "icd_10": "C49.9", "omim": "300813", "umls": "C0039101", "gard": "7721", "meddra": "10042863"}, {"name": "Synovitis - Akne - Pustulosis - Hyperostose - Osteitis", "sub_name": "SAPHO-Syndrom", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine seltene, pyogene autoinflammatorische Erkrankung, die durch die Assoziation von neutrophiler kutaner Beteiligung und chronischer nicht-bakterieller Osteomyelitis gekennzeichnet ist.", "synonyms": "Synovitis - Akne - Pustulosis - Hyperostose - Osteitis, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Jugendalter, Erwachsenenalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "ICD-10": "M86.3", "UMLS": "C0263859", "GARD": "7606", "MedDRA": "10051316", "epidemiology": "Obwohl seine H\u00e4ufigkeit und Pr\u00e4valenz wahrscheinlich untersch\u00e4tzt wird, gilt das SAPHO-Syndrom (Abk\u00fcrzung f\u00fcr Synovitis, Akne, Pustulosis, Hyperostosis und Osteitis) als eine seltene Erkrankung.", "clinical_description": "Das Eintrittsalter reicht von der Adoleszenz bis zum sp\u00e4ten Erwachsenenalter, mit einem mittleren Alter zwischen 30 und 40 Jahren. Das SAPHO-Syndrom umfasst ein breites Spektrum von Anomalien, die durch variable Kombinationen von osteoartikul\u00e4ren und kutanen Manifestationen unterschiedlicher Schweregrade gekennzeichnet sind. Der Beginn von Knochen- und Gelenkschmerzen, Steifigkeit und Schwellungen ist meist heimt\u00fcckisch. Bei Erwachsenen kommt es vor allem in der vorderen Brustwand, aber auch in der Wirbels\u00e4ule, seltener im Unterkiefer und in den Beckenknochen vor; bei Kindern zeigt sie eine vergleichbare Verteilung wie die chronische nicht-bakterielle Osteomyelitis (CNO/CRMO) (z.B. lange Knochen, Schl\u00fcsselbein, Wirbels\u00e4ule). Wenn eine Synovialitis auftritt, manifestiert sie sich meist im Kreuzbeingelenk, in den H\u00fcften oder Knien oder in den Sternoklavikulargelenken. Je nach Schwere der Symptome kann ein eingeschr\u00e4nkter Bewegungsumfang beobachtet werden. Die dermatologische Beteiligung umfasst schwere Akne, palmoplant\u00e4re Pustulose und pustul\u00e4re Psoriasis. Hautmanifestationen beginnen oft 1-2 Jahre vor kn\u00f6chernen Ver\u00e4nderungen, k\u00f6nnen aber gleichzeitig oder mehr als 20 Jahre sp\u00e4ter auftreten. Die Patienten k\u00f6nnen auch unter Bauchschmerzen, Durchfall, Analfissuren oder Abszessen leiden, was auf einen m\u00f6glichen Zusammenhang mit einer entz\u00fcndlichen Darmerkrankung (IBD) hindeutet. Die meisten Autoren betrachten CNO/CRMO als die p\u00e4diatrische Form des SAPHO-Syndroms. Tats\u00e4chlich spricht das h\u00e4ufige Auftreten von dermatologischen St\u00f6rungen oder IBD f\u00fcr die Einbeziehung dieser beiden Einheiten in das gleiche Spektrum.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie ist unbekannt. Das SAPHO-Syndrom scheint einen multifaktoriellen Ursprung mit genetischen, \u00f6kologischen, immunologischen und infekti\u00f6sen Komponenten zu haben. Langsam wachsende Bakterien, wie z.B. Propionibacterium acnes, k\u00f6nnten als Ausl\u00f6ser fungieren.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die bei der klinischen Untersuchung vermutete Diagnose muss mit bildgebenden Verfahren (R\u00f6ntgen, CT, MRT) best\u00e4tigt werden, die eine Kombination von Osteolyse und Osteosklerose mit sekund\u00e4rer Hyperostose, Knochenmark\u00f6dem, endostealer periostealer Entz\u00fcndung, perifokaler Myositis und angrenzender Arthritis zeigen. Die Knochenbiopsie offenbart oft ein Infiltrat von Neutrophilen im Fr\u00fchstadium, das nach und nach durch mononukle\u00e4re Zellen ersetzt und in sp\u00e4teren Stadien mit Sklerose assoziiert wird. Eine bakteriologische Studie ist manchmal positiv f\u00fcr Propionibacterium acnes. Die Kultur der Synovialfl\u00fcssigkeit ist in der Regel negativ.", "differential_diagnosis": "Die Differentialdiagnose umfasst infekti\u00f6se Osteomyelitis oder Arthritis, Langerhans-Zell-Histiozytose und Knochentumore wie Ewing-Sarkom, Osteoblastom und osteoidales Osteom. Hypophosphatasie kann den Knochenph\u00e4notyp des SAPHO-Syndroms nachahmen.", "genetic_counseling": "Die meisten F\u00e4lle sind sporadisch. Es wurden einige famili\u00e4re F\u00e4lle gemeldet.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist haupts\u00e4chlich symptomatisch und basiert auf nicht-steroidalen entz\u00fcndungshemmenden Medikamenten, die manchmal durch Kortikosteroide (z.B. Prednison) ersetzt werden. In resistenten F\u00e4llen k\u00f6nnen auch krankheitsmodifizierende Antirheumatika (z.B. Methotrexat) eingesetzt werden. Intraven\u00f6se Biphosphonate (Pamidronat, Zoledronat) k\u00f6nnen Knochenschmerzen lindern. In j\u00fcngster Zeit zeigten TNF-Hemmer ermutigende Ergebnisse bei der Kontrolle sowohl der osteoartikul\u00e4ren als auch der kutanen Manifestationen. Die osteoartikul\u00e4ren Merkmale k\u00f6nnen auch mit Sulfasalazin behandelt werden. Akne kann mit systemischen Antibiotika wie Doxycyclin behandelt werden. Die palmoplantare Pustulose oder Psoriasis pustulosa reagiert in der Regel gut auf das Thema Kortikosteroide oder die PUVA-Therapie. Physiotherapie wird empfohlen.", "prognosis": "Die Erkrankung verl\u00e4uft in der Regel chronisch, mit abwechselnden Remissions- und R\u00fcckfallphasen, manchmal mit dem Auftreten neuer osteosklerotischer L\u00e4sionen. Es kann zu einer spontanen Aufl\u00f6sung kommen. Zu den Komplikationen geh\u00f6ren Beeintr\u00e4chtigungen der Knochen- und Gelenkfunktion, Gef\u00e4\u00dfkompression, chronisches Schmerzsyndrom und Fortschreiten zur klassischen Spondyloarthritis.", "summary": "Obwohl seine H\u00e4ufigkeit und Pr\u00e4valenz wahrscheinlich untersch\u00e4tzt wird, gilt das SAPHO-Syndrom (Abk\u00fcrzung f\u00fcr Synovitis, Akne, Pustulosis, Hyperostosis und Osteitis) als eine seltene Erkrankung."}, {"name": "Synpolydaktylie", "sub_name": "Syndaktylie Typ 2", "german_description": "Die Syndaktylie Typ 2 oder Synpolydaktylie (SPD) ist eine seltene angeborene distale Gliedma\u00dfenfehlbildung mit einer Kombination von Syndaktylie und Polydaktylie. Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt. In den meisten F\u00e4llen betrifft die SPD beiderseits die Finger III und IV und die Zehen IV und V. Weitere Symptome sind Klinodaktylie des Kleinfingers, Kamptodaktylie und/oder Brachydaktylie. Die Synpolydaktylie wird autosomal-dominant vererbt, bisher sind 3 urs\u00e4chliche Genorte identifiziert: SPD1 (HOXD13-Gen, 2q31), SPD2 (FBLN1-Gen; 22q13.31) und SPD3 (14q11.2-q12). ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-syndromic syndactyly characterized by a distinctive combination of syndactyly and polydactyly, generally affecting the 3rd and 4th fingers and the 4th and 5th toes, bilaterally, with partial or complete reduplication of a digital ray within the syndactylous web. Additional features include 5th finger clinodactyly, camptodactyly and/or brachydactyly.", "synonyms": "Synpolydactyly, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Autosomal dominant\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Neonatal", "icd_10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "omim": "186000\u00a0 608180\u00a0 610234", "umls": "C2699746", "mesh": "C538153", "gard": "5087"}, {"name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Vordingborg, SD2a, SPD Typ Vordingborg, SPD1, Synpolydaktylie Typ Vordingborg, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "186000", "UMLS": "C1861367", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Debeer, SD2b, SPD Typ Debeer, SPD2, Synpolydaktylie Typ Debeer, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "608180", "UMLS": "C1842422", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Malik, SD2c, SPD Typ Malik, SPD3, Synpolydaktylie, Typ Malik, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "610234", "UMLS": "C1853255", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ Debeer", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 2", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Debeer, SD2b, SPD Typ Debeer, SPD2, Synpolydaktylie Typ Debeer, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "608180", "UMLS": "C1842422", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "Synpolydaktylie, Typ Malik", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 3", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Malik, SD2c, SPD Typ Malik, SPD3, Synpolydaktylie, Typ Malik, ", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "610234", "UMLS": "C1853255", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ Vordingborg", "sub_name": "Synpolydaktylie Typ 1", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "synonyms": "SD2 Typ Vordingborg, SD2a, SPD Typ Vordingborg, SPD1, Synpolydaktylie Typ Vordingborg, ", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0", "ICD-10": "Q70.0\u00a0 Q70.2", "OMIM": "186000", "UMLS": "C1861367", "summary": "Diese Krankheit wird beschrieben unter Syndaktylie Typ 2"}, {"name": "Synspondylismus", "sub_name": "Spondylo-karpo-tarsale Synostose", "german_description": "Das Syndrom der Spondylo-karpo-tarsalen Synostose, auch Kongenitaler Synspondylismus genannt, ist eine seltene Krankheit mit Verschmelzungen von Wirbelk\u00f6rpern (h\u00e4ufig in Form eines unsegmentierten Stabes) und mit Fusionen der Mittelhand- und Mittelfu\u00dfknochen. Die Krankheit ist genetisch heterogen. Ursache der autosomal-rezessiv vererbten Form sind Mutationen im FLNB-Gen in der Chromosomenregion 3p14.3, das f\u00fcr Filamin B kodiert. In einigen Familien wird die Krankheit autosomal-dominant vererbt, und Filamin-B-Mutationen wurden nicht gefunden. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A spondylodysplasic dysplasia clinically characterized by postnatal progressive vertebral fusions frequently manifesting as block vertebrae, contributing to an shortened trunk and hence disproportionate short stature, scoliosis, lordosis, carpal and tarsal synostosis and infrequently, club feet.", "synonyms": "Synspondylism, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Infancy, Childhood", "icd_10": "Q76.4", "omim": "272460", "umls": "C1848934", "gard": "4974", "epidemiology": "Spondylocarpotarsal synostosis (SCT) is very rare. To date, less than 40 cases have been reported in the medical literature.", "clinical_description": "While the clinical onset is postnatal, the diagnosis becomes clinically evident in early in childhood. Primary clinical characteristics of SCT syndrome include progressive vertebral fusions manifesting as block vertebrae leading to a shortened trunk resulting in disproportionate short stature that becomes apparent with physical growth. Scoliosis, lordosis, carpal and tarsal synostosis are frequent with club feet being observed in a minority of cases. A mild facial dysmorphism with a round face with frontal bossing and anteverted nostrils can be evident. Midline cleft palate, conductive hearing loss, joint laxity and dental enamel hypoplasia are uncommonly reported.", "etiology": "SCT syndrome is due to biallelic mutations in FLNB (localized to 3p14.3) that encodes cytoskeletal protein filamin B. A very similar condition is caused by either monoallelic or biallelic mutations in MYH3.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is confirmed by skeletal x-rays and genetic testing. Radiographs demonstrate progressive vertebral fusions and lumbar spine, carpal and tarsal synostosis without rib anomalies. Occasionally, delayed ossification of epiphyses and bilateral epiphyseal femur dysplasia are reported.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differential diagnosis may include isolated Klippel-Feil syndrome and other vertebral dysplasias, such as autosomal dominant spondylocostal dysplasia and multiple synostoses syndrome.", "genetic_counseling": "SCT syndrome follows an autosomal recessive inheritance (FLNB, MYH3) or occasionally autosomal dominant inheritance (MYH3). Genetic counseling should be proposed to at risk couples informing them that there is 25% (autosomal recessive) or 50% (autosomal dominant) risk of tranmitting the disease to offspring.", "management_and_treatment": "Management involves ophthalmologic, audiologic and spine assessments. Scoliosis is treated medically; no effective surgical intervention has been described. The cervical spine should be evaluated for features of instability prior to general anesthesia. Pain management is indispensable as patients suffer from much continuing physical pain due to the spinal deformities and fused block vertebrae.", "prognosis": "It has not been formally evaluated if SCT syndrome affects life expectancy."}, {"name": "Syntelenzephalie", "sub_name": "Mittlere interhemisph\u00e4rische Fusionsvariante der Holoprosenzephalie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Interhemisph\u00e4rische Mittellinienvariante der Holoprosenzephalie (MIH) oder Syntelenzephalie ist eine Form der Holoprosenzephalie (HPE; s. dort) mit fehlender Trennung des hinteren Anteils der Stirn- und Schl\u00e4fenlappen, normal geformtem Genu callosum und Splenium, fehlendem Corpus callosum, normaler Trennung des Hypothalamus und der Linsenkerne und h\u00e4ufigen Heterotopien der grauen Substanz. Etwa 2-15% der HPE-Patienten haben den MIH-Typ. Die Patienten haben eher milde faziale Dysmorphien (Hypotelorismus, flacher oder schmaler Nasenr\u00fccken) oder ein relativ normales Gesicht.", "synonyms": "MIH, MIH vom Typ HPE, MIHF, MIHV, Mittlere interhemisph\u00e4rische Fusionsvariante, Syntelenzephalie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q04.2", "OMIM": "157170\u00a0 609637\u00a0 610829", "etiology": "MIH wurde vor allem bei Patienten mit Mutationen im ZIC2-Gen (13q32) beschrieben.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose ist besser als bei den klassischen HPE-Formen.", "summary": "MIH wurde vor allem bei Patienten mit Mutationen im ZIC2-Gen (13q32) beschrieben."}, {"name": "Syphilis durch Mutter-Kind-\u00dcbertragung", "sub_name": "Syphilis, kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare teratologic disease caused by vertical transmission of the spirochete Treponema pallidum from an infected mother to the fetus, characterized by early congenital syphilis during the first two years of life (maculopapular rash progressing to desquamation, hepatosplenomegaly, osteochondritis, snuffles, and iritis), followed by late congenital syphilis with the classic Hutchinson's triad of Hutchinson's teeth, interstitial keratitis, and eighth nerve deafness. Additional signs may include saddle nose, saber shins, seizures, and mental retardation. Congenital syphilis can also result in stillbirth, neonatal death, and nonimmune hydrops.", "synonyms": "MTCT of syphilis, Mother-to-child transmission of syphilis, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal"}, {"name": "Syphilis, kongenitale", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare teratologic disease caused by vertical transmission of the spirochete Treponema pallidum from an infected mother to the fetus, characterized by early congenital syphilis during the first two years of life (maculopapular rash progressing to desquamation, hepatosplenomegaly, osteochondritis, snuffles, and iritis), followed by late congenital syphilis with the classic Hutchinson's triad of Hutchinson's teeth, interstitial keratitis, and eighth nerve deafness. Additional signs may include saddle nose, saber shins, seizures, and mental retardation. Congenital syphilis can also result in stillbirth, neonatal death, and nonimmune hydrops.", "synonyms": "MTCT of syphilis, Mother-to-child transmission of syphilis, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Antenatal, Neonatal"}, {"name": "Syringadenom, papill\u00e4res", "sub_name": "Syringocystadenoma papilliferum", "german_description": "Das Syringocystadenoma papilliferum (SP) ist ein Hamartom der Haut, das sich vermutlich von den apokrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen herleitet oder seltener von den ekkrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen. Es ist eine au\u00dferordentlich seltene Neoplasie. Das SP ist entweder schon bei der Geburt vorhanden, oder es entwickelt sich im Kleinkindalter, in der Pubert\u00e4t oder sp\u00e4ter im Leben. Es wurden 3 klinische Typen beschrieben: (i) Der Plaque-Typ manifestiert sich als haarloses Areal auf der Kopfhaut, oft in Verbindung mit einem Naevus sebaceus Jadassohn, aber auch isoliert. (ii) Der lineare Typ tritt meist am Hals oder im Gesicht auf. (iii) Der solit\u00e4re nodul\u00e4re Typ tritt bevorzugt am Stamm auf. H\u00e4ufig ist das SP mit Hamartomen assoziiert, die ihren Usprung in Follikelzellen oder Talgdr\u00fcsen haben. In etwa einem Drittel der F\u00e4lle ist das SP mit einem Naevus sebaceus assoziiert. Bei bis zu 10% der F\u00e4lle tritt ein Basalzell-Karzinom auf. Sehr viel seltener sind Plattenepithelkarzinome und verruk\u00f6se und duktale Karzinome. Die klinische Verdachtsdiagnose wird histologisch best\u00e4tigt. Wenn immer m\u00f6glich ist, wegen des Risikos einer malignen Entartung, eine prophylaktische chirurgische Resektion anzuraten. Eine komplette chirurgische Exzision mit sorgf\u00e4ltiger histologischer Kontrolle ist die Therapie der Wahl. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-malignant adnexal neoplasm that originates from the apocrine or eccrine sweat glands and is characterized histologically by cystic, papillary, and ductal invaginations into the dermis lined by double-layered outer cuboidal and luminal high columnar epithelium and connected to the epidermis. Dilated capillaries and a dense infiltrate of plasma cells are characteristic. Clinically, lesions are asymptomatic with a heterogeneous, non-distinctive appearance ranging from skin-colored to pink papules or plaques, occurring most commonly in the head and neck area.", "synonyms": "Fistulous vegetative verrucous hydradenoma, Naevus syringocystadenomatosus papilliferus, Papillary syringocystadenoma, SCAP, Syringadenoma papilliferum, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Neonatal, Infancy, Adolescent", "icd_10": "D23.9", "umls": "C0406803", "gard": "5100", "meddra": "10042926", "epidemiology": "To date, approximately 730 cases have been reported in the literature. The condition has been reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Syringocystadenoma papilliferum (SCAP) may be present at birth (50% of cases) or develop around puberty (15-30% of cases). SCAP typically presents as slow developing, non-specific, smooth, skin-colored to pink papule, verruca or nodule, which may be exudative. It may also be seen as hairless plaques, smooth or raised, usually less than 4 cm in diameter, skin-colored to brown. It is rarely pigmented. In the majority of cases, it is asymptomatic, but it may grow progressively and has been occasionally associated with pruritus, pain, and/or bleeding. Three clinical types have been described: the plaque type, the linear type and the solitary nodular type. The plaque type usually presents as an alopecia plaque on the scalp which may increase in size at puberty and often transforms to nodular or verrucous lesions. The linear type consists of multiple pink to reddish, firm papules or umbilicated nodules, 1-10 mm in diameter, and is extremely rare. The solitary type includes dome-shaped, pedunculated nodules, 5-10 mm in diameter, with a predilection for the trunk, shoulder and axillae. Rarely, segmental variants are found. In 75% of cases, SCAP is located on the head or cervical region and less frequent in other regions, or on a postoperative scar. SCAP develops in existing nevus sebaceous in about one-third of cases, 10% of which are associated with he development of basal cell carcinoma and more rarely other carcinomas. SCAP can also be associated with other benign lesions. Transition to malignancy is rare but, possible. Syringocystadenocarcinoma papilliferum is the malignant counterpart to this lesion and may develop in a long-standing case of SCAP.", "etiology": "The etiology of SCAP has not been elucidated. It seems to arise from the pluripotent cells with the potential to exhibit either apocrine or eccrine lineage, although apocrine differentiation is more common. The pathogenesis of SCAP remains unclear although, both in sporadic cases and lesions arising in nevus sebaceous, the human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA and mutations in the RAS/mitogen-activated protein kinase signaling pathway have been detected. BRAF V600E mutation or activating mutations in HRAS (or in one case KRAS) have been reported in sporadic forms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation of non-distinctive lesions and confirmed on biopsy showing the characteristic histology. Immunohistochemically, the tumor cells stains positively for carcinoembryonic antigen. Dermatoscopy is not diagnostic.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis is broad, requiring histological confirmation of cases. The main diagnostic issue is the distinction of SCAP from hidradenoma papilliferum. Other conditions to be considered include basal cell carcinoma, cutaneous lymphoma, factitious dermatitis, viral warts, subcutaneous fungal infection, linear verrucous nevus, pyogenic granuloma, warty dyskeratoma, inverted follicular keratosis, as well as eccrine nevus, nevus comedonicus, cylindroma, and basaloid follicular hamartoma.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment involves complete surgical excision. However, recurrence is common. Carbon dioxide laser treatment can be useful for lesions in anatomic areas not favorable for excision and grafting. SCAP has also been successfully treated with Mohs micrograhic surgery.", "prognosis": "The condition is mostly benign but extensive lesions may have an impact on quality of life and transformation to malignancy cannot be ruled out."}, {"name": "Syringocystadenoma papilliferum", "german_description": "Das Syringocystadenoma papilliferum (SP) ist ein Hamartom der Haut, das sich vermutlich von den apokrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen herleitet oder seltener von den ekkrinen Schwei\u00dfdr\u00fcsen. Es ist eine au\u00dferordentlich seltene Neoplasie. Das SP ist entweder schon bei der Geburt vorhanden, oder es entwickelt sich im Kleinkindalter, in der Pubert\u00e4t oder sp\u00e4ter im Leben. Es wurden 3 klinische Typen beschrieben: (i) Der Plaque-Typ manifestiert sich als haarloses Areal auf der Kopfhaut, oft in Verbindung mit einem Naevus sebaceus Jadassohn, aber auch isoliert. (ii) Der lineare Typ tritt meist am Hals oder im Gesicht auf. (iii) Der solit\u00e4re nodul\u00e4re Typ tritt bevorzugt am Stamm auf. H\u00e4ufig ist das SP mit Hamartomen assoziiert, die ihren Usprung in Follikelzellen oder Talgdr\u00fcsen haben. In etwa einem Drittel der F\u00e4lle ist das SP mit einem Naevus sebaceus assoziiert. Bei bis zu 10% der F\u00e4lle tritt ein Basalzell-Karzinom auf. Sehr viel seltener sind Plattenepithelkarzinome und verruk\u00f6se und duktale Karzinome. Die klinische Verdachtsdiagnose wird histologisch best\u00e4tigt. Wenn immer m\u00f6glich ist, wegen des Risikos einer malignen Entartung, eine prophylaktische chirurgische Resektion anzuraten. Eine komplette chirurgische Exzision mit sorgf\u00e4ltiger histologischer Kontrolle ist die Therapie der Wahl. ", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare non-malignant adnexal neoplasm that originates from the apocrine or eccrine sweat glands and is characterized histologically by cystic, papillary, and ductal invaginations into the dermis lined by double-layered outer cuboidal and luminal high columnar epithelium and connected to the epidermis. Dilated capillaries and a dense infiltrate of plasma cells are characteristic. Clinically, lesions are asymptomatic with a heterogeneous, non-distinctive appearance ranging from skin-colored to pink papules or plaques, occurring most commonly in the head and neck area.", "synonyms": "Fistulous vegetative verrucous hydradenoma, Naevus syringocystadenomatosus papilliferus, Papillary syringocystadenoma, SCAP, Syringadenoma papilliferum, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Unknown\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood, Neonatal, Infancy, Adolescent", "icd_10": "D23.9", "umls": "C0406803", "gard": "5100", "meddra": "10042926", "epidemiology": "To date, approximately 730 cases have been reported in the literature. The condition has been reported worldwide.", "clinical_description": "Syringocystadenoma papilliferum (SCAP) may be present at birth (50% of cases) or develop around puberty (15-30% of cases). SCAP typically presents as slow developing, non-specific, smooth, skin-colored to pink papule, verruca or nodule, which may be exudative. It may also be seen as hairless plaques, smooth or raised, usually less than 4 cm in diameter, skin-colored to brown. It is rarely pigmented. In the majority of cases, it is asymptomatic, but it may grow progressively and has been occasionally associated with pruritus, pain, and/or bleeding. Three clinical types have been described: the plaque type, the linear type and the solitary nodular type. The plaque type usually presents as an alopecia plaque on the scalp which may increase in size at puberty and often transforms to nodular or verrucous lesions. The linear type consists of multiple pink to reddish, firm papules or umbilicated nodules, 1-10 mm in diameter, and is extremely rare. The solitary type includes dome-shaped, pedunculated nodules, 5-10 mm in diameter, with a predilection for the trunk, shoulder and axillae. Rarely, segmental variants are found. In 75% of cases, SCAP is located on the head or cervical region and less frequent in other regions, or on a postoperative scar. SCAP develops in existing nevus sebaceous in about one-third of cases, 10% of which are associated with he development of basal cell carcinoma and more rarely other carcinomas. SCAP can also be associated with other benign lesions. Transition to malignancy is rare but, possible. Syringocystadenocarcinoma papilliferum is the malignant counterpart to this lesion and may develop in a long-standing case of SCAP.", "etiology": "The etiology of SCAP has not been elucidated. It seems to arise from the pluripotent cells with the potential to exhibit either apocrine or eccrine lineage, although apocrine differentiation is more common. The pathogenesis of SCAP remains unclear although, both in sporadic cases and lesions arising in nevus sebaceous, the human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA and mutations in the RAS/mitogen-activated protein kinase signaling pathway have been detected. BRAF V600E mutation or activating mutations in HRAS (or in one case KRAS) have been reported in sporadic forms.", "diagnostic_methods": "Diagnosis is suspected on clinical presentation of non-distinctive lesions and confirmed on biopsy showing the characteristic histology. Immunohistochemically, the tumor cells stains positively for carcinoembryonic antigen. Dermatoscopy is not diagnostic.", "differential_diagnosis": "The differential diagnosis is broad, requiring histological confirmation of cases. The main diagnostic issue is the distinction of SCAP from hidradenoma papilliferum. Other conditions to be considered include basal cell carcinoma, cutaneous lymphoma, factitious dermatitis, viral warts, subcutaneous fungal infection, linear verrucous nevus, pyogenic granuloma, warty dyskeratoma, inverted follicular keratosis, as well as eccrine nevus, nevus comedonicus, cylindroma, and basaloid follicular hamartoma.", "management_and_treatment": "Treatment involves complete surgical excision. However, recurrence is common. Carbon dioxide laser treatment can be useful for lesions in anatomic areas not favorable for excision and grafting. SCAP has also been successfully treated with Mohs micrograhic surgery.", "prognosis": "The condition is mostly benign but extensive lesions may have an impact on quality of life and transformation to malignancy cannot be ruled out."}, {"name": "Syringomyelie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Syringomyelie ist gekennzeichnet durch Hohlr\u00e4ume (sog. Syrinx) im R\u00fcckenmark, die mit Zerebrospinal-Fl\u00fcssigkeit (CSF) gef\u00fcllt sind, entweder als Folge einer bekannten Ursache (Sekund\u00e4re Syringomyelie, SS) oder, seltener, als Folge einer nicht bekannten Ursache (Prim\u00e4re Syringomyelie, PS).", "synonyms": "Hydromyelie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Alle Altersgruppen", "ICD-10": "G95.0\u00a0 Q06.4", "OMIM": "186700", "UMLS": "C0039144\u00a0 C0152444\u00a0 C1861301", "MeSH": "D013595", "GARD": "7725", "MedDRA": "10042928", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wurde zu 8,4:100.000 bestimmt. Etwa 2% aller F\u00e4lle von Syringomyelie sind autosomal-rezessiv vererbte F\u00e4lle.", "clinical_description": "Obwohl die Syringomyelie zur Unterbrechung von Nervenbahnen f\u00fchren kann, sind 50% der Patienten (wenn alle Typen von Syringen zusammengefasst werden) nur leicht oder gar nicht beeintr\u00e4chtigt. Die Symptomatik beginnt meist mit Schmerzen und mit Sensibilit\u00e4ts-St\u00f6rungen, die von vollst\u00e4ndigem Ausfall der Sensibilit\u00e4t \u00fcber Nadelstiche und ver\u00e4ndertes Temperaturempfinden bis hin zu \u00dcberempfindlichkeit auf Reize reichen. Obwohl es bei der neurologischen Untersuchung keine eindeutigen diagnostischen Zeichen gibt, sind eine 'umhang-artige' sensorische Dissoziation (Unf\u00e4higkeit, kalt und warm zu unterscheiden, bei an den Armen und am Rumpf erhaltener Sensibilit\u00e4t f\u00fcr leichte Ber\u00fchrungen) und abgeschw\u00e4chte Reflexe an den oberen Extremit\u00e4ten recht spezifische, aber nicht immer nachweisbare initiale Zeichen einer Syringomyelie. Motorische Symptome reichen von Muskelschw\u00e4che unterschiedlichen Ausma\u00dfes bis zu spastischen Paresen und Verlust der Autonomie. M\u00f6glich sind auch St\u00f6rungen der Blasen- und Sexualfunktionen.", "etiology": "Die \u00c4tiologie der PS ist nicht bekannt. Die SS resultiert aus einer direkten Sch\u00e4digung des R\u00fcckenmarks oder aus einer Behinderung des CSF-Flusses im Spinalkanal. Gr\u00fcnde hierf\u00fcr sind: Chiari-Malformation Typ I (CMI) mit oder ohne Skoliose, basil\u00e4re Invagination, Neuralrohrdefekte, postinfekti\u00f6se oder posttraumatische Arachnoiditis, posttraumatische Kompression des Spinalkanals, postischaemische oder posttraumatische Myelomalazie oder eine Syrinxh\u00f6hle in Nachbarschaft zu einem intraspinalen Tumor.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose wird durch neurologische Untersuchung und mit bildgebenden Verfahren (MRI) gestellt. Die MRI ist diagnostischer Goldstandard und zeigt einen fl\u00fcssigkeitsgef\u00fcllten Hohlraum, der sich im R\u00fcckenmark horizontal und vertikal unterschiedlich weit ausdehnt, manchmal \u00fcber 1 Segment, manchmal \u00fcber das ganze R\u00fcckenmark. Das Fl\u00fcssigkeitssignal im MRI ist dem der CSF recht \u00e4hnlich.", "management_and_treatment": "Die Betreuung besteht in langfristiger Kontrolle und, bei fortschreitender neurologischer Verschlechterung, in chirurgischen Ma\u00dfnahmen. Die Art des operativen Eingriffes wird durch den Typ der Syrinx und ihre Ursache bestimmt. Bei PS besteht nur die M\u00f6glichkeit, die Syrinx in den spinalen Subarachnoidalraum, in die Pleura oder in die Peritonealh\u00f6hle zu \u00f6ffnen. Bei SS ist das Ziel der Therapie, die Ursache zu korrigieren, je nach Pr\u00e4ferenzen und Erfahrung des Operateurs.", "prognosis": "Die PS hat eher einen sehr gutartigen Verlauf, und deutlich mehr als 2/3 der Patienten entwickeln niemals eine Behinderung. Bei SS mit CMI bleibt etwa die H\u00e4lfte der Patienten neurologisch stabil. In F\u00e4llen von fortschreitender Verschlechterung kann eine chirurgische Intervention eine noch weitere Verschlechterung meist verhindern. In F\u00e4llen von posttraumatischer Syringomyelie mit Kompression des R\u00fcckenmarks scheint die Rekonstruktion des Spinalkanals zu \u00e4hnlichen Ergebnissen zu f\u00fchren. Schlechter ist die Prognose, wenn nur ein direktes Shunten der Syrinx m\u00f6glich ist, da oft neurologische Sch\u00e4den und Rezidive folgen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wurde zu 8,4:100.000 bestimmt. Etwa 2% aller F\u00e4lle von Syringomyelie sind autosomal-rezessiv vererbte F\u00e4lle."}, {"name": "Syringomyelie, famili\u00e4re", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Autosomal-dominant\u00a0oder\u00a0Autosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter, Neugeborenenzeit", "ICD-10": "Q06.4", "summary": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden."}, {"name": "Syringomyelie, idiopathische", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die idiopathische Syringomyelie ist eine seltene, nicht-syndromale Fehlbildung des Zentralnervensystems, die durch einen l\u00e4ngsgerichteten, fl\u00fcssigkeitsgef\u00fcllten Hohlraum innerhalb des R\u00fcckenmarksparenchyms oder des Zentralkanals gekennzeichnet ist, ohne dass eine eindeutige Ursache erkennbar ist. Sie ist in der Regel mit Schmerzen, sensorischen und/oder muskuloskelettalen St\u00f6rungen verbunden, kann aber auch ein zuf\u00e4lliger und asymptomatischer Befund sein.", "ICD-10": "G95.0"}, {"name": "Syringomyelie, kongenitale", "sub_name": "Syringomyelie, prim\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare central nervous system malformation characterized by a fluid-filled longitudinally oriented cavity (syrinx) within the spinal cord, which may or may not communicate with the central canal, does not have an ependymal lining, and is either idiopathic or seen as a familial malformation. Clinical manifestations in symptomatic patients include neuropathic pain, as well as sensory and motor disturbances. Typical presentations may be cape-like loss of pain and temperature sensation along the torso and arms, or disproportionately greater motor impairment in upper compared to lower extremities.", "synonyms": "Congenital syringomyelia, ", "icd_10": "Q06.4", "umls": "C0039144\u00a0 C1861301"}, {"name": "Syringomyelie, prim\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare central nervous system malformation characterized by a fluid-filled longitudinally oriented cavity (syrinx) within the spinal cord, which may or may not communicate with the central canal, does not have an ependymal lining, and is either idiopathic or seen as a familial malformation. Clinical manifestations in symptomatic patients include neuropathic pain, as well as sensory and motor disturbances. Typical presentations may be cape-like loss of pain and temperature sensation along the torso and arms, or disproportionately greater motor impairment in upper compared to lower extremities.", "synonyms": "Congenital syringomyelia, ", "icd_10": "Q06.4", "umls": "C0039144\u00a0 C1861301"}, {"name": "Syringomyelie, sekund\u00e4re", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Secondary syringomyelia is a rare medullar disease defined as a development of a fluid-filled cavity or syrinx within the spinal cord due to blockage of CSF circulation (e.g., due to basal archnoiditis, meningeal carcinomatosis, various mass lesions), spinal cord injury (e.g., due to trauma, radiation necrosis, hemorrhage, spinal abscess), spinal dysraphism or intramedullary tumours. It presents with neuropathic pain, numbness, muscular weakness, changes in tone or spasticity or autonomic changes (hyperhidrosis, heart rate or blood pressure instability). Selective loss of pain and temperature with relative preservation of dorsal column function (touch and pressure) are classic findings.", "icd_10": "G95.0"}, {"name": "Systemische EBV-positive T-Zell-lymphoproliferative Erkrankung der Kindheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare and very aggressive neoplastic disease emerging after a primary acute or chronic active EBV infection. It presents with persisting fever and malaise, hepatosplenomegaly with or without lymphadenopathy, liver failure, severe pancytopenia and a rapid progression towards multi-organ failure and hemophagocytic syndrome with a fatal issue. It is characterized by clonal proliferation of EBV-infected T cells with an activated cytotoxic phenotype.", "synonyms": "Systemic EBV+ T-cell LPD of childhood, Systemic EBV-positive T-cell lymphoproliferative disease of childhood, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "D47.9"}, {"name": "Systemische EBV+ T-Zell LPD der Kindheit", "sub_name": "Systemische EBV-positive T-Zell-lymphoproliferative Erkrankung der Kindheit", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare and very aggressive neoplastic disease emerging after a primary acute or chronic active EBV infection. It presents with persisting fever and malaise, hepatosplenomegaly with or without lymphadenopathy, liver failure, severe pancytopenia and a rapid progression towards multi-organ failure and hemophagocytic syndrome with a fatal issue. It is characterized by clonal proliferation of EBV-infected T cells with an activated cytotoxic phenotype.", "synonyms": "Systemic EBV+ T-cell LPD of childhood, Systemic EBV-positive T-cell lymphoproliferative disease of childhood, ", "prevalence": "Unknown", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Childhood", "icd_10": "D47.9"}, {"name": "Systemische Karyomegalie", "sub_name": "Karyomegale interstitielle Nephritis", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Karyomegalic interstitial nephritis is a rare, genetic renal disease characterized by slowly progressive, chronic, tubulointerstitial nephritis, leading to end-stage renal disease before the age of 50 years, manifesting with mild proteinuria, glucosuria and, occasionally, urinary sediment abnormalities (mainly hematuria). Mild extrarenal manifestations, such as recurrent upper respiratory tract infections and abnormal liver function tests, may be associated. Renal biopsy reveals severe, chronic, interstitial fibrosis and tubular changes, as well as hallmark karyomegalic tubular epithelial cells which line the proximal and distal tubules and have enlarged, hyperchromatic nuclei.", "synonyms": "KIN, Systemic karyomegaly, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "inheritance": "Autosomal recessive\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Adult", "icd_10": "N11.8", "omim": "614817", "gard": "11003"}, {"name": "Systemische Krankheit, entz\u00fcndliche, mit assoziierter erworbener peripherer Neuropathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Systemische Krankheit mit anteriorer Uveitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "age_of_onset": "Kindesalter, Erwachsenenalter, Jugendalter, \u00c4ltere Erwachsene", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Systemische Krankheit mit Glomerulopathie als Hauptmerkmal", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Systemische Krankheit mit Hautbeteiligung", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Systemische Krankheit mit Panuveitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Systemische Krankheit mit posteriorer Uveitis", "english": 0, "defenition": "Unsere Website hostet keinerlei Werbung\nUnsere Partnerschaften beeinflussen in keiner Weise unsere Ver\u00f6ffentlichungspolitik\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "Systemische Mastozytose mit assoziierter klonaler h\u00e4matologischer nicht-Mastzellen-Krankheit", "sub_name": "Mastozytose, systemische, mit assoziierter h\u00e4matologischer Neoplasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Eine fortgeschrittene Form der systemischen Mastozytose (SM), die durch eine abnorme Ansammlung von neoplastischen Mastzellen (MCs) in einem oder mehreren extrakutanen Organen, haupts\u00e4chlich im Knochenmark, gekennzeichnet ist und mit einer anderen h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie nicht MC-artiger Natur einhergeht.", "synonyms": "SM-AHN, SM-AHNMD, Systemische Mastozytose mit assoziierter klonaler h\u00e4matologischer nicht-Mastzellen-Krankheit, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "\u00c4ltere Erwachsene, Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "C96.2", "UMLS": "C1301365", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf 1/7.700 bis 1/10.400 gesch\u00e4tzt. Es wird angenommen, dass die systemische Mastozytose mit einer assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie (SM-AHN) zwischen 10-40 % aller F\u00e4lle von SM ausmacht.", "clinical_description": "Die Erkrankung betrifft typischerweise Erwachsene und \u00e4ltere Menschen. Obwohl das SM-Kompartiment \u00fcberwiegend vom indolenten Typ (ISM) ist, handelt es sich in seltenen F\u00e4llen um aggressive SM (ASM) oder Mastzellleuk\u00e4mie (MCL). Die assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasien (AHN), die am h\u00e4ufigsten vorkommen, sind myeloische Neoplasien und selten lymphoide Neoplasien. Wenn das SM-Kompartiment indolent ist, werden die biologischen und klinischen Zeichen und die Prognose von der AHN dominiert. Wenn es sich bei dem SM-Kompartiment hingegen um eine ASM oder ein MCL handelt, ist es schwierig, den relativen Beitrag der Mastozytose zu den typischen B- (spiegelt hohe Mastzelllast wider) und C-Befunden (spiegelt Organfunktionsst\u00f6rung(en) wider) zu quantifizieren. Bemerkenswert ist, dass das SM-Kompartiment h\u00e4ufig an Mastzell-Mediator-bedingten Symptomen wie rezidivierenden Synkopen, Kopfschmerzen, Flush, gastrointestinalen Traktsymptomen und in schweren F\u00e4llen an einem lebensbedrohlichen anaphylaktischen Schock beteiligt ist. Eine Hautbeteiligung, haupts\u00e4chlich mit Urticaria pigmentosa (UP), wird h\u00e4ufig beobachtet.", "etiology": "In der \u00fcberwiegenden Mehrzahl der F\u00e4lle findet sich eine erworbene und aktivierende Mutation im KIT-Gen (meist D816V), in den abnormen Mastzellen des SM-Kompartiments sowie in den malignen Zellen bestimmter AHN-Typen. SM-AHN ist jedoch oft eine komplexe, multigenetische Erkrankung; Mutationen f\u00fcr SM-CMML oder SM-MDS wurden unter anderem in den Genen TET2, ASXL1 und SRSF2 identifiziert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Es ist entscheidend, den jeweiligen Typ der beiden Malignome (SM und AHN) zu bestimmen. Die Diagnose des SM-Kompartiments erfolgt anhand der WHO-Konsensuskriterien. Das SM wird dann als ISM, ASM oder MCL kategorisiert, obwohl dies schwierig sein kann. Weitere Tests (Ph\u00e4notypisierung, Zytogenetik, Molekularbiologie) sind obligatorisch, um die Art des AHNs zu charakterisieren.", "differential_diagnosis": "Wenn die AHN-Komponente myeloischer Natur ist, sind die beiden wichtigsten Differentialdiagnosen myelomastozyt\u00e4re Leuk\u00e4mien und myeloide Neoplasien mit Expression von Mastzelllinien-Antigenen oder verwandten Gendefekten. Unter bestimmten Umst\u00e4nden kann eine Waldenstr\u00f6m-Makroglobulin\u00e4mie in Betracht gezogen werden. Diese Erkrankungen erf\u00fcllen nicht die SM-Kriterien.", "genetic_counseling": "Die Krankheit ist auf somatische Mutationen zur\u00fcckzuf\u00fchren, eine genetische Beratung ist nicht erforderlich.", "management_and_treatment": "Jede Komponente wird gem\u00e4\u00df den Richtlinien f\u00fcr SM und AHN behandelt, unabh\u00e4ngig vom Vorhandensein der anderen Komponente. Da es schwierig ist, klar abzugrenzen, welche Komponente f\u00fcr die klinischen Probleme/Organsch\u00e4den verantwortlich ist, sollten alle Patienten mit SM-AHN als Patienten mit Hochrisikoerkrankung behandelt werden. Midostaurin ist f\u00fcr die Behandlung in Europa und den USA zugelassen, und obwohl es vielversprechend ist mit einer partiellen Remission der SM-Komponente, wurde bisher nicht \u00fcber eine komplette Remission berichtet. Patienten, die eine komplette Remission ihrer AHN erreichen oder ein signifikantes Ansprechen nach der Behandlung zeigen, sollten f\u00fcr eine allogene Stammzelltransplantation (allo-SCT) in Betracht gezogen werden, um ihr Ansprechen zu konsolidieren. Der Einsatz der allo-SCT wird jedoch h\u00e4ufig durch Alter, schlechte Leistungsf\u00e4higkeit oder andere Faktoren eingeschr\u00e4nkt. F\u00fcr diese Patienten ist eine palliative Therapie mit Hydroxyharnstoff erforderlich. MC-Mediator-bedingte Symptome erfordern oft eine unterst\u00fctzende Therapie, einschlie\u00dflich H1- und H2-Rezeptorantagonisten.", "prognosis": "Derzeit wird ein medianes Gesamt\u00fcberleben von 24 Monaten berichtet. Die Prognose von SM-AHN h\u00e4ngt jedoch sowohl von der Art (Aggressivit\u00e4t) des SM als auch von der AHN-Komponente ab, wobei eine l\u00e4ngere mediane \u00dcberlebenszeit bei SM-MPN-Patienten (31 Monate) und eine k\u00fcrzere \u00dcberlebenszeit bei SM-CMML (15 Monate), SM-MDS (13 Monate) und SM-AML (11 Monate) berichtet wird. Dar\u00fcber hinaus kann eine multimutierte Erkrankung die Krankheitsprognose negativ beeinflussen.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz in Europa wird auf 1/7.700 bis 1/10.400 gesch\u00e4tzt. Es wird angenommen, dass die systemische Mastozytose mit einer assoziierten h\u00e4matologischen Neoplasie (SM-AHN) zwischen 10-40 % aller F\u00e4lle von SM ausmacht."}, {"name": "Systemische PAN", "sub_name": "Systemische Polyarteriitis nodosa", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Systemic polyarteritis nodosa (PAN; see this term) is a chronic systemic necrotizingvasculitis of adults and childrenaffecting small- and medium-sized vessels and characterized by formation of microaneurysms leading to serious generalized disease and multi-organ involvement.", "synonyms": "Systemic PAN, Systemic periarteritis nodosa, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "M30.0", "umls": "C0031036"}, {"name": "Systemische Polyarteriitis nodosa", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "Systemic polyarteritis nodosa (PAN; see this term) is a chronic systemic necrotizingvasculitis of adults and childrenaffecting small- and medium-sized vessels and characterized by formation of microaneurysms leading to serious generalized disease and multi-organ involvement.", "synonyms": "Systemic PAN, Systemic periarteritis nodosa, ", "inheritance": "Not applicable\u00a0", "icd_10": "M30.0", "umls": "C0031036"}, {"name": "Systemische Sklerodermie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Systemische Sklerodermie (SSc) ist eine generalisierte Erkrankung der kleinen Arterien, der Mikrogef\u00e4\u00dfe und des Bindegewebes und gekennzeichnet durch Fibrose und Gef\u00e4\u00dfobliterationen in der Haut und anderen Organen, besonders in Lunge, Herz und Verdauungstrakt. Zwei haupts\u00e4chliche Untergruppen der SSc sind die diffuse kutane SSc (dcSSc) und die limitierte kutane SSc (lcSSc) (s. diese Termini). Als dritte Untergruppe wurde die limitierte Systemische Sklerodermie (lSSc) oder Scleroderma sine scleroderma (s. diese Termini) beschrieben.", "synonyms": "Sklerose, systemische, ", "prevalence": "1-5 / 10 000", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.0\u00a0 M34.1\u00a0 M34.2\u00a0 M34.8\u00a0 M34.9", "OMIM": "181750", "UMLS": "C0036421", "GARD": "9748", "MedDRA": "10042953", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf 1:6.500 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m etwa 4:1). Die Krankheit wird in der Regel im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest.", "clinical_description": "Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist oft das erste Zeichen der Krankheit. Die weiteren Symptome treten bei der diffus-kutanen Untergruppe wenige Monate sp\u00e4ter auf, bei der limitiert-kutanen Untergruppe einige Jahre sp\u00e4ter. Bei der limitierten kutanen Untergruppe ist die Beteiligung der Haut auf H\u00e4nde, Gesicht, F\u00fc\u00dfe und Unterarme beschr\u00e4nkt, w\u00e4hrend die Hautver\u00e4nderungen bei der diffusen kutanen Untergruppe schnell generalisieren. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus, mit der Folge von gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal Dysphagie. M\u00f6gliche lebensbedrohliche Komplikationen sind Lungenfibrose und, seltener, Lungenarterien-Hochdruck. Patienten mit limitierter SSc haben ein Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen, aber keine Hautbeteiligung. Daneben besteht das Risiko einer Organbeteiligung.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der SSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die SSc mit Chemikalien-Exposition (Siliziumdioxid, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die typischen klinischen Manifestationen und Hinweise auf eine spezifische Mikroangiopathie mit Megakapillaren bei der Kapillaroskopie am Nagelbett. Bluttests zeigen typische antinukle\u00e4re Autoantik\u00f6rper. Die Ausdehnung der Krankheit sollte durch Computertomographie (CT) des Thorax, Elektrokardiographie, Echokardiographie, R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und ggf. endoskopische Untersuchung des \u00d6sophagus und Magens beurteilt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sharp-Syndrom, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom, Polyarteriitis nodosa, Polymyositis und rheumatoide Arthritis (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist \u00fcberwiegend symptomatisch. Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen kann mit Kalziumkanalblockern behandelt werden. Bei gastrischem Reflux werden Protonenpumpen-Hemmer gegeben. Bei k\u00fcrzlich aufgetretener schwerer Hautbeteiligung oder bei progredienter Lungenfibrose sind niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide und Immunsuppressiva erforderlich. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck wird mit pulmonalen Vasodilatatoren behandelt. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden klinisch und mit Lungenfunktionstests und echokardiographisch \u00fcberwacht werden.", "prognosis": "Die Prognose wird durch die vorliegende SSc-Untergruppe bestimmt. Die Prognose der limitierten kutanen SSc ist relativ gut (10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate 80-90%). Eine weniger g\u00fcnstige Prognose kann mit schwerwiegendem Lungenarterien-Hochdruck, der in 10% der F\u00e4lle auftritt, und schwerer Lungenfibrose gegeben sein. Eine noch schwerere Prognose haben Patienten mit diffuser kutaner SSc wegen des h\u00f6heren Risikos f\u00fcr lebensbedrohliche Komplikationen: Nierenkrise, schwere Beteiligung der Verdauungsorgane, schwere Lungenfibrose und manchmal schwere Herzbeteiligung und Lungenarterien-Hochdruck.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf 1:6.500 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m etwa 4:1). Die Krankheit wird in der Regel im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest."}, {"name": "Systemische Sklerodermie, progressive", "sub_name": "Systemische Sklerose, diffuse kutane", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die diffuse kutane Systemische Sklerose (dcSSc) ist ein Untertyp der Systemischen Sklerodermie (SS; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Fibrose der Haut des Stammes und der Akren und durch fr\u00fch und in signifikanter H\u00e4ufigkeit diffus auftretende Organbeteiligungen (interstitielle Lungenerkrankung, oligurische Niereninsuffizienz, diffuse gastrointestinale St\u00f6rungen und Beteiligung des Myokards).", "synonyms": "Sklerodermie, diffuse kutane systemische, Sklerose, kutane progressive systemische, Systemische Sklerodermie, progressive, ", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.0", "GARD": "9751", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf etwa 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest. Beginn im Kindesalter ist m\u00f6glich, aber extrem selten.", "clinical_description": "Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist das h\u00e4ufigste und oft auch das erste Symptom der Krankheit. Die \u00fcbrigen Symptome treten meist erst einige Monate sp\u00e4ter auf. Die Haut verh\u00e4rtet zuerst an den Fingern und im Gesicht, schnell aber auch am restlichen K\u00f6rper.Teleangiektasien werden manchmal an Thorax, Gesicht, Lippen, Zunge und Fingern gesehen. Reibungsbedingte Auffaserung von Sehnen wurde gesehen. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus, mit der Folge von gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal Dysphagie. Gastrointestinale Malabsorption und Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rungen sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome und haben Gewichtsverlust, Erbrechen, Diarrhoe oder Obstipation zur Folge. Trockener Mund und Beteiligung der Z\u00e4hne sind m\u00f6glich. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Gelenkschmerzen und Akroosteolyse. Eine Beteiligung der Muskeln wird mit Muskelschmerzen, -schw\u00e4che und -kr\u00e4mpfen manifest. In etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle kommt es zu lebensbedrohlicher Nierenbeteiligung. Bei 60% der F\u00e4lle besteht eine Lungenfibrose, in 10-15% der F\u00e4lle ein Lungenhochdruck.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der diffusen kutanen SSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit mit Chemikalien-Exposition (Siliziumdioxid, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren das typische klinische Bild und Zeichen einer spezifischen Mikroangiopathie mit Megakapillaren bei der Kapillaroskopie am Nagelbett. Eine Hautbiopsie ist in der Regel nicht erforderlich. Notwendig sind Blutanalysen, die in 30-40% der F\u00e4lle zum Nachweis typischer Anti-Topoisomerase-Autoantik\u00f6rper f\u00fchren. Die Ausdehnung der Krankheit soll durch Thorax-Computertomographie, Elektrokardiographie, Echokardiographie, R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und ggf. durch endoskopische Untersuchung des \u00d6sophagus und Magens beurteilt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sharp-Syndrom, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom, Polyarteriitis nodosa, Polymyositis und rheumatoide Arthritis (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist \u00fcberwiegend symptomatisch. Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen kann mit Kalziumkanalblockern behandelt werden. Bei gastrischem Reflux werden Protonenpumpenhemmer gegeben. Bei k\u00fcrzlich aufgetretener schwerer Hautbeteiligung oder bei progredienter Lungenfibrose sind niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide mit Immunsuppressiva erforderlich. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck wird mit pulmonalen Vasodilatatoren behandelt. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden kontrolliert werden, schon fr\u00fch mit Lungenfunktionstests und Echokardiographie.", "prognosis": "Wegen des erh\u00f6hten Risikos lebensbedrohlicher Komplikationen (Nierenkrise, schwere Beteiligung des Verdauungskanals, schwere Lungenfibrose und manchmal schwere Herzbeteiligung und Lungenarterien-Hochruck) ist die Prognose schwerwiegend (10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate 60-80%).", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf etwa 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest. Beginn im Kindesalter ist m\u00f6glich, aber extrem selten."}, {"name": "Systemische Sklerose, diffuse kutane", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die diffuse kutane Systemische Sklerose (dcSSc) ist ein Untertyp der Systemischen Sklerodermie (SS; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Fibrose der Haut des Stammes und der Akren und durch fr\u00fch und in signifikanter H\u00e4ufigkeit diffus auftretende Organbeteiligungen (interstitielle Lungenerkrankung, oligurische Niereninsuffizienz, diffuse gastrointestinale St\u00f6rungen und Beteiligung des Myokards).", "synonyms": "Sklerodermie, diffuse kutane systemische, Sklerose, kutane progressive systemische, Systemische Sklerodermie, progressive, ", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.0", "GARD": "9751", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf etwa 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest. Beginn im Kindesalter ist m\u00f6glich, aber extrem selten.", "clinical_description": "Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist das h\u00e4ufigste und oft auch das erste Symptom der Krankheit. Die \u00fcbrigen Symptome treten meist erst einige Monate sp\u00e4ter auf. Die Haut verh\u00e4rtet zuerst an den Fingern und im Gesicht, schnell aber auch am restlichen K\u00f6rper.Teleangiektasien werden manchmal an Thorax, Gesicht, Lippen, Zunge und Fingern gesehen. Reibungsbedingte Auffaserung von Sehnen wurde gesehen. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus, mit der Folge von gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal Dysphagie. Gastrointestinale Malabsorption und Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rungen sind m\u00f6gliche Symptome und haben Gewichtsverlust, Erbrechen, Diarrhoe oder Obstipation zur Folge. Trockener Mund und Beteiligung der Z\u00e4hne sind m\u00f6glich. H\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Gelenkschmerzen und Akroosteolyse. Eine Beteiligung der Muskeln wird mit Muskelschmerzen, -schw\u00e4che und -kr\u00e4mpfen manifest. In etwa 2% der F\u00e4lle kommt es zu lebensbedrohlicher Nierenbeteiligung. Bei 60% der F\u00e4lle besteht eine Lungenfibrose, in 10-15% der F\u00e4lle ein Lungenhochdruck.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der diffusen kutanen SSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die Krankheit mit Chemikalien-Exposition (Siliziumdioxid, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren das typische klinische Bild und Zeichen einer spezifischen Mikroangiopathie mit Megakapillaren bei der Kapillaroskopie am Nagelbett. Eine Hautbiopsie ist in der Regel nicht erforderlich. Notwendig sind Blutanalysen, die in 30-40% der F\u00e4lle zum Nachweis typischer Anti-Topoisomerase-Autoantik\u00f6rper f\u00fchren. Die Ausdehnung der Krankheit soll durch Thorax-Computertomographie, Elektrokardiographie, Echokardiographie, R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und ggf. durch endoskopische Untersuchung des \u00d6sophagus und Magens beurteilt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sharp-Syndrom, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom, Polyarteriitis nodosa, Polymyositis und rheumatoide Arthritis (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist \u00fcberwiegend symptomatisch. Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen kann mit Kalziumkanalblockern behandelt werden. Bei gastrischem Reflux werden Protonenpumpenhemmer gegeben. Bei k\u00fcrzlich aufgetretener schwerer Hautbeteiligung oder bei progredienter Lungenfibrose sind niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide mit Immunsuppressiva erforderlich. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck wird mit pulmonalen Vasodilatatoren behandelt. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden kontrolliert werden, schon fr\u00fch mit Lungenfunktionstests und Echokardiographie.", "prognosis": "Wegen des erh\u00f6hten Risikos lebensbedrohlicher Komplikationen (Nierenkrise, schwere Beteiligung des Verdauungskanals, schwere Lungenfibrose und manchmal schwere Herzbeteiligung und Lungenarterien-Hochruck) ist die Prognose schwerwiegend (10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate 60-80%).", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf etwa 1:25.000 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest. Beginn im Kindesalter ist m\u00f6glich, aber extrem selten."}, {"name": "Systemische Sklerose, kutane limitierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die limitierte kutane Systemische Sklerose (lcSSc) ist ein Untertyp der Systemischen Sklerodermie (SSc; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Assoziation des Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomens mit auf H\u00e4nde, Gesicht, F\u00fc\u00dfe und Unterarme begrenzter Hautfibrose.", "synonyms": "Sklerodermie, kutane limitierte systemische, ", "inheritance": "Multigenetisch/Multifaktoriell\u00a0oder\u00a0Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.1", "OMIM": "181750", "UMLS": "C0748540", "GARD": "1053", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf 1:12.500 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest.", "clinical_description": "Ein Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen ist das h\u00e4ufigste und oft auch erste Symptom der Krankheit. Die \u00fcbrigen Symptome treten in der Regel erst einige Jahre sp\u00e4ter auf. Die Beteiligung der Haut ist auf H\u00e4nde, Gesicht, F\u00fc\u00dfe und Unterarme beschr\u00e4nkt. Nicht ver\u00e4ndert ist die Haut an Brust, Abdomen, R\u00fccken und Oberschenkel. Beobachtet werden Teleangiektasien und Sklerodaktylie mit dem Risiko von Ulzerationen an den Fingern. H\u00e4ufig besteht eine Motilit\u00e4tsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus, mit der Folge von gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal auch Dysphagie. Computertomographisch ist in etwa 30-40% der F\u00e4lle eine Lungenfibrose nachweisbar. Etwa 10% der Patienten haben einen Lungenarterien-Hochdruck. Bei einigen F\u00e4llen ist im Fr\u00fchstadium der Krankheit die Haut noch nicht betroffen, weshalb die Krankheit limitierte SSc benannt wird. In seltenen F\u00e4llen fehlt eine Hautbeteiligung ganz, man spricht dann von SSc ohne Sklerodermie. Das CREST-Syndrom (s. dort) wird oft als Synonym der limitierten kutanen SSc benutzt. Es handelt sich aber eher um einen Untertyp mit h\u00e4ufigeren und ausgedehnteren Teleangiektasien.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der limitierten kutanen SSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit nimmt ihren Ausgang von einer Immunreaktion, die eine \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen ausl\u00f6st. In einigen F\u00e4llen ist die SSc mit Chemikalien-Exposition (Siliziumdioxid, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe) assoziiert.", "diagnostic_methods": "Zur Diagnose f\u00fchren die typischen klinischen Manifestationen und Hinweise auf eine spezifische Mikroangiopathie mit Megakapillaren bei Kapillaroskopie am Nagelbett. Im Blut sind typische Anti-Zentromer-Autoantik\u00f6rper (ACA) nachweisbar. Die Ausdehnung der Krankheit soll durch Thorax-Computertomographie, Elektrokardiographie, Echokardiographie, R\u00f6ntgenaufnahmen der H\u00e4nde und ggf. durch endoskopische Untersuchung des \u00d6sophagus und Magens beurteilt werden.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Sharp-Syndrom, systemischer Lupus erythematodes, Antiphospholipid-Syndrom und Polyarteriitis nodosa (s. diese Termini).", "management_and_treatment": "Die Behandlung ist \u00fcberwiegend symptomatisch. Das Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen kann mit Kalziumkanalblockern behandelt werden. Bei gastrischem Reflux werden Protonenpumpen-Hemmer gegeben. Bei progredienter Lungenfibrose sind niedrig dosierte Kortikosteroide mit Immunsuppressiva erforderlich. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck wird mit pulmonalen Vasodilatatoren behandelt. Die Patienten m\u00fcssen in regelm\u00e4\u00dfigen Abst\u00e4nden kontrolliert werden, schon fr\u00fch mit Lungenfunktionstests und echokardiographisch.", "prognosis": "Wegen der langen Krankheitsdauer (10-Jahres-\u00dcberlebensrate etwa 80-90%) ist die Prognose der limitierten kutanen SSc relativ g\u00fcnstig. Der Lungenarterien-Hochdruck ist eine bei etwa 10% auftretende Komplikation, die eine schwerere Prognose bedeutet. Bei einigen Patienten besteht eine schwere Lungenfibrose.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz unter Erwachsenen wird auf 1:12.500 gesch\u00e4tzt. \u00dcberwiegend sind Frauen betroffen (w:m ca. 4:1). Die Krankheit wird meist im Alter zwischen 40 und 50 Jahren manifest."}, {"name": "Systemische Sklerose, limitierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die limitierte systemische Sklerose (lSSc) (oder SSc ohne Sklerodermie) ist eine Untergruppe der systemischen Sklerose (SSc; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Organbeteiligung ohne Fibrose der Haut.", "synonyms": "Systemische Sklerose ohne Sklerodermie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.0", "UMLS": "C1290138", "GARD": "9749", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten haben keine Fibrose der Haut, sondern nur ein Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen. Es besteht aber ein Risiko f\u00fcr die Beteiligung innerer Organe (Fibrose und Gef\u00e4\u00dfverschluss in Lunge, Herz und Verdauungstrakt). Bei den Patienten kann im weiteren Verlauf eine Bewegungsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus auftreten, wodurch es zu gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal zu Dysphagie kommt. Lungenfibrose und arterieller Lungenhochdruck sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der lSSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit ist die Folge einer Autoimmunreaktion mit \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen. In einige F\u00e4llen steht die SSc in Verbindung mit Exposition auf Chemikalien (Silikate, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe usw.).", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose kann schwierig sein, da Hauptsymptome fehlen. Die Kapillaroskopie an Nagelfalten zeigt ein SSc-Muster und im Blut werden h\u00e4ufig Anti-Zentromer-Antik\u00f6rper gefunden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Systemische Sklerose ohne Sklerodermie", "sub_name": "Systemische Sklerose, limitierte", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die limitierte systemische Sklerose (lSSc) (oder SSc ohne Sklerodermie) ist eine Untergruppe der systemischen Sklerose (SSc; s. dort) und gekennzeichnet durch Organbeteiligung ohne Fibrose der Haut.", "synonyms": "Systemische Sklerose ohne Sklerodermie, ", "prevalence": "Unbekannt", "inheritance": "Nicht anwendbar\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Erwachsenenalter", "ICD-10": "M34.0", "UMLS": "C1290138", "GARD": "9749", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt.", "clinical_description": "Die Patienten haben keine Fibrose der Haut, sondern nur ein Raynaud-Ph\u00e4nomen. Es besteht aber ein Risiko f\u00fcr die Beteiligung innerer Organe (Fibrose und Gef\u00e4\u00dfverschluss in Lunge, Herz und Verdauungstrakt). Bei den Patienten kann im weiteren Verlauf eine Bewegungsst\u00f6rung des \u00d6sophagus auftreten, wodurch es zu gastro-\u00f6sophagealem Reflux und manchmal zu Dysphagie kommt. Lungenfibrose und arterieller Lungenhochdruck sind weitere m\u00f6gliche Symptome.", "etiology": "Die genaue Ursache der lSSc ist nicht bekannt. Die Krankheit ist die Folge einer Autoimmunreaktion mit \u00dcberproduktion von Kollagen. In einige F\u00e4llen steht die SSc in Verbindung mit Exposition auf Chemikalien (Silikate, L\u00f6sungsmittel, Kohlenwasserstoffe usw.).", "diagnostic_methods": "Die Diagnose kann schwierig sein, da Hauptsymptome fehlen. Die Kapillaroskopie an Nagelfalten zeigt ein SSc-Muster und im Blut werden h\u00e4ufig Anti-Zentromer-Antik\u00f6rper gefunden.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz ist nicht bekannt."}, {"name": "Systemische Vaskulitis mit assoziierter Glomerulopathie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Zusatzinformationen\n", "summary": "Dieser Terminus bezieht sich auf eine Krankheitsgruppe. Bitte nutzen Sie das Menu Klassifikation, um mehr \u00fcber die Krankheiten zu erfahren, die sich unter diesem Sammelbegriff zusammenfassen lassen."}, {"name": "SYT1-assoziierte neurologische Entwicklungsst\u00f6rung", "sub_name": "Infantile Hypotonie-okulomotorische Anomalien-hyperkinetische Bewegungsst\u00f6rungen-Entwicklungsverz\u00f6gerung-Syndrom", "german_description": "Eine Kurzbeschreibung der Krankheit wird derzeit erstellt. Weiterf\u00fchrende Informationen zu dieser Krankheit k\u00f6nnen \u00fcber das Menu  am unteren Bildrand abgerufen werden.", "english": 1, "defenition": "A rare genetic neurological disorder characterized by infantile hypotonia, congenital ophthalmic anomalies (including strabismus, esotropia, nystagmus, and central visual impairment), global developmental delay and intellectual disability, behavioral abnormalities, and movement disorder (such as dystonia, chorea, hyperkinesia, stereotypies). Mild facial dysmorphism and skeletal deformities have also been reported. EEG testing shows marked abnormalities in the absence of overt epileptic seizures.", "synonyms": "SYT1-related neurodevelopmental disorder, ", "prevalence": "<1 / 1 000 000", "age_of_onset": "Infancy", "icd_10": "F84.8", "omim": "618218"}, {"name": "S-Zapfen-Monochromasie", "sub_name": "Blauzapfenmonochromasie", "english": 0, "defenition": "Die Blauzapfen-Monochromasie (BCM) ist eine X-chromosomal-rezessiv vererbte Krankheit mit schwer gest\u00f6rtem Farbsehen, geringer Sehsch\u00e4rfe, Nystagmus und Photophobie als Folge einer Funktionsst\u00f6rung der Rot (L)- und Gr\u00fcn (M)- Zapfen. BCM ist eine unvollst\u00e4ndige Form der Achromatopsie (siehe dort).", "synonyms": "Achromatopsie, atypische X-chromosomale, Achromatopsie, inkomplette X-chromosomale, Farbenblindheit, blauer einzapfiger monochromatischer Typ, S-Zapfen-Monochromasie, ", "prevalence": "1-9 / 100 000", "inheritance": "X-chromosomal-rezessiv\u00a0", "age_of_onset": "Kleinkindalter", "ICD-10": "H53.5", "OMIM": "303700", "UMLS": "C0339537\u00a0 C2931753", "MeSH": "C536238\u00a0 C538165", "GARD": "917", "epidemiology": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird weltweit auf 1/100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt.", "clinical_description": "Die BCM manifestiert sich im fr\u00fchen S\u00e4uglingsalter, bevorzugt bei Knaben. Das Farbsehen ist schwer gest\u00f6rt und die Sehsch\u00e4rfe vermindert (erhalten ist nur die Funktion der St\u00e4bchen und der Blauzapfen). Weitere h\u00e4ufige Symptome sind Photophobie, Myopie und Pendelnystagmus (der im Verlauf nachl\u00e4sst).", "etiology": "Ursache der Erkrankung sind Mutationen im Rot- und Gr\u00fcn-Opsin-Gencluster OPN1LW und OPN1MW (Xq28), wodurch die Funktion der entsprechenden Zapfen gest\u00f6rt ist. Zu diesen Mutationen geh\u00f6ren Deletionen der f\u00fcr die Expression beider Gene kritischen Locus-Kontrollregion. Diese Deletionen k\u00f6nnen aber auch den Opsin-Gencluster teilweise oder vollst\u00e4ndig einschlie\u00dfen. Genomische Rearrangements (ungleiches Crossing-over) k\u00f6nnen zu einem singul\u00e4ren Rot-Gen und/oder zu Rot-Gr\u00fcn-Hybridgenen mit den inaktivierenden Mutationen f\u00fchren. H\u00e4ufig wird die c.607T>C p.C203R Missense-Mutation gefunden, aber auch andere Missense-und Nonsens-Mutationen wurden beschrieben.", "diagnostic_methods": "Die BCM wird diagnostiziert durch klinisch-ophthalmologische Untersuchung, elektrophysiologische (Elektroretinoraphie; ERG) und psychophysische (Farbsehen, Dunkelanpassung) Testung, wobei BCM-Patienten keine Antwort auf rotes und gr\u00fcnes Licht aber eine normale Antwort auf blaues Licht zeigen. Mutations-Screening kann die Diagnose best\u00e4tigen.", "differential_diagnosis": "Differentialdiagnosen sind Achromatopsie, kongenitale Amaurose Leber, verschiedene Arten von Zapfendystrophien (siehe diese Termini) und zerebrale Achromatopsie.", "prenatal_diagnostic": "Die BCM wird X-chromosomal vererbt. Eine genetische Beratung ist unerl\u00e4sslich. Konduktorinnen vererben das mutierte Allel mit 50% Wahrscheinlichkeit an ihre Kinder. Die Penetranz ist vollst\u00e4ndig, die Expressivit\u00e4t nur wenig variabel.", "genetic_counseling": "Eine vorgeburtliche Diagnostik wird Paaren mit Wiederholungsrisiko abh\u00e4ngig von nationalen Vorgehensweisen und ethischen Einstellungen durch Speziallabors angeboten.", "management_and_treatment": "Eine spezifische Therapie gibt es nicht. Die Patienten werden symptomatisch behandelt und im Verlauf regelm\u00e4\u00dfig ophthalmologisch kontrolliert. Die Patienten werden \u00fcber die Anwendung von Filtergl\u00e4sern und Kontaktlinsen (rot- oder braunget\u00f6nt) informiert mit dem Ziel verminderter Photophobie und verbesserter Wahrnehmung von Kontrasten. Stark vergr\u00f6\u00dfernde Sehhilfen unterst\u00fctzen das Lesen.", "prognosis": "Die BCM bleibt im Verlauf in der Regel station\u00e4r, jedoch kann selten bei \u00e4lteren Patienten eine Makuladegeneration auftreten.", "summary": "Die Pr\u00e4valenz wird weltweit auf 1/100.000 gesch\u00e4tzt."}]